"How I Reddit when drinking bourbon whiskey. Sorry everyone. (gif.)"
"The faces..."
"So I hear Alicia Keys will be opening the Super Bowl..."
"In honor of the upcoming super bowl..."
"My friend went to Costco today..."
"When you poke someone and they think it was somebody else."
"cat trolling"
"Troll cat"
"trolling cat"
"Trolling level: cat"
"meh  close enough"
"Drive By"
"I know this is an overused song  but I couldn't help but hear this song play through my head when I saw this gif"
"Reconfigured"
"I found the first r/Gonewild post my dad posted. He's a weird dude."
"Deranged psychopath ties dead mouse to his testicles and brings out snake for &quot;feeding time&quot; (NSFW)"
"How i feel attempting to beat the last level in my game"
"After my first death in FTL"
"Leighton Meester"
"forever alone..."
"Forever Arone"
"Self-Shot Difficulty Level: ASIAN."
"Local Multi-player gaming at its best."
"Balloonfest 1986"
"Just a baby anteater..."
"So freaking adorable."
"Katy Perry with a fan [fixed]"
"Poor Spiderman..."
"What's my favorite rice peter? (added spoon and bowl)"
"Scumbag JJ(Spiderman)"
"Now that's just messed up."
"What's your favorite brand of rice  Spiderman?"
"Peter Parker is a cry baby..."
"Fireball taken at the birthday celebration of Sri Guru Nanak"
"Fire - Imgur"
"An Indian Sikh Nihang (warrior) performs a fire breathing act at a demonstration of gatka skills during a procession from Sri Akal Takhat to the Golden Temple"
"Fire Breather"
"Fire Breathing Act (x/post from /r/woahdude"
"Fire Breathing Act (x-post from /r/woahdude)"
"How I feel when I see a girl peeing in public (NSFW)"
"Nothing like a good kick in the ass!!"
"BEHOLD! It's a Christmas Miracle! Cheesus Christ is born!"
"Our spending is spiraling out of control."
"Amazing Coin Balance"
"So bad that it's awesome"
"True and Hilarious"
"Origin of humans"
"oh my FUCK this guy nailed it."
"Ah  the joys of forever alone..."
"Anyone remember these delicious beverages?"
"Hillary watches Bill from Timor Leste"
"A Proud Wife"
"A Proud Wife - edited (Once you see it...)"
"Dialga Used Roar of Time! (animated)"
"Can't stop laughing."
"Whalebait (x-post from r/whalebait)"
"I have no clue where/what this is  but it looks amazing..."
"If you really hated someone in the 90s  you served them this."
"Holy 90s. Where did these drinks go?!"
"I'll see your craving for dead drinks and raise you drinks best forgotten!"
"Only 90s kids will remember this."
"Scumbag OAG"
"Zippity Zoopity Zopity"
"Zippity Zoopity Zopity"
"The Jello Wiggle"
"Bill shake that A  Jello!"
"For my birthday  I present my favorite GIF. An oldy but goody."
"thingken of life."
"MY MOM TOLD ME SHE WOULD BUY ME GRAPES BUT SHE LIED TO ME"
"I might have liked the movie if it was in this direction"
"My Friend Put His Cat on FB... TOONCES THE DRIVING CAT LIVES!"
"New Wolverine reboot?"
"When you go swimming and the water is too cold"
"Easily the most astute review ever written about The Jersey Shore"
"Ummm?"
"Sometimes mistakes can be so easy to make."
"This Is Actually Really Clever"
"Deadpool pole dancing gif. Try not to get too hypnotized."
"So this popped up in r/gifsound"
"so i heard a new deadpool game was coming out"
"Whack your bag appropriately"
"Stay classy Australia"
"its like having a worm in your eye"
"Snake"
"My version of flirting [FIXED]"
"Saw this on FB.. Only on the subway"
"Well. I had an interesting train ride..."
"This guy won't stop staring..."
"This is why I don't ride public transportation"
"You really can't help but enjoy this."
"Its this beautiful mans birthday in 3 hours"
"When my cat vomits and immediately begins eating it"
"When a girl tries to convince me she poops."
"And kids  this is how I met your mother"
"You really want me to believe that she tripped and fell on your dick......"
"Literal Bitch Slap"
"Stop that!"
".... MAKE ME A SANDWICH"
"How to win a staring contest"
"Your favourite GIF"
"how to win a staring contest- dog style"
"It'll be just like Beggar's Canyon back home."
"Get me the fuck out of here!"
"The printer was low on ink anyways"
"Best possible reaction to the scary maze prank"
"WTF?!?!?!?!?!? taking it too far! haha."
"So I googled &quot;baby sloth&quot; and this came up..."
"Baby Sloth."
"Donating money to name your own center...priceless"
"You know  I think I've finally got my life on track..."
"How I feel when the hot ticket agent at the airport says &quot;Have a nice flight&quot; and my reply is &quot;Thanks  you too!&quot;"
"For reddit's dog owners"
"Space toothbrush"
"Space Toothbrush"
"I cant stop laughing..."
"When I'm feeling down this always helps..."
"Kitten  what I think I'm saying is  sometimes  shit happens  somebody's gotta deal with it  and who're you gonna call?!"
"When I remove my pants after working all day and can smell my own balls. [FIXED]"
"I'm glad I don't work here."
"That face"
"Everyone could learn a thing or two from Bill Gates"
"How I feel when I go outside to smoke around someone who just quit smoking."
"When people bring up Jesus at work."
"How I feel being the only guy in my math class."
"Mitt Romney after Obama Endorses Gay Marriage"
"My reaction after seeing Overly Attached Girlfriend all over front page..."
"How i feel whenever my threads get no upvotes."
"When I see my ex in public."
"When The Topic Of Religion Comes Up On Facebook"
"How I feel after Reddit points out a grammatical error and the vultures that follow."
"Perfect Aim"
"From Cute to Killer In 1 year"
"The first year of this German Shepherd"
"Growin' Up"
"Growin' Up [gif]"
"It's only a matter of time... [FIXED]"
"Sounds about right."
"That looks painful.. [NSFL]"
"please tell me where this gif is from!!?!"
"When my dog eats his shit."
"Me when I see a guy has posted on /r/gonewild"
"Introducing... The Monkey Tail Beard"
"I work with very conservative Christians. This morning they were talking about how they agree with North Carolina. This is how I've felt all day long"
"Every time I see a negative comment from a brand new member"
"my reaction when my friend ended our conversation with 'YOLO'"
"When someone asks to borrow my cell phone."
"Oh Brasil..."
"The reason I watch women's beach volleyball"
"Went to a gallery opening tonight: &quot;I'm all out of trees; you want an Adderall?&quot;"
"How my kids feel when I ask if they need help with their homework."
"Ron Swanson at his finest"
"How to win at wrestling. [FIXED]"
"You can see the struggle in his eyes"
"Found this on a different subreddit. Thought it might help someone"
"Midgets gettin' down"
"This was on my news feed...horse face"
"wut"
"No animals were harmed in the making of your T-Bone steak."
"Fuck this..."
"Fuck this ... I'm walking"
"Fuck this I'm walking"
"Llama-Slug"
"I hope he turns into a butterfly one day..."
"Aww what happened to him???:*("
"I just want to put a saddle on it and ride it into the sunset"
"I put my hands up in the air sometime."
"Let's play a game"
"Let's play a game..."
"I'm happy with the status quo with regard to elephants."
"You Suck!"
"This must be what getting a facial for the first time feels like"
"I thought the switch from lurking to posting would be easy"
"How I felt when my first post was downvoted to the depths of hell"
"how i feel as a christian on reddit"
"Every time I try to reach the front page..."
"BOMBARDMENT!"
"I hate this book! I don't want to read it!"
"this is how i feel when i post something and it gets downvoted to hell"
"If Romney did an AMA...[Fixed]"
"trying to prove your point  in an argument with a girl"
"When one of my friends admitted to us he &quot;doesn't really like&quot; Game of Thrones..."
"Every post i make on reddit"
"This is what happens when you try to defend a controversial opinion on reddit"
"Everytime i post something on reddit"
"Believe in yourself"
"VP90X"
"Paul Ryan Tiger Beat Time Magazine Pedo Shoot  these are real"
"Paul Ryan wants to stimulate you economically..."
"paul ryan's face."
"Paul Ryan pumping iron."
"Time Magazine releases 3 hilarious photos of Paul Ryan."
"Time's Douche of the Year"
"America... can you trust this man not to curl in the squat rack?"
"Enterprise Moves to Intrepid"
"You have no idea how happy this just made me..."
"Quasiparticles is what i meant  thanks iphone..."
"iPhones are getting smarter..."
"Makes sense..."
"Hungry Hungry Escalator."
"dinner for two"
"Aww"
"The power of touch."
"Elephants need more love"
"What  I didn't fall down!"
"nope nope nope nope nope. (Nomura's Jellyfish)"
"How the shit does fuck get this big?!"
"A Lions Mane Jellyfish  the largest jellyfish in the world."
"If you cross the street like this  fuck you(x-post from /r/gifs)"
"This definitely needs reposting"
"This definitely needs reposting [fixed]"
"This definitely needs reposting [NOT FIXED]"
"Reposted"
"Well  if you say so...."
"This surely hasn't been reposted in a chwile."
"You asked for a repost"
"A repost you say? As you wish."
"Hasn't been reposted yet"
"Is this funnier because I am reposting this?"
"When someone asks me if I saw the President's AMA"
"Mr. Walter White"
"When my vet told me that I had a very happy and healthy kitty"
"two bees hitting each other"
"Mid-Air Bee Collision Translated from &quot;Bzzz&quot; to &quot;Reddit&quot;"
"Thought r/Eve might enjoy this"
"Fish do it too"
"Pfft who needs a cat for this"
"Mesmereyes"
"Fukushima - what really happened."
"Why? Why would someone do this to his own body?"
"My first random imgur pic"
"Can you repeat that?"
"Fox and the ground"
"Baby Mozilla Firefox"
"Here's my WTF for the day."
"Ostrich shredding the gnar"
"The fuck  Internet?"
"Flightless but not style-less."
"An ostrich skiing."
"Haters gonna hate  ostrich gonna..."
"Beauty and Grace"
"FIRE!"
"How I feel after coming in from a night of drinking"
"More than just a horse... [NSFW]"
"Some years after global warming..."
"New CPR protocols are coming soon! Here is a sneak peek of the new CPR..."
"CPR  Onion style"
"CPR according to The Onion."
"WTF Onion!"
"CPR according to The Onion."
"CPR according to The Onion (apparently this belongs here)"
"a perfect gif sound mashup. oh the horror"
"Well Now I have to Turn off the lights..."
"How would you feel if someone turned you on and left?"
"How would you feel? Huh?"
"After reading a long  meaningful comment"
"STAHP"
"Human... What R U doing..."
"Licking pussy"
"Staaaahp"
"Human STAHP!"
"Smells like freedom"
"Smells like....freedom"
"Toilet Paper Roll Scenes... - Imgur"
"I don't always drink. But when I do  I drink on a horse."
"Proof that Old Spice man and Most Interesting Man have formed the League of Awesome."
"I don't think words can describe."
"too much win for one picture"
"No more epic than this"
"The day the internet imploded"
"that's a lot of awesome"
"The old popcorn trick."
"am i bad for thinking this is funny?"
"Deformed stillbirths due to Agent Orange exposure"
"Vietnamese babies  deformed and stillborn after prenatal exposure to Agent Orange"
"Noticed it was my cake day replying to a red mail"
"Me looking at my Calc test"
"This should be an SNL skit  not real politics."
"Oh really... (x-post /r/atheism)"
"This should be an SNL skit  not real politics. (x-post from /r/atheism)"
"Long shadows on the Salar de Uyuni"
"Spider on my couch"
"How my cats feel about my furniture. (x-post from r/funny)"
"no one sat on either side of me at The Dark Knight Rises"
"Me at a friend's house"
"What I imagine my cat thinks when I tell him to stop picking my couch."
"Whether it happens this election  or in 4 more years  how I envision Obama's last night in the White House"
"That doesn't make any sense!"
"How to deal with other peoples children."
"Something something Modern Family downvote gif"
"Whenever i post my own content"
"When someone makes a dumb comment in a thread that has potential...."
"How to treat people on /new"
"When I'm browsing the new queue"
"Whenever someone tries to hijack the top comment with a pun"
"Startling realization"
"Its Fashionable.. I guess"
"Call me immature  but I can't help but laugh at this."
"Just 2 guys juggling a football"
"It would sure be a different show."
"GLaDOS 2012 - CAKE WE CAN BELIEVE IN. This is my husband's submission to IGN's Video Game Presidential Election Poster Contest"
"Sadist intending to kill everyone with a deadly neurotoxin? Definitely a less painful option than the other candidates."
"So.. a guy walks into a bar.."
"Marketing vs. Reality[Fixed]"
"&quot;Atheists don't care about anyone but themselves!&quot; Yeah  Okay."
"Oh hey Christians! Who's going to burn in hell?"
"Cuteness in a box."
"Look what came in the mail today"
"If i fits  i ships."
"Boxcat"
"OMG  it is my cake day  EMERGENCY KITTENS!"
"I could see where this is a conflicting one."
"Basically  teeth or porn?"
"Heterozygoats..."
"My sweet dark chocolate..."
"All the ladies want him."
"Ladies..."
"Dark Chocolate"
"And Jack gave some to each and every one..."
"So Sadly True"
"Found this on Larry the Cable Guy's facebook"
"It's school time!"
"perfect! just the Back to School savings I was looking for"
"ALEX NO."
"ALEX NO"
"Everyone make sure to stock up for the hurricane."
"Seems about right...."
"I'm in luck......"
"It will be all over facebook.."
"Sigh - 4/20"
"&quot;Actors&quot;"
"Why does these go hand in hand?"
"People with gangster facebook names...."
"Haunting."
"awesome slowpoke"
"Oh  hello!"
"New roommate is classics major and devout Christian..."
"Rioters thank police with food for helping fat man out of trousers"
"Hi Ya'll!"
"Happy Thanksgiving &lt;3"
"It's Friday..."
"Google Maps Win"
"Google burn!"
"Google Maps WIN"
"i Love Banana ..."
"wait for it  wait for it..."
"She's so cut.....OH GOD"
"land before time"
"The Land Before Time"
"Solvay Conference 1927  29 Of History's Most Famous Scientific Minds In One Photo. (Colourised)"
"All of the suden the wii looks like a great system..."
"Playing games was never so fun. NSFW"
"Larry. Fucking. Gooseman."
"This guy..."
"Twin dogs that make you go &quot;aww&quot;"
"If they allowed me in the audience for the Presidential debates..."
"He's the hero that all presidential debates needs."
"Canadian CSI"
"Puts things into perspective"
"We live in a beautiful world"
"Smile"
"Perfect gif-nastics."
"Perfect gif-nastics."
"Timing"
"Einstein in slippers (from here - http://www.princetonhistory.org/exhibitions/#einstein)"
"Classy as fuck"
"Thanks Tosh for the update  saw this on Reddit 4 days ago"
"Dear lord  the stop girl backwards is creepy..."
"Momentarily Possessed Man in background"
"When relatives continue to greet you at holidays with 'You look great. You've gotten so big!' past the age of 12"
"What I tell myself every time I see a link on this subreddit and still click on it"
"Who is she?"
"Today i told my gay roommate that i haven't seen mean girls..."
"Sure  Japan. Whatever."
"cats and cats and cats and cats and cats"
"Love When I Make Myself Laugh"
"kitty cat dance."
"Dogs are no friends of mine..."
"How I feel after IHOP"
"Just Michael Jackson  vodka  and two midgets."
"Just Michael Jackson partying with midgets."
"YEEAAAHHH!!!"
"Privacy"
"Finding out Christopher Eccleston is going to be in Thor 2."
"How I feel as a FedEx driver who randomly picked September 21st as a day off 4 months ago."
"Grim Grinning"
"For your viewing pleasure: 9 dancing."
"God Damn It!"
"420 blaze it faggot"
"An Interesting Story"
"Well  that explains everything"
"where do the funny images on the internet come from?"
"BOO you Whore"
"Mattress down the stairs"
"Dad of the Year"
"Deal with it"
"Dad of the year"
"A new perspective"
"It's that time of year again."
"apocalypse?"
"When I see people talking about how cold it is in their country"
"Welcome to Canada eh? (I don't know if this is a repost) also my first post!"
"Father is getting frisky!"
"All My Friends Are Dead"
"Best Bed EVER...?!"
"One annoying problem taken care of....."
"Christians:0 Atheists: 0 Jabba: 1"
"I laughed for about five minutes when I saw this  it just slays me."
"Saw that a Facebook &quot;friend&quot; liked this along with 700 000 others. Caption: &quot;HE DIED FOR US! Like to thank him.&quot; I dont think they get it..."
"Cobra Cocktail Anyone? I guess it's called &quot;Cu Chi Wine&quot; in Vietnam. Just for some extra giggles."
"Ahah! I caught you in t..... Uh...you can have it"
"Beard Leader  Standing By"
"X-Wing beard!"
"I don't blame him"
"How to ruin someone's day"
"You kick a kid = You get knocked the fuck out"
"It was worth a shot!"
"The Philly Phanatic. Doing the Lord's work. (xpost r/baseball)"
"So Close... [gif]"
"Clever mascot. [Gif]"
"Nice try though..."
"Bro-ba Fett"
"Bro-ba Fett"
"if Boba Fett was a bro..."
"I'm glad I'm not the only one who thinks this"
"The only thing"
"Me when my girlfriend says she has a &quot;surprise&quot; for me."
"My horse is amazing"
"How I like to imagine everyone boasting about weed on the internet"
"Sand struck by lightning. (Photo by Ken Smith  National Geographic)"
"I Google image searched &quot;Social Network Vertical&quot;"
"The future of the Universe"
"The future of the Universe... with better fitting music"
"Seems like it fits"
"The future of our planet. Damn."
"Why Choose The Lesser Evil?"
"Thought r/aww could use some more baby dolphin"
"I see your kitten and I raise you a baby dolphin"
"Baby Dolphin"
"What's wrong dad"
"I HAVE A NEW BUSINESS PLAN"
"Upgrade your cat."
"Spongebob knows it all"
"Dog."
"Why my room is always dirty..."
"A tug-of-war breaks out between riot police and protesters at the height of disturbances in the Ardoyne area of north Belfast  Northern Ireland"
"Police and rioters come together to... uh..."
"Police and rioters come together to help fat man out of trousers"
"Police and rioters come together to help fat man out of trousers [Fixed]"
"Police and rioters come together to help fat man from chestburster"
"You are richer than most if..."
"You are more than fortunate."
"Wisdom at its finest"
"Cats playing with giraffe."
"Dutch Renaissance self-shot"
"Ballsy-iest man I've ever seen x-post r/AdrenalinePorn"
"Oh shit!"
"Meanwhile in Russia (check out the &quot;not bad&quot; face on the right)"
"Longest gif ever  but it's worth the wait."
"After staring at this for a good 10 minutes  I can see where it loops."
"Oh no  we're going down"
"Fuck everything about this."
"My brain hurts. (x-post from r/trees)"
"Wait for it..."
"No Boo.. why?"
"What I want to do to all the Diablo III posters"
"I can't be the only one who died laughing!"
"Enough! All of you are beneath me. I am a god  you dull creature and I shall not be bullied!"
"I get the feeling that a redditor was involved"
"Reddit's worst nightmare."
"Police crackdown on redditors"
"Reddit's worst nightmare [Fixed]"
"Seems reasonable."
"Truth in Advertising"
"How I feel when I get 30 upvotes in one link"
"Getting laid for the first time in almost 7 months."
"Just spent an hour watching this"
"I could watch this for hours"
"Ain't No One - The Story of Tiny Hippo"
"aint no one fkz with tiny hippo. aint no one"
"Ain't no one."
"Ain't no one"
"Ain't No One F--ks with Tiny Hippo (x-post from r/aww)"
"The Tiny Hippo Story"
"Ain't no one fucks with tiny hippo."
"Ain't no one"
"My brother was caught by the police at a speed trap today  his response was to make this sign."
"Let's wash the Hedgehog!"
"Bath time"
"Time for a bubble bath!"
"Bruce Lee"
"New Chuck Norris fact."
"San Diego"
"Kids are easy to please"
"Vintage pictures always intrigue me. Boys rolling hoops."
"I'm tired of these motherfuckin' snakes on my motherfuckin' chain!"
"Well there's your problem..."
"Future Redditors of America"
"How I feel every morning while picking up breakfast"
"How I feel ever time I get upvotes"
":D o.o 0.0 (╯°□°）╯︵ ┻━┻"
"Browsing r/WTF"
"Not sure what to call this"
"1N1TIAT3"
"How I felt at the end of my little brother's class recorder recital"
"This just makes me smile  hopefully you will too"
"One time  at bear camp..."
"One time  at bear camp..."
"Huh.. my fur got dirty.."
"Bruce  go home."
"My attempt at getting my fat cat to move..."
"my attempt at getting my fat cat to move (xpost from r/funny)"
"I just figured my internet was REALLY slow."
"Eminem advice"
"The east coast right now."
"where do astronauts hang out"
"Astronauts hang out at the..."
"You wanna piece of me??"
"&quot;Come at me!&quot; - &quot;Okay.&quot;"
"Foreplay explained in one SFW image"
"Man and Woman"
"That cat surely loves biting on arms   oh wait .. thats a watermelon."
"Found this interesting... Osama 1993"
"Hank"
"Hank Hill has a darker side..."
"Childhood ruined ... (Slightly NSFW)"
"My first try at the imgur roulette thing."
"wat"
"I heart reddit"
"Where is Waldo?"
"Where is Waldo?"
"Where is Waldo......."
"Redditor opens pack from the back  switches only one and puts it back"
"Ermahgawd! Wandowers!!"
"i really wonder what happened"
"Wow  the view from Mount Reinebringen."
"On top of the world"
"Browsing reddit while a girl you like is watching..."
"Penguin"
"Prodigy... He eats lil children via lil children"
"Not even sure what to say about this."
"help me find this video. in return  tits!!"
"And with a rebel yell he cried..."
"Shaq is tripping"
"Having dinner outside on a warm Spring night."
"HIFW A gnat is flying around me"
"Poke a Shaq"
"Jesus  Bobby  you fucking retard!"
"This kid doesn't give a FUCK"
"And why not?"
"Meow So Serious?"
"That One Too."
"Fast-food take-out."
"Drive-In... Kinda."
"How i feel when a predator missile goes out. Me. Ever. Time."
"Lunch Time"
"SUPRISE MOTHERF**KER"
"Hide and seek: African safari edition"
"A most proper work atmosphere (via /r/interiordesign)"
"Forget Santa and God  this is the question I'm dreading from my kids."
"Some people just want to burn and watch the world."
"Well have you?"
"Jedi Master Obama Wan Kenobi"
"My leg..."
"Thou shalt drop thy like it's hot."
"&quot;One of you will betray me...&quot; -Keanu Reeves"
"Andrew thought Jesus was a badass"
"Andrew thought Jesus was a badass (x-post funny)"
"Swag Jesus"
"Figured id give the GIF and sound making a shot. Enjoy."
"how i feel after unsubscribing from r/atheism"
"we got a badass over here"
"A pod of sleeping sperm whales"
"You wanna know how I got these berries?"
"Oh  watermelon."
"My favorite image on the entire internet"
"Oreo Memories"
"Woah there sonny  this is my sled asshole..."
"Sled-jacked"
"Grand Theft Auto"
"One of my favourite photos from the interwebs..."
"Penguin Buddy"
"Hairless cats"
"Yeah  shut up Charles."
"Charles  you asshole"
"Shut up  Charles."
"My new favorite gif"
"Ain't no one fuck with tiny hippo. [REPOST]"
"tiny hippo"
"Well that escalated quickly"
"Water balloon exploding on a guy's head in slow motion"
"Standing up for yourself in an argument"
"Haters gonna hate"
"Never ride alone!"
"Hitler calls shotgun when you ride alone"
"Wow  it's that serious?"
"When you ride alone..."
"Guys  we might need to be more careful."
"Sharing a car with Godwin"
"I was doing researching ways to cut carbon for science. I found this..."
"Deep"
"How I feel looking out the window at night"
"SHIT"
"Gorilla mom disapproves"
"I've had long hair for most of my life  and this is what I sent to my friends as soon as I cut it all off."
"How i felt when i was watching the &quot;18 minute&quot; San Diego Fireworks show"
"If only I had a wife and this actually happened."
"Watch out for that croc mate"
"My ex girlfriend"
"What I picture when listening to people debate iPhone vs Android [Fixed]"
"Of course! Why didn't I think of that?"
"Absolutely no faith in humanity after reading this."
"We really need to move that deer crossing..."
"Disco Bear"
"Dance with me  make me sway"
"Disco bear"
"Dancing Polar Bear at Bernard Spit in Alaska (x-post from r/AnimalPorn)"
"Cute &quot;dancing&quot; polar bear"
"Polar Bear has got the moves!"
"want to know what you look like right now?"
"SpongeCrop"
"I am never watching Sponge Bob again....."
"Wow...Found this lady in Target  she's either completely oblivious or has a great sense of humor"
"Stop dancing.. bitch!"
"I Am Banksy..."
"HUNTER!"
"Pandamonium"
"Uh... Yeah. So this exists."
"how i want to respond when someone asks why i don't go to church"
"Glory of Satan"
"F*ck yeah  I'm a monkey!"
"I dare reddit to find me a picture even more awesome than this."
"Axe Cop...!"
"Hey kitty~ ugh..."
"seriously ppl... half the things on here don't even belong in r/wtf. an xray of someone talking  the russian headquarters and a guy fucking a prostitute do not make you say 'wtf'. when i come to this subreddit i want to be made to audibly say 'wtf'. half this shit belongs in woahdude or r/funny."
"Googled &quot;How to get on the front page of reddit&quot;. Wasn't disappointed."
"Google'd &quot;How to get on the front page of Reddit&quot;... was not disappointed."
"Halloween in Russia"
"Seriously."
"I see london  I see France!"
"Pointless much?"
"I asked my friend how she was doing... she sent me this."
"Tablecloth Pull Fail"
"fixed scary monster crushes kid"
"Ta-dah...oh shit!"
"My brother is visiting Australia. I asked him if they had any American food in the restaurants. He sent me this."
"This is what passes for &quot;Ameican food&quot; in Australia"
"For all you grammar nazi's out there"
"Made my day"
"Don't stop now"
"The voice I hear for every-single-Grumpy_Cat-post..."
"When I found out my ex-gf got pregnant twice and gained 50 lbs."
"Just found out my ex girl is now pregnant by my now ex best friend."
"we can both burn"
"Look guys  if there's a fire  we're all just gonna die  alright?"
"Mr. Big is pleased"
"Think she got the point. [NSFW]"
"Somebody thought of something dirty."
"Parent and child"
"Sean Connery as a sailer"
"This is a shot of the Sarychev Volcano Eruption in 2009 from the International Space Station.."
"Sick ass pic of a Volcano from space."
"Awesome photo from space of an erupting volcano (Sarychev Peak  Kuril Islands)"
"Kitten vs Turtle  the ultimate battle"
"How to lose a girlfriend in 10 seconds."
"And Yet Nice Guys Still Finish Last..."
"When given the chance...always deliver..."
"someones sleeping on the couch tonight.."
"Wish I thought to commute like this..."
"Mass Transit Rider level 99"
"My girlfriend just came back from a 3 month trip this about sums up my reaction when she came home."
"Simba gets PWNED."
"Live to See Another Day"
"When I'm not in the mood of an arguement"
"Looks like 7/11 ran out of cups..."
"7/11's Slurpee Day in Australia. Bring your own container."
"Reddit in a nutshell..."
"An oldie but a goodie"
"The sound makes all the difference..."
"Poor Squirdward."
"Hats for Cats"
"Hangover Cat"
"What  you expect every lynx to be photogenic?"
"Pickpocket level: stupid"
"This is what a bone cancer patient's skull looks like. Ouch."
"When I see someone trying to recall in enemy jungle with 5 mia..."
"500 Hour Exposure - eXtreme Deep Field | NASA Hubble [2382 X 2078]"
"Quick! Before the fundies........"
"A long time ago in a galaxy......."
"I keep looking at this picture and think about the possibilities. Of life  how it all began and the amazing chain of events that had to happen for us to exist  and take this photograph. I mean how arrogant must one be to actually believe that this was created just for them  before they go to heaven."
"Something bad is about to happen..."
"Go ahead and have a seat....."
"Please Explain"
"Chess play of Nature"
"Environmental battle"
"All /r/wtf has been lately is gore and porn. Thought I should bring back it's roots."
"Softball sized eye that washed up on a beach."
"A giant eyeball from a mysterious sea creature washes ashore in in Pompano Beach."
"No  YOU  FUKYU!"
"An Autumn Morning in all it's Beauty."
"When I have a dog  I'm getting one of these..."
"Gotta love video chat"
"tribute to redditors"
"I just sent my bf this.. at midnight...yup...i'm that kinda girl..."
"I'm guessing this will intrigue you..."
"When you see it."
"LOL"
"she REALLY wants that sandwhich"
"Mountain Rats? Fuck that."
"This fucked with my mind for longer than it should have."
"Ron"
"Ron Swanson ∞"
"Ron Swanson Fractal"
"Infinite Ron Swanson"
"Googled Funny Reddit. Did not dissapoint"
"One wish"
"One wish"
"It is done."
"How I Imagine Most Girls On Reddit"
"What we do during a perfect day."
"Each And Every Summer"
"The internets is more fun!"
"Meanwhile  in Switzerland"
"Now that's a hot tub"
"Auschwitz personnel at a weekend retreat  1944. [X-post from r/historyporn]"
"Auschwitz personnel at a weekend retreat  1944. [468x297]"
"Every time I see a redditor post about their kids"
"How I feel when browsing my facebook news feed."
"Snow? or Bacon?....hmm"
"Finally!"
"Freddie Mercury"
"As an American  this is how I feel about how Australians feel about our heatwave posts."
"As a Canadian  this is how I feel about those heat wave posts."
"My favorite LOL in the game  thus far"
"The five second rule."
"Pick a card  son!"
"A subtle way to introduce believers to Atheism"
"Troll Dad!"
"Ya  your candidate is better"
"He loves it  that's all that matters."
"Yep  he's doing fine!"
"How I feel when my manager goes on vacation..."
"When I find out my ex girlfriend from high school became a Mormon and had four kids."
"It's finally here!"
"This is oddly mesmerizing."
"Sir  I think you forgot something."
"I think you missed a spot.."
"Doing all the work. NSFW"
"Today you  tomorrow me."
"When Barney and Sesame Street collide..."
"Feed Me + Elmo = Awesome"
"uh oh..."
"I've made a terrible mistake..."
"Another kind of Alphabet..."
"I love pie charts"
"The World’s Most Accurate Pie Chart"
"The World’s Most Accurate Pie Chart (FIXED)"
"WTF Jesus"
"Don't Be Racist! Be like Mario"
"Everyone should be like Mario"
"no sure if WTF or Creepy"
"Do you take red pill or the blue pill? (Xpost r/vertical)"
"My favourite hipster edit."
"Caught my parents having sex today..."
"Me when I realize a creeper is about to blow up and kill me in hardcore mode."
"My reaction to the new youtube layout!"
"How I feel when I get home after a long day and realize I'm out of beer"
"When I found lube on my parents nightstand."
"When I found lube on my parents nightstand."
"Walking in to see my girlfriend browsing my internet history"
"How I felt going on r/spiders as a person with arachnophobia."
"How I feel browsing reddit not having seen Dark Knight Rises yet"
"MFW I realized it's my two year cake day.."
"Logging into online banking and finding I've been overdrafting for the last week"
"leaving for work  only to realize it has snowed..."
"Me upon discovering my entire submission's comments have been downvoted"
"Drinking Game"
"Recently stumbled upon this"
"Drinking Board Game[Memes]"
"Bitch Slapper"
"Bitch slapper"
"So  given light of the recent zombie attacks: I present gnombies eating a flamingo"
"There's no gnome cure for this epidemic"
"Jabba: 1  Christians/Atheists/Solo: 0"
"Jabba:1 Christians:0 Atheists:0 Solo:0 I think we all can agree."
"Chemis in Copenhagen"
"Who says graffiti can't be beautiful?[xpost from /r/graffiti]"
"Most awkward old west photo ever...I do not make a cute saloon girl."
"Diagnosis."
"Just a check up."
"4 in the morning? I work 10PM-6AM then start work again 11 hours later after an 8 mile bike ride."
"When my friends complain about insignificant crap."
"The one true fact of this universe."
"Captain Thor Hammer"
"The Hammer"
"OMG pasta"
"Peacefully eating dinner  when all of the sudden..."
"My Facebook feed finally delivered!"
"Red Panda baby!"
"What i feel like coming home at 4am drunk as fuck [gif]"
"How I Feel Everytime I Tell My Sister A Joke"
"Those disgusting ex-girlfriend porno sites (SFW)"
"Dolphins are adorable WTF!"
"A trip to the African Safari"
"Don't Cover it!"
"DON'T COVER IT!!!"
"Cats! &lt;3"
"I kind of want to do this to someone"
"Has Steam really been around this long? That's a third of my life!"
"Nine years and counting"
"Pugception"
"Yo I heard you like puppies...."
"I heard you liked pugs..."
"Willception."
"this cat is trippin'"
"The biggest whore in gaming history [FIXED]"
"Originator of the douchebag look..."
"Greeley Haven Panorama from Opportunity"
"Picture of mars from one of the rovers as seen on space.com"
"Mars."
"Panorama image from Opportunity Mars Exploration Rover at Greeley Haven (published just last week; source in comments)"
"First Graffiti on Mars"
"So i'm looking to get a weasel as a pet"
"God Answers Prayers of Paralyzed Little Boy"
"I'm going to hell for laughing at this"
"Seems about accurate..."
"&quot;No.&quot;"
"I think this is my all-time favorite by The Onion"
"God answers boys prayers."
"I love the Onion"
"I love the onion [x-post r/funny]"
"Pug Yoda has something to say."
"Just found this. Some bastard painted her..."
"You mean they became stairs?"
"Wrecking ball beats mini van."
"How to become the most hated person on campus"
"I just found out that I lost my job  while I'm still at work and no one has told me. I never thought I'd relate to this guy..."
"All I could think of last night as Jim Lehrer kept losing control of the debate."
"How I view Jim Lehrer after last night's debate"
"How I feel watching porn and my name is called out by the girl."
"asus paper scissors"
"LPT Request: Best way to open these?"
"5:01pm every work day"
"At the end of the work day"
"That's racist!"
"Meanwhile in Australia..."
"As a black male  these stereotypes offend me"
"As a black male  I still find this funny."
"As a black male  I still find this funny"
"Saw this on facebook  and started crying out laughing."
"Subtle Racism."
"Welfare"
"How to Get Welfare"
"Damn..."
"Gets me every time"
"Lobstercycle"
"My friend likes mountains."
"Hairicopter"
"Hairicopter"
"Jay Cutler is a fellow Redditor."
"Any Bears fans out there?"
"My dog got sick while I was at work. This pretty much sums it up."
"As long as you are quiet  this is perfectly acceptable."
"When I find out my submissions get upvoted."
"I whip my crazy lady hair"
"Whoooo! INTERNET!"
"Someone enjoys their dubstep..."
"Because Phil Collins."
"expressing yourself (work edition)"
"How I feel when I make the front page"
"Finding that it's my Cake Day in the office!!!"
"When coffee and monster kicks in at the same time..."
"ATTACK!"
"This Dude's Ankle Better Watch Out"
"ATTACK!"
"It's my cake day so I present... Man stuck in a mailbox."
"How I feel I feel when I drop something breakable/valuable  and save it with my foot."
"Sometimes listening to music and redditing can be amazing."
"When my brother texts me saying that he's bringing 2 girls over  and one is for me."
"/r/GoneWild in a nutshell."
"Googled Anne Hathaway  found this. Goodnight Internet!"
"This goes here."
"Anne Hatha...wait you're not cat woman?"
"Really glad this is what comes up when you Google image search 'Anne Hathaway'"
"Oh anne hathaway I thought you were a cat.."
"This showed up on my news feed..."
"Anne Hathaway as a dog..."
"What's up dog"
"How convinient!"
"I offer no explanatio"
"What working at taco bell at minimum wage does to me."
"WTF? haha"
"Guiles theme meets Reddit."
"In light of pending Zombie Apocalypse  I present Zombie Playground..."
"What. The. Fuck."
"Mmmm... Yummy"
"A delicious snack."
"How could it have ended any other way?"
"That's Liu Kang's chair"
"This is the worst thing I've laughed at recently"
"Liu Kang Wins!"
"Liu Kang Finish Her!"
"Test your might"
"Funniest porn gif i've ever seen"
"Sounds about right to me!"
"Sounds about right.... (xpost from /r/gaming)"
"Meanwhile...In North Korea"
"Crew Chief Sgt. Fred Oser otherwise known as DON'T FUCK WITH ME!"
"An ad for a social worker's degree."
"These Facebook ads are starting to scare the shit out of me"
"Not sure how the creepy picture relates to the ad..."
"Does anyone else think this is creepy?"
"Why... why the hell is there a creepy ass baby on this ad? I just wanted to watch a video."
"Walking my fish."
"For all of you poor  poor souls entrenched in finals."
"Photoshop troll"
"Atheist Extremists"
"I bought everything in my Steam cart before I logged off....right?"
"How I feel as an atheist when asked to say grace."
"Woke up to a full inbox and double my comment karma  with no memory of posting last night"
"What I looked like when that loud-ass jet flew over downtown."
"Suddenly a wild babby appears"
"How does this even happen?"
"LOL THIS KID IS CRYING OVER SPILLED CHOCOLATE MILK AND THAT DAD IS JUST TAKING A PICTURE. xd TOP NOT FRONT PAGE MATERIAL."
"Slurp guard - TAKE MY MONEY"
"Brilliant jump(x-post from /r/anypic)"
"I have a serious question."
"Has science gone too far?"
"Pingu listen to music! My new favourite gif."
"Pengu loves Kernkraft 400"
"Close enough."
"How para-olympians are made"
"Necrognomicons for your garden!"
"The garden zombies are coming."
"Classy lawn decor"
"Deleting a post with no upvotes."
"When I go into the wrong class  sit down for 10 minutes  then leave after realizing it isn't my class."
"Needs practise"
"RAWR!"
"RAWR!!! (x-post from /r/gifs)"
"...they hatin'"
"To the Centre of the Milky Way"
"Amazing picture of Laser pointing Towards the Center of the Milky Way (x-post /r/ExposurePorn)"
"Lily Pads."
"Sundown Across the Marsh"
"Breathtaking sunset"
"Oh happy day!"
"Look how cute he is!"
"This man has seen things no one should ever have to see"
"The things this guy has seen...... * shiver*"
"Headbutting my own face?"
"Can't be untied [NSFW]"
"Walking away."
"Dat Tattoo"
"I'll vote for the man with some style!"
"Bear noize"
"Ursa Thrasher"
"Jump Around!"
"When gif's need sound"
"Bounce Wit' Me Bear!"
"Gangster panda"
"One Cool Cat."
"Late night redditors"
"Beautiful shuttle launch photo"
"right way?"
"When my Mom does my laundry randomly and finds a crusty sock.."
"You can be anything"
"Anything..."
"My friend did this great photoshop work of the lion with the head of a pigeon"
"Just another day sticking it to the man"
"The animal of destruction"
"He's going to be pissed when he finds out about the jacuzzi..."
"Every dog in the world"
"Troll Dog"
"Dog Logic"
"Every dog in the world"
"I Googled unicorn and got this....WTF"
"Unicorn Lady"
"[pic] {wtf.ca} That Horn Looks....... Painful."
"Unicorns are majestic horned horses they said. Unicorns are beautiful they said."
"Unicorns are majestic horned horses they said. Unicorns are beautiful they said. (X post from r/WTF)"
"How in the..."
"I could watch this all day!"
"How dogs should fetch."
"One year on Hormones toady!(MtF) What an incredible year!"
"One year from Guy to Girl!"
"Easter eggs for Hitler"
"That Kid Is Pretty Scared Of Fish"
"kid is scared of fish"
"In Soviet Russia  Fish catch you!"
"Oh look. The weather and my ex  in one news story."
"Hi guys  It's me. Jennifer Aniston"
"what would you name this cat?"
"I like your chin strap....wait wtf?"
"My girlfriend is trying to convince me to shave my head  so I turned to Google Images for help. Didn't disappoint."
"And everyone that has reblogged this on Tumblr believes it."
"Bad luck Brian today"
"Whenever my cat runs away from my affections."
"Atheism seems like a hot topic right now. So I googled it..."
"Yum!"
"I'm gonna get 'im... Oh  son of a!"
"I thought we agreed to not interfere in earthly affairs."
"What it's like when my team chases an enemy Shaco. [xpost from r/funny]"
"me dodging a fight with my gf"
"College football  Hogwarts style"
"Logical Advice"
"No bring them back! [NSFW]"
"titty kitty [X-post from r/nsfw_gifs]"
"Logged onto my imgur account today to see that someone added this without my knowledge..."
"So I went on Hundred Water’s Twitter Page  and saw this…. just WTF!"
"Romance!"
"Why would someone draw this."
"The romance these couples have is contagious."
"Come at me bro."
"Every time I see a hot girl..."
"I've got a song stuck in my head..."
"What happens if u leave some cats with a box?"
"Better grab an umbrella"
"Basically every drawing instruction book ever."
"How to draw an owl"
"How I see most drawing tutorials"
"How to draw an owl"
"Adolf Hipster"
"What snake venom does to blood"
"Bulbasaur Evolution"
"My favorite gif."
"Evolution"
"Obama's jump shot."
"The POTUS playing basketball with some white guys."
"Real life Scooby Doo"
"Run it out..."
"My attempts to reach the front page"
"Surfin USA"
"Kelly Slater’s training"
"me going to bed after a late night out.. [gif]"
"Right on target"
"Now this is one bedroom I wouldn't mind living in for the rest of my life."
"When someone tries to insult me."
"This hotel knows how to do it"
"This is Ringo  he's named after the Beatle"
"Punctuation Pirates."
"So cute I almost cried .-."
"Ladies and gentleman of Reddit: I give you the Pomskie."
"The Men in Black are seemingly monitoring Google Maps"
"Remember the creepy person/thing in the google street view pic? It's blurred out now!"
"what is it??"
"4chan caught someone censoring Google Street View  covering up something really weird."
"Everything else wrong with this picture aside  someone had to draw this. ಠ_ಠ"
"You just know the warning is there because someone tried it"
"Caught Slipping."
"Well  that's embarrassing..."
"Bae caught me slippin."
"OMG SMH LOL YOLO (when you see it)"
"Got &quot;caught&quot; slippin"
"I love it when my S/O takes pics of me while I sleep!"
"Sleeping with the babe..."
"Lmfao."
"What a cute couple . . ."
"Anger Management"
"Seriously WTF (EDITED)"
"Seriously?"
"Dear eastern people saying the world hasn't ended"
"Picard on r/wtf back to its roots"
"How I feel browsing Reddit lately."
"Hardcore Mosh Pit"
"Let the dancing begin"
"Everybody's Doing the Cat Dance!"
"How does this even happen?!? (cats)"
"This just appeared on my Facebook feed."
"Let's PARTY!"
"Sweet fighting game mash-up shit whippin"
"Poor Spidey"
"Sorry  friend"
"&quot;I'm sorry  they made me!&quot;"
"I'm sorry  pinata bro"
"How I Feel Down Voting Something on r/aww"
"When I Down Vote Something on r/aww"
"How I just felt (as a new redditor and a Canadian)  when I down voted something for the 1st time..."
"I'm a lover  not a hater"
"Shuttle Endeavour passing the University of Texas Tower"
"Space Shuttle over Austin."
"Space shuttle Endeavor being transported over Texas this morning"
"The Space Shuttle hitching a ride over Austin  Texas this morning."
"Endeavor flying past the University of Texas tower"
"Pic of Joseph Kittinger falling from 102 800 ft in 1959 during Project Excelsior"
"Balls | Joseph Kittinger's record-breaking skydive from 102 800 ft. (31 300 m.). {Photograph by Volkmar Wentzel.} (Commentary: He nearly breaks the sound barrier  the freefall record is still unbroken to this day  and all this was done in and around 1959-1960.) [1417×1800]"
"oh ya know... just someone skydiving from space in 1960"
":|"
"I'm not exactly sure what just happened"
"What the fuck is going on?!"
"Don't Startle Diabeetus Cat"
"How I feel about Windows 8"
"My favourite GIF of all time.."
"Jim Gaffigan as a Cat"
"Just a GIF on docking"
"Let's all take a moment and be positive for a change."
"As if using cyberlockers didn't make me paranoid enough..."
"Is Steam telling fat jokes now?"
"Obama + The Walking Dead"
"Walking Dead Obama victorious!"
"Sho when shall you shhmoke with me?"
"The Dark Knight Rishesh  eh?"
"Benstillerfaggot69@verizon.net"
"[Repost] How to open a Windows 98 session without password"
"It's Morph... oh wait nevermind."
"Abraham Lincoln understood the future."
"Words of Wisdom from Abraham Lincoln."
"Abe"
"How it feels when I free up hard drive space"
"Powerful."
"That is exactly how it is..."
"From the Tiger Temple in Kanchanaburi  Thailand"
"How I feel browsing /new"
"Whenever I have to do anything other than hovering my mouse over your link"
"Modern Warfare"
"Strongly considered this when i found out that my car had been shit all over by birds"
"How I picture r/gaming today..."
"Me when my posts get triple digits karma"
"When the postman comes with my online purchases"
"Not even this guy hates hula hoops"
"Limitations"
"Trying to make it to the Front Page"
"Cue The Curtain"
"And that's the show folks  thanks for coming"
"The most fabulous of all Klansmen."
"Now that I think about it  the Ku Klux Glam belongs here. (x-post from r/pics)"
"As I understand it first post should be a good post  so I give you this"
"You can see the evil in his eyes."
"James Holmes is actually a Muppet. (x-post from r/funny)"
"Who is he REALLY?"
"first appearance"
"James Holmes' makes his first court appearance."
"Spidey's watching me"
"As a Redditor over 30 this is how I feel when I read &quot;advice&quot; given by most Redditors"
"How I feel playing sports nowadays..."
"You light that pipe!"
"Canadians are loose cannons"
"This will haunt your dreams."
"ARISE! [NSFW]"
"WE MARCH AT DAWN!"
"I can only question... WHY?"
"this is what will happen if octomom does another porno"
"Jersey Shore was just cancelled. Faith in humanity: restored"
"My friends profile picture on Facebook."
"&quot;I'll just get a liiittle closer...&quot;"
"Let me just get a little closer..."
"When I think things are going well in inferno."
"Okay  on second thoughts maybe it was kind of funny..."
"Our trusty babysitter."
"Everything looks normal... right?"
"Pretty women  right?"
"face flip"
"Dutchfacebook page just submitted This.."
"This is just strange"
"A story."
"The wind never had a chance"
"Posting a text based post in /r/funny"
"Words to live by"
"My favorite picture of Blake"
"Police Notes"
"Just a baby elephant playing"
"Did I hear something about elephants?"
"Grapefruits"
"Definitely going to feed my future babies grapefruit"
"Like mother  like duck"
"I think this belongs here"
"Saw this on FB with the title 'One word to describe this picture' my answer was 'Merica!!!"
"Things change......"
"Target Sells Bananas for Night-Time Fun."
"get me an avocado  an ice pick and my snorkel."
"Possibly the most ridiculous stunt by MacGyver"
"Possibly the most reposted stunt by MacGyver."
"Took me forever to train him to do this."
"Love this gif"
"Aww? More like AWWWWWWW YEEAAAAAHHH"
"Got a light?"
"Devilishly handsome dog."
"Sleep tight Reddit..."
"But I just want to cuddle..."
"Found these on Stumble  too awesome not to share (and yes I know some of them are reposts) [PERFECT TIMING]"
"Bathtime is a real Mission: Impossible  sometimes"
"Me?"
"Whip it real good"
"When I hear a hot girl at a party's been asking about me"
"A literal snapshot of evolution. (xpost from r/atheism)"
"Crab."
"My friend went fishing and found a missing link in fish and crustaceans. Your move creationist."
"The crayfish's last revenge..."
"False advertisement as its best"
"It always looks so good in the ads..."
"Relevant."
"Tattoo spotted at a bar"
"For real dawg."
"Keeping the black man down"
"Shit Tyrone"
"Assassin's Creed"
"White people...."
"To this day  it remains my second favorite gif"
"Pretty sure its a repost...but its so good."
"Nothing like some concussive blast to wake you up in the morning"
"It is a grenade. What could possibly go wrong?"
"Not the best idea."
"Every time I try to post on Reddit."
"Behind the scenes.."
"Now that you mention it  I've always kinda felt they were."
"Soccer is dangerous! - Imgur"
"Wut."
"3... 2... 1... FIGHT!"
"It all makes sense now."
"Meet 'Big Mo' - the man with biceps as large as a grown man's waist"
"Popeye?"
"Moustafa Ismail  24  has the largest biceps in the world (31 inch circumference)."
"He ate way too much spinach"
"Meet Moustafa  The man with the biggest biceps in the world.... Also  the most ridiculous looking man in the world"
"Something is not right with this photo... can't quite put my finger on it..."
"I wonder if they saw this cumming."
"Morgan Fucking Freeman"
"Mont Saint-Michel at Low Tide"
"Next Generation Unreal"
"First Contact"
"First contact"
"Hello There Child  Come Closer"
"I don't know why but this is one of the best comics I've read in a long time"
"Finish it."
"Friends parking ticket. I wouldn't mind getting one like these really."
"Oh Dumbledore.."
"Hair Like Fire"
"honestly  she should have known better."
"How I felt after my last submission"
"Dem toes"
"So this showed up on my twitter."
"A friend on FB thought it would be a good idea to draw eyebrows on her dog"
"Found this on my dash on tumblr... I couldn't stop staring."
"Is it warm in here  or are you in heat?"
"I AM SEXY AND I KNOW IT"
"High or Suave? Either way  it looks pretty cool"
"Laaaaaaaaaaadies..."
"Well hello there..."
"Just makes me smile."
"How you doin'?"
"You were saying?"
"My name is Barney Stinson. I am a survivor living in New York City."
"He is legend"
"I'll just leave this here."
"you know what  fuck it."
"How I feel when I drink my morning coffee"
"I should buy a boat..."
"This shit makes me laugh every time."
"Realizing today that I've been here three years now..."
"How I feel landing a (well) paid internship..."
"How I feel every time I get paid"
"After making the front page twice in the same week"
"Real Spongebob...."
"Meet Luna!! I make her work for her treats.."
"My cat Luna demands her treats  and when she doesn't get them she get very angry."
"The Pencil Maker"
"Holy crap! Amazing pencil lead art."
"Hard at work."
"There's a difference"
"There's a difference"
"Photos"
"Should've cam whored Neal!"
"clicking pics is always important (for girls!)"
"Bookstore fun."
"Join my Google Circle!"
"Google + (x post from /r pics)"
"How I imagine reddit"
"The majority of posts on /new"
"The majority of posts in /new"
"Where is this gif from?"
"Religion."
"New redditors"
"Seems legit."
"Why isn't my house built like this?"
"Seems legit"
"Deep fry"
"It wasn't me!"
"When my boss asked me to go to Staples for the third time in two hours"
"I don't even... what?"
"Can't unsee."
"I see your picture of Michael Jackson drinking vodka with midgets and raise you a picture of Michael Jackson holding a huge pair of underwear with doves on his wrists"
"This photo is my inspiration for living."
"My cat lives a tough life...."
"I searched &quot;Swag Cat&quot; on google. I was not disappointed."
"Gangster"
"Makes me laugh everytime"
"Balance [gif]"
"Balance [gif]"
"Dearest Reddit  I have studied you for a year now and I believe you will be entertained by my collection."
"Distinct Difference"
"Bert and Ernie in HD"
"Bert and Ernie"
"The years have not been kind to Bert &amp; Ernie"
"anyone feel like not sleeping tonight?"
"Bert &amp; Ernie"
"Brings back memories."
"Oh Canada  you win."
"Good Guy Canada. This is our new money."
"Ferret Oops"
"Ermahgerd!"
"Weasel derp face"
"When you try your best and you don't succeed"
"Every time I try to take a photo..."
"This should be fun"
"I've never seen cats better utilized in a gif."
"Hip Hop"
"Is this gif from some kind of video?"
"rap cat!"
"We finally have a confession from this motherfucker!"
"Brendon tells the truth  but gives zero fucks"
"25 Years of Zelda"
"This amazing illustration contains some of my most cherished moments in gaming"
"25 Years of Zelda"
"How I feel when I see these kids with &quot;swag&quot; ..."
"Watermelon"
"The dream has come true."
"Lionesses at the watering hole"
"Umm....take a picture it'll last longer [1024x683]"
"All hotels should look like this...."
"NED?!?!"
"When someone tries to spoil a movie or TV show I've been wanting to see..."
"Beware online"
"My goatee isn't stupid."
"my goetee isnt stupid [FB]"
"Hello? Yes this is babe"
"My Sad Reality."
"Every-time..."
"Looks pretty scary to me"
"Pretty creative (x-post r/funny)"
"I could practically hear yakety sax playing as he kept picking up stuff and dropping it into the puddle."
"These Sarah Jessica Parker posts lately.."
"Dramatic Chihuahua"
"Nervous? Me?"
"Just the tip"
"Gettin' Fresh [gif]"
"Everytime someone posts an OC..."
"Look at this dog."
"Look At This Dog"
"I'm considering doing this."
"Food for loose women."
"All the awesome NES games in one gif."
"This is not an ordinary mole. Reddit I give you a star-nosed mole"
"Almost There..."
"HAHAHA.... AAWWWW......"
"superheroes"
"Right in the feels"
"Literally... literally?"
"i`ll just startle myself"
"Nutella!!!"
"Nutella!! (x-post from /r/pics)"
"Never look a gift horse in the mouth? How about a Leatherback Sea turtloh... MY... GOD!!!"
"The inside of a turtle's mouth"
"Saturday Night Lights - Faint Double Rainbow"
"You Bitch!"
"Leap of Faith"
"I can watch this ALL DAY!"
"Flawless victory!!!"
"That's just wrong"
"How I feel getting excited for my cakeday only to realize it was yesterday."
"How i feel when someone says the punch line to a joke before I do."
"One of my friends found this on her desk this semester. Mystery artist finally completed (childhood ;-;)"
"My whole childhood...on a high school desk"
"90's Kids will love this detention doodle."
"I &lt;3 the 90's"
"Awwww ... So cute. A Lion Hug"
"They're not the best but...."
"My first try at this."
"When I somehow win an online argument that I didn't think I could win"
"Dodgeball Skills"
"Mid Lee Sin vs Syndra Matchup"
"Me upon realizing that my cake day had unknowingly crept up on me."
"Every time I bother to post something I think Reddit will like."
"I found this while on Google Images  I thought you guys might like it."
"Felt that this should be share with the world.."
"So we don't celebrate Thanksgiving in Australia..."
"NO!!!!!"
"Suddenly  WWE"
"Suddenly  WWE"
"What is this sorcery?!"
"After the movie funds dried up  Snow White went downhill fast..."
"Straight from Felix Baumgartner.... WIN!!"
"In soviet russia  you can the can for 100% more can."
"Spotted at Taco Bell [fixed]"
"Meanwhile at Taco Bell"
"They say that the cigarette after a meal is the best - I think he might disagree"
"Spotted at Taco Bell [Fixed] (English version)"
"Spotted at Taco Bell [Fixed]"
"i told you not to light your farts in the car after taco bell!!!"
"Hit and run"
"Slow traffic to the right  bitch!"
"Monkey knife fight"
"I can't explain this picture I just love it"
"Great album cover  or greatest album cover [FIXED]"
"A challenger for greatest album cover appears"
"Speaking of funny album covers"
"Another great album cover"
"Great album cover  or greatest album cover? [fixed]"
"Comical/Satirical Screens from Plague Inc...."
"What are you parents getting you for Christmas?"
"Quiet little one."
"What have I found..."
"This fuckering company needs a new designer."
"Sculptor Transforms Scrap Parts Into Gigantic Autobots"
"Autobot!"
"Sometimes I just can't resist"
"My roommate whenever I bring a girl over to the house.."
"Kinda old  but always cracks me up when I see it"
"Thought that you all may enjoy this"
"Holy fishing"
"Moses: Trolling since 1525 BC."
"stop it Moses"
"Moses"
"A man's breakfast"
"What an unfortunate name for a website:"
"Smooth criminal"
"This would be a Glasswing Butterfly."
"I don't normally shit while away from home..."
"Is this one of those &quot;Fuck everything about that&quot; moments?"
"Billy Badass."
"Once you pop...."
"I think she wanted attention too. [Fixed]"
"She was wondering the same thing."
"She was wondering the same thing. - Imgur"
"fuck the police"
"Canadian Thug"
"B.A.M.F."
"Vandalism in Canada"
"I want one!"
"I'm almost positive that this is a repost....but it's the first time I've seen it  and I laughed my fucking ass off."
"The problem with time travel."
"Well  there goes my theory"
"Size doesn't mean anything."
"The cutest thing I've ever seen"
"matt lewis (neville) should write this if he hasn't already!"
"DELETE COOKIES?!?!?!"
"Don't you hit that Enter button Cookiemonster!"
"That face..."
"Dat jiggle..."
"Probably the best game ever!"
"I am trying oh so very hard not to win this game right now."
"Wrong hole  luv."
"So True [FIXED]"
"So true [fixed]"
"shitty_watercolour"
"Fly trap"
"I'm going to hell for this  your new favourite DJ"
"Baby zoo (circa 1935)"
"Reddit  from now on you will have to work for your upvote"
"How I feel trying to reach the front page."
"After waiting for so long; this is how I feel on my cake day."
"Girls who could explode from their clothing at any second...."
"Sometimes I love 4chan."
"Girls who look like they are going to explode out of their clothing any second."
"Gollum is taking over Wellington Airport (NZ)"
"Well  this is a pretty neat fish tank..."
"Anyone know the aftermath of this incident?"
"Think I'll just check out Reddit for a bi... shit!"
"Make a speling mistake on a Reddit submission"
"A visual representation of what happens when you stick your dick in crazy"
"I couldn't have said it better myself."
"Lol."
"Words to live by."
"HEAD SAVE! And a Beaut! (gif)"
"I think this way too often"
"Aliens"
"Solving first world computer problems. Just a genius idea."
"The world through a drop of water."
"Drop of water in front of a map"
"The whole world in a single drop of water..."
"Just a drop of water in front of a map"
"Before my child can get behind the wheel of a real vehicle  they must come in first place..."
"class class class...."
"Yes  I also love the Australian Male Christian President."
"Funnel cloud touching down in Orchard  Iowa"
"Judgement day (x-post)"
"How I feel not getting any upvotes on my cake day."
"How I feel after one full year of Redditing."
"HELP  FIRE!"
"Remains one of the coolest photos I've ever seen."
"epic photo"
"Kind of a huge fan of this new Deadmau5 album art."
"You've gotta admit  when it comes to album titles  no one does it quite like deadmau5"
"When it comes to creative album titles no one does it quite like this guy"
"When it comes to creative album titles no one does it quite like this guy"
"Deadmau5 New Album Cover"
"So This Exists"
"I don't understand..."
"Ever get so happy that you hump the air and rainbows come out your dick? SFW"
"Thank god Wonder Woman is here! We are going to be saved!"
"Wonder Woman! You look different! It's the hair  isn't it?"
"My favorite Jesus .gif!"
"Whenever somebody calls me out in public for being high"
"Just opened Youtube ..."
"capital sins..."
"It only runs on double A's!"
"How I imagine people looking at /r/gonewild look like."
"The Incredible Dump"
"Don't get between a hungry frog and his prey"
"I was watching a movie in bed  got up for a drink and came back to find this"
"I was watching a movie in bed  got up for a drink and came back to find this"
"How I imagine Alexander Rhodes is probably introducing himself nowadays"
"This makes sense"
"Now I understand !"
"HAPPY BIRTHDAY HERE!"
"What my adventures typically look like."
"My idea of parkour (x-post r/adventuretime"
"Existentialism."
"One of the saddest pictures I've seen."
"50 Pictures of Basset Hounds Running"
"Here's a baby fennec fox for you."
"Baby Fennec Fox"
"Baby fennec fox"
"A never before posted Fennec Fox &lt;3"
"Come on  Bruce..."
"Superdog"
"How I feel after I defend atheism in my theology class--in a college that's in Salt Lake City."
"OHSHITOHSHITOSHIT!!"
"o shit o shit o shit!"
"I'm a network admin of an outdated office. This morning a couple of my co-workers got a surprise visit from the Doctor."
"Inspiration behind Hyrule Field."
"Look at this amazing photo my girlfriend took today"
"Pure nostalgia."
"How peanut butter is made"
"aaaaand I'm done with my sandwich..."
"I don't think I'm going to eat peanut butter anytime soon."
"Mr. T mocks your moves"
"Any post after redditing for 4 hours..."
"Hmm  yes.."
"Me in the bathroom with nothing to read but my moms fashion magazine"
"How I feel during accounting..."
"Smoke Break"
"Stale ass bread."
"Everything is getting converted to 3D these days"
"Meanwhile on acid"
"Finding a job being a recent grad"
"My Parents Were Murdered In An Alley"
"This is how I do it right?"
"It's exam season in Australia and I have absolutely zero motivation to study."
"It aint easy being a Physics major."
"We made a huge mistake."
"Notice the man to the left protecting his baby"
"IN THE FACE!"
"Someone saw this coming."
"Kira's successor really likes to keep it original."
"I should buy a boat [Fixed]"
"Saw this as one of the sponsored links. Thought I should fix it."
"Bat out of hell."
"Trolling the FBI"
"How I feel after downloading Reddit Enhancement Suite"
"Living with two female roommates .."
"[FIXED] Living with ONE female roommate - from r/pics"
"Man living with Women (Fixed)"
"Saw this on facebook today"
"Saw this on Facebook today."
"Metapod has whiskey dick."
"Too soon? [FB]"
"A new drink called the sandy"
"sandy"
"Too soon? [x-post from funny]"
"Wait  what?"
"Walmart.....Is this really happening right now?"
"Don't. F*cking. Play."
"Do you even lift?"
"Asked google if it was the weekend.. this was one of the top images"
"Trenderman"
"Getting a little nipply in here."
"Hoping this body modification isn't a new trend.."
"One of my favourite Postsecrets"
"Eggception"
"this is extremely accurate... (black ops)"
"No Homo"
"Let's start being honest about these things......"
"Father where are you?"
"Father where are you? (x-post from /r/gifs)"
"My teammates in every shooter I've ever played online."
"Not So Safety Dance"
"Found this on the desktop of a school computer. Thank you to whoever brightened this shithole of a day for me."
"The Lieutenant Dan cat."
"The Bible"
"The Bible explained by 4chan."
"4chan explains the Bible. I lol'd"
"Power of Mom"
"maybe reverse psychology will work."
"decided to use reverse psychology on the new neighbors"
"Meanwhile  some men..."
"Those sadists..."
"Some men just want to watch the world..."
"Some men..."
"Some men..."
"Beautiful Headshot"
"She better not get in my face"
"Ladies  please.."
"Ladies  please..."
"Going to the Party"
"Perfect combo"
"Truly gangsta."
"When my smoke buddies and I venture out for more munchies  pretending we're not high."
"March of the Gangsta"
"Back home to the hood."
"Just puffin' around"
"Forget gif that goes with any song  this is a song that goes with any gif."
"perfection."
"Progression of Lindsay Lohan (xpost from r/gentlemanboners)"
"Being a 30 year old watching the VMAs and knowing who green day is but no one else"
"&quot;OH THE HUMANITY!!!&quot; [.gif]"
"Wrestling fan jizzed"
"When I walk into the classroom early to find my teacher making out with another teacher"
"I need to do more with my life"
"Hanging Cave  Vietnam"
"Hang Eng Cave  Vietnam"
"These pretzels are making me thirsty."
"Only in Arkansas..."
"If I didn't know better  I'd say they live in Kentucky..."
"Transformers 2.0"
"The hero Reddit deserves"
"What it's like when someone owes me money (GIF)"
"ive waited exactly one year to post this."
"When someone opens a pack of gum..."
"Plants vs Walkers"
"Plants vs Walkers"
"My response to all the people raging about getting speeding tickets."
"I can show you the world."
"The face on the fish is priceless"
"Dildo Suit (NSFW)"
"Reddit  I present to you… I don't even know what to call him"
"Just scrolling through Facebook when..."
"Searched &quot;Pearl Harbor&quot; on Twitter after US beat Japan.."
"Bears."
"When I come back to see how my Reddit post is doing"
"Being excited to be a part of the Guinness World Records  then finding out I have to pay for the certificate"
"Pacman Explained"
"Pac-Man"
"after getting a bigger monitor"
"I don't think a newspaper to the snout will deter this behavior..."
"Ummmmm... Yeaaaaa"
"Baby Hedgehogs"
"Baby hedgehogs melting my face off  havent seen this cuteness in a while."
"Those eyes are just adorable"
"It can be fun and rewarding"
"Finishing a paper at 5 in the morning..."
"Finishing your homework at 3am"
"Staying up all night and finally finishing an essay"
"Shower Prank NSFW"
"don't slip [NSFW]"
"Living with two female roommates [FTFY]"
"Who has enough money for this many dildos?!"
"Bazinga!"
"Minimal Fucks Given"
"Missed my cake day.... anyone else joining the club?"
"How I see it and how mom's see it"
"Snorlax playing on a Slip'n'Slide"
"Snorlax on a Slip'n'Slide"
"HIFW I take a joke too far..."
"The $50 Lesson."
"The $50 Lesson"
"The $50 Lesson"
"Well... Fine..."
"Vincent does something right."
"Did you just see that?"
"Babe Ruth with future president George H. Bush (1948)"
"Posted all over the Afghan army base my friend works at"
"Karma on Reddit"
"When my recent ex gets married to a guy she's known for two weeks."
"Makes me think of my brother who joined the military one year and two months ago. I love you  Riley."
"Space Shuttle Endeavour flies over downtown Austin  TX this morning"
"Shuttle  downtown Austin"
"On her way home - Endeavor over Austin  TX"
"Space shuttle Endeavor flying over Austin Tx this morning (Xpost from r/space)"
"Awesome pic of the space shuttle over downtown Austin. (repost from /r/austin)"
"Space Shuttle Endeavour piggybacked over Austin  TX. (xpost r/space)"
"I don't even know"
"How I feel when people post videos on Reddit."
"When I click on a post that has long Txt to read.."
"How I feel anytime there's a &quot;When you see it&quot; post *FIXED*"
"My psycho ex wants to get back together."
"Man Vs. Weasels"
"FTFY - David Bowie VS. Weasels"
"What's this article about?"
"Can a man go skinny dipping without being attacked by flesh-eating weasels?"
"I always hunt out this picture when I'm having a bad day. NEVER FAILS"
"Awww  it's funny 'cause he thinks he is gonna die."
"Oh God I accidentally /spacedicks"
"Trapped"
"Nope.gif"
"Treadmill fail"
"DIY Lobotovasectomy"
"Don't &quot;tread&quot; on me"
"Machines are smarter than man!"
"This guy is having a bad day"
"Fail... oh wait he's up.. and fail."
"Girl gives great head (SFW)"
"Whenever I'm winning in an Argument"
"I ventured far into the weirdest part of the internet I have ever seen!"
"don't know if this was already made"
"Tranquility as it should be"
"Be my blanket?"
"Nearly missed my free karma day!"
"fuck you i want to sleep"
"Lights out  bitch."
"That split second when you sneeze while driving and your eyes close"
"After I found out Facebook now displays who views photos"
"You deserve that"
"Oddly enough the guy with the beer is the most interesting person in this picture."
"An invisible giant stepping on a truck tank!."
"Pimps on treadmills."
"Twilight's like soccer"
"Twilight is like Soccer..."
"Stephen Hawking experiencing Zero Gravity"
"Al Capone's prison cell at Eastern State Penitentiary  PA"
"Submit a query  get trolled!"
"No Words"
"Laser-eyed flying bears? What?"
"How a bee looks like when it gets in my house"
"Nice shirt....douche"
"He might what?"
"Interesting components of various Google offices around the world"
"NOW KITH"
"Mike Tyson Knows Love When He Sees It"
"I will eat your children."
"This made me laugh harder than it should have"
"How I feel everyday at work..."
"As a long time Call of Duty player  this is how I feel playing the BF3 Beta"
"How I feel about alchemy"
"How I felt the first time I randomed Invoker"
"I'm writing my first major research paper for submission to an academic journal. This is how I feel about it."
"Okay ladies..So r/blackgirls just hit over 300 subscribers and this is how I feel..."
"My girlfriend told me to talk dirty to her."
"First time filing my own taxes ever..."
"My first impression on playing Kerbal Space Program"
"I just got Civ V. I have never played Civ and didn't bother with a tutorial."
"How I feel 2 weeks into a summer physiology class"
"6'3&quot; 210Lb me trying to do Yoga"
"How I feel note taking in class as a psych teacher rambles"
"This is always my response to Karma  Girls  and Magnets."
"How I feel trying to make new friends at college after being in the same group for the last 4 years and being separated."
"An accident happened here in Rabat (Morocco) yesterday. I have no idea how that car got there."
"An accident happened here in Rabat (Morocco) yesterday. I have no idea how that car got there."
"Dis shit don't stop."
"The Last Sprite Supper."
"The Last Supper"
"Got Ya"
"what if i told you..."
"Team Conservative!"
"Prepare for Trouble..."
"Prepare for trouble..."
"Team Conservative. Surrender now and prepare to fight!"
"Prepare for Trouble!"
"How I see politics today"
"Prepare for trouble"
"Pokemon Terminology of Mitt Romney and Ryan."
"Prepare for trouble Obama.."
"To Serve Mankind"
"Russian Missile Barrage  Chechnya [1198x750]"
"Leela poppin' and lockin'"
"I'll take this one!"
"What is this  and why am I watching it??"
"I don't even..."
"What anime is this?"
"“Splashing” (© Shikhei Goh)"
"Dragonfly"
"Flawless logic."
"My aunt posted this  my mom loved it... My family makes me sad."
"How I feel about the heatwaves today and tomorrow"
"A summary of Colorado's and Montana's summer so far"
"shit's on fire  yo..."
"I'm not an outdoors person and I successfully made a fire today. Feels good"
"Shit's on fire  Yo!"
"x/post from r/exmormon had to share"
"Deal with it."
"Come on bro. Lets GO!"
"Redditors would save so much money..."
"A piggy bank we'd all be able to use"
"Exactly how I felt when I showed a friend a link from Reddit and she told me she had seen it before."
"Go to Bible camp  they said. It'll be fun  they said."
"Gods will at bible camp (x-post from /funny)"
"Sorry guys... I'm not sure where this goes  just thought reddit should see this show of classy in the local Walmart parking lot."
"Soo this was spotted in my hometown. I will never admit to being from there again."
"This is what is happening in my redneck home town."
"The Library underneath the stairs!"
"Bookstairs in London [392x571]"
"Nearly everyone here  trying to reach Front Page..."
"Cart Wrangler"
"My reaction after going on r/spacedicks for the first time..."
"Silly confused Golbats"
"When you're waiting to hear back about a potential job offer."
"Waiting for up votes."
"SpongeWorld SquareJules"
"The case had gone cold. Detective Squarepants didn't know where to turn. The killer was out there."
"As a Mormon and a Republican Redditor"
"If Joe Biden and Paul Ryan switched hair."
"If Joe Biden and Paul Ryan switched hair"
"What the VP candidates would look like if they switched hair!"
"how i feel when my posts get 0 upvotes and 0 likes."
"When I think a post is amazing and it flops."
"I think a comma would help here."
"Electron microscope image of an ant holding a microchip"
"We are too evenly matched.."
"Epic Swordfight"
"BEAR DICK PUNCH"
"Tupacicorn!"
"My take on Star Wars original trilogy (poster designs -I presented two of them to you guys last week - here's everything finished up)"
"I laugh every time"
"Appropriate Reaction"
"Whenever I cut in line I feel like this..."
"He's right. (x-post from r/images)"
"The truth of Ski-hill difficulty ratings"
"Winter Resort"
"Desert Fox!"
"A bit too literal."
"I love you man."
"Excellent cartoon about the Arab street reaction"
"Sums it up pretty well."
"Since when does posting your opinion on the internet make you an &quot;idiot slime ball&quot;?"
"Reactions"
"Reactions"
"The Arab Street Reacts..."
"Give me some food..."
"Hoover be Damned"
"The new Kitty Swiffer"
"Final exams are coming?"
"How I feel when I'm eating in class and the professor asks me a question"
"Most Christians on the Bible"
"&quot;On reddiquette&quot;"
"So I visited r/politics for the first time..."
"How I feel after getting a 100 on my summer reading."
"My response to any vegetarian post on Facebook"
"How I feel about the Obama AMA"
"The truth of the &quot;reddiquette&quot;"
"Itunes has new terms and conditions to agree to?"
"[First] I'm... not sure about this one."
"Everybody wants a piece of his chicken."
"When I'm assigned reading in an intro-level class as a senior"
"Awesome statue at the Old Graveyard of Poblenou in Barcelona"
"Bros before hoes...haha Michael is my favourite"
"Since I can't post images on r/science"
"And for my next trick..."
"And for my next trick..."
"*wink*"
"Just a winking kitty"
"Where's WALL-E?"
"Wheres Wall-E?"
"Robots need love too!"
"Appropriately Used Meme"
"Sperm problem"
"Ribbit!"
"Be polite."
"When one of your friends is about to say something they shouldn't in front of your mom..."
"When I click a NSFW that ends up being gore..."
"DAE feel this way when they get their tax refunds?"
"Blizzard responds to negative feedback on Diablo 3"
"When ever i get down voted to hell"
"It's A Homo's Devil Machine"
"How did she make the sign?"
"How much wood could a woodchuck chuck?"
"The pedophile in Sims"
"Sims Pedophile (x-post from r/gifs)"
"The Sims"
"The Sims"
"Japanese Game Shows..."
"Just Installed some 12 inch subs in my car"
"How do u like my 6 inch subs..."
"That would be very  very painful."
"Ouch (x-post from r/wtf)"
"This gets me every time"
"Instant Karma"
"The most satisfying GIF on the internet"
"Like a motherf****** BOSS."
"instant karma"
"Karma's a bitch. You don't mess with the twil."
"So all i have to do is say &quot;instant karma&quot;?"
"Watch your step  asshole."
"Don't fuck with this guy"
"Using RES and getting and unexpandable link..."
"It's Friday... at 5 PM  this is how i'm going to walk out of the office."
"How I feel seeing my tax refund"
"How I felt getting my first post on to the front page."
"Fabulous!"
"I found this interesting looking chair. It doesn't look too comfortable."
"The Falcon Punch done right."
"FALCON PUNCH!!!!!!!"
"3D  Rotating Nebula"
"Betty White on SNL"
"Ninja Cat 2.0 {GIF}"
"How I feel upvoting new submissions"
"Duckling feeding koi fish"
"Wut? (Possibly NSFW)"
"Mmmmmm"
"I believe this belongs here."
"Googled weirdest thing on the internet  I think this is pretty close."
"Searched for &quot;I know something you don't&quot; on Google. Got this..."
"Weirdly arousing"
"Feast your eyes on this."
"Mmmm... poopsicles"
"Googled &quot;weirdest gif ever&quot;  did not disappoint..."
"How I feel after browsing Reddit all night."
"how i feel after a long week at work... now  if i could only look that cute feeling that way."
"How every night on Reddit ends....."
"How I feel after eating a big lunch and returning to work..."
"OH SHIT  SHIT"
"[spoiler] The Dark Knight Rises in 5 seconds.... only more cogent"
"I knew there was something familiar about the end of The Dark Knight Rises (SPOILERS)"
"Shaved Llama?!?"
"I really want to play Katamari-Damaci after finding this."
"The Madness is in the eyes (fixed with more scars)"
"Masters of Chaos"
"GUYS! GUYS! SQUIRREL! GUYS! SQUIRREL! [OC]"
"I need one of these things... also a 2nd player"
"giraffe awww - Imgur"
"Funny  and yet sad and true."
"NASA and apple"
"Sad but true"
"How I feel after a 5-hour power"
"When you drive by someone who looks like you"
"Definitely one of my favorite gifs"
"I laughed so hard at this."
"How I blink when I'm high"
"When I try to wink at a girl"
"My Facebook hell"
"Before we praise or criticize the new Facebook for iPhone app  let's never forget where we previously were."
"It's almost like a cruel joke."
"Never thought this would happen to me but..... wow"
"Murica"
"Cupcakes these days (x post from r/funny)"
"I want you to hit me as hard as you can."
"Meet the animals from Ghibli!"
"I always wanted a cat with HUGE eyes  so i made one. Meet Jiji."
"Weird..."
"Figured this belonged here"
"Weird [FIXED]"
"Egg Inception"
"When you live near Railroad tracks and you try to fall asleep"
"ALL ABOARD... This Karma train is heading straight to the front page."
"Underwater Sculpture Park (multiple images  from National Geographic)"
"[insert adorable cat reference here]"
"You need a hug? I give you a hug!"
"My cat Sam. Isn't he just precious?"
"My lunch this afternoon  Enchiladas"
"If we fits  we sits"
"Relaxation"
"Never take advice from Pamperchu. (super wtf &quot;fetish&quot;)"
"I think this belongs here"
"Shut up and take my money"
"The joys of living in Alabama. I don't know who will be more offended  /r/politics or /r/atheism."
"Welcome to Dothan  Alabama. They're taking the news a bit harder than others."
"Valentines Day is Right Around the...Wait  What?"
"They say romance is dead"
"Cute sleeping cat"
"Sleepy"
"I take online classes. How I feel about all you early wake ups"
"My dog  every time I play with my cat."
"MFW I have to wait another week for TDKR to be released in my country..."
"When I see re-posts getting massive karma."
"How I feel when I see a post that has more Karma than I have in total."
"How I feel not having anything interesting to post on my cake day..."
"Future classrooms?"
"The Black Cat Analogy"
"Morning dew"
"Call it Camouflage (moved here by request)"
"My conditioned response to the word lonely"
"At least chemistry agrees with me..."
"Not to get technical..."
"Alcohol is always the solution!"
"How I first met the internet...."
"Prodigy® Interactive Personal Service... this brings back memories!"
"When I was your age  this was the Internet"
"found an image on imgur with only 7 COMMENTS"
"whenever i try to dance in public"
"The hipster"
"Hipster level: apple zombie"
"Oh America...."
"WAIT A MINUTE..."
"Xbox Car."
"Looks Legit"
"My germs will cut you!!!"
"This just popped out in my news feed. WTF?!"
"Artic Fox Puppy"
"Sniper check..."
"Challenge: find 4 people in this photo. Bonus: the possible 5th person. Extra credit for time and place."
"Heh."
"r/funny these days"
"Heh"
"I love the design of these stairs and how they incorporate a wheelchair access ramp."
"I really admire the design of these stairs and the novel manner in which they incorporate a wheelchair access ramp"
"Handicap-ready stairs"
"Every single time I hear the word &quot;concur&quot;..."
"Every time I say the word &quot;concur&quot;"
"Laundry Day!"
"Why I break during corners"
"My Australian cousins asked me if we had squirrels in Canada  I responded with this"
"Nobody talk about any club! (x-posted from movies. Since the name of the movie in the title is required there.)"
"My favorite Fight Club art"
"People are always asking me if I know Tyler Durden..."
"(SPOILERS!) Fight Club Fan-Art"
"My New Wallpaper"
"Louis C.K. on anti-environmentalists"
"How to kill a Walrus"
"How to kill a walrus"
"What did I just learn..."
"How I feel when I see some one with a Reddit bumper sticker..."
"Its my Cake Day"
"my reaction to troy and abed rapping in tonights episode..."
"My reaction when I discovered /r/reactiongifs and thought about all the karma I can get now in other subredits"
"this is the best birthday. ever."
"BIRTHDAY FUNDAY!!!"
"It's my cake day! It's my cake day! I'm so excited!"
"I went from 1 to 2 Karma??"
"How I react when one of my posts gets more than 2 upvotes."
"For my cake day I present my favorite birthday related gif"
"Day I found out that they're making a new Dumb &amp; Dumber"
"As a new redditor getting 100+ karma on a post"
"As a new redditor getting 100+ karma on a post"
"Me when I realized my weekend starts in a few hours"
"I'm not sure what to title this."
"When i first realize reaction gifs is a subreddit"
"MFW I didn't get sick after being around a friend who had the flu"
"Long live the King!"
"Escalator."
"What it feels like to not have a job"
"Spinning!"
"Silly Girl Spin"
"Today marks the start of Ramadan. To all my friends at r/exmuslim enjoy this plate of bacon"
"Pretty much sums up my church"
"Jesus Camp Dinosaur Rave"
"Our God is an Awesome God"
"r/politics after hearing about Obama's AMA"
"Golden Eagle Talons"
"The Beatles In 1957"
"My first thought when I found out my friend had crabs"
"How I feel about the US election"
"We know Darth  we know."
"Fairly odd parents - The teen years"
"Well  that freaked me out."
"Wasn't expecting that."
"Family Guy got it pretty accurate"
"Found this on Dr. Peppers evolution photo. Good on you  /r/atheism"
"In Canada  moose hunts you."
"what my friends caught and strapped to the roof last weekend"
"No time to explain  get in the car"
"I'll explain later  just hop in!"
"Hop in!"
"just me and the fam enjoying a beer after a successful hunt"
"It's Minnesota's favorite time of the year!"
"How'd we do hunting this weekend?"
"So I finally found an interesting pic on my facebook feed"
"It's hunting season!"
"How To Make Your Fish Nervous"
"If I had one of these  I would be paranoid all the time"
"Make sure he knows who's in charge."
"I think this collar makes me look fat."
"Finger lickin' good"
"Nothing makes me laugh more than this."
"5 out of 6 Kids Love KangaSack!"
"Unfortunate ad placement"
"Dueling movie posters"
"Lincoln cannot catch a break. At least they sent the best this time."
"Clever James Bond and Lincoln poster placement"
"Lincoln CANNOT catch a break"
"Lincoln Can Not Catch a Break."
"Poor Lincoln never saw it coming"
"Found the real culprit behind the Lincoln assassination..."
"Skyfall ad placement win"
"Advertising Fail?"
"Bond. John Wilkes Bond. (Unfortunate poster placement)"
"Who really shot Lincoln?"
"Poor Lincoln..."
"Too soon?"
"Ah  so THAT'S who killed old Honest Abe..."
"John Wilkes Bond"
"At least it's not from the back."
"The most adorable flight safety violation you'll ever see."
"The force is strong with my strong hand"
"Let the paws be with you!"
"Pals"
"Friends forever."
"How to escape the f***ing Friend Zone (fixed!)"
"WHERE THE HOOD AT?"
"Cat fuckin' tha police"
"Proof that angry birds was a sick  twisted experiment."
"Must.concentrate."
"Seems Legit."
"Me when someone who got to see Batman at midnight told me the ending"
"yes....yes you are..."
"Honesty is the best policy"
"I'm just a cunt..."
"My reaction when I see WTF posts on the front page cause of the enhancement suite"
"damn"
"i knew i wasnt good at reddit..."
"First I've disappointed my family  now this?! I'm a failure."
"Sorry guys"
"My little sister posted this on FB... should I be worried?"
"Surprise  motherfucker!"
"Suprise Motherfucker!"
"My professor canceled class today and I was all like..."
"How I feel when I win a big argument."
"Annie and Britta From Community's Lesbian Photo (Yes  it's for real)"
"Where were they when I went to Community College?"
"Two reasons we love &quot;Community&quot;"
"Maybe she thought her Mom was hungry?"
"Good guy Adam Sandler."
"Deadpool spinning"
"Deadpool spinning"
"19 of 19 people found they had something in their eye after reading the following product review."
"Hot  juicy and tasty...(NSFW)"
"You can smell it from here"
"My first attempt at this "
"so this on another subreddit r/gifsound"
"More Bacon than the pan can handle."
"Me at a [6]"
"Bacon In the North."
"Downvoting when I'm in a bad mood."
"What I feel like doing while in school"
"I see your action movie punch and I raise you this multiple impact  mustache powered fist!"
"Every time I get downvoted."
"DOKKEN DOKKEN PARADISE!"
"Glow-in-the-Dark Driveway"
"Mine's the driveway that glows  you can't miss it!"
"I just had a pretty strong bout of the nostalgias..."
"Everyone here thinks they are"
"A bear stops fishing to breakout in dance."
"Candles can be lit by their vapor trail"
"Candles can be lit by their vapor trail (xpost pics)"
"&quot;Your love is my only desire..&quot;"
"He's stoked on life"
"This is not cute"
"The guy that originally posted this didn't think it was cute! [r/funny repost]"
":)"
"The most useless desktop icon of all time."
"This sort of belongs here (a post from pics)"
"Big Jake  the tallest horse in the world (Original Image)"
"Little Kate  the shortest woman in the world"
"That's some great translating  Bing."
"This is why I love Spongebob..."
"Tired baby donotwant"
"Downvoting posts in /r/new"
"Once a pun thread starts"
"Benders vs. Bronies WGC  Day 8"
"How I feel standing in my room sometimes."
"How I feel standing in my room sometimes. [FIXED]"
"How I feel when I wake up and realize it's Friday"
"How I imagine Romania is after seeing two of their posts on the Reddit front page..."
"How my relatives dance when they get drunk"
"The Kazakh folk music is fitting!"
"finding out that i have two finals on the same day"
"How I feel to Have Poison Ivy on one leg and Road Rash on the Other"
"A nice swimming pool"
"a VERY nice swimming pool"
"Basketcar"
"I hate it when this happens"
"The most annoying thing when surfing reddit!"
"Can I have one of these?"
"If you squint you can see Jesus"
"Jesus is everywhere"
"Just heard about that racist anti-Obama bumper sticker. This came up in an image search.."
"Just tell them anyway"
"No matter what kind of mood i'm in  this always makes me laugh"
"Meanwhile in Washington  D.C. [GIF]"
"How I feel getting my paycheck  reimbursement check  and tax refund all on the same day"
"Want your next party to be a hit? Play this song and watch what happens!"
"How I feel after crossing 1 000 karma..."
"Want your next party to be a hit? Play this song  sit back  and watch what ensues!"
"Enough  Michael"
"I know it's old  but there's literally never been another .gif I can watch as long as I can watch this one. Cracks me up every time."
"when my friend shows up with an o!"
"Finding a job after being unemployed for so long."
"Phelps turning Super Saiyan . . . brilliant"
"I know it's old  but Phelps is damn funny!"
"Uncanny."
"When someone has a witty insult directed at me"
"Browsing /r/new"
"Me talking to a friend in class then finally noticing the teacher has been watching me in silence."
"&quot;Haha  that was funny guys. Dicks.&quot;"
"After being on reddit for a year and finally seeing reposts hit the front page."
"I really am trying to be happy for my friend who made it to the front page the other day."
"This is a little over half of my gif folder  enjoy."
"Realizing today is my Cake Day and it's close to midnight"
"Imagination around the world"
"Best prank ever"
"I bet you do!"
"They're pumping alright"
"Why atheists have problems accepting the simple truth... I'll never know."
"Go get em' Aquaman!"
"Cant tell if he's reacting to the Patron or the lime."
"GROSS! WHAT THE HELL IS THIS THING?!"
"Always cheers me up"
"My reaction when I go down on a smelly vagina."
"DO NOT WANT"
"How I look when I'm going down on my girlfriend. (SFW)"
"Curiosity killed the cat"
"I had a similar reaction after my first shot of liquor"
"Sour!"
"Cuteness overload"
"AWWWW-tters"
"Sorry if repost  but too adorable not to share"
"Feels good to be loved."
"Whatever happened to this guy?"
"Cutest looking feet!"
"When my teacher asks if I had finished the required course reading over the summer."
"How I feel after reading the transcripts from the debate"
"Underground Vietnam"
"I thought we might need a visual aid"
"Scratch"
"Put your finger in your ear and scratch"
"Improper dancing."
"Send Me On My Jig"
"life during wartime"
"He will be known as Little Bobby Buscemi"
"Dug up Steve Buscemi's grade school picture"
"Dug up Steve Buscemi's grade school picture"
"simple train etiquette"
"Super Simple Stuff"
"The grim reaper is a bro"
"DAT ASS!"
"Oh  this is not gonna end well."
"Favelas in Brazil. Note the wealthy neighbors."
"Patience."
"Patience"
"Damn! Forgot the milk"
"It's my first Cake-Day  and I want to celebrate by sharing an album of my favorite images from my year with Reddit. Enjoy!"
"There's a whole lot of savings going 'round."
"Hehehe this made me laugh."
"r/atheism in a nutshell"
"The things I've seen..."
"How I feel when my girlfriend gets more karma than me on my cake day."
"Every time I comment on Reddit..."
"Every time I comment on Reddit... (xpost r/gifs)"
"How it feels when someone comments on your post that has already gone into the negatives."
"What getting downvoted with +10 000 karma feels like"
"Who's Absorbent and Yellow..."
"I'm guessing lots of fucks were given"
"Overly Attached Girlfriend Shows You Her Room!"
"Guys listen."
"Oh christopher..."
"Umm...Yeah...I'll just leave this here..."
"WTF"
"Yes  this picture is real. Taken from Cassini as it drifted into Saturn's shadow. Oh yeah  and Earth is in this picture  too."
"Saturn  photographed by Cassini. Thanks  science!"
"Saturn in front of the Sun [2766x1364]"
"Just found this little gem  'The N-word Project'?"
"Sweet and Sour"
"MFW my &quot;hilarious fart&quot; turns out to be a shart."
"When I look at a girls butt and then look up to see her face."
"Wait...wat?"
"College Bingo"
"College-Level Bingo"
"This is how I spend most of my classes"
"Please tell me it's fake. [FB]"
"Destination - How to get there [pic]"
"Destination/How to Get There"
"How to get there...."
"Toddlers and Tiaras.... enough said."
"It makes me sad people watch shit like this"
"like mother like daughter"
"Grammar rant"
"I think reddit will like this"
"Obama and Gun Control"
"A nuisance of cats."
"Here's a sink full of cats. I'm not good with titles."
"Candidates Hair Swap"
"If Romney and Obama switched hair..."
"Hair Flip Lulz"
"Obama/Romney hair switch. Warning: this cannot be unseen."
"The presidential candidates seemed a bit... hairried... last night."
"The old switch-a-roo"
"If Obama and Romney switched hairstyles..."
"Presidential hair swap"
"Presidential Hair Swap"
"If Obama and Romney swapped hair....."
"Yet another photo of Nicholas Cage."
"pickolas cage"
"WARNING! [O.C.]"
"favorite flavor"
"Extreme sour lemon"
"Maned Wolf"
"I may be a bitch..."
"Asshole teacher deserved it."
"Little Russian girl doesn't take your shit."
"In the nuts!"
"I told you not to touch it! (X-post from /r/gifs)"
"Proper use of an Ipad"
"Laptop Smack."
"Look who I ran into!"
"Greatest play ever."
"Searched Google images for 'random shit'. Found a pretty good depiction of Reddit."
"&quot;I just want this so I can put my dick in here and see how many people it feeds.&quot;"
"probably 4"
"I... what..."
"Every damn time."
"Only Time I even think of it"
"I don't always comment on Reddit"
"Subscribing"
"finally back online here in New Hampshire"
"This happens on every single link ... every ... damn ... one"
"Happens to me every time... But at least I don't repost!"
"I want to play a game..."
"first day on reddit... better prepare myself"
"Never go to war with a Redditor."
"How I picture r/aww"
"These Things."
"I have never felt so powerful."
"The Bare Necessities"
"Special Olympics"
"A different view on Youtube's load animation"
"oh fuck  oh fuck  oh fuck!"
"Accidentally went on /r/spacedicks"
"When I step in the shower and it's still too cold"
"oh fuck  oh fuck  oh fuck!"
"When I discovered Reddit  and my friend told me to &quot;check out&quot; r/spacedicks."
"After clicking on a NSFL link..."
"I got bored  brave  and drunk enough to see what /r/spacedicks is all about. This was how it went..."
"Thank God!"
"So this just popped up on my news feed."
"I dare you not to laugh [10]"
"Will Smith FTW."
"Covered in memes!"
"Teenage stupidity at its finest..."
"The Fast and the Furious: Polio Drift"
"TIMMY SLIDE!!!"
"2x Problem"
"And then several more problems when you want to dispose of the body"
"New PSP console"
"Im just gunna leave this here..."
"I already have a PrayStation!"
"What I actually look like when I dance"
"Well  if this shouldn't be here  where should it be?"
"Ever wonder what a semi-nude man eating spaghetti in a washing machine would look like?"
"Fading Faces (large GIF)"
"What a drag"
"Beastie Panda Boys. Came up with this months ago. Had no idea /r/gifsound was a thing!"
"Go to sleep."
"WOAH WOAH WOAH!"
"Oh fuck"
"OHFUCK!"
"Oh hai! (Fox Pup)"
"Lindsay Lohan looking as stunning as always"
"Make a wish"
"Pretty much how I feel about people"
"Works in a pinch."
"Oh Spider-man"
"Spiderman on hats"
"Tweet of the decade! [response]"
"Robert Downey Jr is impressed"
"I see what you did there"
"Racist Downey Jr"
"Much better holiday than Thanksgiving"
"&quot;Tanksgiven holiday for estudents&quot;? Close enough."
"Brownsville Independent School District"
"A friend forwarded this image from my old middle school in Texas"
"Probably my favorite face-swap"
"EGAD!"
"I could have saved a ton on therapy if I had seen this sooner."
"The best Freud quote"
"Usain Bolt's Future Descendant."
"Cross-Section of a Banana Under a Microscope  got it on yesiknowthat.com"
"After my boss gives me three days to complete a project I told him would take me two weeks."
"After my boss gives me three days to complete a project I told him would take me two weeks."
"Almost Friday..."
"10 tips to prevent rape (x-post pics)"
"Posted in my dorm building. Good information to know."
"Some good lessons posted in my dorm building."
"10 ways to prevent rape. (x-post pics)"
"Is this real"
"Is this real life?"
"Caught in a landslide..."
"How I feel as a Redditer who likes Nickelback."
"Dear vegetarians... [FIXED]"
"Glorious"
"Glorious (all i saw)"
"Don't know if rt but I still think its hilarious."
"A truly WTF tattoo"
"While considering his vasectomy..."
"More gold from Modern Family's Phil Dunphy!"
"Human motor bike  who wants to ride?"
"Look into her eyes - don't break eye contact  keep staring into those eyes."
"Omegle didn't fail me this time...."
"Writing 8 hours a day as a grad student"
"[GIF] My mind at [9]"
"Why I love women's soccer."
"My Cts teacher would not be proud."
"How the word &quot;Boob&quot; was invented."
"How I as a 23 year old college freshman trying to pick up the ladies."
"250 Movie GIFs to get you through the day"
"Sweet dreams  Reddit."
"Bus driver uppercuts a girl after she attacks him. Then throws her off the bus."
"Move bitch!"
"Space Cats album!"
"I think I shed a tear."
"Because we share life.."
"Improvised Explosive Device."
"Finally taught the dog to sit."
"Dubanana kitty"
"Banana Cat"
"The weirdest thing I've ever found typing in a random link on Imgur.[GIF]"
"When Someone Declares Rule 34."
"The reaction I imagine my girlfriend would have if she found my hidden files"
"Every time I check for karma after I post something"
"Please delete my history when I die."
"Discuss"
"So... 4chan is the purest form of art?"
"The evolution of Link's swords."
"The evolution of Link's swords. [FIXED]"
"This is what I saw at the bus stop this afternoon."
"We've all thought it."
"I think the force has finally left George"
"&quot;What have I done?&quot;"
"The Last Caticorn"
"saw the unicorn cat product on the frontpage and tried to find it using google....."
"Seeing a post I upvoted in the morning from r/new on the front page after coming back from lunch"
"Real Life Hermes Conrad"
"X-files Limbo"
"Real Life Hermes Conrad (x-post r/funny)"
"I think I can do this"
"My thoughts exactly  this trend needs to die."
"Keep Calm and - STOP! (x-post from r/Design)"
"Be Calm"
"Keep Calm"
"Derp"
"Aww... Baby's first drink!"
"I heard that their was a fish party going on so  here's an axolotl"
"How I feel packing to move out of my parents house"
"Browsing r/whatsthisbug"
"I just got the humble bundle and installed amnesia. This is me after playing for 5 mins"
"Indochinese Tigress - at Khao Kheow Open Zoo - Thailand 2012 by Ashley Vincent - [964 x 623]"
"Perfectly timed picture of a tiger shaking itself dry"
"Top 12 Candidates for the 2012 National Geographic Photo of the Year Contest"
"How I bet people truly feel when they repost and it makes the front page"
"How I Feel When My Posts Start Getting Downvotes"
"It's a bit late  but... how I feel being 28  taken  seeing all my friends get married and realizing I'm in line."
"What it was like getting out of my spot this morning"
"Sad but true"
"I Bet You Can't Throw This Wood Into A Bin Behind You While Blindfolded."
"Just a reminder..."
"My Nap-o-lantern (Mike Napoli of the Texas Rangers)"
"I await the end"
"The only thing I could post for my cake day tomorrow."
"Wasn't this supposed to be the top post today?"
"How I see today."
"For the folks in England"
"Quick! Play the song of time!&quot;"
"Waking up this morning."
"Silly bird  take that off. That is not a hat."
"Fashionista bird."
"Found this guy in class today!"
"Most of my friends didn't get this. Most of my friends are also stupid."
"Trick or treat?"
"I think I will try this for my Halloween costume this year. It's a repost  but still good."
"I've heard stories of people seeing God in everyday things  but I never thought it would happen to me"
"Alien vs Predator"
"They see me rollin'"
"Just chillin"
"Quit hitting yourself!"
"Biblical bully"
"And so it did happen."
"Why are you hitting yourself?"
"Out of all the things I could have said"
"Living in Tampa  these faces are pretty tame compared to what I see on a daily basis here. [Xpost from WTF_Florida]"
"Abandoned Mill from 1866. - Sorrento  Italy"
"A breathtaking aerial view of an abandoned mill in Italy"
"Abandoned mill from 1866"
"Abandoned mill from 1866 (x-post from r/pics)"
"Man Gets De-Niggered; a revolutionary breakthrough in science"
"DO NOT WANT!"
"Sign says &quot;No Skateboarding!&quot;"
"Red panda attacking fruit."
"Maybe if I wear this shirt....."
"Another disturbing corn pop comic"
"The new Canadian Corn Pop comics are pretty great!"
"I've heard it's the next Proactiv."
"Well those things don't just drive themselves."
"All of r/gaming today"
"Paddle FASTER!!!"
"Guitar Cat gets a perfect score on expert"
"Hardcore Punk Cat"
"gimme fuel  gimme fire!!!!"
"Someone on reddit created this gif  and this immediately came to mind."
"Found a gif of a cat bugging out  so I gave him a guitar."
"Johnny B. Goode"
"System of a Cat"
"What came to mind immediately"
"Guitar Cat is crazy"
"Cat of God"
"Dusk dismantled!"
"When I'm fapping and Mom drives up"
"Someone just posted this on my newsfeed"
"i wonder what happens next..."
"More like this"
"Today  my friend received an email on his gmail account from a sender named &quot;GMAIL&quot;. Seems legit."
"Go home trampoline... you're drunk."
"So it was pretty windy today around town..."
"We had a little wind today."
"Go home trampoline  you're drunk."
"I'll see your napping semis and raise you a trampoline (literally)"
"Bob Saget after Full House."
"So  how do you like my new girlfriend?"
"&quot;Excuse me sir  would you like to learn about Jesus?&quot;"
"Whenever I see &quot;(first post)&quot; on the front page..."
"Seems to work."
"Party in the backyard"
"That moment..."
"Whenever a girl posts a comment."
"Me  trying to be social  after being on Reddit for so long."
"Jersey Shore is being cancelled"
"Before the lock was invented."
"Duck tape fixes EVERYTHING"
"Popular logos: first vs current"
"Famous companies first logo compared to now"
"The single greatest picture on the inter-webs."
"Open your mind."
"Ok I know what the first girl is doing  but what is the 2nd girl doing?"
"Totally worth it..."
"Ok I know what the first girl is doing  but what is the 2nd girl doing?"
"Logical Brian"
"One please (x-post from /r/comics)"
"One please!"
"Found it in a comment... So Gary  who is this going to creep out?"
"Today is my last day of high school this is all i can think of since waking up"
"How I feel when I'm about to leave for work on a Friday"
"Anyone have an ocarina?"
"Just woke up and realized"
"Whelp  here we go..."
"Been waiting a year to post this. Good luck fellows."
"Here we go."
"It's been a pleasure Reddit..."
"I hope this is how it happens"
"You knew this was coming."
"Dawn of the final day - Zelda"
"Sunrise reflected in a bubble"
"Photo of bubble  floating in the air  with the sunset visible in its reflection"
"slightly more faith in humanity"
"Came across this on my news feed. A little faith in humanity has been restored."
"Dry cleaning shop owner acting like a boss"
"Go Outside and enjoy nature they said..."
"&quot;Soft kitty  warm kitty Little ball of furr Lazy kitty  pretty kitty purr  purr  purr&quot;"
"He's a little trouble maker"
"Dog in class"
"Dog in class"
"When you're on page 15  and your laptop dies."
"I can't even hold my feelings for this lion"
"Strong bond between lion and man (found in gifs)"
"I've never considered Lions as 'aww' material until now."
"DEM ROCKS"
"DAT ASS[SFW]"
"Twerk it"
"Phin and Jake Jump on it"
"Recommending a show to a friend  then seeing them like the show page on Facebook the next day."
"When I tell my friend about reddit  and the next day  he can't stop talking about 'that one site'"
"When my mom goes to work for the day."
"Sheep shield activated"
"Sheep shield activated"
"Not bad pencil  not bad"
"Don't think I'll be able to use this gif in a thread unless I'm being insensitive as hell"
"My favorite faceswap"
"Saw this on Facebook. A million times yea."
"Open the Rainbow bridge!"
"Just a Pug."
"They rapin' everybody out here!"
"When you see it"
"what's happening on the background?"
"Found this gem on facebook (uploaded to imgur for convenience)"
"OH SHI-"
"Gallium has a melting temperature of about 85 degrees Fahrenheit  which is basically room temperature. If you hold this metal it will begin to melt in your hand."
"It makes sense."
"Why do we name the plants if..."
"...and thats why its called uranus."
"How I feel when my post only gets 2 upvotes."
"Boop his head dog. Do it!"
"Always makes me laugh"
"This really does make me lol every time"
"Re-post but a classic."
"This is probably a repost (definitely a repost) but IMMA BOOP YOUR HEAD!"
"hey cat!"
"This came up on my feed today..."
"Knock  knock - who's there?"
"Obama  some weed and a bald eagle."
"Knock Knock"
"Knock Knock"
"Knock knock"
"knock knock....."
"Knock Knock Mr. President"
"As a person who sells printer ink for a living this is how i feel about college kids printing and posting memes in the hall."
"What I think every person in a business suit is thinking"
"When I hear people laughing in the conference room..."
"&quot;The American Way&quot;"
"'Merica..."
"Nothing at all..."
"Best. GIF. Ever."
"What happens on your cake day."
"HERES CHARLIEEEEEE!!!!!"
"Here.. Take my drum"
"Don't Mess With the Pep Band..."
"Drop the bass"
"Drop the bass."
"Drop the bass"
"Music makes you lose control!"
"Drop the Bass (X-Post from r/WTF)"
"This little guy followed me around for a couple of days."
"C-c-c-c-ombo breaker!!"
"BOOP"
"Troll Dolphin"
"Here  let me help you a little."
"We made it!!!"
"Draw Something Describes A Pothead"
"Draw something math..."
"This is what students at my workplace will see if they try and play Draw Something using our Internet connection"
"Draw Something is spying on me..."
"He went back for seconds"
"Blaggghghgh I'm still good I'm still good"
"Trolling Gameshow"
"O no she diint"
"I've run out of plates again  so I bought another 40kg. I've probably spent more time in the last week buying lifting-related shit than I have spent lifting. Victory thread victory  here I come!"
"I see these types of people at the gym every now and again."
"I can't decide if this kid is a douche in the making or absolutely awesome. Probably a bit of both."
"Like a boss!"
"The first time i had sex"
"My reaction when I found out I get free karma on my 1 year reddit anniversary."
"Just found this gem... &quot;Is your housemate an atheist?&quot;"
"This is the first result when I looked up atheist on google"
"So How Many of You Look Like This?"
"Know how to tell..."
"Found this while searching Google for a Atheist tattoo. Can't tell if it's a joke or not"
"A million gallons of fun!!!"
"&quot;Me if you use those fingers right.&quot;"
"I noticed something familiar in Ron's office."
"It all makes sense now."
"It all makes sense now!"
"The Swanson Archetype"
"Close enough."
"Wiggle wiggle wiggle wiggle wiggle...yeah!"
"The Transformers are here!!!! And...they...are smaller than i imagined..."
"So i killed a guy with an EOD bot in Battlefield 3... How I imagine he feels."
"(╯°□°）╯︵ ┻━┻"
"Whenever I play Dark Souls."
"This is what I call a passionfruit!"
"This is what I call a passionfruit!"
"What a cocky fruit"
"Ripe for the *icking."
"Passion fruit plant with a peculiar natural mutation..."
"'Murica's Theme"
"Saw this gif on here the other day  thought of this."
"hm"
"Im guessing he's muslim"
"Fierce and dangerous polar bear"
"Baby Polar Bear Belly Tickles!"
"Finding out that I have more karma than my son after only 9 days as a Redditor"
"Where did all the Buffalo go?"
"A pile of bison skulls  Kansas  1870s [1280 x 1001]"
"A mountain of bison bones from 1870s"
"Yeah  how do we know!?"
"&quot;More attractive than you think&quot; - German ad for craftsmen"
"Look at that huge rac.....wait a minute"
"Awesome German t-shirt ad(possibly NSFW)"
"Making plumbers' butts attractive."
"Well that's much better"
"GitHub and Whiskey"
"I'll have scotch  please. Neat."
"How my posts rate after an hour."
"Is it me  or does the RE6 logo look sexual.."
"Broccoli in a MRI looks like fireworks."
"Broccoli MRI looks like fireworks"
"Sword fight with flaming swords"
"MORTAL KOMBAT!!!!"
"Baby Hedgehog getting its belly rub and yawns after"
"Hedgehog belly rub."
"Cute yawn - Imgur"
"Baby hedgehog belly rub"
"The Last picture of the Bounty (Replica of the HMS Bounty) as she sank on Oct 29th in bad weather from Hurricane Sandy"
"She wants what?"
"Doing Halloween right (and Sesame Street wrong)"
"I used to think hair shavers and cats didnt mix..."
"So this showed up on my newsfeed"
"Red-bellied Short-necked Turtle!"
"Pick your body up and drop it on the floor"
"Well  I never got *that* sadist playing Roller Coaster Tycoon."
"The only reason to play Roller Coaster Tycoon 3"
"How I feel when driving during rush hour"
"CHOO CHOO  MOTHERF*CKERS. CHOOOOOOOO."
"Choo choo bitches!"
"Strike!"
"Thomas no!"
"Standoff"
"Where do Americans fit in?"
"So this started out as a small project  then &quot;exploded&quot;"
"The REAL Holy Trinity"
"when a friend on my side of politics makes a crazy conspiracy claim"
"When someone just keeps on talking."
"I'm going to say I totally agree with this statement"
"Coitus"
"As an Australian seeing all these posts about the presidential debate."
"Unreal pics of the volcano eruption in Chile."
"Wow"
"Red lightning"
"Fire in the sky"
"This makes sandstorms look like fun."
"This makes sandstorms look like fun [xpost from /r/wtf]"
"You know you are a STALKER player when you hear the fated words..."
"What a beautiful disaster. [x-post from WTF]"
"Mother Nature's terrifying beauty"
"Well hello little guy..."
"How I Envision US Diplomacy"
"My TEN favourite gifs ever"
"Douchebag of the year  poor kid."
"That's gonna leave a mark...."
"dessert"
"Brave child..."
"Spiders fleeing to trees and creating webs in them during the 2010 flooding in Pakistan"
"Earth  Jupiter and Venus from the skyline of Mars"
"Pew Pew Pew"
"Halt Citizen!"
"This cat watches way too many Army movies"
"Stealthy cat is stealthy"
"Stealthy cat is stealthy"
"metal gear?"
"I'm not a cat. I'm a Teenage Mutant Ninja Turtle!!"
"Weird"
"Spotted this at Barnes &amp; Noble today. Didn't realize I was in the Forever Alone section."
"To fulfill the needs of any cat lover"
"Mount Rainier Erupting beautiful lenticular clouds"
"...and you have my banana!"
"My banana!"
"Best gif ever (x-post from r/funny)"
"Whenever I'm Lord Eddard Stark and am offerred a piece of fruit in place of weaponry"
"I Think He Did..."
"putin making balloon animals"
"Waking Up Next To A Hog"
"A New Denomination of Currency - Limited Time Offer!"
"It's goin' down!"
"Mitt meet Elamo's gang."
"And I Ain't Playin' !"
"Do the zebra."
"Shuffling zebra"
"How I celebrate getting on the front page."
"Everyday im shufflin'"
"Lol wut?"
"Zebra strut"
"Zebra..."
"And slide..."
"This One Is Easy"
"Amazing Zebra"
"When I saw the &quot;keep off the grass&quot; sign at the job I was recently fired from"
"Friday is coming up!"
"Happy zebra is happy."
"Afro Zebra"
"I can't stop watching this."
"After the realization that tomorrow is Friday"
"Everday I'm zebra'ing."
"How I feel during the last 10% of downloads"
"Browsing the Comments of /r/ShitRedditSays"
"How i feel browsing new on /r/f7u12 [nsfw]"
"&quot;RL cake day!!!&quot;"
"How I feel when a movie I like is added to Netflix"
"Surfing in Chunks &lt;Rare&gt;"
"Surfers on foam-covered waves in Karitane  New Zealand. It's caused by chemicals entering the sea after flooding.."
"Damn you Quaker man!"
"Flooding in NZ makes for some... gnarly waves."
"Rainbow Ladybug"
"This is how I picture the locals see me  as a tourist  at the beach in hawaii.."
"Dwight Schrute on the subject of life"
"Grass is greener on the other side?"
"The most menacing of sounds"
"Dwight puts and end to dead memes"
"What happens after you die."
"Schrute on Lemons"
"When someone tells me &quot;it's gonna be a long day...&quot;"
"What happens when I die?"
"My brain on red bull..."
"An aww-dorable joey"
"I'll beat a motherfucker..."
"I don't know why  but I found this really funny."
"No words"
"Yummmmm!"
"Puppies Like Starbucks Too"
"Splash Mountain Melee"
"Time to Die"
"I always thought the popsicle stick jokes were a lil lame"
"Time to die."
"Front page  here I come.. FUCK!"
"Olympians in training making it look easy"
"I told everybody I was really good at high jump. I lied."
"So close."
"A vending machine that would give you an already lit cigarette for a penny  England 1931.[628x878]"
"Sir are you ready to order"
"So today I learned chicken nuggets come in four basic shapes."
"So today I learned chicken nuggets come in 4 basic shapes"
"Nnnnnnnnnnnnnnnnnnnnope on a vagoogoo. (NSFW)"
"Heyyy Sexy Latte!"
"Heyyyy Sexy Latte!"
"Went to the coffee shop today..."
"Ayyyyy Sexy Latte"
"Oh God! (NSFW)"
"&quot;Poking&quot; fun at the Sistine Chapel [nsfw]"
"Could you help him out!"
"Look how cute they are playing together!"
"Flexibility Wtf"
"Bitch got skills"
"The One card i never leave home without."
"You may now set your computer on fire"
"I'm gonna burn this fucker to the ground."
"Hello?"
"Hello?"
"Why God never received his PhD"
"Why God Doesn't Have a PHD"
"Why God never received a PhD"
"Seven hours  one image."
"Thank you for helping me pass my WWII final essay."
"This basically sums up my job-search."
"The Circle of Life"
"The Circle of Life"
"The Circle Of Life"
"Tough Chicks"
"This is my new favorite subreddit  so have this [FIXED]"
"Spider-woman?"
"my 1st attempt at this"
"Sway with me"
"The cookie cutter shark - known for biting neat round chunks of tissue out of it's victims. Ew."
"I present to you the Cookie Cutter Shark"
"Patch of four-leaf clovers"
"The luckiest place in the world (xpost from /mildlyinteresting)"
"My reaction when my boss tries to be friendly by telling a joke  then walks out of the room."
"Still the best yahoo answer to exist"
"Make me a sandwich...."
"Welcome to Munich. This is Oktoberfest."
"Let's have a beer at the Oktoberfest they said..."
"Welcome to Munich. This is Oktoberfest"
"Finn &amp; Jake Pencil Carving"
"Finn and Jake pencil carving (xpost pics)"
"Pencil lead sharpening skills"
"My experience so far with everything I post."
"Kaaameeee..."
"My thoughts on Never Ending Reddit."
"My Girlfriend who is a reddittor said &quot;i like GW&quot; i then proceeded to say &quot;me too&quot; then i realize..."
"My girlfriend asked if I thought she was on her period."
"Anon Ackbar. A shitty shoop I did  but I still thought it was funny."
"When your girlfriend introduces you to her attractive friends {Fixed}"
"How I feel about the American dream"
"Hey guys  I heard Ubisoft just made their DRM more reasonable!"
"How I felt after hearing that Disney bought out LucasArts."
"The most interesting skunk in the world"
"Right in the child hood"
"So  what's your favorite pokemon?"
"Abandon Thread!"
"After spending about 20 minutes in the &quot;back to roots r/wtf&quot;"
"Just some of the finer ones I've collected in my 600+ days on Reddit. Oh  and one is NSFW."
"When you and a friend are sleep deprived and can't stop laughing.."
"My reaction when my gerbil goes down my shirt"
"Said every girl always."
"When reddit has a good day."
"Convenient Weather Chart for Canadians."
"This pretty much sums up a Canadian year."
"This pretty much sums up an Arizonia year."
"This pretty much sums up an Arizona year."
"How I seduce women"
"Childhood officially ruined"
"I'M OUT!"
"Mitt Romney and friends at Bain Capital"
"Russians"
"The russian gang problems are getting pretty bad... (GIF)"
"Whenever I attempt to dance in a club"
"In honour of all the &quot;not sure if repost&quot; posts. Ya  it's a fucking repost!"
"ouch"
"I completely forgot horses can do that to you..."
"Fuck you  I'm a horse."
"Burnie some one needs help!"
"nomnomnom"
"So true."
"The tragic tale of Skeleton Jelly"
"Skeleton Jelly"
"An angelic cloud"
"An angel flying over my city during thanksgiving!:)"
"Come on Facebook!"
"Come on Facebook!"
"This strikes true."
"Skull of a child developing adult teeth."
"A child's skull while developing adult teeth. No gore  just a skull."
"Was I the only one who got really excited for a third kung fu panda?"
"How I feel about the iPhone 5 having another row of apps."
"Saving Lives."
"Oh Superman  you so funny!"
"Nonsense..."
"It's over 9000!"
"We're a bunch of dicks."
"So true."
"NASA Budget  in a nutshell"
"Is this why women &amp; children are supposed to go 1st?"
"Best picture of a Llama surfing you will see all day."
"Best &quot;Random&quot; imgur I've found yet"
"We hammock daily as well!"
"Armed bodyguards for the almost extinct Northern White Rhino [xpost /r/pics]"
"WAIT A SECOND..."
"Mind blown. I love you  Pixar. - Imgur (Imgur Roulette)"
"r/politics today"
"Every time someone posts something from Reddit on facebook..."
"My reaction when I discovered /r/gentlemanboners"
"Even Homer J. Simpson had a better understanding to becoming President"
"Homer Logic"
"imgur: the simple image sharer"
"How I view people that smoke to look cool"
"It all makes sense now"
"ERMAHGERD  URM SWURMIN"
"Its a trap!"
"White tiger...."
"Teacher asks you to pair up with a partner for a project. You look at your friend like this:"
"The more you look...the more of your soul they devour"
"LET ME HEAR YOUR WAR CRY! [0:42]"
"YEEEEEAAAAAAAH!"
"Assassins creed parkour"
"yet another reason why president obama is great..."
"America is in his hands"
"Obama telling a scary story."
"And he looked so sharp in the debates  too."
"Makes Me wish I had a twin."
"Christians  perhaps you should consider Odin worship."
"Comparative theology"
"Jesus promised the end of all wicked people..."
"Probably a repost but still funny/true."
"I don't see many Ice Giants around."
"/r/ aww in a nutshell."
"I iz delivered now...?"
"I just broke 1000 comment karma"
"That moment when you notice a lot of redditors live in your city"
"Getting an upvote"
"The enemy of redditors everywhere."
"Crazy plant like thing growing from a chemical reaction"
"Now that's a bitch slap"
"Youtube Gold"
"That'll do."
"Just some adorable fox PDA."
"The majority of students on final exam review day"
"Beware of this terrifying monstrosity!"
"Tiny house  or giant kitten?"
"Accidentally opening Internet Explorer"
"TGIF"
"Just gave in my 2 week notice.."
"When my slow work computer freezes after important unsaved progress"
"the moment your computer decides to be a jerk and nothing works but this"
"But....why?"
"Heard Reddit likes cats and Chuck Norris"
"How would you make Melbourne a better place?"
"I want a picture just like this for myself"
"Simply the best."
"When a someone else's single post gets more karma then I have total"
"Moved into my new student house  this was in the freezer."
"I have a different sense of humor than my sister...This is how I feel around her."
"Missing Tortoise!"
"Has anyone seen this Tortoise?"
"Imma cry  fo realzz"
"Missing Tortoise"
"Saw this at the park today...."
"Missing Tortoise!"
"MISSING TORTOISE!"
"Soup of the Day!"
"What my friend does in his senior business class..."
"What my friend does in his senior business class... (x-post /r/funny)"
"Most accurate mirror ever..."
"How I feel as a-"
"How I feel about all the &quot;Googled 'insert clever word here.' Needless to say  I was impressed&quot; posts lately..."
"Teddy Roosevelt vs. Big Foot"
"Why can't I learn this in history class?!"
"Polyatheist"
"Polyatheist"
"a little creature i know my fellow redditors are very very fond of"
"Tickle tickle.... OH GOD NO!"
"Meat-loaf baby"
"Enjoy your meal?"
"Me driving while it's snowing."
"Because i like it."
"Grow a bear? Ha  amateurs."
"God of Reddit"
"the god of reddit"
"cat beard"
"Damn cat hair!"
"Reddit's Jesus"
"The God of Reddit"
"Reddit in one image"
"As a redditor  this is what I expect at the end of no shave movember"
"Googled 'King of Reddit'... Wasn't what I expected  but then again  I don't know what I expected"
"so i Googled the god of Reddit"
"Hank Hill said it the best"
"Ice Canyon  greenland"
"I'M SO EXCITED!!!!"
"Someone is VERY excited"
"I like turtles..."
"Rise of the turtle!"
"Just amazing!"
"What an Awesome Cloud"
"Am trying to break the 10 000 link Karma mark. This oughta do it...."
"Super Kitty"
"Kowloon Walled City - China"
"Getting your priorities right. This picture represents the epitome of humanity."
"Oh the Irony"
"what? I don't even..."
"Which one do you have?"
"This is probably a repost  but it's funny."
"Bambi's unlucky day."
"Damn hippies"
"And the winner is..."
"Gloating"
"Fuck You"
"Wore my Darth Vader helmet while giving out candy last night. At one point  a guy jogging by yelled out &quot;sweet Disney costume!&quot;"
"I'd like to think I don't have a problem..."
"supermodels without makeup"
"Supermodels with and without makeup/Photoshop"
"Supermodels without makeup"
"Risky Business"
"OHHHHH YEAHHHHH...."
"Sliding Dirty"
"How you doin'?"
"Me  when a title of a popular post has &quot;this gem&quot; in it"
"How I feel when people complain about having summer too soon  while living in Canada"
"When someone tells me the Moon landing was a hoax."
"When somebody tells me it's my cake day right before i go to bed."
"When somebody tells me it's my cake day right before i go to bed."
"When someone wakes me up during deep sleep.[FIXED]"
"When no one upvotes pictures of my cat"
"If i was snape i would also have had flipped some tables..."
"How I felt when my iPhone decided to take a swim in the airplane shitter after I had already vomited in it."
"BOOM! Headshot!"
"Sneaky thieving bears! He's got that &quot;busted&quot; look  priceless!"
"I was trying to look something up and found this. Army men at work."
"MISSIN' FEESH"
"Imma Cry Mane"
"Does r/aww have enough Slow Lorises? I don't think so."
"Yes I did."
"Kill...me...."
"I just googled 'Ron Swanson' - found one the single greatest pictures of all time"
"Found this while trying to find a picture of Ron Swanson and Tammy 2 (nsfw?)"
"The pig that I f***"
"Women and cats first!"
"Abandon ship..!!!"
"Shit just got serious."
"Shit just got serious."
"Must go  my people need me."
"Funny. I think the cat is photoshopped in though."
"Die juice die!"
"DEATH TO ALL JUICE"
"Islamic &lt; Jewish"
"When someone disables comments on their Youtube video.."
"When a response to my comment gets more upvotes than mine"
"Worst plant placement ever"
"Stereotypes."
"Poorly Placed Plant"
"MTV cancelled the Jersey Shore!"
"An utterly adorable GIF of a large dog lovingly kissing a small bunny on it's little rabbity nose."
"he sat like this the entire class period."
"The true plot behind Slender."
"The true plot behind Slender."
"ORIGAMI!"
"This picture just emerged on my Facebook page  made me chuckle."
"Chris Brown's Halloween costume... because people just don't hate him enough yet?!"
"Just when you thought you couldn't hate Chris Brown anymore... (He's in the middle)"
"Chris Brown's Halloween costume... because people just don't hate him enough yet?!"
"First time I gave a blowjob"
"A Newborn Baby Gorilla Surprised"
"Newborn Gorilla Surprised"
"Cold stethoscope?"
"Foreshadowing."
"Googled &quot;fat guy with money&quot; and got this. Isn't this Gabe Newell?"
"The real reason there is no Half-Life 3"
"the real reason there is no Half-Life 3(x-post from r/pics)"
"Who gave the green light for this movie? I mean really"
"HUMAN!"
"When something from r/gifs gets reposted on r/funny and gets to the frontpage..."
"Reading My Drunk Texts"
"Yeah."
"No match for grumpy cat"
"it begins."
"Airport security"
"Whenever I don't have to look in the comments to figure out a &quot;When you see it&quot; post"
"My reaction when I found a year old reddit account I forgot I signed up for."
"Finally achieving an 1000 point post"
"What I expect every time I post anything on Reddit."
"That's... sexy?"
"Beyonce  in 1 simple gif"
"Whenever I know the answer in class"
"Cyberpunk Wallpapers. Paris 2084."
"GODDAMMIT DIEGO"
"If Wonder-Woman was a drag queen..."
"At least she's not smoking"
"Pregnant Breakdancing."
"Weeeeeeeee!"
"Such cute eyes you have"
"baby sloth"
"Sloths &lt;3"
"A literal sign our education system is lacking"
"I think of this every time I shake hands with somebody."
"Happy birthday you hilarious bastard..."
"Happy birthday to this wonderful man."
"Two girls are sitting at a table quietly"
"This Guy (:"
"Head in the Clouds"
"A man called gravity"
"1938 Phantom Corsair. That's all."
"Letting Her Hair Down"
"Letting Her Hair Down"
"Tsk Tsk"
"A friend of mine snapped this picture of a cop on the interstate yesterday.."
"Just an example of the fine police force we have here in Ohio."
"saw this on the facespace"
"It can wait"
"Missing link or first contact?"
"New Monkey Discovered"
"Monkey."
"Cat Dunk"
"Kitty Dunk"
"Can he make it? Yes. He. Can!"
"How Pitbull (rapper) came to be."
"Right then  where to begin..."
"Sandwich?"
"a personal favorite"
"I hate my life."
"Midlife crisis baby"
"Reddit after tonight's VP debate"
"Funny box"
"Bill Cosby  they said..."
"Dat accuracy"
"Dat accuracy"
"Well this is awkward..."
"Would you live here?"
"Reddit... Words can't describe my.. Uh.. Not sure which emotion to feel."
"This reminded me of Fallout when it was shiny and new [Redneck Mansion] (sorry if repost)."
"Redneck Condos"
"Megaton: Life before the bomb"
"Don't be a racist  be like mario!"
"Don't be a racist  be like mario!"
"Don't be racist..."
"I was looking for Hugh Laurie photos and found this"
"Truer words have never been spoken..."
"This is how I feel dealing with customers at work"
"When I heard about the church in London advising people to stop taking their HIV medication  claiming their lead pastor could &quot;cure&quot; them of the disease."
"How I feel when browsing r/facebook."
"Arguing with most Christians"
"When I'm sleeping over at a friends place and their parents start fighting during dinner"
"When my parents ask me at dinner &quot;when are you going to bring a girl over?&quot;"
"Wanna Be My Loris"
"He is ok with his food  but there is something worrying him inside..."
"greatest actors never to have won an oscar"
"And the winner for Best Actor in a Leading Role goes to..."
"Greatest actors never to have won an oscar."
"Where you should pee [flowchart]"
"&quot;What do you normally do when I'm gone?&quot;"
"How I imagine other redditors when they complain about a repost."
"How i imagine redditors complaining about reposts"
"How I imagine redditors complaining about reposts look..."
"How I picture other redditors complaining about reposts"
"Coke  its whats for dinner"
"Every time my phone gets no signal..."
"I er... just no! Eggs  do not do that!"
"I er... just no! Eggs  do not do that!"
"I'm gonna sing the doom song! Doom doom  doom de doom doom....."
"Gonna sing The Doom Song now."
"HIFW I Talk to Foreign People."
"Praying Mantis"
"MFW everyone around me is talking about the World Series"
"How I feel most days....."
"My response to the Mike &amp; Ike commercials about Mike splitting up with Ike."
"How I feel when people post their PERSONAL views on atheism/religion."
"Whenever I see any &quot;Newest Hobbit Poster&quot; posts"
"Who won the Vice Presidential debate?"
"Has reddit not seen this? A glass toaster (hopefully not repost)"
"It exists!"
"For those wishing for a clear toaster..."
"Solo artist"
"I'm just going to paint a little quadlaser right there."
"Tornado near Parker  Colorado"
"Roller coasters..."
"WE GOIN DOWN!!"
"Jesus is a bad ass."
"After Jesus being on the front page  I thought I could share this."
"While Jesus is still on the front page. I thought I could share this."
"HD - Sun and Moon [1920x1080]"
"After recreational use of marijuana has been legalized in Washington and Colorado  this picture came to my mind"
"When a misplaced phone wakes everyone in your hotel room at 3am."
"So I was at the store today and knocked over some frisbees  then walked back into a stack of toys and it all came down. This is what it looked (and felt) like."
"Emma Stone"
"Things that Bounce"
"I know it's a repost  but for my cake day  here's my favorite gif over the last year on reddit"
"Ghost in the cemetery - Imgur"
"When you see it.. eat dots"
"What reddit has made me think when I see news about a certain celebrity."
"People on their cakeday"
"What I think of the Reddit community when they see a repost (also first post"
"I was searching flamingos when I found this..."
"War is a serious thing... but CAT!"
"Hamas hates cats? That's it. NOW  I'm angry."
"Hamas hates cats? That's it. NOW  I'm angry."
"Apple Maps was right.."
"Mind = Blown"
"After lurking for a bit without ever posting  I finally decided to put up this self portrait of my girlfriend. Please be honest. Hope you guys like it"
"Look at the painting my gf painted the other day(Upvote so her work can be seen)"
"My  uhm  Girlfriend made this."
"My girlfriend amazes me with her art  but she doesn't think it's very good. What does reddit think?"
"My girlfriend painted this  pretty impressed"
"My girlfriend painted this  i thought i would share her skills with you reddit!"
"My girlfriend just finished this painting last night. She says it's nothing special  but I think it's amazing!"
"Mr. Lisa"
"Oh we're posting art we've made? Here's something I made in my parents basement. Probably my greatest achievement or whatever."
"Spotted a sure sign on my morning commute that summer is almost over...."
"How I felt and thought when my teacher embaressed me on Monday nights class."
"what is this??"
"Grandpa didn't have Spongebob"
"Creepy  where is this from?"
"Does anyone know what this is from? Creepy animatronics."
"I heard that Reddit likes cats that do human things..."
"My milkshakes..."
"If I had one hour to live..."
"If I had one hour to live..."
"Ouch"
"What last night could've really used instead of a drinking game."
"What last night could have used instead of a drinking game."
"APPROPRIATE"
"Wife of a fallen Marine  sleeps by his casket the night before his burial  playing music which reminded her of him"
"The night before the burial of her husband 2nd Lt. James Cathey of the United States Marine Corps  killed in Iraq  Katherine Cathey refused to leave the casket  asking to sleep next to his body for the last time."
"Just having some fun with the toys..."
"Buster Keaton having a bit of car trouble. [x-post r/oldschoolcool]"
"everytime my parents ask me to do something"
"How I felt walking to my physics final this morning."
"'Murca!"
"So cute! He just wants a fwiend"
"Want a hug?"
"For my First Cakeday!!  i raise you this  reddit...."
"Temptation"
"Well  it certainly didn't start off as a joke."
"When my girlfriend types in 'r' in the address bar and Reddit shows up first instead of redtube."
"It's all a question of perspective"
"Slo-Mo Bullet"
"The DIRT on Mario!"
"I told a co-worker I wanted to have my feet nibbled on by those little Doctor Fish so she decided she would scar me for life instead."
"Weirdest movie I have ever seen"
"The Duel"
"The Duel"
"How I felt when my dealer told me he quit dealing. And he's my only connection =["
"Just making a list of things to do before a flight when this came up..."
"Mountain Goats ain't got SHIT on this."
"Cecilia  responsible for the restoration of the Christ of Borja  is simply another artist in a long line of visionaries..."
"A new milestone in art history"
"Variations"
"How I feel downvoting someone already in the negatives"
"The perfect upper-cut."
"Searching for a wifi hotspot when..."
"What Don't They Know!?"
"So this showed up on my fb feed this morning..."
"Train derailment off a building."
"Star Wars is a religion"
"Y U NO EXPLAIN!!!"
"My favorite Christmas song"
"It's idiotic stories filled with non-nonsensical metaphors like this one that substitute actual knowledge. These people make me support post-adolescence abortion."
"Inception!!"
"Cut that shit out!"
"This will happen if you leave your room for a month unattended."
"thought this belonged here [NSFL]"
"Saw this on my news feed  and that's a big nope for me!"
"Friend posted this on my newsfeed after a trip to Asia."
"In a friends room at Uni"
"Pay a toll! What the..."
"Why Does This Make Me Laugh So Hard?"
"Oh  aren't they just so quaint!"
"baby  what the fuck?"
"Some people just don't listen!"
"Baby  what the fuck?"
"My nephew decided to grow a beard. Thoughts?"
"Pretty death!"
"How I feel after visiting r/spacedicks"
"Why didn't you write me? Why? It wasn't over for me  I waited for you for seven years."
"Chinese woman run over by speeding truck [gif] [xpost from r/MorbidReality]"
"Meanwhile in Hong Kong..."
"Break So Bad! (Chinese Bootleg Breaking Bad)"
"A clever fake"
"Thanks for the reminder..."
"Pugception"
"Reddit  I give you a pug within a pug."
"Yo Dawg  I heard you like pugs..."
"Inception Pug"
"Am I The Only One Who Ever Noticed This"
"So full of WIN..."
"Sparks [gif]"
"This Gif really sparked my interest"
"Let the sparks fly"
"Playing with fire."
"laziness lvl over 9000"
"I'm surprised he had the energy to get out of bed today."
"Laziness at its finest."
"This guy is why i don't find slender all that terrifying."
"When you spend too much time watching cartoons  the shows start blurring together"
"Those Krabbie Patties look tasty  I'll tell you what."
"Oh no  it is alien all over again."
"WBC  meet Hell's Angels."
"How I feel trying to make a title for a post"
"I bet that sand is warm."
"Which seat can i take?"
"I'm incapable of not bursting out laughing everytime I look at this."
"will always be my favorite gif"
"I see your repost and raise you a repost!"
"unfortunate time to get arrested"
"Arrested during haircut."
"This man does not f*** around."
"Mirror Mirror"
"Just a young Steve Irwin and a platypus"
"Nobody ever asks..."
"Destroying N64 Joysticks since 1998 (as well as palms)"
"Destroying N64 Joysticks Since 1996 [Fixed]"
"Destroying N64 Controllers since 1999"
"Come at me  bro!"
"fear the almighty"
"Fear the almighty"
"I am chick  hear me roar!!!!"
"This is the funniest thing I will ever watch"
"Kayak pool dive"
"When a thread goes well then backfires."
"Well that was fun"
"I just hired my DJ for the Rapture Party. What do you think?"
"DJ Jesus; He died for your spins"
"When I need to decide between reddit  netflix and video games"
"How this movie was made in the first place  lots and lots of..."
"That's about right..."
"Men &amp; Women See Colours Differently"
"The Messiah has risen!"
"How I feel when my friend hits the frontpage his second day of using Reddit."
"manual car rage"
"McKayla Maroney teaches how to Dougie"
"Being a conservative on r/politics."
"Wookie Goldberg"
"Found this gem  perusing the interwebs..."
"Say hello to my little.. banjo."
"Say Hello to my Little Friend!"
"Nope in a nutshell"
"Now I feel like I HAVE to open the door..."
"Well at least they can agree on something"
"&quot;What is your major?&quot; &quot;Art&quot; XD"
"I see your library in both Iran and Yale and raise you a library in the USA"
"Emma Stone doesn't want to be a gif"
"Emma Stone doesn't want to be a gif"
"Hey  I don't wanna sound like a queer or nothin'  but I think unicorns are kick ass!"
"They see me rollin'  they hatin'"
"Haters Gonna Hate"
"Kid Masters the Unicycle"
"He's getting sooo laid when girls see this years later...."
"Sort of how I feel when riding bike at a [5]"
"Every boy's dream bike..."
"Still my favorite picture ever"
"Road to paradise"
"Paint war in Berlin"
"Colorclash (Berlin paint war)"
"My mind when listening to dubstep..."
"They see me rollin'"
"They see me rolling..."
"see me rollin...they hatin..."
"The r/wtf version of &quot;They see me rollin'...&quot;"
"Feed... Me... NOW!"
"Just....can't.....stay.....awake......"
"A cross stitch even your grandma would love..."
"My life described via cats"
"When I pour cereal  then find out there is no milk left."
"Why you gotta disrespect me bro!?"
"My cake day is coming to an end  and this is how I feel in line for the midnight showing of Batmat."
"Looks like Bane met his match [X-Post from /r/southpark]"
"Damn straight we're doing another one with that tree"
"yes."
"The Creek"
"Dark Forest with Rain"
"You Come at the King  You best not miss"
"Game of.....The Wire?"
"Your mother is so fat..."
"It just got real."
"Condensed sulfer burns blue in the crater of the Kawah Ljen volcano - East Java  Indonesia"
"There's so many possible titles for this"
"Derp Maggot"
"Microscopic Derp"
"When something from r/reactiongifs gets reposted on r/gifs and gets to the frontpage..."
"When a repost hits the front page"
"To the person who just goes through and downvotes all posts"
"What I think when people get tons of karma on their first post..."
"When I get a ton of upvotes and only one downvote"
"When my friend showed me that he made the front page using my Facebook comment."
"When I found out it was MrTwiggy who trapped my portal."
"Internet disconnected...."
"Ron Swanson's Pyramid of Greatness"
"Ron Swanson Pyramid of Greatness"
"Study it. Learn it. Live by it."
"A Perfectly Calibrated Recipe For Maximum Personal Achievement"
"Hilarious Tampax ad"
"possibly the best Disney face swap ever."
"there aren't enough pygmy marmosets on this subreddit..."
"Pygmy Marmosets on fingers."
"Tard the Grumpy Cat was on CBS 5 Morning News in Phoenix"
"Oh Mr.Bean..."
"Canada isn't taking America's shit anymore."
"Its been over 200 years  and as a Canadian I'm not sorry (:"
"The Left/Right Brain [infographic]"
"The obvious bias in this annoys me."
"1 Brain  2 Minds"
"Left Brain  Right Brain"
"The Right To Bear Arms"
"What's the one thing you need in a bear attack?"
"Elevator-trolling-stairs"
"Remember  when attaching a Space Shuttle to its 747 carrier aircraft  always..."
"NASA has a dry sense of humor when it comes to the mounting points on the Shuttle Carrier Aircraft."
"meanwhile on the subway"
"swag"
"WTF is wrong with these guys"
"This shouldn't be a thing...."
"It's just a joke..."
"I've done all these things"
"When I first found reddit"
"How Frankie Muniz Feels About Bryan Cranston's Success."
"NFL Qb's talking on fb"
"A Conversation Between Manning and Brady (FB)"
"NFL QB Facebooking"
"Whatcha thinkin about?"
"Oh  just war stuff"
"Most realistic Iron Man costume I've seen to date."
"Doing the DQ test ..."
"Sadly  I know many people who would fall for this"
"DYEL?"
"Push it."
"You got to push it."
"Tag you're it"
"It does not fit into his ear..."
"There is something here  bro... I can feel it..."
"Allan gets around!"
"They know whats important"
"Good Guy agent Dash"
"So I was playing a game on my phone when I saw this"
"The creators of Agent Dash understand Reddit"
"The Best Film Synopsis Ever"
"You can't just use firetype pokemon like that!"
"Invisible string"
"Wow...just wow"
"Facebook genius."
"This bears repeating"
"This picture has been sent to a lot of my friends in the past few days."
"Story of my life..."
"How I feel after drunk texting my ex"
"So the new Mars Rover looks pretty badass... (far right)"
"How Being Ignored On Your Cake Day Feels"
"Naysayers shall say nay (intersected mail from r/funny)"
"The Bible -"
"Evasion Tanking on Baleroc"
"A Master of His Craft"
"Now that's what i call sexy!"
"It's hard being a man - extended version"
"It's hard being a man extended version (x-post from r/4chan)"
"We need a Penguin champ in LoL!"
"Wizard caught on tape"
"I obviously have the power"
"Damnit DrHetterscheidt."
"An Imgur Link  but the picture's not so funny. Read the comments instead."
"Just a baby bat."
"Them little bat feets"
"king of cocaine"
"Wonder what was going on here?"
"Don't do drugs  Don't shoplift"
"Lizard has amazing accuracy!"
"There there."
"ThreatDown: Bears!!"
"Dance party"
"When I receive 10+ upvotes [Fixed]"
"Wilson from Castaway cosplay"
"Wilsooooon!"
"Toy soldiers"
"?! nothing to add"
"True love does exist..."
"So in love..."
"The tale of Fats Mcgee and his retard three (Long and nsfw)"
"Today is my first cake day. Cheers!"
"What'd you say?"
"crazy backwards guitar"
"Libyan uprising"
"Not sure about the accuracy without the stock... but still a cool picture."
"If you love Santans... (found on my timeline)"
"George Carlin on the wrong kind of pride"
"Hey Carl have you seen my..."
"What a little......!"
"Hey Carl..."
"I'm sure many of you have seen this  but for my cake day I give you my favorite picture on the internet."
"Sonofabitch Carl"
"the act of a monster"
"Dave Chappelle  speaking the truth"
"Dalai Lama is Cyclops"
"Dalai Lazers"
"Poodle Llama"
"Repost  but it made my Thursday a little better."
"The chicken whisperer"
"Chillin' with my chicks"
"Covered with cock (safe for work)"
"Kung Cow!"
"Nailed it."
"Is the redditor gone? [X-post aww]"
"Something great happened today..."
"It's been a lot of pain and suffering  but I finally did it: 106% on Super Meat Boy."
"Haikus are fun."
"I'm so sorry  son"
"What have you done..."
"found a gif that represents reddit perfectly"
"Reddit in a nut shell"
"Reddit in a nutshell"
"Reddit  I'm getting my internet installed today after over a month without it after moving. Tonight will be glorious. [pic]"
"this is how batman made me feel"
"Well  this is going to be my first goal once I get my hands on an Oculus Rift kit..."
"This hurts my feelings."
"A friend of mine found this on her car after an attempt at parallel parking."
"Friend found this on her car."
"Holiday sale on dryers."
"Well  would you just take at look at that. Finally  something that makes some sense!!"
"Dual time"
"Saw this earlier....the fuck?"
"You're no Gentleman"
"Go Bobby Go!"
"Shake"
"Getting down"
"Smashing."
"Never leave a kid alone with a laptop."
"Never leave a kid alone with a laptop.(x/post from r/funny)"
"Never leave a kid alone with a laptop. (x-post r/ funny)"
"This is a Flemish Giant  the largest breed of rabbit there is."
"Saw this on facebook today  are you effing kidding me?"
"I raise you my funny teacher name."
"So these guys were riding around college station last night..."
"My friend spotted these guys while driving around town yesterday"
"This person clearly has no idea what she is doing."
"How I feel upvoting a sad but relevant story on r/news"
"Just 'Ol Blue Eyes"
"Steven Seagal vs Kids"
"Max Payne?"
"mini gif dump! (do you know where can I upload all 308 gifs? imgur did not let me!)"
"Googled &quot;Best picture on the internet&quot;. This was the first result."
"I think I agree with Google. This is the &quot;Greatest picture on the internet&quot;"
"If only Walmart did photos like this.."
"Googled &quot;best picture on the internet&quot; and this is what i got"
"Reddiculous"
"Googled &quot;Best Picture On The Internet&quot;  this was the first result."
"The classiest photo I have ever seen."
"I have started associating this picture with reddit in my mind"
"What I picture the average redditor looks like"
"Quotes that inspired you. Or you found life changing."
"Overly Attached Nicolas Cage.."
"Overly Attached Nic Cage"
"Mom was worried about my new girlfriend. I sent her this pic."
"Brilliant"
"Collision Lights"
"Wahne el porche strikes again  well  not really..."
"WTF  Poo? [NSFW]"
"Not sure if posted yet."
"Front page... HOOOO"
"Found this gif on 4chan  thought you guys might like it"
"o - o"
"Its...almost like watching Shark Week"
"Best thing I have ever seen"
"Cannot comprehend how one does this"
"Every time I post on Reddit.."
"Will Ferrell's Cat"
"Curse you  Darwin!"
"STAHP"
"Poor Dinos"
"When someone asks if I can dance"
"Panda Slide!"
"Pandas and chickens belong together"
"Pretty much the perfect evening"
"Damn... SNES games were expensive."
"An awesome three step optical illusion"
"My favorite optical illusion - stare at the middle"
"Your black and white castle is pretty cool. But my optical illusion is better."
"Stratus clouds"
"I'm going to hell for laughing at this."
"Me and my dog  12 years apart."
"Falcon Version of Puppy Dog Eyes"
"Falcon Version of Puppy Dog Eyes"
"Those weren't puppy dog eyes"
"This little guy needed his &quot;Puppy Dog Face&quot; to be here (x-post from /r/funny)"
"I'm just going to chill right he-AHHH!"
"Exit Stage Right."
"Colored Pencils."
"If you talk on the phone like this in public  fuck you. (fixed)"
"Everywhere the light touches Simba..."
"Simba  listen to your father"
"Porn shoot photobombed by a duck."
"Soon.... (NSFW)"
"Soon..."
"I joined eBay for the first time today  and accidentally won an auction for something I didn't really want."
"After 5 days of getting back together with my ex."
"How I feel everytime I go to Chick-fil-a now."
"MFW I find my karma doubled overnight...because of penis cookies."
"Forever alone"
"Forever Alone"
"Some men just want to watch the world turn"
"Is this Jesse from Breaking Bad?"
"They need it"
"My favorite atheist."
"Humanity"
"Why has no one else tried to use this formula/game-type to make another best seller?"
"Gentlemen  we can rebuild her. We have the technology"
"Oh Sam I am..."
"I had my suspicions..."
"Never thought /b would show any compassion. I was proven wrong today."
"My expectations on my first cake day [x-post from r/funny]"
"For my cakeday  i give you my favorite Redditgif."
"Dat Back"
"My new watch movement cufflinks"
"Sometimes the highlight of a film is the closed captioning..."
"whenever I see an asian person laugh"
"Errmahgerd"
"HELLO THERE"
"Hello. My name is bird."
"The Global Transportation System"
"Saw this on Facebook there goes my Scooby doo childhood"
"It's like Taken...but with more Nicolas Cage."
"Training session at Shenyang Sports School  China"
"If you're a kid who grew up in the 90's  this is your childhood."
"They got Frank!"
"Fucking United States of America"
"nuff Said"
"Rare picture of Abraham Lincoln"
"Gandalf is not pleased."
"Even wizards need oakley(The Hobbit)"
"Talk about determination!"
"My friend asked Suzuki to make the peace sign  he flipped the bird instead."
"Young David Suzuki doppelgänger meets actual David Suzuki. Ridiculousness ensues."
"A friend of mine shared some drinks with David Suzuki"
"Don't mess with Rudolph. (x-post /funny)"
"Used to..."
"Used to..."
"Rudolph The Red Nosed Raindeer...."
"Rudolph has had enough!"
"used to."
"When I actually do the assignment  and the teacher doesn't collect it..."
"It was very windy on my daily commute this morning. This is how I powered through it."
"The end of the tongue (proboscis) of a hummingbird hawkmoth"
"Microscopic shot of Anons penis"
"Microscopic shot of a hummingbird's tongue"
"My University's Meme page did me proud with this one"
"Dominos is crowdsourcing the internet to design a pizza delivery car. Why do I feel this will be the end result?"
"Presenting: The Homer"
"Mr. President  the Cardinals won..."
"How I feel hitting on girls"
"how i feel playing sports"
"What happens when I post something that I think will get a lot of upvotes"
"SHARK-YUKEN!"
"Everyday I'm shufflin'"
"Wiggle wiggle wiggle wiggle wiggle yeah"
"Work it!"
"Oppa Humping style"
"Come J.O. on my train set. NSFW"
"Very tempting offer."
"Don't worry Alyssa  we all are..."
"Found this under my car's wiper coming out of the grocery store  thought I'd share."
"The choice is clear: Jesus or Obama"
"This is atheism WTF at its finest. Fuck this."
"The Danxia Landform  China"
"Premature Ejaculators Anonymous (SFW)"
"Poor man  I'm glad you got some help."
"Story of my life..."
"poor guy..."
"Premature ejaculation"
"How I feel when I have something of value to add to the conversation only to see the exact words written by someone else."
"Cat pranking"
"When I was trying really hard to seduce my girlfriend this morning and she told me she was on her period"
"This happened in the Netherlands"
"What was Hitler's first name?"
"Translucent Ants Photographed Eating Colored Liquids jelly beans anyone?"
"THAT'S RACIST!!!"
"Haha..ha... AWW HELL NAW"
"This never gets old"
"Browsing reddit  looking at the time  and browsing again."
"Just finished a paper for a class in one sitting  then realized I hadn't saved it at all. Save."
"Scientists have successfully created a bear/fruit-roll up hybrid. The drawbacks: full derp."
"Sun bear is not a very photogenic animal ..."
"fwd: fwd: fwd: fwd: DO NOT SWALLOW YOUR CHEWING-GUM or else  see what happens:"
"Don't swallow your gum"
"The people who sit behind me in class while I surf reddit..."
"Aj mccaron  his gf  manti teo and his gf skype"
"Alabamas quarterback and girlfriend  Manti Te'o and girlfriend"
"The difference between Alabama and Notre Dame"
"&quot;Onward  Cocoa.&quot;"
"Onward my lackey!"
"My Noble Steed."
"You lost weight. Good for you  now get the fuck out of here. Also pic."
"TL;DR"
"To the recent influx of unfunny Facebook screenshots"
"Gorilla Warfare [Gif]"
"Fire in the hole."
"I SAID GET OUT THE WAY"
"MFW Imgur is down for maintenance"
"Hey guys."
"Um... I don't want to disturb.."
"Ganon Style"
"Doin it Ganon style!"
"Two birds  one stone."
"So that's how he travels around undetected..."
"Dear Internet  never change. Sincerely  me."
"looked up &quot;Hitler&quot; for a report. Found this."
"Hitler in pajamas riding a magic carpet on a rainbow"
"Just Adolf riding the rainbow."
"Ahhhh the merry days of Hitlermas."
"So close..."
"NOW I know why those teenagers made fun of me..."
"Getting on the freeway near the neighboring retirement community."
"I never knew you could do this..."
"Who's next?"
"Haters Gonna Hate"
"Haters gonna hate."
"How I feel when I watch youtube now."
"How I feel every time I go to youtube."
"Seeing the recent increase in ads across the internet really makes me think of where we are headed"
"HIFW I quadruple my link karma with one post"
"Just a couple of baby otters"
"HOMOPHOBE!"
"Homophobe"
"Shock"
"WHAT JUST HAPPENED?!"
"Best. Reaction. Ever."
"Kiss cam"
"I should give that a try (xpost from r/standupshots)"
"Picking up where you left off in a dungeon after a couple of days of not playing Skyrim."
"How I feel when cramming for law school final exams"
"I was the first developer in my company. 5 years and 10 developers later..."
"Good luck on finals  reddit!"
"Being a european from reddit these days (x-post from r/funny)"
"After having sex for the first time in two years."
"Math class after summer vacation"
"When I forgot the course I was running during cross country practice"
"I leave for a couple of days...whats this about talking to the President?"
"There's a camp for that?"
"Having missed America's Presidential debate."
"Firing up any RPG after a couple month hiatus."
"Firing up any RPG after a couple month hiatus."
"Being European on Reddit today"
"I leave Reddit for one day."
"Why was this  burying a body 6-8 feet below a dog  brought up?"
"Just spiders escaping a flood in Pakistan (2010)..."
"NOPE"
"An unexpected side effect of the 2010 flooding in parts of Sindh  Pakistan  was that millions of spiders climbed up into the trees to escape the rising flood waters..."
"For God's Sake  Kid...Get AWAY From that Tree"
"True meaning of a Facebook"
"So close..."
"&quot;Ghetto just got taken to a whole new level.&quot;"
"My local discount store has never been a class act but this is a stretch even by their standards. I still bought several packages."
"My local discount/liquidation store has never been a class act  but this is sketchy even by their standards."
"My local liquidation store has never been a class act  but this a stretch even by their standards"
"This is how i explain Reddit to newcomers!"
"2 pairs of... stairs"
"I think ill take the stairs from now on."
"Where my appreciation for gadgets began"
"The Room We All Dreamed Of Having During Our Childhoods"
"How I feel most days."
"I know that feel Snoopy"
"Well I was considering dropping this class anyway"
"Watching &quot;How It's Made&quot; on youtube when..."
"The penis witch"
"I just found out financial aid gave me a full pell grant for college"
"My various reactions to changing my language setting to &quot;pirate&quot;."
"Meanwhile  in Norway..."
"Im sure everyone can relate."
"Scumbag mirror"
"Scumbag mirror (repost from x/funny)"
"Feel the Burn!"
"How it feels to repost and still get upvotes."
"Pure Joy"
"Now I've got you!"
"PARTY HARD!!!!!1one"
"No  I do believe this is how it feels to get 1000+ Upvotes!"
"Turning 21 in 45 minutes. This is how I feel."
"This'll make my girlfriend regret making me go to prom"
"3 day weekend coming up  time to..."
"If I could do that  chicks would be all over me... But I can't"
"still my favorite Obama moment"
"Perfect Porn Music"
"Alison Brie pretending to give handjobs"
"Damn eye floaters are getting worse."
"This isn't what I ordered  where's the extra pickles?!"
"I'd give my first-born for a burger."
"o.O.."
"crocodile dendi"
"Misused Meme To The Highest"
"This showed up in my facebook news feed. Wrong in so many ways."
"This REALLY is getting out of hand."
"I found this by accident one night  and it is glorious."
"Every time my girlfriend mentions marching band I picture this"
"Hurricane Sandy strikes in my local mall!"
"Dat grip"
"Zach Braff and Donald Faison reunited"
"&quot;Reunited and it feels so good...&quot; - Zach Braff"
"Ready to walk through the fog gate yet r/gaming?"
"Oh  the cries of agony..."
"3D Super Mario Bros"
"Mugshots used to be classy (1925 criminal)."
"Commence nostalgia"
"It's my cake day  and I'm just sitting here doing a lab report."
"Fucking accurate"
"Sometimes I wonder if it's even worth it..."
"Obama and his backroom staff trace the live feed of the mission that killed Osama Bin Laden."
"Found this gem on Google today"
"Found this gem on Google"
"I was just browsing the internet today when I found this gem..."
"I could watch this all day."
"&quot;One of the most beautiful snakes I have found and shot so far  which is a photographer's delight because of its vibrant colors and its posture  which is actually a self-defense posture. It's a mildly venomous snake found throughout the subcontinent of India and its neighboring countries.&quot;"
"Saw a beautiful snake in /r/pics  HAD to caption it thusly."
"TIL the green vine snake does not look like a regular snake"
"GO home Christmas tree you're DRUNK!"
"But where do the presents go?"
"A Very Portal Christmas"
"a very Portal christmas"
"These people win Christmas"
"Portal Christmas tree"
"Merry Christmas  Portal Style"
"Portal: Christmas"
"Portal tree"
"A very Aperture Xmas"
"Awesome Portal Christmas tree."
"It must have been a hobby..."
"Just another statue that makes you turn and say WTF??"
"Homeless doesn't mean heartless."
"Homeless doesn't mean heartless"
"When i hear a youth call the Beetles &quot;Fags&quot;"
"Just your standard music festival roster (x-post)"
"She's got better things to do."
"How I feel about being asked to work Saturday"
"My personal favorite"
"Out of the house  into the food chain"
"Steve Carell + Zack Galifianakis makes the best interview ever."
"Sleeping beauty."
"Troll Science"
"Cat DJ For Hire"
"the BEST cat in the WORLD"
"How I sometimes feel as a conservative Christian on Reddit."
"Getting drawn and quartered"
"Map of the First World War"
"Welp  see ya!"
"EJECT"
"Now that's a Mouthful."
"Reposts garner Karma? Let's take a BITE out of this theory right now!"
"Googled &quot;How to get upvotes on Reddit&quot;...This was the first image..."
"So  I was just googling &quot;how to get karma on reddit&quot; when I found this:"
"Baby karate"
"Guess who else is nominated for an Emmy!"
"Still better acting than Kristen Stewart"
"Business Cat finds it lonely at the top."
"Yeah  Susan is supposed to edit those for me"
"Further investigation required."
"Whenever I get downvoted..."
"For the last time  sir.."
"Arctic corporate CAt"
"Business Cat."
"Interspecies love  farm-style."
"&quot;Duuuude..the floor..it's all bouncy!&quot;"
"fighting turns to joy"
"just another day in San Francisco: San Francisco Financial District (02/02/12) (NSFW)"
"Blast from the past [Win95]"
"I want to watch this so bad."
"Hey  remember the 90s?"
"just some friends teaching you about windows 95 via vhs"
"I ran naked with your grandma because hoes keep stealing my tacos!"
"Its a dog! *ziiip* Nope  its a cat."
"Neighborhood war"
"Do all dogs go to heaven?"
"Do dogs go to heaven"
"Obviously fake  but can't it be funny anyway?"
"Justin Bieber Meatloaf. [PIC]"
"Bieber  delicious Bieber"
"Charlie Brown is the truth"
"That is a good point.."
"When I look back on my elementary school math tests"
"Only in Math"
"Always makes me laugh."
"Not a single bother"
"Iron Man Doing His Job"
"Is this irony?"
"If youre Jesus"
"Sometimes stealing a purse is harder than you think"
"Shit happens"
"Epic mugging fail!"
"Extreme...bowling?"
"Bowling. Like a boss."
"To those complaining about South Park memes"
"Me after trying to pay for Tim Hortons in Canada with American Money"
"they are doomed!!!"
"My friend had these 3 guys show up at work today and they had an interesting message."
"Oh Ainsley..."
"i'm a teacher  and i have a BIOGRAPHY section on the schools website"
"I was debating god with my friend on Facebook when he sent me this link and proceeded to call me closed minded after I tried to talk some sense into him. (sadly  he was serious)"
"Why on earth did I click?"
"Me Gusta"
"Birthday Gusta"
"So i turned 20 today...."
"kitty likes his sheep"
"A kitten and her sheep"
"Cats these days"
"So  this is happening outside my window right now. They seem to have a good time."
"Lazy cat gives no f*cks"
"Quit it. Quit it. Quit it. Quit it. Quit it. Quit it. Quit it. Quit it. Quit it. Quit it. Quit it. Quit it. Quit it. Quit it."
"Snapped. (wait for it)"
"How my girlfriend must feel when she's trying to sleep and I want to get laid."
"Annoying"
"On the 30th of June"
"How I feel about the Steam Summer Sale"
"IT'S TIME!"
"Timelapse"
"Perfect Timing"
"Throwing your own poo. It's not a good look."
"Throwing your own poo...?!"
"Words cannot describe this poster to me......"
"Just an average night out in Belfast"
"Throwing your own poo. It's not a good look."
"I was high on acid and started throwing my poo at people!"
"WTF..."
"My Friend Found This Laying Around On his Computer..."
"No  definitely NOT a good look."
"Just a guy taking his picture with a poptart"
"Soon..."
"How I imagine a novelty account acts when they find an apropos comment."
"How I feel when I find an onion ring in my fries"
"How I feel when I see this GIF"
"My face when I get to a gonewild tab I forgot was open."
"When someone brings donuts in for the office"
"My AT&amp;T contract ended today!"
"Is...is that a cake next to my name?"
"How I feel getting ready to see the midnight premiere of The Dark Knight Rises"
"I could have told you that"
"I could have told you that"
"Patty Cake"
"Sexy Ladies"
"I guess that's why they're called Meat Curtains [NSFW]"
"One of my Favourites! NSFW"
"I have no words..."
"This gif always cheers me up. [NSFW]"
"You could fry 'em to be fair."
"My friends' costumes as The Fresh Prince and Carlton"
"My friends' spot-on Carlton and Fresh Prince costumes"
"That didn't quite go to plan (Fail)"
"Tried explaining what a troll was to a nonredditor  searched it on google and found this guy"
"found this on my fb feed DA FUQ (nsfw)"
"Just me and Megan Fox."
"National Geographic photo of the day  October 29 2010 - Eyjafjallajökull Volcano  Iceland"
"For Everyone Who Hates YOLO - The True Begining."
"You Only Live Twice"
"YOLT"
"Only if it's a girl  right?! Haha! Misogyny!"
"Underwater Beauty"
"Green Lake - Austria"
"Dr Obamkenstein"
"Yes master..."
"Looking for a bookstore"
"Batstache"
"how to quickly trim your facial hair"
"Every time I try to post something Funny"
"That's one way to keep your pits dry."
"Well this is neat"
"North Dakota: Arrive a Guest. Leave a Legend."
"Easter comming soon"
"My friend's giant horse cock"
"Randomly searched &quot;horse cock&quot;. Found this..."
"It's NEVER too late for this kind of present"
"Getting vertical."
"Mmmh  yes...good."
"Didn't know this sub existed until today.. I think I found a new hobby."
"Who's your daddy?"
"The suck is strong with this one! Sorta NSFW"
"Ichiro's look of terror"
"Socially Awkward Ichiro..."
"Nooo! not our butts!"
"I has to toot"
"I has to toot"
"Oddly familiar articles on TV"
"Same prop newspaper used over and over again."
"That one prop newspaper makes the rounds!"
"There are some really lazy journalists in that company"
"a majority of girls on facebook."
"Well this about sums it up..."
"This about sums it up"
"What I Feel Like When I Listen To Metal"
"Kitty flashdance"
"Seconds later  Fluffy slaughtered the entire family in a moment of temporary insanity"
"Where Does Ludacris Have hoes?"
"Area Codes In Which Ludacris Claims to Have Hoes [1500*962]"
"The other white meat"
"All ready for winter!"
"Would you shit here?"
"Interesting toilet in Germany"
"Every Four Years"
"A debate between Romney and Obama 8 years ago"
"As a non American  from what I have read on Reddit  this is what I imagine the debate was like"
"Is this even possible?"
"FUCK THE POLICE"
"FUCK THE POLICE"
"Destroying N64 Joysticks Since 1996"
"I think my heart literally just melted"
"Couch Potato"
"Couch potato"
"Ugh these things are so attracted to my computer screen at night..."
"Found this on Facebook this morning"
"This little piggy...."
"This little piggy..."
"I don't know!"
"John Went"
"Fishcake on MR. Walruses birthday"
"Happy birthday  walrus! Aww  you shouldn't have."
"A walrus' reaction to his birthday cake."
"Maybe if I hide  they'll forget it's my birthday"
"Ohhhh you shouldn't have!"
"Ohhhh you shouldn't have!"
"Ohhhh you shouldn't have!"
"Ohhhh you shouldn't have!"
"REALLY?! All for me??"
"found this while browsing maxgif.."
"Congrats  It's a boy! (nsfw)"
"It's never been a better time to be a man"
"Everyday after school  I'd make a point to talk to the janitor before I left. When I graduated  he gave the best gift I've ever gotten. &quot;This is for being my friend &quot; he said."
"White people"
"White people"
"Can't stop the cute."
"Kitten in a tube."
"Peek-a-boo"
"Whenever i try to play whack-a-mole"
"&quot;Kart&quot; (Mario Kart parody of the movie &quot;Drive&quot;)"
"Choose Wisely."
"Hands Off the Sandwich"
"Cute kitten"
"Just a kitten hugging it's own face"
"She's obviously not doing it right"
"Rub mah belleh!"
"Socially Awesome Audience Member"
"Worst Lay Ever {nsfw}"
"What I picture when I hear about straight sex..."
"... in bed."
"I know it's not an animal  but my girlfriend showed me this picture"
"UP UP AND AWAY YOU GO."
"One of the cutest pictures I have ever seen."
"How I feel after being on Reddit for a year."
"They start young...."
"Coolest Arrested Development photo i've ever seen"
"Arrested Development Royalty"
"Seems legit"
"Everytime I forget my glasses..."
"When there's a car behind me..."
"Trying to read memes from the thumbnail"
"How I feel watching Tosh.0"
"Wadsworth constant"
"A collision of two memes."
"College Cheerleaders"
"The worst use of a meme I have seen..."
"Every eye doctor exam."
"I'm sure"
"Walking through West Hollywood (gay part of town)"
"Walking around the math part of campus…"
"Forgot all about this game for a while. Why the hell did they never make a sequel?"
"Suddenly  this guy (xpost from r/funny)"
"Yeesssss"
"When you see it"
"Tis the season for my girlfriends puppy...."
"WTF"
"Fake sleep"
"Leaked picture of the iPhone 5S!"
"Subtle..."
"Tea's done. Time for action."
"Am I beautiful now?"
"I giggled a bit."
"This should come standard with Reddit Gold"
"We should all have one of these"
"What they see (x-post from r/forwardsfromgrandma)"
"I know who I'll be voting for this November."
"Just your average bad cosplay-OHMYSWEETJESUS"
"Wat."
"Feeling a bit sheepish?"
"I don't think my hat goes well with my suit. Thoughts?"
"Google Maps"
"On Buddhism  samsara  and science [more original content]"
"On Buddhism  samsara  and science (repost time! thanks soldiercrabs)"
"Not enough catfish on this sub"
"No matter how old I get  I still run up dark staircases for fear that this may be behind me..."
"Ebony magazine  August 1985. What Michael Jackson may look like in the Year 2000"
"Yeah...not quite."
"Snoop + Dog"
"Before 'The Scream'"
"The Scream"
"While most of my friends were playing Mario Kart  I was always partial to this game. [FIXED]"
"Welcome to the interwebs"
"Cool story  bro"
"For my cakeday  I give you the first post that I upvoted"
"Mhm yeah  yeah  yeah ..whoaaaaa shitt!"
"look at all them iphone 5's.. [x-post from /r/pics]"
"Thousands of iPhone 5's going through the Fed Ex distribution center. [Looks like someone is missing out!]"
"Girl rats out her brother and gets him grounded. He responds by posting her &quot;hook-up list&quot; to facebook."
"Back that ass up"
"Putting the spark back into the relationship."
"This post is Not safe for Farm Animals"
"Sad dragon {x-post from /r/pics}"
"Spread it"
"Ive never laughed so hard in my life"
"I'll eat that if you're not going to."
"Utter Pandamonuim (x-post from r/aww)"
"Don't be scared"
"Can someone tell me what the hell this is?"
"Eel"
"Upvote disco"
"this level still haunts my dream..."
"Re: My most stressful moment from childhood"
"I know some of you don't give a shit about sports but... FOOTBALL'S BACK!!"
"How I feel after getting Reddit Enhancement Suite"
"How I felt when Meryl Streep won the oscar."
"My face when I walked in a strip strip club for the first time"
"How I imagine most of r/gaming right now (Steam sale just went up)"
"I'm 23 and have never experienced the Steam sale. After checking out some of the deals..."
"Everyone in r/gaming right about now"
"How I feel when someone wants to argue on Reddit"
"Mfw it's my first cake day"
"Realized the teenage redditors are going back to school"
"How it feels after being on reddit over a year and finally hitting 200."
"Every time I open my Comcast bill.."
"Cheeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeese"
"Brothers"
"Stratofortress"
"B-52 Stratofortress"
"Wishing i could downvote on Facebook"
"americans &amp; canadians - accurate"
"hey  llama try out that surfboard"
"U mad bro?"
"Please follow these instructions carefully"
"Great Red Spot"
"Jupiter"
"High resolution shot of Jupiter's Red Spot"
"Shh"
"Oh.. I get it!"
"Camouflage practice."
"I didn't see you there Smith."
"Sir!"
"Smith!"
"Nickelodeon: A Network For Kids!(Slightly NSFW)"
"Hey  Reddit..."
"Honestly though  he has a point"
"The most useful wallpaper ever"
"Message to Reddit users"
"My new  motivational desktop"
"I've been using this as my background for a while now  helps me get my work done"
"And if you don't know  now you know"
"Life before Google..."
"It was a damn shame"
"Look kind of like an owl?"
"Hula Hoops + coffee = owl"
"Coffee Owl"
"Proud Australian! (Not sure if it's been posted before)"
"Just the right angle."
"Dogs on a train"
"Looking good Anubis [x-post from r/pics]"
"My new favorite gif"
"Single ladies"
"Only boring people take the stairs"
"How all of my attempts to get any Karma have gone"
"Not sure if funny but I laughed."
"Pointless Freak Of Nature &amp; What To Do When You See It"
"Never has there been a truer statement (x-post from r/wallpapers)"
"Slavery problems"
"Bizzare Amazonian &quot;Penis Snake&quot;"
"So... what if you are in the middle and have to pee?"
"When my dad ate the last of my ice cream"
"I think it's getting to be time for a new one of these..."
"Scariest Movie Villain Growing Up"
"This thing still scares the shit out of me..."
"Just follow the trail of puppies..."
"A trail of puppies"
"Im the type of girl..."
"All da milkshakes"
"Hey r/Atheism  I Think We Should Start Our Own Church"
"Multi-tool."
"I see your macGyver stunt and I raise you his tool set."
"Catena Wall Clock"
"Simple  yet amazing clock"
"now you can pee like a guy"
"No. Just no."
"Ya  so this exists.."
"This could have come in handy several times...it's called a Sheewee"
"Strange."
"For the girls that want to write their name in the snow..."
"Equality for All Genders"
"Equality for All Genders (x-post from r/wtf)"
"Puppy Conga Line! GO!"
"All aboard the karma train!"
"All aboard the karma train! [x-post from r/gifs]"
"Jump on in!"
"Thom Yorke on Piracy [x-post from r/Radiohead]"
"A rare image of a flying peacock [762 x 960]"
"how i feel when my friends ask me to upvote their posts"
"how i feel browsing reddit at this hour"
"/r/pickle's new gif (courtesy of ULJarad)"
"Catching a very obscure reference."
"This is how I feel browsing through the humor-based subreddits"
"How I feel after skipping a season in a TV series"
"Every single time I try to navigate 4chan"
"Can't tell if one is really short  or one is really tall..."
"Best threesome candidates  or worst?"
"The first time I found /r/spacedicks."
"For my cake day  have a dump of my reaction/funny gifs folder."
"How I feel when I walk into r/conspiracy"
"That awkward moment when you see someone you’ve been trying to avoid."
"My reaction when I click on a link and it's a Facebook screenshot"
"This gif has been used a lot recently but this is how I felt the first time I visited /b"
"When encountering a religious debate on reddit"
"Whenever my parents are having an arguement."
"Whenever someone posts a youtube video response as a comment"
"When I see a super long post at 3 A.M."
"When I open a rage comic that is WAY too long..."
"What i think people do when they accidentally repost."
"Trying to ward baron and finding the entire enemy team already there"
"How I feel when I realize I've clicked an r/TwoXChromosomes thread as a guy."
"How Romney's going to feel if he tries to do an AMA soon"
"My favorite Simpsons gif"
"When r/random takes me to r/gore"
"How I feel every time I click on a wtf link."
"OWNED!"
"This is wrong on a couple of levels (NSFW)"
"Ouch  my childhood!"
"So Peter pan seems to be cool now. NSFW"
"Bulgy Neck"
"I don't even...[NSFW]"
"Bane Headphones"
"Bane Headphone Impersonations (X-post from /r/Bane)"
"Lawlstika"
"How I feel after downvoting"
"Scumbag Reddit Atheist"
"Don't try this at home  kids."
"Why they warn you not to try this at home"
"After 8 seasons of House I've learned..."
"How i felt after watching Taken 2 Trailer"
"Whenever theres a breakthrough in science..."
"Moving to Canada?"
"i hope this will never happen to me again"
"Every time youtube changes their layout"
"How I feel when I stumble into /r/politics..."
"How Abe feels when he stumbles into /r/politics"
"Romney Gangnam Style!"
"hey sexy romney (romney style)"
"Do the Rom Rom!!"
"No reaction at all..."
"Don't want to say where I found this.."
"Poor Brian (Fixed for Easter)"
"Did they do bathsalts?"
"This is how the American motorcycle land speed record was broken in 1948."
"What I think when people post exercise updates to Facebook."
"How I envision congress right now"
"In honor of my cake day  my favorite pic on the internet."
"My mom was worried about my trip to Africa  so I sent her this"
"Simba was worried about my move to Pride Rock  I sent him this picture."
"America - Canada's shorts"
"How I feel whenever I get to 90% on a torrent"
"How I feel waiting for the comments to load on a funny post"
"Every time I check my wallet at the middle of the month…"
"Seeing a girl's boobs for the first time."
"Wait..what..OHH SHIT ABORT!"
"How I look realizing you could put 100 links per page."
"10/10 would bang!!"
"look who I found!"
"This hit home a little too much"
"Would Have Won the Republican Debate Tonight"
"Neiner Neiner"
"After finding myself Googling &quot;How to impress people&quot;"
"I dont know... What to say (NSFW)"
"This was just emailed to me! Thought you guys might like it!"
"Fuck the police! (NSFW)"
"War....it changes a man."
"Kidnap?"
"The first time I masturbated."
"Bad Idea..."
"Of all the 'Oppa Gangnam Style' gifs  this one makes me the happiest"
"Colonel Custard"
"Stop my baby!"
"Honestly what first came to my mind when I saw this."
"Stop That Baby!!!"
"Just noticed its my cake day  I've been saving this one for a while."
"How I feel when a 260lbs/120kg friend of mine always chest bumps me when he's drunk"
"Don't Talk Bad About My Family"
"Had to check  I was right"
"Why does the internet hate midgets so much?"
"The internet's version of Fuck Da Police"
"But they have nothing but love to give!"
"Really?"
"I'm glad the internet agrees on one thing."
"As am I..."
"Wait What? My fate in humanity just went down  a lot..."
"What does the internet think of this? I should have guessed it."
"we're good."
"Seriously internet!?"
"13.7% of the internet is wrong"
"my thoughts exactly..."
"bullshit."
"What the ?? Oh it's a Beta version alright - Imgur"
"The internet feels very negative about 4chan"
"end of earth"
"On the edge of forever"
"I'm pretty sure this is an obvious troll.. If not  then god have mercy on her soul. She is one piece of work ."
"Gaga keeps wearing different meat dresses. I think I've finally figured out where the old ones went."
"Realizing I've spent a year of my life on Reddit"
"Me after starting Amnesia: The Dark Descent at 12:30 AM"
"So I shaved my pubes for the first time..."
"When I graduated with an art degree and started looking for a job..."
"So I'm Redditing in the shower and just realized I forgot to bring a towel upstairs.."
"I'm a completionist and I'm about 20 hours into Xenoblade."
"How I feel about being a pre-med after taking the MCAT"
"Spent an inordinate amount of time pondering my mortality these last couple of days and came to a glaring conclusion:"
"I was running late this morning and used my wife's deodorant in a rush. How I felt immediately after."
"Every time I browse r/spacedicks"
"How I feel whenever I'm the first to comment on a facebook photo that's destined for dozens of comments."
"Michael J. Fox is a BOSS."
"Cat vs lasers"
"Pew pew pew!"
"come at me bro"
"Joseph Ducreux is too sexy for his..."
"Today is my reddit birthday  tomorrow is my 21st birthday. This is me on Saturday."
"Rough night."
"Saturday morning."
"Oh  mercy me!"
"C-C-C-C-CHOO-CHOO"
"So my friend was cutting peppers when..."
"Fucking ninjas  man."
"James Bond never loses at Monopoly"
"When you realize mid-sentence that your argument is wrong..."
"Oh no... MY CUPCAKES!!!"
"Whenever I lose a board game."
"The Bat Face."
"Ah  Batman.."
"Clever storage space"
"Finally putting this space to good use"
"That moment after a new AskReddit question is submitted and there's a rush to post the most obvious witty response."
"How I feel after almost clicking a GoneWild link with [m] in it."
"Dodging death LIKE A BOSS"
"Something tells me he had to change his pants afterwards."
"The new Dell Walkman"
"That's one way to listen to music on the go...."
"before ipod"
"stolen ipod"
"He could really use an iPod..."
"Who needs an iPod?"
"BOO!"
"NOOOO BUMBLEBEE NOOOOOO"
"NOOO BUMBLEBEE NOOOOOO (x-post from /r/gifs)"
"Both of These Billboards Have Sold Me"
"The Lion of Lucerne."
"Kitteh! I choose you!"
"I choose you!! Wait..."
"I would be kicked out of my dentist for laughing to much if it was like this"
"Well this is terrifying."
"Intent to kill."
"You kids  with your &quot;cloud computers&quot; and &quot;Googly Docs&quot;"
"He Shoots  HE SCORES!"
"Happens all the time."
"He shoots  AND HE SCORES!"
"Don't let the cat near the Kinect"
"This needs to be in the appropriate sub-reddit (X-Post from r/funny)"
"The Best Way to End an Argument"
"What happens when you pirate your music"
"As an Android user  this is how I feel about all the iphone stuff being posted."
"The original Overly Attached Girlfriend"
"Me in the middle of having sex with a girl after a night of heavy drinking..."
"When i'm taking a shit and I realize I forgot to bring my phone to the bathroom with me"
"Party Hard"
"When my girlfriend asked which beach volleyball player i'd sleep with"
"What the world needs now is love  sweet love. No  not just for some but for..."
"What You Should Do if You Ever Meet the President"
"What I look like when I run..."
"Awkward runner"
"This really how i look when i run"
"whenever someone tells me they dont like Star Wars"
"Anak Krakatau Volcano Erupting"
"Bismuth [pic]"
"Bismuth."
"You're Awesome!"
"I want cookies all of a sudden"
"So this is what YOLO always meant...."
"The difference between cats and dogs [FIXED]"
"I don't know about you guys  but I'm still waiting for another game like this."
"10 years  101 power cells  112 scout flies  and 2000 orbs  but I finally beat it."
"The Doctor"
"And you thought Hitler was bad"
"Weiners and Butts"
"Wieners and butts"
"Abandoned Yugoslovian War Monument"
"Abandoned World War II Monuments and Memorials in Yugoslavia"
"Seems you guys like Mark Twain  here's another gem"
"I don't know anything about this &quot;object&quot; seriously"
"In Dubrovnik  Croatia last year  I saw a Google Maps tricycle and got some karma. The tricycle asked for some karma back but couldn't set up a reddit account."
"Submitted a picture of a Google Maps tricycle in Croatia last August. Come to find last night it was lookin' back at me"
"Last summer I taking a picture of a Google Maps Tricycle in Croatia. Turned out it was actually taking a picture of me"
"Last summer I took a picture of a Google Maps tricycle in Croatia. Turns out it was actually taking a picture of me"
"Here's a picture from Michael Bay's Upcoming new film"
"Sneak peek at Michael Bay's new film."
"How I feel about reposts"
"So this was posted on Mitt Romney Facebook."
"Romney's promo photo on Facebook today. Notice the signs."
"Anyone else notice the BS in the background? (Post from the Mitt Romney facebook page)"
"How to properly take care of a baby:"
"Baby Instructions (x-post /r/predaddit)"
"Do's and Dont's When Handling Babies..."
"Fuck everything about this."
"How is this acceptable again?"
"How is this acceptable again?"
"It's my last day at my shitty restaurant job. This is exactly how I feel!"
"I'm always nervous when I'm on a motor boat…this GIF did not help."
"Jesus take the wheel"
"it's the sunglasses that get me every time"
"How the Oxford Comma Changed History"
"Oxford Comma"
"I just.. what the..."
"He wants to be with you always [xpost from r/gifsound]"
"How it must feel to live in the states with legal marijuana"
"Best part about being on a low/no carb diet? Still get to have this."
"Facebook's Timeline has gone public"
"Soon  on Reddit..."
"Brace yourselves (Big Bang Theory)"
"Texans will know what I'm talking about"
"My first thought as I woke up this morning and got on Facebook..."
"How I feel living in Texas right now."
"They're coming!"
"First Day of Summer"
"brace yourselves"
"Time to get off the internet"
"&quot;Every friday...&quot;"
"Other then paying 1k more for the Mac name..."
"How i feel about Reddit after a string of unsuccessful posts."
"Whenever I see a cat and want to pet it but it runs away."
"This photo is real  but I dont know what city it is !"
"US-Mexican Border"
"You Ready For This?"
"The Real Origin of the Ninja Turtles"
"My teacher told me that because evolution is a theory  it's most likely wrong."
"Where's the W?"
"Take off"
"the cartoon BAMF"
"Boy Hitching a Ride on his Pet Shark"
"Cutie"
"The 2016 Olympics are going to be great"
"Remember  remember  the 5th of November"
"&quot;Some people have told me they don't think a fat penguin really embodies the grace of Linux  which just tells me they have never seen an angry penguin charging at them in excess of 100 mph. They'd be a lot more careful about what they say if they had.&quot; -- Linus Torvalds"
"First thing I thought of"
"I am not clever enough to think of a title."
"LOL cats are the best"
"I'm fairy certian that YOLO is Carpe Diem for stupid people."
"Bertrand Russell tells it like a boss"
"Family guy: Then and now"
"Resilient Skink"
"annoying but hypnotic"
"How it felt being admin on my 8 year old (and his friends) minecraft server."
"This is what the downtown Toronto blackout looks like right now."
"Right-click anywhere on f7u12 and hit view background. My jimmies have been rustled."
"No one fucks with pigeon."
"Zero Fucks Given..."
"You think a play by play on Facebook is bad? Try working in a sports bar and being bombarded by fans when you're not one yourself."
"50 shades of gay"
"50 Shades of..."
"Even though this point has been driven into the ground already"
"Some men just want to watch the world burn."
"Well hello there Mr! ...Oh"
"Good news!"
"Good news!"
"How I feel getting downvoted every time."
"MFW I'm sitting in an empty hallway and somebody sits RIGHT next to me"
"Approved. &lt;lick&gt;"
"Rat nap."
"Otters got nothin on this"
"Believe"
"It's time to make a change "
"A Tibetan Mastiff -- Cost: $1.5 million"
"Mike Tyson For President"
"When you realize your friend's girlfriend submitted to gonewild"
"Keep being AWESOME!!!"
"Carnivores &gt; Vegans"
"You Spin Me Right Round Baby Right Round"
"you spin me right round"
"You Spin Me Right Round Baby Right Round...[xpost-funny]"
"Every time I see a facebook post hit the front page."
"OMG Summer Sale is canceled!"
"Out of town  and my friends are sending me texts about TDKR premiere."
"It's Automatic [FIXED] [FIXED] [FIXED]"
"To all the recent &quot;The resemblance is uncanny&quot; posts."
"Pretty accurate tattoo [NSFL]"
"I guess that tattoo's pretty appropriate (somewhat NSFW)"
"Accurate tattoo"
"He does live up to the tattoo on his chest..."
"That's gotta hurt."
"No ones gonna believe this! A bit gruesome."
"Spark Night"
"Poppins Magic"
"I want this kid to be my friend"
"Cristian ice cream"
"The many faces of Christian Bale"
"Christian Bale."
"Ow my balls"
"Oh! That makes sense."
"Rest in peace"
"I could watch this for hours &quot;DO A BARREL ROLL!!&quot;"
"Oh Bane!"
"Bane experiences the wonders of &quot;The Sound of Music&quot;"
"The Hills are alive."
"When writing an essay [FIXED]"
"After working on an essay for what seemed like hours"
"Welp  guess I'm not sleeping tonight... or ever again"
"How I imagine &quot;Found this guy...&quot; posts"
"I wish more Redditors were like this.."
"TIL that President Obama will turn into Morgan Freeman in 4 years."
"Internet browser meeting"
"Veggie Dogs? Hmm. That looks..."
"Meanwhile in India..."
"You missed a spot  friend!"
"Hey  you're not my kid"
"I hate two things in life"
"I hate two things in life"
"Is it time for a walk yet?"
"I'll just wait for you here."
"It's time for a walk  right?"
"Walk meeee"
"The Powerpuff Girls are Redditors"
"Buttercup is not a Redditor"
"Battleshots"
"You sunk my battleshot!"
"As a surfer and a man  I don't know whether to cum or cum"
"Lets go for a ride at knight."
"And then I told Christian &quot;You'll win an Oscar for Batman&quot;."
"While not consistant  these are my three favorite cast photos from &quot;The Dark Knight Trilogy.&quot;"
"Something tells me I wouldn't be allowed in this bar..."
"I'm not sure I understand. . But I don't really feel the need to"
"I want this... I want this in my house..."
"Skull Spew."
"Reflections"
"Mixed the Mortal Kombat Prom with the disco song from It's Always Sunny  works amazingly well"
"Disco-tality?"
"Disko Kombat"
"A tribute... of sorts..."
"I see your Spider in California and raise you this!!!!"
"I see all your school lunches and raise you an Irish one. [Fixed]"
"a reason to be pro-choice"
"How it feels programming at 2 in the morning"
"I see your heavy breathing  twisted dog and raise you a heavy breathing  twisted cat"
"Superheroes are not online"
"The greatest pick up line of all time."
"No  No! Like this..."
"This is an image from Hurricane Sandy's aftermath that's being passed around my friends Facebook walls  it's a roller coaster in the ocean in seaside heights  NJ."
"Seaside Heights  NJ  I feel this picture really put things in perspective"
"So I texted my brother that I got a fish today and this was his response."
"Just some BAMF's from the early 1900's"
"My history professor said that if he had a rap album this would be the cover."
"Fuck Off Jesus"
"I GOT THIS!"
"I'm going to put my head in your bum  so you can hear me better..."
"Can you hear me now?"
"your amusing the majestic owl  continue"
"Oh  4chan"
"Still gets me every time."
"How I feel when I get a new fish"
"Black Man"
"I won't have my daughter bringing a black man into this house..."
"Why smartasses can't be trusted."
"Baby Kangaroo"
"Why is this not in every bathroom?"
"Will that complete your order?"
"The reason I went threw hundreds of batteries."
"Tom like a bau5"
"Like a boss(GIF)"
"At KFC Today"
"Makes sense."
"So I was browsing through my /b/ folder and came across this gem"
"Nicolas Cage as a baboon"
"The best thing the internet has given me"
"Embrace the greatness that is majestic Nicolas Cage"
"If only we tried this sooner"
"Blues Brothers"
"We bad? We bad."
"We bad? We bad."
"Training for the WTF Olympics"
"This gorgeous world map depicts all of Earth’s hurricanes since 1851"
"GIANT pic (5006 x 3150) shows paths of all global hurricanes since 1851."
"Abe's Paranoia"
"Oh Lincoln  always on the lookout."
"You thought rats were a problem  I give you the Coconut Crab."
"The coconut crab."
"When you walk into McDonald’s with more than five dollars [FIXED]"
"A hijacker’s passport survived the inferno"
"Me after seeing the Black Dynamite commercial"
"Whenever my one of my friends comes out as an atheist."
"How I feel when I post a comment on a post that's on the front page and actually get an upvote."
"When I check a post and I have one less down vote than before."
"Hee haw"
"The Most Powerful Pokemon"
"Magikarp too strong"
"Magikarp  the most powerful Pokemon."
"Sweet Gandhi's Tits"
"Great Success!"
"Transparent frog"
"Atlantis over Hawaii (I believe). Simply Stunning [3 473px × 2 307px]"
"Beautiful Picture of Space Shuttle Atlantis over the Bahamas"
"You'll get your pizza in 30 minutes or less  guaranteed."
"Yeah Bitch  You Like That?"
"Gets me every time"
"Trying to have sex and being drunk at the same time"
"Kittens Stalking"
"It is the truth..."
"How I feel during a math exam"
"Having my drivers license exam within 8 hours... this is how I imagine how I'll be sitting there"
"Not sure if combination is good  or just the music."
"So fluffy I'm gonna die!!"
"So I come home at 9 o'clock and notice it's my cake day. Oh  the irony."
"The only thing most people will take away from the debate"
"This election just got real."
"HIFW I see fake Facebook conversations appear"
"Snape agrees [Kinda NSFW]"
"I always feared this day would come..."
"Gingers must be in low demand..."
"SRS Moderators are allowed to do this to other Redditors."
"First post and I found gold"
"Oh ya know...just someone skydiving from space."
"Felix Baumgartner as he prepares to jump from over 21 000 meters on March 15  2012."
"Felix Baumgartner as he prepares to jump from over 21 000 meters on March 15  2012."
"Extreme Skydiver Felix Baumgartner as he prepares to jump from over 21 000 meters on March 15  2012. This was a test jump."
"Felix Baumgartner jumping from 71 580 feet"
"This came up in my newsfeed  thought you guys might like."
"So that's how Godzilla was made"
"Zombie body paint (NSFW)"
"Hot potato"
"Hot Potato  Level: 99"
"What my girlfriend is like when I get home late at night"
"My favorite anti-theist  nails it again (Hitchslap inside)"
"fuck cancer"
"paper ninjas!"
"Factory Fume ..........Leaf Art"
"Factory Fume  Leaf Art!"
"What is going through my mind when my computer doesn't load reddit"
"How i feel on the last day of my internship and the copier jams every 5 secs......."
"Switchbot"
"Switchbot [fixed]"
"Truth of the life.."
"Well...Fair enough"
"Exactly Same..."
"The Universal Truth"
"This is how female/male 5 minuts work"
"You quit?"
"Walter's Laboratory"
"Butterfly with glass-like wings."
"When my girlfriend doesn't want to do stuff with me..."
"Curious George"
"He just left."
"Ex came over last night looking for me."
"So  I was bored"
"New phone"
"Jack and smoke."
"What happens in Chernobyl  Stays in Chernobyl"
"What i spent my school days doing..."
"Ladies?"
"I'm with Tony"
"Marijuana did THIS to Shaun White"
"You know the difference between you and me? I make this look FABULOUS."
"But these are for girls.."
"Brilliant table design allows it to move like a spider."
"Spider Table!"
"Umm... Sir.. well  your head.."
"What a dick head"
"What a cute puppy."
"I want this on me."
"That's an...interesting looking dog."
"This dog kinda looks like a..."
"My dog's sleeping position"
"I can only pet him for about 5 minutes then we both need naps."
"&quot;Now that's a wiener I'd like to cuddle with&quot;"
"North Korean missile program EXPOSED"
"How I See North Korea's Nuclear Test On The U.S. Going"
"Move on up (FIXED again)"
"These blast points ... too accurate for sand people"
"When the Professor tells the pretentious douche in the front row that his answer is wrong."
"Two of your favourite things!"
"A true fan [NSFW]"
"And I've just noticed there's a picture of Jesus... (NSFW)"
"Nothing to see here. Just a baby lama."
"Did someone say safety first?"
"Now that we're doing this...NSFW IRL"
"Jut some art"
"Flying over London"
"EVERY time I watch cable &quot;NEWS&quot;......."
"Is this some sort of trick question  or what?"
"I think this belongs here after the new law in North Carolina"
"This belongs here"
"Unexpected Support"
"Say goodbye to burnt toast."
"Ask and you shall receive."
"Go outside and play."
"This gave me a proper giggle"
"I don't speak Arabic but I have a feeling I agree with this comic"
"Let's rub it in their faces (SFW)"
"Kidless parents"
"GabeN currently sitting at Valve HQ drinking a nice  tall glass of..."
"When my boyfriend says he prefers uberhumor.com over reddit."
"&quot;She should keep the chips and dip coming.&quot;"
"&quot;Tell your wife that she looks pretty  even if she looks like a truck.&quot;"
"As a nail technician  I approve this message."
"Found this in an unrelated google image search"
"Taught my little sister how to photoshop. She said that this is she wants to do when she grows up....what?"
"so i decided to google majestic creatures.."
"Binged &quot;Majestic creature&quot;. Was not disappointed."
"i saw a post about googling &quot;majestic creatures.&quot; this is what i find"
"I think this firmly qualifies for this subreddit."
"Fixed"
"Well this is just tragic"
"Well this is just tragic (X-post from r/pics)"
"Found while searching through Google Images... [NSFW]"
"Jimi Hendrix and employment"
"If Jimmy ever needed a day job"
"True story."
"How i feel when people keep asking me about marriage and kids..."
"Everyone I know. . ."
"I will be your girlfriend. I WILL BE YOUR GIRLFRIEND."
"Waking up with strep throat  3 hours before an interview"
"The appropriate reaction for awkward situations."
"The original Forever Alone guy"
"Car stereo I wanted 10 years ago vs the one I want today"
"Car Stereo I wanted 10 years ago vs Car Stereo I want now"
"One small step for man  one giant leap for Puffin kind!!"
"Pufffffffffinnnnssss!!"
"Have a wash and be inspired!"
"Do you belive in magic?"
"Bull Terrier Headbutt of Love"
"oh hai there"
"My dogs when I get home from work."
"Party Terrorist"
"Erry day.."
"So fucking good"
"Beer killing brain cells  making you a better person?"
"If your GF/BF nags you about drinking too much  just explain this concept to them and they will leave you alone."
"Enough motivation for me. Cheers!"
"Always brings a smile to my face [0]-[10]"
"&quot;Please give my compliments to the chef!&quot;"
"I don't know who you are..."
"Found this gem on my news feed."
"R.I.P. Carly Rae Jepsen"
"Just Hunter Thompson shaving Johnny Depp's head"
"WWII veterans on WWII FPS's"
"WWII vets on FPS's"
"Say it ain't so  Santa."
"Dangerous demonstrator arrested."
"The statue was just asking for it."
"How to be awesome..."
"Oh Japan  I don't even."
"Badass Bar-B-Que."
"The Magdeburg Water Bridge- The worlds largest water bridge  with a span of 348 ft. (106 m)"
"Not bad  Mobama"
"Not bad"
"I hope im not the only person who loved this game"
"Anyone else remember playing the hell out of this game?"
"I'm a huge Beatles fan &amp; this guy is a lucky Photo Bomb! (pics)"
"Made me smile (:"
"How did you think Reddit clothing was made?"
"After almost a year on Reddit this is how I imagine our clothing is made."
"Kitty keeps knitting"
"Some people earn money easily  and some other take the hard way."
"I didn't know my school graduated Sith Lords..."
"This is Nagasaki before and after the atomic bomb was dropped."
"Every time someone tells me the book is better than the movie"
"My real life Reddit friends when I tell them I got almost 800 upvotes on a post today"
"Well reddit  today is my birthday. Here I present to you a gif I've been saving for a long time."
"This works."
"Never thought of bottled water this way"
"Don't stop..."
"I would hit that"
"I Googled &quot;Nicolas Cage as:&quot; and got this I am equally terrified and satisfied."
"Hannic Montcage"
"The Four Horsemen"
"So? At least I'm not a sucker like you!"
"What it's like looking through my high school yearbook."
"What it's like looking through my FACEBOOK"
"Looking at all of my Facebook friends"
"Looking through my fb friends."
"My Reaction When my Mom said she was &quot;Going for a Facial&quot;"
"Anytime a student raises an argument with the teacher."
"Inside-out Pool"
"Can someone tell me the title of this movie?"
"Late for class"
"No Witnesses. Ever."
"This just happened..."
"Socially Awkward Third Wheel"
"It happens to me all the time"
"Facebook is full of functionality suprises!"
"Socially Awkward MMORPG"
"The problem with browsing the front page"
"awkward penguin thanks you"
"Never ascribe to malice that which is adequately explained by Socially Awkward Penguin"
"Every time I pay for something"
"Every Friday Morning"
"I Just Got My First &quot;Christmas Bonus&quot; ..."
"My reaction to getting 17 upvotes"
"My karma just doubled...to 2"
"When class was cancelled today."
"Blocks like this would have fucked me up as a kid."
"Wooden Mind-Fuck"
"This hurts my brain."
"How do you feel now jerk!"
"And here I was  thinking San Andreas was a massive game world"
"Fuck this guy"
"Some posts are just not meant to have a title"
"OH MY GOD KING!"
"Poor Spidey..."
"Sad but true"
"curiosity"
"Fearless"
"Showdown"
"This is 'group therapy' for some in San Quentin state prison"
"Al jeffersons bed"
"NBA player Al Jefferson's bed looks like it's got plenty of room for &quot;company&quot; in it."
"Al Jefferson is 7 feet tall. Look at the size of his $23 000 bed"
"6'1&quot; man in a $23 000 bed."
"Man  that's gonna be worth a shitload of points"
"Spiderman  you're not a wizard!"
"Oh hi"
"I told my friend I was sad and he sent me this."
"Bara Bere Bara Bere Bara Bere Bara Bere ;D"
"It appears Firefox has encountered another problem.."
"Lego Stephen Hawking"
"This is what fun looks like!"
"Found this gif quite a while ago. Pretty sure it belongs here. [NSFW]"
"I don't even know...[NSFW]"
"a casual sunday..."
"Wtf did I just watch? NSFW"
"Da fuq??"
"Why did I watch the full thing??"
"Can't believe someone took the time to create this"
"Some of us have a sexual fantasies  and then there's this guy..."
"What was this guy thinking ?"
"This is what I came home to yesterday"
"Balaa the 3 leveled waterfall"
"The humans from Wall-E go diving..."
"Scooty-Puff  Jr.?"
"when did they start making American SCUBA equipment?"
"So inspirational"
"Putting a quote on a beautiful background always makes it seem meaningful."
"Not the typical format  but this one always gets me."
"When I spent all last night playing video games and i should have been revising..."
"Can't Describe this."
"wat..."
"wat..."
"Chicago Lights"
"Think they'll notice I gave the camera man a blowjob?"
"This is me right now."
"What it's like at 1 in the morning with school in a few hours.."
"Yeah...thats cool"
"Erm..."
"Nobody f*cks with the Jesus."
"This is what comes up when you google/image search for &quot;Big Lebowski Prostitutes&quot; (SFW)"
"Nobody fucks with the Jesus!"
"no way I'm going back."
"Just a lighthouse keeper out for a smoke"
"Anybody afraid of water?"
"The Original Walter White"
"Admin finally allowed firefox to be installed in the labs  If my fellow geeks and I had rythm..."
"How I imagine r/trees tomorrow"
"Satan at his best"
"Satan at his best (xpost)"
"Very Satanic..."
"Marvel vs Capcom: BET edition [Warning: &gt;2MB Gif]"
"Come on  deep breaths"
"When i saw this Gif i knew the perfect music for it..."
"Internet some things shouldn't be kept....."
"I don't care if this is a repost  this gets me every time....it just reminds me of that annoying kid in the classroom"
"Eagle chucks goat off of a cliff"
"Downvoting links in /r/new"
"Eagle pushes goat off a cliff"
"Time-Lapse of a Molting Spider Crab"
"Time Lapse of Molting Spider Crab [gif]"
"The thing I hate most"
"Scared Kitty"
"Found in a Walmart parking lot."
"When I do something stupid  I think of magikarp."
"Obamacare is upheld!"
"Party wagon"
"MFW I got a lot of karma from /r/politics"
"My favorite face swap to date"
"Every semester"
"Shlurpt."
"Yummy"
"How Chad Kroeger cuts his hair"
"How I react when a new episode of Legend of Korra comes on"
"How I felt when I saw Thanos at the end of The Avengers..."
"Going on first vacation in many years  this is what I look like to people when I look at the attractions."
"Truth is I haven't kept up with politics  watching the debate was tough..."
"Feels good man"
"Browsing through some old stuff in my pictures..."
"WTF toothpaste..."
"Lightning striking Chilean volcano mid-eruption [x/post woahdude]"
"How did the hipster burn his tongue?"
"Friend is a vet assistant/caregiver"
"Otter Babies"
"Omg! So cute!"
"Baby Otters So Cute...."
"Squishy Face"
"A baby's face being squeezed. Dammit  cutest gif ever."
"Can't stop chuckling"
"How I Feel Being Hungover At Fucking Work Right Now"
"How I feel the morning after a night of drinking"
"All hail to the nom nom!"
"What happened here?"
"If overattached gf was a puppy..."
"My Little Brother as Thor"
"My little brother as Thor [x-post from r/pics]"
"Little Thor (xpost from pics)"
"Math Atheist"
"There's no way to know math!"
"Finish Her"
"Why I don't ski"
"Cast away just put this up on their facebook"
"Uhh...."
"How I feel every time I drive past the police."
"As a naive white girl  this was my face after learning &quot;bath salt&quot; wasn't actually bath salt."
"Just looked at my bank account"
"True friend always helps"
"Pull over. NOW."
"I could watch this all day (tile it for extra awesome)."
"What I heard when I saw it"
"Halloween Rose..."
"Death Flower..."
"My friend who has diabetes made this his profile picture"
"The cruel aftermath of Halloween [FIXED]"
"The most detail picture of a black hole taken.(x-post/science)"
"Laser cat"
"A Dog and His Blanket"
"Clever girl!"
"This is why you should always accept the bullshit pamphlets from the religion goons. I used to say no thank you but they're actually very entertaining."
"I give you the most Australian picture ever"
"Sink Hole de Mayo"
"As a white guy learning about slavery in an all black school..."
"O2 you legend."
"O2 customer support win. And ting."
"Size of the Earth (pic)"
"The size of ..."
"Just makes you feel good"
"One thing reddit does that improves my productivity"
"Boba Fett has something important to express..."
"I'm not going to post with a bullshit title  so here's a .gif of Boba Fett."
"First attempt."
"No arms Some legs= It had to be."
"She got them moves."
"When you see it.... the horror"
"Repost  but holy sh*t do I agree with the blonde guy..."
"Gotham needs you!"
"Found THIS on MY newsfeed...."
"When I heard we hit 7 billion."
"Whenever I go to the mall"
"I am to blame. I shot a rocket back (X-post r/pics)"
"Yet We Call Them Terrorists..."
"I am to blame. I shot a rocket back"
"Just Robert Downey Jr. as a cat."
"why mom why make me wear this?"
"Hi"
"Wig"
"DUN DUN DAH DAH DAH DAH DAH DAH DAH DUNNNN"
"what do you guys think of my new hairstyle?"
"I can't get money off of my mind."
"Soon...."
"Dark Knight Rises Still - What is on Bane's neck?"
"Bring It On"
"At least once in your life on the Halloween."
"Don't hide secrets in your house  'cause boy I stole the key"
"I'll be your girlfriend"
"for anyone that has been on the front page today."
"Well I fully regret making this..."
"Submerged plane in the Bahamas [990x742]"
"Hooray Beer!"
"tra la la la la"
"Robbery gone wrong"
"Trying to bring the flag back to my team."
"The truth about Mars"
"The truth about Curiosity..."
"When girls overdose on makeup..."
"Monsters by John Kenn - edited by /co/ (x-post from /r/4chan)"
"Son  I am not disappoint."
"US Navy Training"
"It was a bit salty"
"Group projects"
"Group Projects"
"Group Projects"
"Australian fishing"
"Meanwhile in Australia..."
"Agents C &amp; H"
"Classy Chameleon"
"what I look like when I give handjobs (SFW)"
"I want some.. oh god... oh jesus... No!"
"&quot;I eat pussy like it's the last supper&quot;"
"Watch trailers they said. It will be fun they said."
"I don't want to live on this planet anymore"
"I don't want to live on this planet anymore"
"You know you're unemployed when this looks attractive"
"At what point does body surfing become BASE jumping?"
"I Regret My Career Choice"
"Bailing from the Big Wave"
"What my office looks like this week."
"When my girlfriend talks about her day"
"WTF mascot getting ready"
"This isn't even my final form! [Possible NSFW]"
"wut. NSFW?"
"Googled &quot;Weird Ass Costumes&quot;. Wasn't disappointed. Umm. A little NSFW."
"Halloween just got really weird."
"NSFW. Somehow this showed up on my account. I really DONT know where it came from."
"Just straightening my hair"
"&quot;Take your high fives and shove `em up your ass  dog.&quot;"
"No? Ok maybe later..."
"This works a charm."
"There was a sign in that tube carriage..."
"There was a sign in that tube carriage... (x-post r/london)"
"Things Reddit likes!"
"WTF do you guys think about this?"
"Nice Dolphin"
"Meth is one hell of a drug"
"Not even once..."
"Meth. Not even beep boop beep."
"Meth: Not Even Once"
"All I could think about while watching the debates [FIXED]"
"Poor Jim..."
"That feels so rough"
"Jim &quot;Goyte&quot; Lehrer"
"The presidential debate in a nutshell"
"Every damn time in the political conference."
"Nazi voting ballot after the Anschluss asking whether Austria agreed with the reunification  Ja or Nein?"
"When I post OC to reddit and it flops"
"Disgraceful graffiti found in wealthy area of London."
"Dat Ass!!"
"one of the best tattoos i've ever seen"
"chub chub chub"
"Oompa Loompa Doopity Doo!"
"I'm sexy and I know it"
"Signs you might have a problem"
"Stand back.."
"He taught me more than any teacher"
"Bill Nye knows what's up"
"There Science In This Shit!"
"::sigh:: White people"
"Girl gets KO'd by birthday cake to the face"
"For my Reddit Cakeday  here is a girl enjoying her cake."
"How I feel trying to post something funny on my cake day"
"Well...Shit"
"how i imagine how people that never get tangiers to smoke right pack it"
"Well  Shit"
"Crap Crap Crap."
"Longboard loop de loop"
"90's overload...."
"Things giraffes hate"
"This was supposed to say &quot;Assortment of ice cream&quot; (or smth similar)"
"The Monkey Who Went Into the Cold"
"D'aww. Who wants a fluffy?"
"So I was listening to Mozart..."
"Minecraft Rage"
"How I watched porn as a young lad"
"My first sexual memory  anyone else's (SFW)"
"RIP Sylvia Kristel  star of Emmanuelle"
"WTF worthy?"
"I used to spend significant amount of time daily studying this tree as a kid"
"Marvelous day [Fixed]"
"Pumping Iron"
"What doesn't kill you  makes you stronger!"
"What I'll do if that Censorship Petition gets Passed by Congress..."
"Weightlifting mouse !!!"
"I've never seen such fear"
"Oh yes  we are the droids you were looking for."
"To end the religion/morality debate"
"truth about religion"
"Religion And Ethics"
"Curiosity self portrait"
"Mars Rover 'self-portrait' is a clear fake."
"Welcome to Mars  I'll be your guide."
"Curiosity self shot [FIXED]"
"Curiosity does what it wants!"
"Me whenever someone takes the effort to click on my name and down votes all of my recent posts and submissions..."
"this triggers my imagination so hard"
"*_* Whoa."
"saw this in r/gifs  thought it definitely belonged here"
"Three Dee"
"Mind blown  now in 3D"
"Browse Reddit Drunk - EVERYTHING IS 3D!!!"
"How do you draw a 3D picture?"
"So my dad works at a hospital"
"I HATE YOU!"
"Where is your God now?"
"Calvin and Hobbes change the stars"
"Calvin and Hobbs"
"World Hunger- Ying and Yang."
"Statue of Liberty during Hurricane Sandy"
"looks like im not sleeping anymore"
"How I feel trying to get to the front page..."
"Mum posts cumshot picture on FB"
"Searched &quot;Real Life Simba&quot; into Google...not what I expected to find"
"It's Friday."
"AHHHHAHHHHHAHHH"
"My Next Project"
"where is this place?"
"Anyone see the issue here?"
"Take me there.."
"Surreal?"
"Ireland."
"Goddamnit 9GAG"
"Goddamnit 9GAG"
"Goddamnit 9GAG"
"reddit likes narwhals  right?"
"Hunter S. Thompson  Johnny Depp  and John Cusack driving around with a blow up doll."
"Hunter S. Thompson  John Cusack and Johnny Depp riding around with a blow-up doll"
"Nothing I do will ever be this awesome"
"Wow! Check it out! Great way to explain what God really is."
"When a title doesn't match it's content"
"Can someone please try this prank and let us know how it went. Possibly film it? I don't work in an office."
"This is the cutest rat I'VE ever seen."
"Hey there little guy!"
"The most adorable rat"
"Can rats be cute? You're damn right they can; especially when you give them a miniature teddy bear."
"So I went to the dentist today and saw this hanging in the office"
"Don't talk while he... Well shit...."
"looked up traffic rage on google. this came up"
"I feel like the Oprah of Reddit  the day after sex"
"Finally got around to downloading Reddit enhancement suite and I just discovered &quot;a&quot; upvote the selected link..."
"How I feel when I'm in a good mood on reddit."
"Browsing reddit while I'm drunk:"
"Talking Snakes are Normal."
"Oh  Arthur"
"Wise words  Arthur."
"How things went when me friend convinced me to try parkour with him"
"Dat Ass"
"Nay  it's mine!!"
"How /r/atheism made me  a european redditor  look at american Christians."
"Long Exposure Photograph of an Airplane Taking Off"
"A long exposure image of an taking off."
"Spazzing the fuck out"
"I don't always blow up the Death Star  but when I do..."
"I was recalling all the dead memes...this was my friend's response to 'Rich Raven'"
"How I feel when my ex-girlfriend who broke my heart tells me she's changed."
"Everyone on Reddit loves Bill Nye. Can't this guy get any love? He taught me science!"
"This makes me laugh every single time."
"Have no Fear"
"The dog is not the only one to watch out for"
"I live in Australia. This has confirmed my feelings that I live in the wrong country - these photos were taken over 5 hours."
"This snake does it for a million dollars"
"&quot;...Now take this empty glass. Here it is: peaceful  serene  boring. But if it is destroyed.&quot;"
"Shattered!"
"How it feels to unsubscribe from r/atheism"
"How i feel dancing in a club"
"How to dance"
"Amazing close-up image of a human eye [PIC]"
"Oh. My. God. Cannot unsee [NSFW] [NSFL]"
"One of those pictures that just hurts to look at. [NSFW/L]"
"As a male  this is the most horrifying picture I've ever seen.. !!Warning: Graphic!!!"
"Brought to you by are fellow 4chan /b/ros"
"Yes  this is dog. [GIF]"
"Hello  my name is..."
"The Giant Leopard Moth - that is all."
"This is the giant leopard moth  it has a wingspan of 3 inches and is found throughout North America"
"Giant Leopard Moth is actually very cute."
"Fissured tongue"
"What in the actual fuck is wrong with this?"
"Look at my tongue"
"What did I just see?"
"The House Stark"
"House Stark."
"Arthur Logic."
"&quot;I love facebook like you love cock.&quot;"
"Women's Rights Activist.."
"Dis my nigga!"
"Catching &quot;G&quot;s not &quot;Z&quot;s"
"True Gangster Love"
"True love"
"Homies over hoes!"
"Bleh."
"A mighty pine spring."
"Best background I've ever had."
"I see your Wiz/Snoop desktop and raise you my desktop"
"Being a fox must be so awesome"
"Back to our roots  eh?"
"Creepiest Commercial. Ever."
"Does anyone want some cream?"
"I... don't even know."
"really disturbing....i don't know why"
"An Amazon River Tributary [1600x1200]"
"Curiosity's self-portrait"
"Why can't we all just be friends??"
"Kitten and puppy think they're sisters!"
"Nope  looks like we are all going to burn."
"salad..."
"I see your world's tallest horse  and I raise you the world's tallest Great Dane"
"Zeus  officially the largest dog ever recorded"
"Swag"
"Swag {Fixed}"
"Was looking everywhere...when I looked under the sofa....."
"How I feel hooking up with girls now"
"Terminal humans"
"What I will say to Theists from now on  when they ask me: &quot;What if you're wrong?&quot;"
"My response when a theist ask me &quot;what if your wrong&quot;"
"Marcus Aurelius nails it."
"It's like the anti-Pascal's Wager"
"My favorite quote"
"It sold for HOW MUCH?"
"Tough choice?"
"When someone heats up fish in the microwave at work..."
"When I fail with everything to get to the Front Page"
"How I feel after my first post to Reddit"
"Best slutty Halloween costume I've seen so far"
"Laughing way too hard at this....."
"You have an urgent need to poo  time is running out  so you rush into the only vacant stall remaining and see this..."
"50 Who?"
"Boy saves sister from moose using World of Warcraft skills"
"One of my favourite pictures."
"Solar System"
"Sleeping puppies"
"Kicking in his sleep"
"Cute overload"
"Just some sleeping puppies"
"Bunny in a cup"
"Bunny in a cup"
"This is definitely NOT what I ordered.."
"I give up trying to figure this out. Mind officially fucked"
"How do you decide who you'll have anal sex with?"
"These girls are making pretty silly faces [nsfw]"
"Breaking up like a boss"
"How I broke the news to my cheating ex that I was leaving her"
"just a duck in a cup"
"Duck In A Cup"
"Whenever I'm eating sushi and someone else grabs the last piece"
"Cats under anesthesia on a bread rack."
"Kitty Operating Room"
"Kitty Operating Room"
"Downvoting stuff on the front page"
"1812 Breakature"
"1812 Breakature!"
"The Internet Explorer commercial came on when I was looking at this gif.."
"Who's ready for an Adventure?"
"So Damn Manly!"
"WTF is this?"
"I guess i'll pay this in my after life?"
"I want this"
"The day we became men!"
"Everytime I get my moustache done."
"Quick trip to the mall three days before Christmas..."
"Me when I'm fighting with my parents and I curse"
"went to /r/spacedicks for the first time tonight...."
"How i felt sleeping without a nightlight as a kid..."
"Whenever I share my opinions on Reddit..."
"The time I told my ex I loved her  with a poem."
"How I feel after upgrading to IOS 6"
"Stepped into this frigid New England morning after shaving my big  scruffy  and itchy beard last night."
"I've seen how it's supposed to be done  so here's my attempt at Cake Day!"
"Statistics."
"Statistics"
"Statistics with Rosie Jones"
"Just some snow kayaking"
"Winter Kayaking"
"why  hello there!"
"Rollin'"
"Shit! Shit! Shit!"
"Smiley seal!"
"OMG!"
"Turning my boyfriend into a vampire."
"So...do you think he's a vampire yet?"
"How I look going down on a woman"
"Whenever I'm paid a compliment"
"&quot;And then I was all...&quot;"
"Nostalgia'd the Piss Out of Me."
"The scariest picture from my childhood got scarier..."
"My favorite."
"For my cakeday  I present my favorite aww gif."
"when my friends stay the night and i tell them &quot;wake and bake.&quot;"
"Spooky Carnival"
"Found in a Sky Mall catalog at 38k feet..."
"Found in a Sky Mall catalog at 38k feet..."
"Found in Sky Mall. (x-post from /r/Wtf)"
"Protest meme?"
"Every argument on the internet ever"
"The truth about online arguments"
"The original &quot;When you see it...&quot;"
"Stop Wineing."
"My favorite comic of all time."
"A friend saw this..."
"I don't like the internet anymore"
"I feel like this would have been important to fix before it took off"
"MFW I'm trying to convince a girl to come home with me"
"Just jumping on the Misty karma-whore train.."
"Not giving a fuck  level: Tyrion"
"When you don't like a popular post"
"how i feel when my friends start discussing reality tv shows."
"At concerts when I know the song isn't over yet"
"When a repost makes it to the front page"
"How I feel as a conservative after the health care ruling today."
"Whenever people love something I did  but I didn't get credit for it."
"Just when I thought I knew who ran this shit.."
"We run this s**t"
"For everyone who's sick of the inaccurate quote  here's a corrected version."
"&quot; I see no god up here &quot; ( can be used as wallpaper )"
"If I was an astronaut  I think I'd have the same reaction."
"You silly animals  get down from there"
"Dear 4 am  we have got to stop meeting this way."
"The type of snack that should be in every convenience store..."
"nutella  bread sticks  and tea"
"Does that come in large?"
"When I let out a &quot;silent but deadly&quot; one"
"Whenever I tell a joke  waiting for someone to get it"
"My face when I see a friend of mine talking to his secret crush."
"Fuck yeah right in the fucking face HISSSSS."
"Fuck yeah right in the fucking face HISSSSSS. [x post from /pics]"
"My wife's reaction when we are about to get intimate and my 10 month old son wakes up (SFW)"
"Too soon?"
"Adorable little turtle is cute!"
"more aquatic cuteness!"
"Baby Turtle chilling out."
"I seriously love this."
"Saints 3? make it happen."
"I guess the saints don't like Twilight too much."
"Probably the most win I have seen in a while"
"Some things are not as they appear: an amazing optical illusion [animated GIF]"
"Amazing Optical Illusion [GIF]"
"Crazy optical illusion"
"Some things are not as they appear: an amazing optical illusion"
"Holy shit.. Mind = Blown."
"i decided to check out what all the fuss about r/spacedicks is......."
"Anytime I See Someone Defend SOPA  or Any Similar Bill"
"Virus disables my computer. The same virus offers me a convenient anti-virus software to get rid of said virus. My response  in a nutshell:"
"How I view US politics as a human being."
"How I felt after seeing the Meme Generator on Facebook."
"after 10 seconds in r/circle jerk"
"...wanna hear a secret?"
"I do what I want"
"That's one hell of a good dog!"
"How I feel about all the fake web crap on April Fools."
"My reaction when someone asks to copy my homework."
"Everytime I see a &quot;Look what my child wrote&quot; post."
"Men vs. Women: A Venn Diagram"
"SOMEBODY HELP ME!"
"Slide Dog"
"Slides aren't his thing."
"Well  hello there!"
"This is the greatest picture in existence"
"How I feel when I wake up in the morning and see my link karma has gone through the roof..."
"So peaceful. Anyone know the back-story?"
"This relationship is killing me."
"the biggest 3D street art... cool  isn't it?"
"Awwww... A dee-WHAT THE FUCK?"
"What is seen on the chalk board"
"Such is the extent of my music notes. Found whilst doing last minute studying for a mid term."
"Silly Moose"
"These Reddit ads are getting a little ridiculous"
"This show."
"Troll level: Master"
"Master troll at a Brazil feminist rally. Just look at that expression"
"This guy whipped out his dong at a feminist pride walk. (SFW)"
"Feels Good Man"
"You will never be as masterful a troll as this guy at a feminist rally in Brazil"
"This gentleman whipped out his dong at a feminist pride walk. (SFW)"
"Twitter account of the year [FIXED]"
"Twitter account of the year"
"Frogman Challenge. Don't stare..."
"frogman challenge gif"
"How I imagine other chicks on Reddit"
"How to properly remove an unconscious co-worker during a fire."
"Proper fire rescue technique...a how-to guide."
"The solution to oversleeping"
"Amazing Night at Quiver Tree Forest  Namibia [pics]"
"Starry Night over Quiver Tree Forest [pics]"
"dramatic cat"
"Christian Bale's extreme weight fluctuations"
"Fighting With Your Boss"
"Boss Fight"
"Gimme a sec  i just have to fight this boss."
"This is how I imagine Redditors at work."
"Just gotta fight this boss"
"am i right? or am i right?"
"Ducks in a cup."
"Curious otter  that look of betrayal!"
"Slow motion popcorn"
"Hey  reddit. Do you remember that girl a month ago that made a hat of snoo? Turns out she's pretty good at making other stuff  too  upon request. Just got mine in the mail today and I couldn't be happier."
"Hey  reddit. Do you remember that girl a month ago that made a hat of snoo? Turns out she's pretty good at making other stuff  too  upon request. Just got mine in the mail today and I couldn't be happier."
"Martin Luther King Jr removing a burned cross from his front yard with his son at his side. Atlanta Ga 1960.[469x418]"
"Romance dog"
"An arch made of monitors. That is all"
"Gudvangen  Norway [1920×1200]"
"Gudvangen village  Norway"
"I know how this ends."
"Hitler cat is watching you."
"Words of wisdom."
"Captian Kirk and Spock on Life in the universe"
"Stuff with Googly eyes part 4"
"Cant stop watching reddit.Am i doing it right?"
"googled &quot;how to reddit&quot;  was not disappointed"
"Princess??"
"Albert Einstein not giving a single fuck what people thought of his shoes"
"You lucky bastard."
"cosplay win"
"Hannibal Lector Cosplay"
"Have you heard of sugar gliders?"
"How I imagine my best friend and I look together"
"Co worker opened the fridge and asked if I had seen a big tube of meat. I couldn't really respond so I went with this."
"Only in Japan..."
"WTF Japan?"
"Because Japan."
"What I think of when my friends that had kids in high school post parenting advice."
"Look at all the trucks I give..."
"Collection of pics of the trucks that carry vital supplies to the US forces in Afghanistan through Pakistan."
"Damn it Helen Keller!"
"So Thirsty"
"Mr. President! Kiss my baby!"
"The hills are alive with the sound of music."
"When I critical hit Elite four pokemon before they full restore."
"My Last Day As A Camp Counselor"
"Realizing my ex blocked me after an argument..."
"Mitt Romney: &quot;I’m gonna stop the subsidy to PBS...&quot;"
"Mr Rogers flipping the bird"
"Reddit's response to every like I post"
"Reddits response to everything I post"
"When my friends tell me how they made the front page... again."
"When my friends tell me how they made the front page... again."
"After getting less than 10 up votes for posting original content on my cakeday"
"How I feel getting into an un-air conditioned subway car."
"Asking a girl how she is after a break up"
"Clicking on a r/WTF &quot;back to its roots&quot; link."
"He's thinking about his dead homies"
"Obama has 99 problems."
"President Obama getting the dirt off his shoulder"
"Whenever these little kids complain about how hard life is..."
"So i was in my local computer game shop called cex and this is their network name ಠ_ಠ"
"My attempt at keeping the less intelligent wifi scavengers at bay."
"Free wifi at my local dive bar"
"Looking for wifi at my school and then..."
"Some friends and I went to the Dark Knight Rises premiere. We decided to set up a wifi network for ourselves  and troll everyone in line."
"Found this near my school"
"Everybody loves Ray."
"It's been like that for 5 days  laziness level: College Student"
"&quot;My reactions every time I visit WTF&quot; posts make me want to do this"
"Hey dude"
"Dew-Covered Dragonfly"
"A cute picture of me as a baby..."
"NOOOOO! I'M AN ATHEIST"
"No! You're making a big mistake!"
"Friend Break-Ups"
"Two Belugas  having fun"
"The coolest way to learn French in the 90's"
"Must've been a great tune."
"This scares me to no end."
"Well  that's terrifying."
"Grand Theft Auto V is most likely ready for a release date..."
"My response to the boss asking me to work late"
"Black Ops II looks very similar too this..."
"My people need me"
"Jay Bruce gives up on the play"
"Jay Bruce gives up on the play"
"A gun shop owner's response to protesters"
"A protester probably wasn't planning on one of the owners counter-protesting him."
"Overly Attached Facebook"
"Ipaid"
"An apple a day - Imgur"
"iPosted"
"Dad regrets buying kids apple products"
"Clinton 83"
"So Bill Clinton walks into a bar..."
"Every time an iPhone goes off in a crowded room."
"The greatest thing to show up in my FB newsfeed ever."
"Assassin's Creed cosplay"
"Nice Assassin's Creed Cosplay!"
"I'm having a hard time believing this is real"
"Say what?"
"The Cutest Picture you will EVER see"
"Herro!"
"Lovely baby owl"
"Abraham Lincoln on Morality"
"Honest Abe the Atheist"
"When you call work to tell your boss that you can't come in and it goes to the answering machine."
"When someone says wiener instead of hot dog"
"When you are having a bad day"
"One  two  three  four  I declare a... OH GOD NO"
"How I feel after a sleepless night when the morning brings a flurry of new posts."
"When I get home from work and browse Gone Wild."
"Ballet is not what you think (pic)"
"Chicken Walk"
"Something to look at under the influence"
"The combined works of renown photographer Martin Schoeller [GIF]"
"Told my girlfriend I love when the page is full of blue links. Woke up to this.[x-post from r/funny]"
"...Faygelah?"
"I hate how much I relate to this... at 20"
"How I feel as a 32 year old watching the MTV VMAs"
"Being a late 30'ies redditor and just now found out what &quot;Gangnam Style&quot; is..."
"An outtake from The Village M. Nyte Shamalamadingdong"
"Rock Paper Scissors"
"When someone asked me if I fapped last month..."
"When I found out my girlfriend is a Redditor..."
"Kush and Lyrikz going all out"
"It has gone to far"
"...Wut?"
"Monkey Taking a Bath"
"Baby Monkey Taking A Bath"
"This is all too true"
"Time Break."
"My goat is in a pen"
"I wonder if they charge extra for the customer service"
"It's my Cakeday  but I thought I would post something other than cats"
"Googled &quot;Retarded Spiderman&quot; and found this..."
"What i imagine when i see poeple fighting in the comments"
"Whenever I see an argument on the internet  I think of this."
"How I see most internet arguments."
"With Valentine's Day coming up  this will make a great card!"
"How it feels after making the front page  then looking at your karma"
"After being here a while and getting past 50 karma  this is how i feel"
"Repost  but an old favorite."
"Penis size [SFW]"
"Ronaldo and the boner"
"every time i grill"
"How I plan on celebrating Memorial Day"
"after years of searching  the prefect plan. I think I could rule the world if I followed this step by step guide"
"Getting out of bed on a Monday"
"Oh snap!!1"
"Every once in a while  you see something so achingly beautiful  you can only cry."
"Thanks mate!"
"Which way did they go?"
"Thanks mate!"
"EA  Game &quot;Journalism &quot; and the Cold Hard Cash"
"A Redditor maybe?"
"Never have so many sat together in complete silence"
"How I feel every time I check on my Google+"
"My prediction for /R/Gaming on May 16th [FIXED]"
"How I imagine April 20th - Kony 2012's 'Cover the Night' campaign will unfold."
"myspace summed up"
"Found this at Blockbuster (FIXED AGAIN)"
"What it feels like on Thanksgiving night in my college town..."
"How Reddit has been lately due to Finals"
"The truth about the Joker."
"TIL mama jokes are funnier in space"
"Wesley  do you know the difference between your mother and the prime directive?"
"Now that I think about it... I don't know either."
"You had ONE job"
"This has gone too far..."
"Trolled by Ben Franklin"
"One Of These Do Not Belong:"
"Screenshot just found on facebook"
"Dear r/minecraft: If you think the authentication servers are down  PLEASE check NEW BEFORE you post about it"
"Probably the most disgusting thing anyone has ever told me."
"Alpha Male."
"Anti-gravity dog (x-post from /r/aww)"
"I wouldn't mess with him..."
"When Christians say they'll pray for me..."
"My face when looking at r/ggggg"
"Here's how I feel reading news articles regarding the Ron Paul RNC fiasco (and  actually  most news articles these days)"
"I asked for a trim."
"only slightly over the top"
"Seeing a terrible post in r/new that one person has  for some reason  upvoted"
"Is that a penis?"
"Every conversation with my grandmother."
"The biggest asshole in video games"
"You never know.."
"There's fan art  and then there's just WTF"
"Couldn't figure out where to post this  so I'm putting it here. I don't know what to say."
"Er  What?"
"WTF"
"If Batman and Superman had a baby."
"Self-explanatory ...."
"Bahahahaha"
"Siri on the spot"
"Siri showing me the locals escort services in Little Italy  Chicago"
"Final Exams."
"Here is something in honor of my first cake day which happens to be on the same day as midterms."
"Oh...Didn't see you there..."
"Best Halloween costume I've seen recently"
"The attitude of every cat...ever."
"Perfect Pickup Line"
"How the hell.. (x-post from /r/funny)"
"Me when I'm scheduled to work after-hours on Friday."
"Who's the best smelling actor that you've worked with?"
"Golden monkeys"
"Instant Couch"
"Last words of a man who was stabbed"
"Famous Last Words"
"Classic mistake"
"What are you gonna do  stab me?"
"Shakespeare couldn't have said it better."
"Well I guess so"
"Well  if you insist."
"My local news tonight. He had it coming i guess..."
"This happened in my home town and I'm not surprised at all."
"Quote from man stabbed"
"Apparently yes..."
"What are you gonna do..."
"What ya gonna do"
"The most adorable frog ever"
"Hollywood is so original."
"Ride on!"
"Whenever an attractive girl flirts with me"
"Don't Mess with Trump"
"Email me at: eatshit@gofuckyourself.no"
"Summer time in Soviet Russia"
"Meaning behind &quot;Nope&quot;"
"Meaning behind &quot;Nope&quot;"
"Lets die together!"
"I'm all for this kind of dog fight"
"Scrabble."
"Can I draw you..."
"My face when someone sends me an imgur link"
"just strolling around google images when suddenly....."
"This is not the greatest gif in the world. this is just a tribute."
"Forever Alone Leonardo DiCaprio!"
"Getting hit by a car like a boss"
"Brock Samson doing what he does..."
"Just Snoozin'"
"hugz"
"Cocaine is a hell of a drug"
"Every 60 seconds on the Internet..."
"Sunrise Highway  Sorrento  Italy"
"Skull-faced caterpillar."
"Phyllodes imperialis"
"Yup  Fuck everything about this."
"Trap door spider. eeek"
"I know I'm not supposed to post DamnLoL link but... WHAT IN THE FUCKING WORLD IS THIS ?!?!?!?"
"Need for nope: Underground."
"Michelle and Barrack Obama waved at me while visiting London."
"The Obamas"
"This has been my desktop background for the last two years"
"Home &lt;3"
"My favorite quote"
"My dad is an astronomer who is really fascinated by all current events/cultures/religions/the world  because deep down he knows this is the truth."
"Obvious Repost. But I just showed this image to my best friend. I had forgotten how goosebump inducing it is. Sagan the world is a better place because of you."
"When lurking on the internet and finding something that will for sure give you a lot of Karma"
"How I feel in regards to all the &quot;Tall People&quot; posts"
"TIL that the famous Easter Island heads aren't just heads after all."
"Stephen Colbert told you so (x-post from /r/pics)"
"How I felt as a geeky white man last night at a rap concert!"
"Meet Steve Huffman and Alexis Ohanian. The creators of Reddit! Most of you owe these men your life."
"After a long family vacation"
"Walken on sunshine."
"Gotta love college. Repost"
"Not really sure where to put this"
"Freedom."
"Spider Tattoo"
"The dark side say the truth"
"Judas and Jesus"
"Let me smell your skin"
"stop judas das gay"
"Old but Gold (Frankincense  &amp; Myrrh)"
"Stop Judas"
"Stop it  Judas."
"Adolph Hipster"
"Naming Items with the New NBT Tags Dinnerbone Introduced in 12w40a"
"Necessity is the mother of all Invention!!!"
"Say cheese!"
"Hey you guys  get out of there! That's not for you!"
"They're doing it right."
"Bounce bounce bounce run!"
"Bouncing Kitty [Previously on /r/gifs"
"I SAID NO CAMERAS!"
"To the frontpage!"
"The key to success"
"Talking on the phone during class"
"School. Asians take that shit seriously"
"Nigga Please"
"Guaranteed sex"
"Guaranteed sex (x-post r/pics) [1800x900]"
"Where I want to be right now"
"close enough..."
"So a jew walks into a starbucks..."
"How I feel after being single for 9 months"
"Australia Day"
"Fireworks and Thunderstorms"
"Xpost from r/perfect timing. I thought it might get the attention it deserves here though. Fireworks  comet  and lightning storm."
"Juggling"
"What? You mean tomorrow is really 11.11.11?? Well..."
"Seems legit."
"Upvote"
"This is what happens when a guy pretends to be a girl on reddit."
"Fapped out."
"Pug Level: Zzz"
"My friends dog asleep on the couch."
"I love elephants too  Reddit."
"Yet another reason to appreciate Kevin Spacey as an actor."
"Wonder what this little guy will evolve into.."
"Just A Baby Stingray"
"Even wizards fall on hard times."
"White Tiger underwater"
"Banging on a wall NSFW"
"I don't know what to say about this . . ."
"well  thats enough internet for the day"
"i... i dont even...what ???"
"um... what? (nsfw)"
"Doggy Style? (x/post from /r/confusedboners) [NSFW]"
"Lost Cat"
"I laughed harder than I should have..."
"The most pathetic reaction in horror movie history"
"When Reddit finds out OP is a woman"
"The most pathetic reaction in horror movie history"
"Winter War stats"
"Why don't more drivers pay attention to this sign?"
"The hardest concept known to man."
"I love the way Indians exaggerate in their movies..."
"HOLY FUCKING SHIT YEAH"
"Indian movies in a single gif"
"I flossed today. Sort of felt like this."
"Definition of Badass"
"Now you're a badass"
"My first attempt at this. How did I do?"
"The true definition of a badass."
"I laughed for to long at this."
"The True Dragonborn"
"NANANANANA BADASS!"
"Beastie Boys - Sabotage (Deleted Scene)"
"vote Odin the all-father for president"
"It's a Crocodile! Nooo  It's a log!!"
"Volcanic eruption + lightening"
"Volcanic Eruption + Lightening (x-post from r/WTF)"
"not bad"
"Grumpy Cat is definitely Addams!"
"Bear - hair= nightmare"
"Sweet shop  bro"
"dis is how i luk lyke its not edited i swear"
"Baby holster.. Why not?"
"douchebag dad?"
"When I have a kid  I'm getting one of these..."
"Baby holster (x-post from r/funny)"
"Rick needs one of these ASAP! (credit:Tyler7p7  x-post from /r/funny)"
"Rick and Little Asskicker"
"Olympic weightlifting injury"
"Olympic weightlifting injury"
"that looks painful"
"Olympic weightlifting injury"
"ArgArgArgArg!"
"Trying to carry all the groceries in one trip"
"Shouldn't have got those extra pizza bagels"
"Daft Punk Sauron"
"When I think I'm submitting good content"
"Awesome Dark Knight Rises street art"
"Batman + 3D = Profit!?!?!"
"Amazing Dark Knight street art"
"The Hawaiian Happy-Face Spider is a highly polymorphic species  producing a multitude of patterns on its abdomen  many which uncannily resemble the re recognizable &quot;Yellow Smiley-Face&quot;"
"How I imagine most Redditors would greet new posters..."
"Grandma Betty will be your guide"
"How I imagine my grandparents trying to understand the Internet"
"My first thought was wtf? My second thought was  is that a grandpa or grandma? (Don't worry  not gore or sexual...well maybe a tad sexy for some.)"
"Grand Theft Walrus"
"Our city's finest  hard at work"
"Biden and Ryan Stare Down"
"Biden and Ryan cross paths after the debate."
"Amazing photo of Biden and Ryan after the debate."
"Caption contest time!"
"There's a lot of sexual tension in this picture"
"When the fire alarm went off right before a gigantic test"
"The modern Howitzer."
"a more accurate title..."
"The elusive sidemullet"
"Just riding"
"My reaction to an NHL lockout."
"how i felt when i found out about the HNL lockout"
"Whenever I see a spider"
"Orange Eyes"
"986F 64B9 3005 E03E FC42 A41E BD57 3179"
"Looks like a bumpy ride..."
"Words can't describe this. NSFW"
"Shark week is right around the corner  here is a shark fact"
"Best Pillow Ever"
"Some men just want to watch the world burn"
"If this loads right  you'll laugh  i guarantee it"
"How my friend and I react when something someone says can be taken in a dirty way."
"You guys brothers?"
"What is love?"
"One of these sheets..."
"Very accurate"
"No idea what this is  but I'm down. I'm taking Swanson in 5."
"I would definitely watch this."
"I still love you..."
"whether youve seen it or not  this picture is amazing. its incredible what we're capable of building."
"Birds eye view of Central Park &amp; Manhattan"
"The Doctor! But  he looks a little young  don't you think?"
"Ron Swanson's lunch box"
"I want this in my menu"
"The dangers of dihydrogen monoxide!"
"Deadly Dihydrogen Monoxide"
"The deadly facts about Water"
"Made me say wtf"
"Beware! The TOTALLY TRUE FACTS."
"Just right"
"This is why I am waiting for summer to be over!"
"Oh shit my bad bro."
"i thought it was my knee!"
"When I fail hitting on a girl."
"He said it was unintentional........ Riiiiiiight......."
"Hey... you  yeah you!"
"Hey  excuse me... can you just... yeah  that's it..."
"Slow Rider."
"Awesome!!! (x-post from /r/pics)"
"So my school is going nuts  because this guy went there ..."
"Gangnam Style  15 years ago"
"Ain't nothin' but a G thang  baby"
"Trying to get to the front page"
"weddings"
"Trying to make front page."
"How I feel after not masturbating for two days."
"What my Feb 14th will look like...[FIXED]"
"The collective nerdgasm at my local theater on Avengers opening night."
"How I treat the girls on r/Gonewild who beg for upvotes [FIXED]"
"Coming back from a family vacation."
"After coming home from a long Vacation"
"Me  when my [live in] gf says that she's going out on a weeknight"
"So my college's firewall is down..."
"What I imagine the r/gonewild moderator's desk looks like."
"Daily Show writers after Clint Eastwood's RNC appearance"
"Day after no fap September.."
"I've shat my pantaloons!"
"Ah  good sir"
"Quite a predicament I might say"
"What's that smell?"
"No matter what  this picture always makes me laugh."
"I laughed way to hard at this"
"Like a sir"
"[MFW] I heard snoopdog changed his name to snoop lion"
"Can someone make this into a rage face? Seems like it would fit nicely in lots of stories"
"Outtake from The Birds Alfred Hitchcock"
"James Bond playing Mario Kart"
"sad keanu now in lego form"
"Saw this at Legoland Florida yesterday. Well played Lego designers."
"My VW fell in my milk!"
"My next."
"My next what?"
"There might be beer in the picture."
"Ew! How the hell does a dog owner let this happen? NSFL + NSFD (Not Safe For Dogs)"
"Poor dog..."
"Adventure Time?"
"When your parents tell you that you will suffer a rare inherited disease"
"Truly Best Smile In the World...."
"Super Derp! (So much Win)"
"How an Australian feel's downvoting an american"
"Animals Being Dicks; Roomba style"
"Whenever I browse /r/gonewild and see a [M]ale post [FIXED]"
"I heard about /r/spacedicks for the first time from the Obama AMA. I decided to see what it was all about... This was my reaction"
"Porn for god"
"Peekaboo!"
"What it feels like when Reddit downvotes my post into oblivion"
"Meanwhile"
"Hah  this guy."
"I choose you!"
"This isn't even its final form."
"Always makes me laugh"
"Art imitates life."
"Koala can't believe it"
"How i feel when eating popcorn  and my wife comes in with a lasagna"
"how to keep an idiot busy"
"How to keep an idiot busy"
"Wait for it ...."
"For my cake day I present to you the best stoner comic I've ever seen"
"The Yukon"
"Spilled kiss"
"Google searched  &quot;You got lucky this time&quot;....."
"Just found out the gender of my baby and decided to announce it in a way that would make sense to my friends."
"When the teacher sees me chewing gum."
"Teacher catching me chewing gum in class.."
"When The Teachers Back In My School Days Caught Me Chewing Gum"
"Um...wut?"
"How first person view was invented"
"Hungry Kangaroos"
"Feeding The Kangaroos"
"Super Ref!!!"
"Horrifically disgusting disease  or just great makeup?"
"Hey you  stop ruining my lawn."
"Devoted to Anti Cheating."
"Devoted for anti-cheating."
"For my cakecay  a collection of face swapping images"
"For Christ's sake"
"I guess they do..."
"Fresh Prince doing the running man  that is all"
"To test new friends  I bust this move and his/her reaction determines the relationship forever"
"So close..."
"Trying to reach the front page with a repost"
"i just wanna fly."
"When a cute girl mentions her boyfriend to me..."
"So close..."
"The gravity is strong with this one."
"Only black guy I've seen who can't play/slam dunk in basketball"
"How I feel trying to make it to the front page"
"I believe I can fly"
"Almost got there"
"Sums up how I feel every time I post something"
"F=GMm/r2  you met your match."
"He just caught some serious fail time."
"How I felt when I heard that the police foiled a plot to kill Justin Bieber"
"How I feel when I think I am going to get upvoted into the golden skys but actually get downvoted into oblivion."
"How it feels like to fail cake-day post."
"Kiss Cam"
"Dude  what the hell! (x-post from /r/funny)"
"I've seen a lot of these pictures  but this is phenomenal"
"sorry boss can`t come to work today  the street is gone."
"that's it Gaza....no more Mr Nice Guy!!"
"Israel and Palestine"
"No more Mr Nice Guy"
"Ronald Regan is back in an all new TV series."
"What the hell?"
"My dog tree finally started to grow"
"Helga: &quot;Nope!&quot;"
"Hey Arnold trololol"
"On my way to the front page!!!"
"This is the story of how I almost made it to the front page"
"Me when I think of original content"
"Oh shit oh shit oh shit"
"Trying to make it to the front page"
"All you need to know about the election [xpost from r/pics]"
"I really enjoy working at a datacenter."
"If only I had a friend in the back seat like this..."
"Siri  who's your daddy?"
"It's a known fact!"
"Don't you judge me Siri!"
"Siri knows how Reddit works"
"Siri's got jokes."
"I know it's immature but I can't help but laugh at this."
"Love you too Siri"
"So these are the types of conversations my roommate has with Siri."
":("
"Friendzoned by inanimate objects"
"Made me feel bad for a second"
"The problem with using Siri when you have a New Zealand accent..."
"Polite Siri"
"This is how I'm treated by all women..."
"Friend-zoned again."
"Whoa there Siri"
"I can honestly say that I was surprised by this response [OC]"
"What happens when I ask Siri to turn off my music at 2 am."
"Had to."
"It has been a year since a great tragedy struck the east coast. We said we will never forget!"
"The great quake of '11"
"Never Forget!"
"One year ago today..."
"Never Forget-I can't believe it's already been a year"
"Vampire Dog Issues"
"Oh children...."
"dinner time."
"Its Dinner Time"
"Oh children..."
"DINDIN"
"Dinner in WTF-Ville"
"Most disturbing gif I've seen in some time."
"Excuse me while i go remove my eyes..."
"The way Father Callahan use to call us for dinner..."
"Dinner time!"
"wha...what!? (NSFW)"
"Dinner Time"
"Oh Children.. It's dinner time! [NSFW]"
"Oh Children..."
"Oh Children"
"ITS DINNER TIME"
"Oh children...."
"Dinner time"
"Ariel Bold Italic Black."
"ever afraid you're going to rape someone?"
"Press Z or R twice!"
"Ran into this guy during lunch."
"Redditor puts a sign around bulldog's neck - for that sweet karma  of course."
"Never mess with Frankie Muniz"
"Good Old Days"
"Meanwhile in 1995..."
"Bellsprout swag"
"When I remember to check-in exactly 24 hours before my flight"
"My reaction on the first day of class after my Bio professor at my Bible Belt college says &quot;Evolution is a fact  jump off a bridge to test the 'theory' of gravity if you want&quot;"
"Its my birthday  this is how I feel when someone writes on my facebook wall."
"How I picture trolls waiting for a response to their mischief"
"Me during the last few minutes of the last class of the day on Fridays"
"Me at my computer after submitting a post."
"Me watching the Twilight duo's relationship fall apart."
"Me reading the Nathan Fillion AMA"
"How I felt when a girl said it was hot that I play acoustic guitar"
"fits for 9 hours"
"Mail  I am your holder."
"Been staring at this for a while now"
"Will Smith has never had a more appropriate reaction."
"I'm so sorry."
"I'm tired of these tumblr douche-bags"
"Metal."
"How I feel with everyone yelling about Chick-fil-A on Facebook"
"Every single time that kid in the front row tries to impress the professor."
"Haters gonna hate"
"Haters gonna hate"
"Fuck wheels."
"Trying so hard..."
"Roads? Where we're going  we don't need roads."
"It's a trap"
"TIMBER"
"I wouldn't go swimming if I were you..."
"Take the undead part away and its surprisingly accurate"
"How Bunnies Flirt"
"You call that a hair beaver?"
"Bad hair day"
"Filthy hair"
"Alien Vs. Predator"
"Germany Netherlands game summed up in one image"
"Mats Hummels after Germany beat their rival Holland in the Euro 2012"
"HATERS GONNA HATE Mats Hummels"
"How I feel when I'm the only one who toked before Avengers."
"It's a shitty day today here in Boston  Reddit. But here's how I feel on my first cake day!"
"Wu Tang flan ain't nothin' to fuck with"
"It's kind of getting old..."
"Seriously it's kinda getting old..."
"He Wasn't even one."
"You thought you were so sneaky."
"Trying to take off her bra with one hand"
"Pressing F5 during Obama's AMA (Borrowed GIF)"
"Every time i lose a point from karma"
"I thought this when I got into my car and there was a random blanket tossed over the back seat..."
"Nando's new slogan"
"What happens when I try to run in a dream [FIXED]"
"Oh hell no"
"If you dream it . . ."
"If you can dream it......"
"You'll need to wear a diaper for this one"
"Scariest waterslide ever?"
"Brazil now has the biggest water slide in the world at 135 feet; people reach speeds of 65 mph"
"The Manliest Wedding Cake I've Ever Seen"
"How you really look when you blow that man across the bar a kiss."
"Does this give anyone else the willies?"
"I wish my boyfriend would do that to me."
"Halloween costume"
"I know what I'm doing for Halloween THIS year!"
"Ha. I think it's a great costume!"
"Israeli Prime Minister Netanyahu is convinced Iran is developing cartoon bomb technology."
"The inspiration behind Netanyahu's bomb pic!"
"Netanyahu on women's menstrual cycles  nailed it - Imgur"
"Beautiful gecko caught on camera at night"
"Just watched Office Space for the first time ever tonight..."
"This. Play this with any music in the background!"
"STOP! Badger Time."
"shots"
"I'M READDYY TO PARRRTAAAYYY"
"When I was given tickets to the Magic Mike Premiere  then the after party with open bar  and strippers"
"when i find something in the store i've seen on reddit.."
"LET THE BABIES HIT THE FLOOR"
"LET THE BABIES HIT THE FLOOR"
"I love Plague Inc."
"I'm sure you has..."
"Mitt....why?"
"Romney Kills Big Bird"
"The Passion of the Terminator"
"My dad is watching The Terminator and this is all I can think about."
"omg so haaaawwt."
"Like a boss"
"Youtube gold"
"Giving myself the old rub and tug when I notice my dog watching me"
"when a family member calls minutes after starting to watch a porno"
"Works every time"
"This is how my wife views my sexy look...."
"How I feel rolling a joint when I'm already at an [8]"
"How to please a woman"
"Days go by"
"Mother"
"The goat's up next."
"Suddenly...goat."
"Suddenly...goat"
"You've goat to be kidding me"
"Because fuck you thats why."
"FRESH OUT"
"Your whistle is awesome!"
"How much I really care."
"Downvotes and how many fucks I give"
"Scale of how many fucks i give"
"It's the Friday before a holiday weekend. Let's see how things are looking for work today."
"How I Feel on Fridays"
"Yea I can see the resemblance .."
"Who would do that?"
"My hero *tear*"
"Santa?"
"My most favorite GIF. Enjoy."
"Happy Holidays"
"The moment when my friend and I decided on the name of our reddit account"
"Having sex at an [8]"
"When the bass drops"
"Robot santa."
"Rudolf the red nose reindeer"
"Well  that just happened."
"Stumbled across this while surfing the wold wide web... (Sorry if its a re-post)"
"I don't know what this is  but it lightened my mood for the day"
"Going to what i thought was gonna be a crappy party and ends up being open bar"
"This is AWESOME  but also pretty WTF?!"
"WANTED: Dead &amp; Alive"
"Hey! Where does that guy think he is going?"
"Baby Ducks!"
"one way to get into your car"
"So inspirational."
"Saw this on my newsfeed. So inspirational."
"Saw this on FB..."
"Busted!!!"
"Well this is awkward."
"Hope he has tiger blood"
"Glass Bash"
"cherish that moment..."
"Dark Zuckerberg"
"I must save him!"
"GO!"
"How I imagine Serj Tankian looked minutes after his AMA started"
"And this is how a slinky falls"
"No matter how long the Slinky is  the bottom will hover."
"When dropped  the bottom of a slinky will hover motionless until the top reaches it. [gif]"
"Whenever someone insults Reddit."
"Me when I heard my ex gf just got engaged to an 18 year old without a job."
"had no idea Earnie took two people to control..."
"Bert &amp; Ernie/Henson &amp; Oz"
"Oh god what..."
"LPT: Use a (clean) dustpan to fill a container that doesn't fit in the sink"
"Protesters in Ireland shooting fresh made milk against the police."
"Protester in Ireland shooting milk from a cows utter at the police. [x-post from r/photoshopbattles]"
"Irish protesters"
"Protester in Ireland shooting milk from a cows udder at the police. [x-post from r/photoshopbattles]"
"Serious Relationship"
"so i google car fan magazines ..."
"Kind of puts things in perspective..."
"Uranus: not even once"
"Seriously  wtf...(x-post morbidreality)"
"Lolita Slave Toy"
"We gettin' pussy tonight"
"Tattooed Lady - 1907"
"Possibly the greatest gif of all time (fixed)"
"Found on random imgur..."
"Gangsta"
"Viva la..."
"in times like these  VIVA LA RESOLUTON!"
"Viva la resolution"
"Viva la"
"Viva!"
"Resolution!"
"Time to start the resolution !"
"Underground Crystal"
"Starry Night in motion [Gif](x-post /r/woahdude (x-post /r/WTF))"
"This is why the Olympics are __________"
"Hmm...yes  this pleases me."
"The body's natural position"
"This is how I view people who downvote my posts"
"Fire in the ho-oooly shit!"
"Posting something clever only to find it's a repost"
"When I'm in a no fap month and I get a naughty text pic!!!"
"Look who we went trick or treating with last night (walking dead)"
"A change in diet might be appropriate."
"Whenever I eat buffalo wings..."
"Their awkward first kiss"
"Soooo cute"
"Silly wolves... that's not how you do it..."
"I knew it!"
"yes  yes she is"
"So my friend posted this on Facebook. Note to self: don't screw with her laundry."
"When im having fun at someones house and a FUCKER shows up"
"Just found out that everyone in my house hold is anti-gay"
"boing… boing…"
"Your argument is... Irrelephant"
"Irrelephant"
"Bitches love my lightsaber(s)."
"sweet license plate bro"
"Fuck gravity"
"They forgot the duct tape and whipped cream..."
"Shark High Five"
"shark five"
"Johns weather forecasting stone!!"
"Best picture I have seen in awhile"
"One thing is for sure: he's going to be one of us"
"if we fits  we swing"
"I think I may be in a bad neighborhood..."
"No hooking"
"And if you don't know..."
"Yippee Ki Yay Mother Fucker"
"Googled &quot;the worst thing ever&quot;. I have to agree with this."
"Well  then"
"Found in an English book in South Korea"
"Just like your daddy"
"Nana never liked Daddy  anyway."
"Not seeing The Dark Knight Rises tonight. This will be me until I see it sometime tomorrow."
"When I pee on the seat while my girlfriend's in the house."
"This happen when we listening gangnam style at work"
"Mr. Furlon? Mr. Footlong?"
"It's Asian Night at the Roxbury."
"Even Asian's ain't nothin' but mammels"
"Last friday  at the office."
"how my room is when i drop a clear colored drawing pin or thumbtack on the floor"
"Play me a song!"
"Maybe it's a sign..."
"Whenever I try to be funny on Reddit"
"How I feel about all the hurricane Sandy posts"
"As an Australian  what I think when I see &quot;as an Australian&quot; posts"
"Me on r/ImGoingToHellForThis"
"When my 6th grade teacher told us we would be penalized."
"Hipster Ariel"
"No."
"No...NO..NO NO HELL NO....Can somebody PLEASE subtitle this?"
"What Christians do when somebody questions their beliefs."
"My husband when I ask him to go down on me"
"When I'm he only one not high and the pieces are getting put away [3]"
"When I saw in the news Mitt Romney was in my country talking to my prime minister."
"When I see eye surgery posts on reddit"
"How my girlfriend reacted when I told her I was having a sizable lan at our house on friday."
"Tracy morgan mashup"
"Let's be honest: this horse deserves upvotes"
"Is that even real?"
"Saw this on facebook and I'm not sure if it's photoshoped or not. I was guessing reddit would know better."
"Handsome horse is handsome"
"Excuse me  I believe you have my flair..."
"My friends' reaction whenever i crack my neck."
"Suddenly Samuel"
"Suddenly Samuel"
"Suddenly  Samuel!"
"This just cracks me up  every time I look at it!"
"all you need."
"The Beatles  feat. Yoda"
"If only....."
"Rat Race... You See It"
"Queen Elizabeth II firing an SA80"
"Queen Elizabeth Lannister"
"Badass queen"
"Her Majesty demonstrating her mastery of war machines (in the driving rain  no less). God Save the Queen."
"Queen Elizabeth II firing a British L85 battle rifle"
"dafuq did i just see"
"Meanwhile in Norway"
"Saw this liberal Norwegian policeman today(!)"
"My expression when someone ninja posts or writes what I was gunna say..."
"Didn't know what to do for my cake day so here is my GIF collection."
"Oh yeah? This is your first posting ever and it already has more karma than I have total?? Cool bro!"
"How I feel when someone finds out my name is extremely close to Marco and they say &quot;Polo&quot;"
"After clicking front page links in anticipation  then realizing most of them have been 404'd"
"When I find an interesting link and find out it has been posted already"
"When a barista at Starbucks screwed up my Chai Tea order twice and after fixing it said &quot;I Chai'd my best!&quot;"
"So...I found out ANOTHER one of my friends just got engaged"
"When my friend tells me I just lost the game."
"How I reacted when my friend told me he had sex with two of his girlfriends"
"Me when my colleague repeats his bad joke for the 100th time"
"backflip fail"
"Rhino VS Warthog or Warthog gets 2 full seconds of air..."
"My Fruity Pebbles (x-post from r/gifs)"
"get the fuck"
"GET THE FUCK AWAY."
"I knew Rhinos had bad eyesight  but shit..."
"have a think about this at a 6"
"Think about this (x-post from r/trees)"
"Zelda Booty"
"Man mix and matches animal parts to create his own fucked up animals."
"Magnum P.I."
"Viewing the guest list for my high school's 5 year reunion"
"My brother said this gem today"
"You want elephant? Here is elephant."
"Anon takes his pigeon to GameStop"
"I summon my blue eyes white dragon!"
"How I felt after my ochem exam  after I screwed up my entire exam."
"How can we possibly NOT believe this?"
"I always laugh at this."
"This kid gets it."
"God help us if he ordered number 3."
"Wait a minute..."
"Welcome to 4chan..."
"Speed Dating"
"Shes the one!"
"Cakeday. Bring on the Karma"
"Making the most of it"
"best reddit is down ad."
"I didn't think a car could just explode like this"
"This is what happens when you let Jesus take the wheel."
"Should have listened to Consuela"
"GIF of a car that skids on an icy road  takes out one van  then gets smashed to pieces by a big truck"
"What the fucking fuck"
"watafack"
"Movie posters with one letter removed"
"Movie posters with one letter removed"
"When the drugs kick in"
"Narcolepsy [gif]"
"Let the bodies hit the floor."
"Finishing a project after an all nighter"
"one for hell  one way.."
"Break?"
"Children rushing into Pikachu's vagina."
"I hope you get hit by a car. Fuck off  eat shit  and die."
"Disguised Weapons"
"The best trophie of all..."
"I guess...its something?"
"why would you wanna get rid of these wrinkles?"
"Annoyed Because i stopped him to meet his girlfriend"
"little bully at its finest"
"Soccer leads to a gay bar"
"How I feel when someone makes fun of my post that has over 1000 karma."
"So  Stan Lee maybe."
"AUEAUEHUAHEUAEHU"
"HueHueHue BRBR?"
"Favorite gif. Br?"
"Screw the elevator"
"Found this while searching google for a washer and dryer."
"Ha  and you said it was a stupid idea... Now Look who's laughing."
"Fuck. The. Police."
"iPhone 20"
"not sure if repost but made me chuckle."
"Forever Alone level: Liz Lemon"
"I have a folder of about 400 pictures that my computer cycles through to use as a desktop picture. This is my favorite."
"There is no need to be that worried.."
"A close call but just for these three"
"Here is the Wikipedia article explaining Rat Kings. http://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/Rat_king_(folklore)"
"Squirrel knots are cool. The Rat King is scary."
"[X-post from /r/AnimalsWithoutNecks] Brd!"
"&quot;brd&quot; - via r/AnimalsWithoutNecks [NSFL?]"
"THATS RACIST!!"
"Alfred Hitchcock \m/ [x-post r/movies]"
"Halloween costumes from the 1930's"
"Making Bathroom Time Fun Again"
"Shaping the fabric of this country."
"Poopy Time...?"
"Uh...Fun for the whole family?"
"POOPY TIME FUN SHAPES"
"Please  pass the sugar"
"Watch out  we got a badass over here."
"DAT moment"
"Its simple mathematics.."
"He looks delicious!"
"My friend told me to Google &quot;Brawny man&quot;. I didn't spell it correctly. Here's the first image from my search."
"CapitalOne rejected my card design. Any suggestions on a company that plays more fast &amp; loose with card designs?"
"I wonder..."
"I wonder..."
"Attack . . attack . .ATTACK . .. ow  oh  wait . . .ow."
"WHAT ARE YOU DOING?!"
"Get Down With It!"
"Gettin Jiggy Wit it"
"Philosophy is questions that may never be answered. Religion is answers that may never be questioned."
"Imma bite you!"
"the Halloween Cat Bat"
"Catman Begins"
"His backpack's got jets  but I shot first"
"Giving some dap."
"Some photos can tell you a lot about a man."
"Skeletor !!"
"Some people handle earthquakes better than others..."
"Rollerblade prototype"
"Halo 4 Leaked?"
"Halo 4 Leaked Discs (No I do not have them.)"
"Must repost.... Gotham's Rockening (not for karma)"
"What they didn't show in the movie."
"Trip so hard  walls be movin'"
"My reaction to seeing /r/spacedicks for the first time today."
"My Favorite Nope Gif"
"i opened internet explorer by accident today"
"to all my co-workers"
"When someone down votes a post I like"
"To all you haters out there..."
"Patrick Star pick-up line"
"WHEEEEEEE!!"
"Owls are beautiful and majestic creatures...OH GOD!"
"Kids these days...What did I just read? (x-post from r/facepalm)"
"There are really people like this?"
"spartan facebooker pursuing eugenics"
"When I see a nice genuine comment on Reddit."
"Saw a buddy take the biggest bong rip ever without coughing."
"Professor said 'All straight men  straight girls  gay girls and gay guys want to have sex with Angelina Jolie.' Guy pipes up 'No they don't'. I wasn't sure how to respond  but I thought this"
"This photo from r/aww is crying out for some 'shopping"
"Squirrel commanding his evil minions. (Reposted with new title)"
"Oh mighty sky! Grant me the power to eliminate those who oppose me"
"That no letter O! That cookie."
"Found it in the ocean. I swear!"
"Probably the manliest hot tub in the world"
"Jurassic Story 4"
"Happy Halloween Ladies"
"This just showed up on FB  I know reddit will like this costume."
"And the award for best costume goes to.."
"In case of rape... [Halloween costume]"
"In case of rape... [Halloween costume]"
"Old but still funny  and very true. [asaekkiga]"
"It's the kiwi we deserve  but not the one we need right now."
"Is hollywood experimenting with genetics?."
"No Hope  No Cash  No Jobs  what could be next? Oh  no..."
"OH DEAR GOD NO!!"
"Today  I found out why cats purr."
"How cats purr"
"Pouch Pooch"
"Hold on weenie!"
"Firefighters (pic)"
"the worst firefighter"
"Delicious."
"Jesus was here!!!!!"
"Taxidermy  partner."
"My first reddit post"
"Yo gonna eat that chair?"
"Hey  you!"
"Someone beat me to the punch  I was totally going to paint this one..."
"Jeff Goldblum is a delicate man"
"Fish Kicks this dudes ass!"
"The redneck defibrillator"
"As someone who recently found out is getting divorced  this is how I felt"
"There it goes..."
"When people get mad at me after they ask for my help"
"50 State Movie Map."
"50 State Movie Map"
"Can't. Stop. Watching. (Corgi jumping into water)"
"FUCK FUCK FUCK FUCK!!"
"Can't Touch This"
"My favorite children's book..."
"But I'm Baked..."
"Reddit...."
"AND NOW THE SURFACE DWELLERS WILL BE PELTED WITH CATS! MWUAHAHHA!"
"Reddit Chimney"
"Visual representation of reddit's business model."
"Visual representation explaining reddit's success."
"They see me rollin'..."
"Disneys UP (Real life)"
"Mother of god."
"The 80's."
"Googled &quot;Best picture ever.&quot; This was the first one"
"Googled &quot;best picture ever&quot;. Was not disappointed."
":D"
"Baby Otter Likes Tickles"
"oh you chinese people..."
"Sleepy Hollow."
"She just got sucked into an evil vagina......"
"Black Hole"
"Some days"
"Nothing will ruin this man's day."
"Kit. Kat. Lasagna"
"I never knew what to do with these little shits in Sonic Adventures."
"Best thing I have ever seen on my newsfeed"
"He's got a point..."
"Australia's favourite dessert"
"The Lord Jesus Christ always tries to get our attention"
"Jesus has come again"
"This dog's asshole has been graced by the presence of JESUS CHRIST!"
"I'm watching you."
"Anytime I see a [deleted] comment on reddit."
"How do you organize a space party?"
"I may have a problem for laughing way too hard at this"
"Oranges for Sale"
"&quot;Oranges for Sale&quot; (X-post from r/pics) (OP - TerrorAlert) (1200x808)"
"Afghan selling oranges out of his car."
"Amazing! Recycled Bike to Bathroom Counter"
"hey this is cool. I want!"
"Just a parrot drinking tea"
"Why I beat my dumb wife."
"Bad days... everyone has them."
"When FB makes you warm and fuzzy inside."
"Israel ❤ Iran"
"Now that takes some balls!"
"Terry Crews being Terry Crews..."
"definitely the man lolz"
"Typical Terry Crews"
"I told you I wouldn't need a suit!"
"Terry Crews at the Expendables 2 premiere. In a bra."
"This showed up on my Facebook feed and I just couldn't help but chuckle."
"Got Milk?"
"Spiderman saved the day"
"Malaysian Spiderman saves everyone [Fixed]"
"Spiderman To The Rescue"
"Spiderman  Spiderman  does whahfhgfnjlbvcbp"
"Waking up for work on the 5th of July"
"The Ultimate Halloween Costume"
"Oh the wonders of our universe..."
"Fictional character portraits transformed into near photographic life-like portraits."
"Battered Warrior (x-post from /r/Popeye)"
"Beautiful and Creepy at the same time [maybe re-post... idk]"
"Amazing eyes."
"Clown Frogs - given the binomial name of Dendropsophus leucophyllatus are natives of South America’s rain forests"
"The Atelopus Frog  sometimes called the Clown Frog"
"step aside  kool-aid man!"
"Smashing!"
"SMASHING! [GIF]"
"So I Googled &quot;So I googled&quot;. Got a very nice surprise."
"Punch ALL the Snooki"
"Snooki pregnant? Her son's reaction when he watches Jersey Shore for the first time."
"One of the most satisfying moments in history"
"Clocking Snooki"
"any time I see her in the news I wish I was this guy"
"Jersey Shore at its Finest"
"Snooki PUNCH!"
"Am I the only one that loves watching this over and over and over?"
"Like if you love jesus"
"The Sweet Escape"
"Hello there."
"party time? yes i think so..."
"Wait  so then who's controlling the Hypno-Toad? And then it all made sense..."
"Hypnokitty demands your allegiance"
"The First Redditor (1905)"
"Top Post on Reddit  circa 1900"
"Meet &quot;Why don't we have both?&quot;-girl's brother"
"Whenever I have a choice."
"What it feels like trying to reach the front page..."
"Almost...got it..."
"OH Hello! How are you? Welcome to my Aquarium!"
"oh my god  hello how are you welcome to my aquarium"
"hello! welcome to my aquarium!"
"Hello  welcome to my aquarium!"
"Seems oddly relevant right now."
"Rejection hurts"
"Your move Atheists..."
"Oh wow didn't see that coming"
"I can't think of title for this .... but I find it hilarious"
"Seth Rogen knows what's going on."
"Seth Rogen gets it"
"Mario lived a good life."
"Cute puppies"
"The hand of god coming for my friend."
"Batman getting creepy"
"Legend Of Korra: new waterbending style"
"So this is how a Slim Jim is made."
"So this is how a Slim Jim is made?"
"Can someone explain this to me?"
"Suddenly stepping on multiple legos that my son left around the house."
"I took the road less traveled by  and that has made all the NOPE NOPE NOPE"
"What the hell is this from!!!"
"Found this and thought i would share..."
"Following the Obama AMA"
"Consequences"
"My reaction when a link of mine is reposted by someone else and makes the front page."
"How someone else feels about me reposting their link."
"when the waitress hasn't been by to refill our drinks in a while"
"How I felt when I missed the Presidents AMA"
"Just a dog dressed as an AT-AT"
"Today I learned how gummy worms are made. [nsfw]"
"[NSFW] - Mmm! Gummy Worms!"
"Gummy Worms [NSFW]"
"What childhood staple will you stuff in your anus today?"
"Better than a ticket I guess"
"I miss this crazy guy..."
"Well.. How much?"
"Words of wisdom."
"Just found out my crazy ex got pregnant 2 weeks after her and I broke up. This is how I feel right now."
"Like a boss"
"First Arrested Development Reunion Photos!"
"Oh  i didn't know i wasn't allowed to do that."
"&lt;3 ALL U NEED IS LOVE AND DANCE AND ROLLER SKATES &lt;3"
"photoshopped  but still inspiring"
"Bear face on a pallet."
"Bears in wood you say? [xpost from /mildlyinteresting]"
"Say Cheese!!"
"A magic fucking chair. That is all."
"Mother fuckin' chairs!"
"Fuck This I'm Outta Here"
"We're done here  have a great day!"
"How I feel when I see people arguing about religion"
"Magic chair - you can fold it and carry where ever you go."
"Pasta and rabbit pair well together"
"youre gay"
"Great Paul Provenza quote"
"Stephen Merchant as a Kid"
"me when I try to dance in front of a hot girl at a Party"
"crazy frog"
"Banksy."
"That's what it feels like sometimes."
"If this isn't the AWWest of them all..."
"Roommate's cat enjoying his halloween candy"
"I don't think you can make me laugh"
"Boop"
"Mercury(II) Thiocyanate. Also known as 'Pharaoh's Serpent' [GIF][Resubmitted with tags]"
"It's coming for you"
"I don't know what is happening  but it looks gross [x-post from r/woahdude]"
"door way to hell"
"Mercury and Thiocyanite Reaction"
"Mercury(II)Thiocyanate being heated."
"Remember (Summer '11): Shower To Go"
"I'm sure we all do this to some extent [FIXE]"
"The introverted way.(x/post from r/funny)"
"No one will notice..."
"Harry Potter vs Lord of the Rings"
"No one will ever notice..!"
"So i became a fence"
"Googled &quot;space cats&quot;... I ain't even mad"
"Biggie Smalls"
"Don't hate me because I'm beautiful"
"GO HOME MOM  YOU'RE DRUNK!"
"Keanu on religion"
"Perpetual Prenatal Suicide"
"That must be the reason!"
"If Keanu evolved from monkeys..."
"final act of trolling?"
"All of a sudden  it hit me."
"What if.."
"What is this &quot;3:03 rumor&quot; thing? Can anyone explain it to me?"
"Quack"
"The image speaks for itself"
"Given level = zero fucks."
"Close  but no zebra"
"0 fucks given!"
"The secret of Isla Pascua"
"Bad Willy! No!"
"Das cake was soo gewd  und Im already pooping"
"Smooth."
"i wouldn't mess with this father and son..."
"Skeletons."
"Friend shared this on facebook. I am disappointed"
"But what about all the healthy people?"
"Saw this on Facebook... That escalated quickly"
"Mother's Love Shows How Precious Life Is"
"F*ck you box! NO  F*CK YOU!!"
"Never fails to make me laugh"
"Fuck You  I'm A Box"
"Living in a Box"
"New supply has arrived"
"Ozzy having fun at the wax museum"
"Ozzy having fun at the wax museum [x-post from /r/gifs]"
"Ozzy at a wax museum"
"Fuck you  I walk a lot."
"goose sandals"
"Oh  Scruffy. You silly dog  you."
"Dammit Scruffy  you're a dog!"
"Damnit Scruffy."
"Best Peter moment ever"
"baby chipmunk praying"
"Cute little baby Chipmunk"
"Still one of the funniest things I've seen on the interwebs..."
"Dear Mr. Haberny..."
"Fool's Gold"
"How I love public transport!"
"Trustworthiness of Beards"
"So I sez to da broad..."
"Haha So We Meet AGAIN!!!"
"He knew he was doing this"
"This gem was taken from a friend's Facebook."
"Checking the time"
"A seahorse checking himself out in my watch."
"Looking at the reflection"
"TVN News is bullshit. Girl scout cookie sales are on the rise."
"Aggressive Sales Technique"
"Aggressive Girl Scout Cookie Sales"
"Winning"
"Advanced technology"
"There you go"
"lmao..."
"fat arm=naked co worker. mind blown"
"Math Tests..."
"I've made a terrible mistake.."
"Living with two female roomates.. (FIXED)"
"Living with two female roommates .. [Fixed]"
"SO TRUE"
"Fucking Zubats...."
"BEHLUH"
"What a jerk."
"Why does a capacitor block DC but not AC?"
"I think I can learn a thing or two from this man."
"True Gamer."
"Oh Adam  you pimp"
"What Happens When I Am Confronted By A Pretty Girl [GIF]"
"Why I mess up sometimes..."
"How I look when I'm on Reddit until the boss comes by for a look."
"How I look when I'm on Reddit until the boss comes by for a look."
"A metaphor for life"
"As good a reason as any"
"I can stay awake  I know I can"
"The Trip of a life time"
"Meanwhile in Australia [fixed]"
"Australian Fishing [Fixed]"
"Australian Fishing [FIXED]"
"Don't worry  I read it that way too"
"Earth was certainly in a good mood yesterday..."
"These guys  with no experience  used the internet to win homeowner designed kitchen of the year in SD (x-post r/DIY)"
"EHRMAGERD - Imgur"
"I hate when this happens"
"Black Stereo Types"
"Black stereo types"
"This scene taken out of context makes for some good material..."
"Karl  Stahp."
"COD logic"
"My new favorite picture of President Obama"
"President Obama looking longingly"
"Le bravest oba[m]a song"
"POTUS at [7]"
"I'm sure this will get you all riled up..."
"If Obama gets re-elected I am posting this on facebook"
"Oh hell yes"
"Wanna grab me a beer?"
"The hard truth"
"Soul sucking gif."
"So majestic"
"Saw this on Facebook"
"How are you supposed to wipe?"
"Spent way too much time thinking about this already..."
"Every single year"
"How I Feel About Being A Redditor"
"Ehhh; reddit is all i need"
"Omegle Rage"
"I googled &quot;What is reddit?&quot;  and this was the first result"
"Circlejerk"
"you got my nose wrong... again."
"When someone on Reddit asks what is wrong with Nickelback."
"when taking attendance and someone says &quot;present&quot;"
"Beats by Dr. Dre"
"Thug beet."
"The slide for bad kids. [Fixed]"
"OH GEE IM TOTALLY GOING SO FAST AND.... AWW FUCK"
"The Gordon Freeman Who Waited [x-post from r/wallpapers]"
"The freeman that waited"
"Just realized it was my cakeday. Found a gif describing how I feel since I have no photos of my cats readily available"
"omnomnom..."
"what happens when i get a chewy piece of steak"
"Drop it like it's Hot"
"Rednecks"
"Tired of Obama?"
"A good picture to post on Facebook to mess with people"
"My expression when I click on a '/r/spacedicks' link to see what all this commotion is about"
"Clicking an imgur link on reddit  then being lead to www.gophoto.it"
"MFW i put cereal in my bowl then realize there's no milk left"
"How I feel when my roommate doubles my karma in one post."
"Surfer girl."
"Saw this on walk home a few days ago. Not sure if serious or just seriously joking."
"Wow... Really?"
"I have no choice but to share this"
"First pic from Facebook to make me laugh since I joined Reddit [Not OC  will delete if repost just let me know]"
"IDK JEREMY"
"Thanks for the confidence boost  lionbro"
"You are flawless and I love you."
"IDK JEREMY (xpost from /Gifs)"
"Possibly the greatest gif of all time"
"For my cakeday  I submit what is possibly my favorite gif ever."
"how sweet!"
"Sometimes I Just Feel Ugly..."
"A man and his lion"
"I don't know what to call this one."
"You are flawless  and I love you"
"Me when I get to that bromance stage of drunk on a night out."
"You're a real bro  Jeremy"
"The FLOP! Slowed down for your enjoyment."
"Squirrel Parkour?"
"Thought of this today when I was the last one to finish a bio exam."
"NOPE"
"Snorlax Underwear Protects Your Chastity  Is Super Effective"
"10 goat"
"I see: &quot;I'M GOING TO BE RICH&quot;. You see: &quot;GET A JOB&quot;"
"Not sure if too good to be true  or too true to be good"
"I don't want to live on this planet anymore."
"I don't want to live on this planet anymore"
"When I see things like this  I wonder if it might be better after all if the world *does* end in 2012"
"You know you're unemployed when this looks attractive"
"This is why we can't have nice things"
"Watch trailers they said. Play games they said. It will be fun they said."
"Came across this on facebook  because FUCK science."
"We Has Progress With These Medicines!"
"Dinner time during Ramadan."
"R.I.P. Mitch Lucker from Suicide Silence. You will be missed by your family and fans."
"Mitch Lucker  vocalist for Suicide Silence  passed away today after a motorcycle accident. He left behind a wife and daughter. Here's a picture of his daughter and him stretching before opening up the mosh pit. Rest in Paradise  Mitch."
"Oh CNN..."
"Very cute CNN..."
"I bet this is the best joke this person will ever make."
"Someone’s been waiting their whole lives to write this in"
"It's Dangerous To Go Alone - TAKE THIS"
"Shark Protection? here ya go!"
"Human Eyelashes Under A Microscope"
"I need a pillow."
"When Reddit goes down..."
"Things to do at work..."
"Saw this near my colage"
"WEE LIL WINKY"
"Ha!"
"This picture hits you hard."
"Tennis anyone?"
"So apparently this exists..."
"What I feel like when I get put back into the same COD lobby I ragequit from."
"What Reddit is like"
"Why would you do that in public?"
"My karma tripled overnight. Initial excitement eventually turned into this realization..."
"Hey Finland  Sweden  and South Korea  check out my Italian school lunch"
"I thought the style was interesting. (set 1)"
"When I become a parent I'm stealing this idea"
"Cat thoughts"
"Currently my favorite image on the internet."
"Frank The Cat"
"you will never know!"
"Working for that upvote"
"Montage"
"Chris brown gif... What where you expecting?"
"Googled crazy boyfriend   found this"
"Christmas - it´s a family thing!"
"The kids face... (x/post from /r/spacedicks) NSFW PORN"
"The Christmas spirit (NSFW)"
"The Circles of Life"
"A couch that all Redditors must have!"
"The London Underground are being kind to new iOS 6 users"
"You know the new Apple iOS 6 Maps are a failure when..."
"Apply cold water to the burnt area"
"For Apple iOS 6 passnegers  local area maps are available from the office"
"So many lost hipsters."
"London Underground helps out iOS 6 users"
"How we are adapting to iOS6 in London"
"For the benefit of those using iOS 6..."
"For iOS6 Users"
"iOS6 Maps is great! Here  have some old school maps."
"Just a friendly warning at the London Underground."
"The London Underground is finally doing something right..."
"I laughed when I saw this..."
"Papa Smurf  you sly dog."
"Cat used mirror move"
"Hungry Hungry Koopas"
"Every time I read about gun shots in USA"
"I'm so happy"
"The guys from ImGoingToHellForThis told me this belongs here [repost from r/ImGoingToHellForThis ]"
"Scumbag Grad Schools"
"Scumbag roommate"
"Scumbag Co-worker"
"Every f*&amp;$ing time I go downstairs at the office he has already been there."
"Mmmhm seems right"
"Best use I have found for bulldog clips"
"Lava Flow  Kilauea Volcano  Hawaii"
"Lava"
"Just a simple search request."
"Favorite comic of all time"
"SAP can't shave"
"Every damn time."
"If I'm ever in New York..."
"Radio Guilt."
"Go through an automatic door..."
"SAP goes on a date"
"my closet is full of these. . ."
"Me  about five minutes ago."
"Does this keep happening to anyone else on Google?"
"Socially Awkward AIM"
"Did this today  I'm such a gentleman"
"What it's like browsing /r/new"
"What it's like going to a Swedish summer camp."
"How I feel browsing r/funny"
"How Reddit browses r/funny/new"
"Every time a post leads me to a Facebook screenshot"
"Every time I overlook small details for job interviews"
"Multiple heat signatures on your six"
"How I feel as an Apple fanboy on Reddit nowadays"
"The tip of a butterfly's tongue  zoomed in [pic]"
"Grandma Logic.."
"Whenever I'm talking to my mom on the phone. (x-post from /r/gif)"
"Earception."
"Good ol' thumb head."
"A few days late... but so true."
"When I accidentally leave my dog and my steak burrito alone in the same room"
"So it was all a show..."
"So  this happened in Chile circa 2008. What other artistically catastrophic events have you seen photos of?"
"So  this happened in Chile circa 2008. What artistic catastrophic events have you seen/taken photos of?"
"Day 32: Humans still think I'm couch"
"Teacher catching me chewing gum in class.. [FIXED]"
"My all time favorite gif."
"My life in Battlefield 3..."
"This woman just wanted a peaceful stroll in the park..."
"Cuteness Army is here!"
"The first debate in a nutshell."
"Apple vs Samsung vs Nokia - A few days old but I still find it extremely funny!"
"The Perfect Family"
"so true you delicious bastards"
"Cooking logic"
"Every time."
"Photoshopping in the 90's"
"George Costanza's idea of Photoshop"
"Pre-photoshop"
"Pre-photoshop"
"Too cute for words"
"'m a waiter  and this is what a customer left me for a tip."
"Saw this on r/wtf...it's not...it's fucking hilarious"
"When I told him he was an inbred..."
"Breadcat."
"When I told him he was an inbred [FIXED]"
"So I let my cat browse r/spacedicks"
"Bread on head? Commence freak out."
"Just realized I have a baboon living in my washroom..."
"Just realized I have a baboon living in my bathroom..."
"Every night before I go to sleep."
"Don't settle for any of his relatives. Just wait for your Boaz."
"my world is spinning out of control"
"Fuck."
"Brunette Beauty"
"More More!"
"Overly attractive girlfriend"
"Scumbag Canada"
"Explains the great lakes..."
"Typical brother behavior"
"No! bad Ape!"
"The faces I have when I blast a dookie."
"Can't even imagine the size of the shit they just took."
"reflection is everything."
"Grow your hair and your IQ!"
"Paper advertisement: hair loss"
"Sheldon Cooper making a career change..."
"Anyone else?"
"Every time I head over to /r/gonewild"
"MFW opening r/spacedicks on my first day of reddit"
"All the evidence I could find about creationism."
"Best picture I've taken with my iPhone"
"So I made some lightning gifs too"
"[O] &quot;Planet Express Logo&quot; - Futurama  Comedy Central"
"Oppa Gotham Style"
"This picture is 100% natural. Not graphically altered."
"Nerdballer at it's best. Watch the girl on the end react to JD giving her a high five."
"Married Sex [Fixed]"
"Weee!"
"Old people and Taco Bell  amirite?"
"Toto."
"I could watch this show alllll dayyy looong."
"The best STAR WARS action figures yet!!!!!!"
"The perfect addition to any fan's collection."
"New Star Wars action figures"
"Driver turns up to police station to pay traffic ticket with 137 origami dollar bill PIGS...cops make him unfold every one"
"person pays traffic ticket with 137 oragami pigs in 2 dunkin donut boxes..well played sir"
"When I see Reddit filled with blue links..."
"Notices single girls at the bar"
"Hard Motherfuckers."
"Growing a new thumb? [NSFW/L] [Surgery Aftermath]"
"Can Anyone Explain This?"
"SHARKKKK!!!"
"Welcome to Australia - [FIXED]"
"lip syncing cats"
"I dare you guys to add text to this gif..."
"Everybody wants to be a..."
"What's new?"
"Bohemian Catsody"
"Newly announced feature on the iPhone 5 will revolutionize text messaging forever"
"My new favorite wallpaper!"
"Nothing But Net"
"Sunset in Indiana"
"Nothing but net."
"Beautiful"
"swish"
"Squirrels got nothing on this lobster  1 in 50 million."
"Nice"
"Otter being ottery"
"Hi there!"
"Can anybody tell me how to get to sesame street"
"How I feel about the family coming to stay all next week for Thanksgiving."
"TLC or WTF ?"
"How I feel every time I pull into a Walmart... [FIXED]"
"Billy Madison gif- Did this to my husband when I finally figured out how to do my psychometrics homework (3 hours later)"
"My reaction when I finally figured out how to do my psychometrics homework (after 3 hours) (X-post from r/funny)"
"When i finally understand something in chemistry"
"Heating up my Subway sandwich at work that I saved from last night..."
"Found this in my animal crackers."
"Found this in my animal crackers."
"It's my cake day. Have an image of a star breeding ground in the Carina Nebula that has nothing to do with atheism."
"Eta Carina [6000 x 2906]"
"What the fuck Sean Connery??????"
"Sean Connery  WTF?"
"Just Burt Reynolds in some thigh-high boots and.....I don't even know....."
"The extinction of the dinosaurs [pic]"
"Makes sense"
"Seems legit"
"The craving for a Nanosaur reboot hit me so hard today."
"Found this little guy at work today"
"Awesome wall mural."
"Popped up on my FB feed. It's called a Sea Pig."
"Damn  Japanese cinema  you weird."
"Try to describe what's happening here."
"Team work!"
"Definitely need something like this for the next time I go out for a night on the town with a friend."
"Rafiki taking a swim."
"How should I celebrate my first year on reddit?"
"European ads are so much better than North American ones."
"yeah  pretty much."
"Red Panda in a tree (also posted to /r/redpandas)"
"Cute red panda"
"What I've done at work so far."
"Here comes the airplane!"
"Give me muh bukket!!!"
"Free Mustache Rides"
"Free moustache Rides"
"Who wants a mustache ride??"
"Dat chin"
"The saddest gif"
"i found this on facebook and i laughed so hard i peed a little"
"Never. Again."
"Pawns can do that also.."
"If you find this funny  I love you."
"Sometimes  I really fucking miss this guy..."
"Bane sans mask."
"Unfortunate tan lines for Tom Hardy(Bane) on the set of TDKR"
"Tom Hardy on the set of TDKR without Bane's mask on. You can really see how tight it must have been on him."
"When I realized I've spent a year of my life putzing around on reddit..."
"I just broke 1000 karma!"
"When your team wins  but you don't have any kills"
"How I felt watching Obama lose the debate"
"Celebrate Good Times! Col-bert!"
"I bet he loved it! (X post from /r/funny)"
"I shouldn't be alive"
"Maybe I'm a little bit funny"
"My ex called to tell me she got a new boyfriend..."
"crazy shaolin monk says HIT ME"
"Touch me."
"No donuts for Reddit..."
"The best explanation of social media that I believe I've ever seen."
"Social Media explained using Tasty Donuts."
"The Seamonster [5184x3456][OC]"
"Hey look guys  it's the Hulk (slightly NSFW)"
"Hey  what're yo....GET AWAY FROM THERE!"
"Wait...is..he? No...MY BALLS!!!"
"Looks like meat's back on the menu"
"Bullseye"
"Revenge is a dish best served warm"
"bad sticker placement"
"Friend's dog ate gum. Went for walk. This happened."
"Who says you can't teach an old dog new tricks?"
"Friend's dog ate gum. Went for walk. This happened"
"I kinda wish I could do this."
"No thank you"
"...and you thought Welsh Lady Ass Fudge was bad."
"Tasty!"
"Finally a Nail Salon for Men"
"I don't wanna know what their blow dry hair Solon is called"
"Hand Job (SFW)"
"This is my kind of spa day."
"Dashing the hopes of many would be customers every day."
"My first gaming completionist moment"
"What I did at work today"
"As a stay-at-home parent  what I did today now that both kids are in school"
"The day I look and see that Battlefield 1942 has 0 players online"
"Trying to keep it together during the Van Gogh episode but ultimately ending up in this state:"
"When the first votes are downvotes on a link i thought Reddit would enjoy"
"what is this from??"
"I just missed my Cake Day by a few hours..."
"It's blue. No pink. No blue. No pink. No blue. No..."
"How i feel downvoting unworthy posts"
"What it's like trying to keep my car clean"
"I felt a kick!"
"Heaven..."
"Back when she was Stefani…"
"Searched up: Shitty instagram photo. I wasn't surprised...."
"Watermelons"
"Aggressive elderly lesbians don't muck about with pickup lines."
"Girl getting totally carried away at wedding."
"This party sucks  I'm out of here."
"Take on me."
"He ran so far just to meet a girl like you"
"I love little little girls (NSFW?)"
"At Least He's Grammatically Correct"
"&quot;I love you  Mommy.&quot;"
"SO cute."
"wat"
"...end"
"Fun with portals (fixed)"
"Jewish Post-Circumcision sucking...I am ashamed"
"Taken 2."
"How i feel when i see people complain over classes/work at 8 AM"
"People who get mad about down votes."
"So I'm collecting gifs (specifically this type) just to irritate my friends on FB. Here's my fav so far. Share yours?"
"How I feel every time I upload something to reddit."
"now that's using your head"
"reddit's diner"
"Hope it's not Devil's Food Cake."
"One of my favorite shows as a kid."
"What a bond (Blind man that bluffed strikes again?)"
"While everybody else played on their fancy consoles I grew up with this."
"Before i could afford PC games..."
"Getting high: you're doing it wrong."
"The ol' Toyota switcheroo."
"i have no idea who r u ?"
"My thoughts after breaking up with my girlfriend."
"I just inherited a bunch of my recently deceased grandfathers tools when I moved away from home last month. After seeing reactswithwater's post"
"After waking up to frost on my car"
"When my SO tells me how excited she is to give me all of my gifts at Christmas."
"Every weekday morning"
"Student's life"
"That's a bloody outrage  it is! I want to take this all the way to the Prime Minister. Hey! Mr. Prime Minister! Andy!"
"Defacing US currency"
"Defacing US currency"
"Five Dollar Bill"
"BFM"
"To infinity and beyond."
"Squids in spaaaaaace"
"I just saw this on 4chan and suddenly my brain WTFd"
"Listen!"
"Hey  listen!"
"Queensland Australia's total solar eclipse in 21 exposures (sequence begins near the horizon)"
"Total solar eclipse that just happend in Australia."
"When I visited Reddit for the first time"
"Don Vito."
"When it's your cakeday and you have no idea what to post."
"How I feel when the whole enemy team gangs up on me with SMG's"
"I feel bad for laughing at this."
"My new favorite gif  strangely calming."
"It really doesn't go with everything..."
"Walking Home During A Stormy Nights"
"This scene usually appears in my head when I do some inner monologue"
"Dat Class"
"Offended? Who cares?"
"Sometimes when I've had a bad day I'll watch this for a while..."
"The cutest gif you will have ever seen"
"This has never failed to make me smile after a bad day. Just a couple of happy Stegosaurus."
"GAH"
"For a better start in life.."
"For a better start in life..."
"The lab test can't be wrong."
"Bull's revenge"
"This never get old to me!"
"It's growing [GIF] (x-post from /r/pokemon)"
"No matter if my eyes can't stay at the right position  but my pirate look get me a lot of attention."
"Skrillex hates bees"
"Skrillex Hates Bees (OP raymonddull)"
"Why nobody should like dubst..ep.. I mean Skrillex. Epic Beardyman Impression"
"Still my favorite gif...it gets me every time!"
"At least we have our priorities straight."
"Good advice."
"Remember these guys"
"Before I learned of the Discovery channel this is how I learned"
"When everybody leaves the house"
"My very pregnant wife does this whenever she gets home."
"Perfect..."
"(something except the punchline) xpost for /r/pics"
"Bird whatching"
"I must attain one of these."
"Smee Again!"
"What you SHOULD do with fame."
"Looks like the Narwhal is Baconing at Midnight again."
"Searched &quot;was not disappointed&quot; on google. Was not disappointed."
"Because  who doesn't want a Christopher Walken mask?"
"In case you happened to want a Christopher Walken cut out mask..!"
"I see a space girl holding a space cat (repost...probably)"
"I would probably have a similar reaction..."
"shut up and take my money!"
"When I'm really thirsty and finally get a drink..."
"Wall Cat"
"Four Stages of Life..."
"Darth User [x-post from r/popcult]"
"Cancer? Fuck that  I'll smoke nine at once. [Fixed]"
"Apartheid"
"Fields of Lavender  Plateau de Valensole  Provence  France"
"Made in Germany... Any Questions?"
"When a Chinese car hits a German bike."
"Made in China vs Made in Germany"
"Leaving work with a joint at home ready to go"
"When I leave my last lesson on a Friday"
"Respect is a virtue."
"Couldn't think of a title..."
"Fancy Cat"
"If you thought overly attached girlfriend was creepy before..."
"Atheists"
"Just stumbled upon this..."
"So I got this card from a coworker when I left my company today"
"An epic amount of speed"
"Nerd Pronz"
"My answer whem my american exchange student asks me what we shall do on weekend."
"today is the day O.o"
"One of the strangest gifs I've seen in my internet adventures"
"How I want to spend the rest of the Fall."
"I was looking at r/gifs and listening to lindstrom  then this happened."
"I'M BATMAN"
"Long Underwater Picture"
"It's Beautiful"
"Dual realities"
"So pretty..."
"Looks like a good read!"
"Meanwhile in an alternate universe..."
"Success Tiger"
"When I see that a girl I hated in high school put on the freshman 15."
"HIFW the handicapped stall at work is available."
"Walking into the office after not seeing my boss' car in the parking lot."
"That amazing moment when your poop that you were sure would clog the toilet goes down smoothly."
"mfw I destiny bond an Outraging sweeper"
"Upvote Island"
"Went home for a good home cooked meal and called the steak my dad made dank. His reaction...I think he's an ent..."
"This guy is the man"
"Old Flathead enjoyed the finer things in life"
"Oh Johnny !"
"There's a handsome guy in my house!"
"Hands off  human!"
"Abu the monkey"
"The director's cut from Aerial (The Little Mermaid)"
"unfortunate time to get arrested"
"Let me show you the dance of my people..."
"White people problems."
"White People"
"Want to go grab something to eat?"
"A serious issue."
"Tumblr win."
"This seems like it is a problem for redditors"
"A serious issue..."
"A Serious Problem"
"A serious issue."
"Summary of all the political knowledge on my newsfeed yesterday"
"Gateway Drug"
"Saw this on Facebook.."
"New From Apple"
"Reddit  for my cakeday I present....this."
"Shanghai 1990 vs 2010"
"On Fridays  we DISCO"
"I'm sick  carry me!"
"He gets a bit clingy at the vet..."
"Help...me."
"Even Neil has a funny side"
"Okay  who's car is this??"
"It's Friday!!! So here's a Princess Leia wallpaper"
"Who remembers this?!"
"Thanks Google..."
"Probably"
"Fuck everyone..."
"CONDOMON I CHOOSE YOU!!"
"i have no idea what i'm doing"
"I am currently shoe shopping with my girlfriend and her roommate."
"Little Bastard!"
"Denied. Why siblings suck. part 2"
"party pooper."
"Every time a comment I thought of has already been posted"
"Fair warning for the second generation"
"My new favorite .gif!"
"That's a tattoo"
"WTF tattoo"
"my reaction when I see a quality r/gonewild post"
"Polar bear criticized Putin on Animal Planet  gets arrested by Russian authorities."
"Go be bear somewhere else!"
"This kid works it."
"How I feel when I get 20 upvotes."
"Dedicated clothing store employee"
"I see your library in Iran and Yale  and raise you a library at Trinity College  Dublin."
"This is how you make something cute into something unsettling..."
"I found this playing the Imgur game  it made me laugh"
"Ultimate if I fits I sits"
"If I fits  I sits."
"They will never find me in here."
"When someone need help with their computer"
"Best cat picture in the universe."
"This guy.."
"Fuck The Cops"
"Fuck you  Flowers [pic]"
"It's my Reddit birthday! To celebrate  here's a picture that makes me laugh every time I see it."
"Grocery store is doing it right."
"Please hit me as hard as you can."
"Every. Time. I. See. A. Bug."
"Renewable Energy ??"
"Go home smuggler  you're drunk."
"Drug smuggling fail  should have payed attention in maths class ese..."
"Best part of going grocery shopping as a kid"
"I reached 100 karma for the first time"
"My friend's cousin is in Japan and sent this picture to him today. Japan has some Fuckin' Great Deals!"
"Meanwhile in Japan"
"Christmas was scary in Yugoslavia"
"Fear my fuzziness!!"
"This simple flowchart is the answer to all of life's problems."
"Downside of having a batcave"
"Bat Cat"
"How I felt when I realized I have to wait an entire year for new episodes after Sunday"
"So here's the world's most adorable pet"
"There is a room in hell  waiting for this woman."
"The biggest bitch in the entire world."
":3 made me laugh"
"something i found while looking at my cousins pictures"
"Past technology marvels"
"Well that escalated quickly..."
"9:03 AM"
"9:03 AM"
"Would you look at the time?"
"Still my favorite gif"
"Every repost on reddit. Ever."
"Every repost on reddit ever."
"sarah jessica parker photobomb"
"Bikini Atoll Nuclear detonation."
"Boom"
"Couldn't think of the perfect title  but this makes me laugh SO hard"
"MMMMMMM bacon."
"Ralph is ready for the internet."
"Finally! The book &quot;How to Understand Women&quot; has been published."
"&quot;How to understand women&quot;"
"Meanwhile in the NYC Subway..."
"Making the most of her daily commute?"
"She takes the woman's role of &quot;staying in the kitchen&quot; way too seriously."
"Only in New York."
"NYC Subway Cutting Board Girl"
"Onion chopping  in the NYC subway =("
"Cooking Level: Mexican"
"Only in a NYC subway...priceless reaction"
"Time Management Level: Woman"
"Weasels."
"As an American  this is how I see the election season so far."
"Kiss my ..."
"Little baby octopus."
"If Hitler and Lieutenant Worf were to kiss  their mustaches would never touch."
"As a star trek fan  im learning new things everyday."
"Map: Almost all pre-Civil War slave states went Romney and almost all free states went Obama."
"Election results 2012 vs. Civil War map 1846"
"To the South  for taking it all in stride!"
"Map of the United States before the Civil war vs. Map of the United States 2012 Election"
"Happens only in my country!"
"I found this delightful .gif  figured you might like it too."
"Ocean waves stained red with blood during the traditional &quot;Grindadrap&quot; Faroe Islands"
"Dirty mouth?"
"Someone made this a while back  very useful!! Thanks again Tiides!"
"So that's how a sewing machine works...."
"This is why you cant the let monkeys hangout with the pigs.."
"Monkey faced pig"
"The blobfish and seaping are WTF for sure. How about a monkey-faced pig..."
"Fucking NOPE"
"Oh shit  man  what are you doing? And why?!"
"Smart Move"
"Taking advantage of a situation like a sir"
"dildo bike"
"It kills you..."
"One of my favorite atheists  Bruce Lee  quote on limits"
"Bruce Lee on limits framed in an story about running."
"Bruce Lee on Limits"
"Enough internet for me  today."
"Pygmy Marmoset AKA Finger Monkey."
"Well  that's one way to advertise wide angle lenses."
"Seemed timely with the Royal Wedding"
"When I realized I missed my cake day..."
"Over the hills and far away"
"Timing"
"Well  there's two possible answers in my head..."
"My childhood hero"
"Really cool perspective from space of the Earth at night"
"Italy"
"So I Googled Vin Diesel..."
"Evolution"
"Come at me bro"
"Bro Team Owl"
"When I see a hot girl walk by in yoga pants"
"Back Up Now!!!"
"When people tell me I'm going to hell (X-post from r/trees)"
"First!"
"So I'm driving to work and..."
"wait a sec  hold up let me just line it up..."
"There is a small country called Niue. This is its currency."
"Runic sure is capitalizing on all the hype..."
"I didn't get *that* large a discount..."
"Just a minor mistake  no one'll notice."
"Blizzard is clearly paying Valve for false advertising..."
"If reddit had a restaurant"
"If reddit were to ever open a restaurant chain..."
"The Credible Hulk"
"The Credible Hulk"
"How I feel in my university's dining hall looking for food after the chefs have stopped serving"
"Am I beautiful yet?"
"Welp... Time to leave..."
"Me trying to hook up with a girl..."
"Sure  I would love a taco."
"MMM... TACO."
"How I felt after my first day of law school."
"For my cakeday  I present you 'one that always gets me'! I love this post"
"Reddit Cat Post Level: OG"
"I think this wins reddit"
"Beware of the mean &amp; angry frog"
"Isn't he ADORABLE!!!!"
"The frog doesn't look happy."
"Bonfire (pic)"
"I regret nothing!"
"Chocolate? Chocoshchsmmm"
"'Chocolate? Chocoshchsmmm' Rage-ified"
"Halloween is coming...time to start thinking of awesome costumes..."
"Best costume ever!"
"My favorite Halloween costume of all time."
"Frosted Flakes"
"MUST.KNOW.ENDING."
"25 Years Ago today  the world was given Double Dare"
"Love Story"
"Boise State Football equipment truck hit a cow on the way to Southern Miss... Ain't that some bullshit."
"Boise State football equipment truck hits a cow on way to Southern Mississippi"
"Boise State's equipment truck hit a cow on the way to Southern Miss"
"Boise State Equipment Truck hits a cow"
"Boise State's equipment truck hit a cow on the way to their game against Southern Miss."
"My schools equipment truck hit a cow..."
"Boise State college football truck hits a cow on freeway."
"This is really how the Leaning Tower of Pisa was built"
"How's it hangin'?"
"How was the world created?"
"Alternate Citations Needed"
"Adventure time spoof"
"Loving the slime"
"This is one of the most disturbing images I have seen in a long time...."
"Don't distract Betty White"
"Pwnd"
"Bambi meets Godzilla [gif]"
"belongs here"
"When you can't face-palm"
"Oompa Loompa"
"this kid will someday get revenge."
"Alfred Hitchcock directing the MGM Roaring Lion."
"&quot;And what would you like your cake to say?&quot;"
"Found this in my schools bathroom."
"Found this in my schools bathroom."
"Scooby Don't"
"After many years in the business you learn a few things."
"If someone asks me what I do all day at work  I show them this helpful infographic."
"How I felt as a Windows Vista user"
"losing an argument on facebook."
"How I feel realizing I missed my cake day"
"Me vs. The front page!!"
"trying to win an argument on youtube with logic"
"/r/buddism  /r/cats  or /r/funny. You decide!"
"/r/buddhism  /r/cats  or /r/funny. You decide!"
"That was Zen..."
"It's my Reddit Birthday  so here's a handy three-pack of spiky cuteness!"
"See No Evil  Speak No Evil  Enjoy the evil?"
"Baby Hedgehogs"
"i googled cuteness and got this"
"A baby Hedgehog is a Piglet or Pup"
"Just want to make sure you know this exists (xpost from r/sloths)"
"Stranger danger"
"I will fulfill these personal demands of mine if I'm furloughed Monday."
"Anti Prohibition march  1920's/30's [1440x902]"
"Whenever the keg runs out"
"How I feel after waking up at 7am on Thursday."
"Prohibition March 1920's/30's. X-Post from r/Historyporn"
"Complete double standard... And I know you guys have experienced this."
"This was on the floor in my office's break room..."
"Crybaby Muhammad"
"What did one ocean say to the other?"
"baby elephant having the time of his life under a waterfall (sorry if this breaks the internet)"
"Chilling on a hot day..."
"[SPOILERS] The Dark Knight Rises  summed up in one gif"
"All I could think of at the end of The Dark Knight Rises (SPOILERS)"
"Every time I see a celebrity that I like do an AMA and it has over 1000 comments within half an hour"
"When my guy friend told me he was reading 50 Shades of Gray..."
"This frustrates me beyond belief"
"When the teacher is coming towards me when I have my phone out."
"Marina Bay Sands Hotel in Singapore  the coolest swimming pool in the entire world!"
"-.-"
"This movie just screams &quot;What the fuck?!!?&quot;"
"How i feel when I find an onion ring in my fries [FIXED]"
"How I am treated as a girl on Reddit"
"An overwhelmingly cute bundle of warmth"
"When it's time to get shit done..."
"Fuck the world  I am a panda."
"Amazing statue of an underwater jesus in the Maltese."
"It'sa Meeeee  Money-o"
"It's-a me  George!"
"Greatest defaced dollar bill  ever."
"Abstinence"
"What I think when looking at r/gonewild"
"How I feel after click all of the blue links in all of the major subreddits  and returning to the front page to find half of them are new blue links."
"Me watching LOST."
"My girl poked me today..."
"So Helicopter Showdown just posted this on facebook."
"Tyler's New Pickup Line"
"How you get a guy to wash his hands"
"Kids  this is the story of How I Met Your Mother"
"The Prestige"
"Not sure if..."
"Wolverine... Or Batman?"
"One of my favorite images in honor of cakeday celebration."
"Meanwhile  in America..."
"I need to try this."
"My mom came to yell at me  but broke down laughing"
"Goblin Shark - The stuff nightmares are made of"
"So much win!"
"Nope."
"Found this account logged on to a computer. Here is a picture of a cow."
"To the full Prot4 guy that killed me then killed himself with ender pearls."
"Being an Australian redditor"
"This happens when only I buy popcorn in cinema"
"how it feels to offer snacks to my super hungry friends"
"Kitty's fantastic abs"
"Looks like the cat's not out of the bag."
"Soon."
"Oh  hi."
"Oh hi"
"I believe this belongs here"
"CATMAN"
"That is one ripped pussy."
"obligatory cake-day cat repost"
"Best cartoon role model!"
"Please tell me more about your new furniture"
"Plotting Your Death"
"Waiting for all that cakeday karma to roll in..."
"This is no ordinary elephant seal."
"This snow tunnel near the Mutnovsky Volcano in Russia is almost a kilometre long. These tunnels form under the snow fields in deep ravines at the end of the summer thaw. Photo Credit: Michael Zelensky"
"Snow tunnel near the Mutnovsky volcano in Russia"
"Just Mark Twain and a shoulder kitten"
"&quot;When a man loves cats  I am his friend and comrade without further introduction&quot; - Mark Twain"
"“When a man loves cats  I am his friend and comrade without further introduction” - Mark Twain"
"The wrath of nature. Satellite photo of Michigan in the winter."
"Lake Effect Snow"
"Awesome Cougars!"
"Just a puppy riding a car... as usual."
"Arch Enemies"
"Every android user when hearing about the iphone 5"
"When a typo destroys my entire argumant"
"When I get home and realize I've been walking around with my backpack open all day"
"Our PresidENT"
"Our PresidENT"
"How I feel at job interviews"
"wait..."
"Im just glad im normal"
"How to wash a cat"
"How to successfully clean a cat."
"Om nom nom"
"Just a man in bathtub with his ducks!"
"UK here - Thought I'd show off my collection. (Bit of a laugh  sorry!)"
"War Birds over New York"
"Phuket"
"Meanwhile  in Australia..."
"Yet another example of horrible  horrible parenting by gays. (it's a sarcastic title  relax!)"
"What happens when you make a &quot;pedo joke&quot; and a Mod is (literally) butthurt about it."
"How I feel administrating my server with kids..."
"I found this as a mods signature on another forum."
"Coolest watermelon I've ever seen"
"Best watermelon I've ever seen!! (lol)"
"One of the coolest melon sculptures I've ever seen!"
"Those EYES"
"Dead Jew Child"
"Dora scares me.."
"Wacky Waving Inflatable Arm Flailing Tube Men"
"Young Obama supporter has an emotional reaction upon meeting the Vice President"
"Father-Son Love"
"Demon Bill Cosby performing his dark magics"
"Edward munch spins me right round"
"brings new meaning to the painting"
"Endeavour  left  and Atlantis  right facing each other one last time."
"The world's most expensive game of chicken."
"Now kiss!"
"Shuttles Come Nose-to-Nose"
"Surreal Beach"
"Surreal Beach"
"Just absolutely love everything about this picture"
"Beach at sunset with fisheye effect. [1920 x 1200]"
"People who hate reposts also hate..."
"Reposts: why you shouldn't hate them."
"Uhm. What?"
"mfw people tell me alcohol is less dangerous than trees."
"My reaction to getting karma."
"When you overhear a conversation and you hear your name."
"When you overhear someone mention your name"
"Kaboom."
"Airburst"
"For my cakeday  have a litter of golden puppies!"
"So this is how it goes..."
"BREAKING: North Korea Launches Missile"
"BREAKING: North Korea Launches Missile"
"North korean rocket launch"
"Meanwhile in Japan"
"Look who I ran into today!"
"Beans was always my favorite."
"This picture was taken this morning  the sign said 'spine' yesterday. ಠ_ಠ"
"Searched &quot;wut&quot; on google  found this"
"Sofia Vergara gives good banana"
"He made it!"
"Whatcha doin in there?.......Guys?"
"Favorite gif on the internet."
"Money talks (xpost)"
"Showed up on FB feed."
"Be this guy."
"Be this gu -- OH NO"
"sometimes you just feel like dancing"
"Oh Look  it's Skyrim!"
"Day 30"
"got this from facebook"
"Camouflage"
"This is how I feel when my girlfriend introduces me to some of her guy friends..."
"This popped up on my news feed titled &quot;CANADA H-E-DOUBLE HOCKEY STICKS YEAH!!&quot;"
"Baked potato?"
"AMERICA FUCK YEAH!"
"Every time I think of something brilliant and post it on reddit but it doesn't make the front page"
"The beginning is near"
"The beginning is near"
"First rule of deer fight club  don't talk about deer fight club."
"Dr"
"For a less traditional holiday greeting"
"This is the card I'll be sending all of my relatives this Christmas"
"I think I found the holiday cards I'll be sending out this year"
"Searched &quot;freaky card&quot; in Google Images and found this."
"My friend just texted me this. WTF."
"I don't even know..."
"Smart girls and redditors have so much in common!"
"Hi Reddit  I've FINALLY finished this pixel art thingy that I started over a year ago. Hope you enjoy it!"
"Science Fail followed by Science Win"
"How dare you infect my Facebook with logic!"
"Quality snow sculpture"
"Best ice sculpture I have ever seen! Firefighter."
"Say no to racism !"
"Rooks can do that too!"
"Pawn attempting to touch every square on a chess board"
"Queens can do that too"
"&quot;Rooks can Do that Too!&quot;"
"Pawns can do that too!"
"But A King Does It The Best!"
"You underestimate a King's capabilities."
"Gettysburg Distress!"
"Hardcore Gamers! Nintendo's BACK! (gif it a sec)"
"Nintendo's Comeback"
"Mob Justice NSFW"
"Help a brother out!"
"Oh my potato"
"What A Wookie..."
"googled &quot;jew&quot; was not disapointed"
"Jewbacca"
"For you Dream Theater fans out there..."
"I was 9 years old when this game came out  and I remember countless hours with my dad doing nothing but playing it over and over"
"If you're blue  and you don't know where to go to  why don't you go where fashion sits..."
"Giving a blow job to an invisible man. ( Coughing )"
"RUN!"
"This is your captain speaking"
"I appreciate his honesty."
"Just chillin"
"Out my car window. He's just chillin'."
"Looked Out The Car Window To See This..."
"4chan"
"What kind of sick person does this..."
"Me as Big Bird for Halloween last year. I'm wearing 4 inch heels so this is really a big-ass bird."
"Larry was the only one in the community that had a beef with little kids"
"The Bucket Wheel Excavator - the largest man-made machine ever built"
"How to hail a Pedestrian"
"The perfect comeback"
"One of the best Spongebob moments."
"Evidence?... What Evidence?"
"Disposing of the evidence"
"Hide the evidence. (Found on r/wtf)."
"Tampering with evidence."
"Cookie monster likes drugs."
"Just an owl wearing oversized glasses. What of it?"
"The Top Hat Changes Everything"
"Rawr! I'm a dinosaur!"
"Some sizzle for your young Derp!"
"Dress for the job you want  not the job you have."
"Engagement photo"
"Old King"
"About cultures"
"The life"
"Haha"
"Every redditer's childhood dream"
"I wouldn't want to be in that water during and earthquake"
"This guy is seriously out standing in his field."
"I don't even want to know whats going on here"
"Foot bath (slightly nsfw)"
"Milk &amp; Nazzi"
"Seriously  wtf?"
"Just the usual Nazi-Breastmilk-Footbath"
"Best picture on the internet!"
"The best picture on the internet! r/funny really didn't find this funny at all."
"Looks like someone's a big fan"
"Some ladies do not prefer a normal milk bath."
"Don't make that face  it'll get stuck like that."
"Mitt Romney decides to reach out to gay voters..."
"Whats the internal temperature of a Tauntaun?"
"Will Smith's ears did always strike me as big..."
"Is that you Will Smith?"
"Surfin' dog"
"How I feel when the punchline is in the title of a r/funny post"
"My Neighbor Jake by J.J. Harrison of BAMPOP!"
"Apple's next major operating system"
"Admit it its true"
"How I felt after unsubscribing from r/atheism"
"How I felt after deleting the &quot;School&quot; tab on my browser after 7 years of college..."
"How I felt after deleting the &quot;School&quot; tab on my browser after 7 years of college..."
"Why can't I stop laughing at this?"
"House by the Water"
"House by the water? Yes  please."
"How I feel as a Canadian..."
"&quot;How I feel as a Canadian&quot; cross-post from r/funny (actor Kit Harrington from Game of Thrones)"
"Someone give this man an Oscar."
"Lag"
"Overanalysis"
"I wish i had a relationship like this."
"London  1949"
"London - 1949"
"Cop made OP ruin computer."
"You're bringing back...the memories."
"Ive seen some serious shit man! [gif]"
"PTSD"
"Looking back at finals now that they are over... (old gif  you've been warned)"
"I remember Vietnom..."
"I've seen some shit"
"Thousand yard stare..."
"Cupcake dog has some flashbacks"
"PTSD Dog's flashbacks get intense."
"I've seen things man"
"Is this what goddites believe?"
"This is what I think when I see people using the &quot;:O&quot; emoticon"
"My free time in elementary school (Fixed)"
"What do you mean I forgot it's my cake day??"
"Me in the passenger seat when my wife is merging onto the freeway"
"Getting ready for bed and my roomate asks about the slenderman story"
"When I forget the &quot;/gay&quot; off of &quot;pornhub.com&quot;"
"That moment when you find a tick on yourself  then lose it"
"When I accidentally press shift + X in /r/Pics or /r/Gifs with RES"
"When I walk into a bathroom stall right after someone..."
"I just accidentally clicked a N SFW link to Playboy in work...."
"He's back...and this time he means business"
"The Second Coming Aug. 2  1934"
"Jesus is back for some revenge."
"Here we see a priest blessing guns for the army. Ironic people of the Philippines are Ironic."
"Eric the rescue pig has a new best friend."
"You Are being Monitored"
"Well Hi!"
"Put on DoYaThing by Gorillaz and watch this gif... can't...look...away..."
"Here we go Will!"
"Baby Great Crested Tern in Sri Lanka"
"Giant octopus cake with hypnofrog eyes"
"Octopus Cake"
"Epic beard slap!"
"Because beards are awesome!"
"beard slap"
"C-C-C-COMBOBEARDER!"
"Beard Slap Magic"
"Beard Slap"
"If only"
"The Gibraltar Airport"
"You don't run red lights at Gibraltar airport"
"Gibraltar airport runway has a main road running straight across it."
"Possibly the cutest thing I have ever seen"
"How I feel when smokeing some one out for there first time (ever)"
"Most aww gif of all time?"
"Cuteness overload!"
"Just me at my job interview..."
"Self pwn"
"Wait a minute..."
"This isn't tuna.."
"ET phoned the wrong person..."
"It doesn't look much like either of them are enjoying themselves.. [NSFW]"
"ET cum home!!! NSFW"
"Underwater cave"
"R.I.P. Mitch Lucker  frontman of Suicide Silence."
"RIP Mitch Lucker. You will be GREATLY missed &lt;3"
"RIP Mitch Lucker"
"Anyone know where to get one of these?"
"Kat Williams is a Genius!!!!!"
"Attractiveness Scale"
"When a post has a link that says &quot;this file doesnt exist&quot;"
"Octopus in Italy"
"Octopus"
"Thought I saw him somewhere..."
"Wrong gym"
"Going to the wrong classroom for your final exam"
"Human  help me."
"Master Troll"
"spoiler alert!"
"Tulip farm in Holland"
"&quot;Holland&quot; (D:) is defragging: 10 hours remaining..."
"Friendly Stingray Photobomb"
"The photobomb to end all photobombs."
"Flamingos in an unusual pattern."
"Alien VS Predator."
"Hate it when you're in the shower and..."
"They asked me what I wanted to be when I grew up..."
"Surprise...........BOOOOOOOOOM!"
"I wish I could pull pranks like this at work"
"Best cat gif ever?"
"Jim gaffigan on camping."
"It's a tradition!"
"Kitty masseuse"
"Kitty giving a massage.. that is all."
"Midget Camel relay...is this a thing?"
"[NSFW] Can't get a good picture of your trophy poo in the bowl? No problem..."
"This post is literally shit!"
"Whoa...."
"My Cake Day? Where?"
"How I feel playing in my new softball league..."
"CAKE?!"
"WE WANT A 3rd!"
"Probably one of the most influential toys of my childhood"
"It's things like these that still make me blame my parents that I'm not Russian..."
"That'll be a story to tell the grandkids"
"I just gave this to my doctor"
"HIFW getting 10 FB-notifications because it's my birthday"
"a tree made out of logs"
"Coolest woodpile ..."
"Foo Psyters  anyone?"
"You know someone had to do this for them to put this sign up."
"What if you really saw this happening?"
"What about Norway? (IMG)"
"At an [8]  something as simple as this can really put things in perspective"
"We're so small"
"What if I robbed the Kwik-E-Mart? [gif edition]"
"What's in your closet?"
"trees on trees"
"When your phone rings on the toilet."
"Knew it"
"Jesus on Sinning"
"Some people don't get it"
"Jesus and Oreos"
"Jesus on Writing Bible Stories"
"He is feeling exactly how I would feel if this happened to me."
"This was a great plan  on paper."
"Tailwhip to roadkill."
"Apocalypse posts."
"You want to burrow in his beard"
"When my girlfriend begins drinking"
"My face after a girl makes eye contact with me after I catch her picking a wedgie"
"Me watching my facebook feed as the &quot;Happy Birthday's&quot; roll in"
"How I feel when I upvoted something from r/new and it makes the front page."
"When i see the person next to me start to smell my recent fart."
"When i see my brother next to me start to smell my recent tremendous fart"
"When I see Michelle Janneke warming up for a hurdle race"
"When my family and I are watching a movie and somebody asks if I farted"
"Oh yeah"
"Careful. You'll get Nye in your Eye."
"Baby KKK."
"Whale  whale  whale."
"Patches suddenly realized that he had made a terrible mistake"
"Go ahead  son. Give yo' Mama a goodnight kiss."
"Can someone tell me whats growing under her chin?"
"Feeling turned on yet?"
"Yum!?!"
"When I &quot;die&quot; I won't be going to Heaven  I might even still be alive  just in a less orderly fashion..."
"Rainbow of the Wasteland"
"I wonder what flavours these all are?"
"you would think one of them would learn to wear a rubber... or just not fuck. (X-Post from /r/imgoingtohellforthis)"
"Anyone up for some grilled pork rect...Wait  what?"
"Stocking up on..."
"How I feel when upvoting someone"
"How I feel giving an upvote"
"Whenever somebody kindly holds the door for me"
"Angry girlfriend"
"I hope he finds his way out of that."
"propane time"
"Propane Time"
"Adventure Time  I tell you what"
"Chocolate guy"
"Fine  I'm walking home."
"Fuck this shit!"
"Starting a 4Gb torrent with 2 seeders..."
"When you're about to go outside for a sesh and you hear the garage door open..."
"Karma Machine  return! Super effective."
"mommy i don't wanna be a pokemon."
"In response to the most British picture ever  I give you the most Chinese picture ever!"
"The most North Korean pic ever."
"After my 59yo boss mentioned he read the Obama ama (he's not a redditor)  I showed him a Spongebob meme about it  his response; &quot;ok... oh that's it?&quot;"
"Haters Gonna Hate"
"How I feel as an Apple user on Reddit..."
"Fancy (Raptor) Dress Party..."
"Holy shit... I think we're fucked."
"Crazy bitch"
"Do you even sift??"
"Somebody come get this Chinchilla."
"As a woman with PCOS participating in &quot;No-Shave November&quot; this is what I'm expecting..."
"I give you reddit  for my cake day  something you usualy upvote a lot  a cute hairy thing... (hope you say awww)"
"Cool color experiment"
"Colorful ants"
"Reddit in a nutshell"
"Reddit in a nutshell"
"THE best gif ever made."
"WHEN DOES IT END"
"Poot!"
"Stuck working very late and seeing coworkers post pictures of all the fun they're having."
"I See Your 8 Am Class  7 Am Work  4 Am Bakery and Raise you a 2:30 Am morning television Job..."
"When someone asks me if i'm still a virgin"
"He's watching"
"He's Watching"
"Was watching Speed 2 last night when i had to pause it."
"Willem Dafuq??"
"Are you going to eat that?"
"Whenever I see a girl with a nice ass"
"Not the baby"
"This is the first time I saw an albino turtle!"
"Am I the only one that misses these ? (90's kids will remember)"
"Do people honestly believe this blatant bull shit?"
"Satan's slave."
"On the ragged edge of the world I’ll roam  and the home of the wolf shall be my home. - Robert Service"
"A Classic prank"
"Fun for the whole family!"
"Fairly common thing to happen?"
"This is so F*cking adorable!"
"Should have parked between the lines"
"Aww man"
"hipster lama"
"Lake dive fail."
"Every one of my attempts for upvotes"
"YEAH! I'MA TRUCK! AW AW AWW SHIT..."
"Awww Yeeah"
"Oh Yeah"
"There are worse things to walk in on than your roommate masturbating."
"Heavy-weight bodybuilder busted sucking a huge dildo"
"Uhhh  I'll come back later... [NSFW probably]"
"Did anyone else have one of these? I miss mine..."
"You will never be this cool."
"Haters Gonna Hate"
"Haters Gonna Hate"
"Haters"
"Haters can't touch this comb over."
"My thought exactly..."
"Dear god I hope none of this is true"
"Whenever I go to the Beach"
"Meanwhile at Bauldersgate.com's servers..."
"Nuclear explosion"
"Nuke"
"What I imagine would happen to r/gaming if Half-Life 3's release date was announced."
"Run. Run fast. Don't look back and consider changing your number!"
"Run. Run fast. Don't look back and consider changing your number"
"Was not expecting that..."
"Watching Hot Fuzz on my Cake Day"
"Jesus was not a rapper. [FB]"
"Nowhere in the Bible does it say Jesus was not a rapper"
"Another day at the office"
"What do Carrie Bradshaw and Boba Fett have in common?"
"glad to see I'm not the only one who thought this when I saw the commercials"
"I'd burn my house down and start over..."
"nope"
"Juan Direction"
"Dear cancer."
"Twitter Reactions  wtf America?"
"So you know the poster for the fake Walt Disney biopic starring Ryan Gosling. Did you know all the other biopic poster its designer  Pascal Witazeck  did?"
"Pig Lips"
"Pinky"
"Flirting with Miss Piggy"
"Decoding text lingo!"
"Russian bear hunting armor from the 19th century."
"Parents bought me a chastity suit for my 19 birthday [FIXED]"
"It's shit like this  tourists [pic]"
"Fucking tourists"
"Probably one of my favorite gifs on the internet. Enjoy!"
"One day you'll thank us"
"I am a red panda and I will cute your face off."
"Baby red panda prepares to FIGHT!"
"Baby Red Panda Needs a Hug"
"Someone mentioned &quot;Spider Porn&quot; in the &quot;Fly Fucker&quot; thread  so I took the liberty of googling it to see for myself. [NSFW]"
"Spider Woman Blowjob (NSFW)"
"WTF  if you haven't seen the Spider Porn pictures yet  I apologize in advance. (NSFW  NSFeyes  Jesus just don't look at this.)"
"NOPE NOPE NOPE"
"Atheists in the real world - why nobody likes them (hint: because nothing is sacred to us!)"
"well..."
"We'll show those gnomes what' up!"
"Star Wars meets Reddit"
"And this  my friends  is why you should never talk on the phone in the bathroom"
"Uhh..."
"4Chan at its best  one of the funniest laugh out loud stories I have ever found on the interwebs. Long read but worth it"
"After a considerable amount of paperwork..."
"I laughed so hard  I think I cried."
"this is no doubt a repost  but a repost that needs to be reread  while poopin'"
"Boom"
"THIS MY SHOW NOW  BITCH."
"i think it's time to faaa... AHHH WHAT THE FUCK!"
"How I feel when a girl says she just wants to be friends after we slept together"
"Fall!"
"I won't sneeze"
"Lonely"
"Forever Alone Pup"
"Forever Alone Puppy"
"Free sex (SFW)"
"Groceries"
"I'm a grill..."
"Boy or Grill?"
"The latest 4chan meetup"
"Been thinking about a title for this for 10 minutes.... any thoughts r/WTF?"
"As if this story couldn't get any sadder"
"Stay Cool"
"That awkward moment when you hear two people having very intense sex in the shower &quot;discretely&quot; and you hear a female voice scream &quot;Put it in the other hole!&quot;....College life...."
"That one guy who upvoted me in a sea of downvotes"
"How I feel watching the GOP nonsense lately."
"When MY girlfriend randomly asks if I want to have sex"
"Whenever I post to /r/Advice Animals"
"Seal with it"
"Dont Be a Pussy"
"Only five cents?! I'll have two!"
"Something about this reminds me of my ex..."
"No thank you  Zuul."
"Enjoy your nightmares."
"What's sleep?"
"Every day she waits for him...and they go for a walk."
"Promise me you'll do something great."
"I think god is talking to me"
"Dad vs the mole  rounds one and two. Update!"
"The classic dog on a roof scenario."
"Whenever I'm trying to cheer someone up."
"Karma machine"
"Reddit hypnosis test"
"Reddit described in a single picture [NSFW]"
"the top thing I look for when picking out a new cat"
"the thing i look for when purchasing a cat"
"What a creep..."
"Just browsing the internet...and  WHY?!"
"Here's Jimmy"
"Every time the bathroom door is closed."
"Knock knock..."
"Stared at this for far too long and now I'm scared to go to bed."
"Taking pics is serious business"
"I cringed so bad"
"So much spaghetti they gave him an upgrade!"
"BFM"
"Found this on a funny pictures app."
"IAmA a person who could win any battle. Anytime. Any place."
"Haggis Wong - The only Asian Ginger I have ever seen"
"Too much burritos"
"Mom catches me fapping! (NSFW)"
"This raised about a thousand questions for me"
"Meanwhile  in India..."
"Meanwhile in India..."
"Me after trying to change my tire for an hour..."
"Dog  i received your message. hang tight  I'm on my way."
"Just a dog making a living."
"What the fuck is going on here"
"I laugh every time I see this"
"I have finally found a gif to sum up my entire life in three seconds."
"hahaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAHAAHAHAHAHHHHH"
"I don't even... (x-post from /r/fithworldpics)"
"Gettin' food like a boss."
"Gettin' food like a boss.(X-post from r/gifs)"
"Alright  who turned on the lizard magnet?"
"When someone says &quot;free food&quot; on campus"
"Look into my eyes!"
"Cute: Why is tiger bread c\alled tiger bread…?"
"A Not so Scary Slenderman"
"Coca-Cola Christmas"
"Meanwhile In Australia [Fixed]"
"Boom"
"Tank Muzzle-flash (dont' know the model of the tank  sorry) [1624x1183]"
"How I feel when I get a lot of up votes"
"Tried to find a job in California for 3 years  with no results. Left everything behind and moved to Fargo  ND 2 weeks ago. Just got hired today."
"Well  Samsung Canada has won me over."
"Heterochromatic kitty!"
"Artic Fox Pup [x-post /r/aww]"
"Finally! [Fb]"
"Unbelievingly big mutant grasshopper."
"This one gets me every time."
"Connect One"
"Connect one. Brilliance"
"I hope this trends..."
"Lacoste shirt: seems legit."
"low cost-lacoste"
"Brother from another Mother"
"Come on you guys! Stop being so mean!"
"Found this today"
"how i feel after a week on google plus."
"when your Reddit submission gets no attention"
"When all my friends are hanging out with their other friends."
"All By Myself"
"Just shopping for some groceries..."
"Parents in a Half Shell"
"This my just be my opinion but i see people make this mistake too often with those &quot;cool&quot; fedoras"
"Oh  Workaholics  you give unfunny people like me some great pickup lines."
"Holy Bread!"
"Finally! Now I can pee all over the floor too."
"Disabled dog"
"oh my god i love leaves!!!!"
"I wish this was my dog."
"I FUCKING LOVE LEAVES!!!"
"That's too bad"
"That is knot supposed to happen"
"When my girlfriend and friends are arguing and they want me to pick a side"
"This photo seemed to be made for Reddit"
"Cakeday. I googled &quot;The happiest picture in the world&quot; to cheer myself up after this week."
"Like boobs? Like cats? Like cats that like boobs!"
"Found you  ya bastard!"
"I think I found my new career path."
"She should have her own stand. There's always money in that..."
"A goddess among mere mortals"
"My school t-shirt is pink  what the hell mom?!"
"Bubble-gum"
"x-post from /r/funny"
"Louis Armstrong plays for his wife in front of the Sphinx by the pyramids in Giza  1961"
"Louis Armstrong plays for his wife in front of the Sphinx by the pyramids in Giza  1961"
"Special infected! [X-post from /r/funny]"
"A couple of badasses from back in the day."
"When someone takes food off my plate"
"When Someone Says 9gag is Better Than Reddit"
"My reaction to seeing Clint Eastwood at the Republican National Convention"
"When someone takes my seat at a party while I go get food."
"When I overheard someone say Resident Evil 6 was better than 4."
"Father  son  and... elephant. Bonding."
"Google image searched Tom Selleck for super legit work reasons. These popped up on page one..."
"Exponential Mustache. Don't know who made it."
"Yeeeee-up!"
"Found this gem of a wallpaper recently  thought /r/atheism might enjoy."
"Come inside"
"If you don't want to date me . . ."
"So much wisdom."
"My favorite quote. I use it all the time."
"Whenever i'm lacking inspiration i read this amazing quote."
"I think these clouds will impress you. (Fixed)"
"Captain Jack Sparrow"
"#NIGEL2012"
"Ants drinking colored water"
"Whenever I win an argument against multiple people."
"Here. The pinnacle of Misty cosplay. Now we can stop."
"Is this how karma works?"
"This is always awkward when you share an office"
"Ridiculously Photogenic Guy  you say?"
"It's funny because this is old and will still make front page."
"The truth!"
"welcome to Oakland"
"Oh  hey mom"
"Albert Einstein said it first."
"Cat sex"
"have i given the ultimate gift or ruined a man?"
"14..."
"I hate 16 year olds"
"Pigeon? I hope you don't mind if I do  om nom nom"
"Party hard Pelican"
"Getting over 1000 upvotes on a post."
"How I feel watching my karma rise from recent submission."
"Railroad after earthquake"
"Nailed it."
"When extreme isn’t extreme enough."
"Hot Mountain Biker"
"Hey there  Delilah... (NSFW text)"
"My Glasses and Mustache Are Not &quot;Ironic&quot;"
"I named my penis"
"I Named My Penis"
"My reaction to all the weight loss success story posts"
"A pizza"
"Personally  I love them."
"Black liquorice"
"Don't make him angry."
"Samuel L. Sharkson"
"Samuel L. Shark"
"JAWSon"
"Karate vs Ballet"
"Ballet vs Karate"
"A kick to the...."
"Apparently this bridge would work (X-post /r/Engineering)"
"SPOT ME BRO"
"I guess you don't need this medicine then..."
"Gravity is on our side"
"Get dressed  we need to go to the... nevermind  let's stay here"
"can someone reverse this please? slightly NSFW"
"They sure are bouncy"
"Nicolas Cage as every character in all the Star Wars films. Yes  even Chewie."
"I searched 'haters gonna hate' in Google Images and this was the first result"
"This guy is just awesome."
"Compiled quite a few gifs for my cake day"
"Firepit"
"Your move  Atheists."
"Your Move Atheists (xpost r/funny)"
"Lahey on drinking ..."
"Does it look like i care?"
"I am the liquor!"
"I made this drunk as fuck."
"Perfect Timing"
"Is this all about timing or just a plain coincidence?"
"Gas Prices in the 90's"
"Remembering the 90's."
"For you youngsters... No  this is not photoshopped"
"Living on a college campus  I see a lot of people use this bad boy."
"I must remember this..."
"Bus in a ball of flames"
"One wrong turn in Detroit and I find this..."
"BEEP BEEP MOTHERFUCKER"
"Bitch  I'm a FIRE BUS"
"Atheism is truly wonderful!!!"
"I'm terrible with these kits"
"Tattoo awesomeness!"
"Well that's an interesting speed limit"
"Most of you won't find it funny and it's really okay because most of you are stupid"
"Decisions on catnip.."
"This may be old  but it's still one of the best gifs ever."
"positive thinking"
"Because alcohol teaches us to be better husbands"
"Advertising definitely used to be more entertaining...."
"Look out Australia  Pedobear has arrived"
"I heard MC Hammer is coming out with a search engine. I think it should use this"
"It's the end of the world as we know it!"
"So I was stmbling around the internet..."
"A random kid texts me... hilarity ensues."
"Probably the best random text conversation ever."
"Checkmate  Medusa."
"This is your cat on dubstep"
"Xenon Cat"
"Here's my favorite gif for my cake day."
"A kid and his super cute friend  a hedgehog!"
"If Breaking Bad and Street Fighter had a baby."
"Pow! Right in my childhood!"
"FLUSH!"
"Bathrooms"
"Dr. Seuss lets gives us his views on anal sex (SFW)"
"Don't do it Pat"
"Periodic Table of the Elements"
"The real Periodic Table (X-post r/Chemistry)"
"I just got iphOWNED."
"Peter Griffin plays Skyrim"
"FFFFFFFF....ahhhhhh...fffffff...ooohh"
"Every time someone falls during the EURO 2012 tournament..."
"How I Know Creationism is Bullshit [Fixed]"
"M31 Galaxy"
"I see your house  theater  and kitchen and raise you..."
"Maybe a repost  but definitely the cutest thing I have ever seen"
"Two tired little fellows"
"Cuteness defined"
"This is why I always have to think 5 seconds before pressing the X button"
"Why I always have to think before pressing the X button"
"Thor's Well (xpost from r/EarthPorn)"
"Damn Nature You Scary!"
"Saw &quot;Thor's Well&quot; picture on reddit. Went there. Did not disappoint."
"I AM REAL !11!1!!"
"Well  watcha gonna do about it  huh  huh?"
"Worm Guy"
"The Worm guy"
"That Neck."
"What I actually look like when smiling at a cute girl"
"Jehovah Witness Final Level"
"Poland  the night before"
"Having a fine snack."
"Nom nom nom nom!"
"Ravi motherfucking Drums"
"B!tch I'm fabulous"
"Damn I am fabulous"
"When peole complain about my posts being &quot;offensive&quot;"
"Me when I visit my friend in Canada"
"How I perceived Clint Eastwood's speech at the RNC"
"Oh  just a squirrel sheilding itself from the snow with its tail."
"just clicked on r/spacedicks for the first time"
"You'd think sports reporters weren't the kind of people that stare into your inner soul."
"I'm not sure what's wrong with Stan  but his brother Jeff can melt your soul."
"...and all you are is a thought."
"Sudden Clarity Clarence on acid."
"Goat WANTED in robbery"
"Even Black Magic isn't enough to escape the cops"
"Kitten snuggling a husky"
"Dis is my shnoz. I wub dis shnoz."
"Oh you. Take one."
"Reddit  on any post about Obama since the AMA"
"How I feel when I give an upvote to a comment with 0 karma."
"When I see a clever post"
"When I'm drunk and perusing Reddit."
"Whenever someone deserves a like"
"Walking dead issues.."
"I was wondering the same thing..."
"Oh nothing...just a cute atheist kitten laying down some logic like a boss."
"atheist cat"
"Rotating Tesseract"
"I could watch this .gif all day"
"Trolling on oldies"
"Get the forms of &quot;your&quot; right."
"The Avenger's inbred cousins."
"&quot;We have a Hulk.&quot;"
"Yo dawg I heard you like..."
"Oh God  yes please!"
"Your punishment must be more severe"
"Rocky Mountain Bane"
"You have my permission... to dance"
"Bane dancing to some Starfucker"
"After having sex for the first time."
"What Bane does in his free time."
"Teach me how to leave Gotham in Ashes"
"Uptown Top Dancing Bane"
"Master 1."
"Goes a'Bane Bane Bane"
"Bane Wupped Bat Man's ASS!"
"Bane knows the word"
"Dapper fox is dapper"
"Hello ladies!"
"Anyone remember this fellow?"
"The sexiest .gif ever. [SFW]"
"Who?"
"All true gamers experience this at a party!"
"Me when I go out"
"how ice cream is really made (nsfw)"
"Oh ok.."
"Mother Of God 0_o"
"Just Nicholas Cage as Andre the Giant."
"I don't know how Reddit feels about contemporary poetry  but Christian Bök is amazing (also check out his book &quot;Eunoia&quot; if you like this!)"
"A master of words."
"A fantastic anagram on the street. By Micah Lexier and Christian Bok."
"he looks familiar...."
"HALT! Hammerzeit."
"Every time I hear he was a bad person this just pop up in my head."
"This escalates quickly"
"Life can find a way to grow in the most unexpected places"
"Lava Tube Cave in Tulelake  California"
"Middle-Eastern Protesters in a Nutshell"
"Sweetness"
"Just in case there are people who haven't seen it yet.."
"If you do it like that then yo... told you."
"This is how NOT to shoot a gun..."
"Any redditors attempt at shooting a gun"
"Alien's Blood Waterfalls  Antarctica"
"After one year I can finally whore this little guy out for karma"
"Look at this gif for 10 seconds. Do you hear the sound it makes?"
"Everything I've done in my life has lead up to this moment."
"How I feel when I get only one upvote."
"watching spongebob after failing a driving test"
"How I feel when I upvote a post in the &quot;new&quot; section and the next day I see it on the front page."
"when I see someone else from my state while on a road trip"
"Whenever Word corrects my spelling mistakes for me..."
"i rodmbl bagadha"
"Super Mario World"
"Friend tried to spoil ending of Dark Knight Rises for me..."
"You merely adopted the cuteness!"
"My hands and feet get sweaty looking at this."
"It's ok because its been a year  right?"
"I'll never look at him the same way again..."
"Super Saiyan Hairstyle"
"Saw this on my FB feed. One of us in the making."
"My gay friend's thoughts for the people supporting Chick-fil-a"
"Ex-post from r/lgbt  Putting Things in Perspective"
"I thought this would go here  I could be wrong  but it's worth a read. Puts things in a different perspective  doesn't it?"
"A savior arrives."
"Just the world saying fuck you"
"If you see God  upvote. If you love Jesus  resubmit."
"A big 'Fuck You' from Mother Nature"
"How I feel when using the bus while high"
"This is all i could think of when I saw this GIF"
"Don't worry! I got this."
"i kind of want to do this."
"the coolest box boy ever"
"Domesticated silverback gorilla...amazing."
"Domesticated silverback gorilla (xpost from /r/funny)"
"The rare ski-booted silverback spotted in the wild."
"Domesticated silverback gorilla...amazing."
"My interpretation of the presidential debate last night [FIXED]"
"That'll teach him to pass out..."
"Instant hypnosis"
"Do a Backflip!"
"Do a Flip! (X-post from r/gifs)"
"EXACTLY what it's like watching your post try to make front page on reddit"
"&lt;fry&gt; You know  that dance wasn't as safe as they said it was."
"Conan O'Brien the zinger slinger"
"Thats one way of gaining male fans  Kim."
"Twitter really needs to do more about these spam accounts"
"Twitter really needs to do more to stop these spam accounts"
"There is probably a better way to say that Lebron.."
"I can't believe that Lance Armstrong did this..."
"Not a clever girl"
"What the...I don't even....why??"
"Wrestling little kids is so much easier"
"I have no idea what's going on here"
"Wrestling gone full retard"
"Could you understand the loneliness of a cat?"
"how my cat is chilin?"
"Wonder what it would feel like to hug this guy. (repost from funny)"
"Don't worry  when we get out we'll shit all over the house for this."
"My new years resolution was also to get ripped abs! Nailed it!"
"&quot;The universe...&quot; -xkcd (xpost)"
"&quot;The universe...&quot; -xkcd (xpost)"
"Planetary litter."
"If only this worked.."
"When I ask a girl on a date and she doesn't respond"
"Ghostbusters!"
"Zoe  the only captive golden Zebra known in existence"
"Time to dust off the holiday decorations"
"Terrifying."
"Found this in a school bathroom"
"Don't mess with me or my bunny"
"Hip hop"
"Just your normal everyday tree sex."
"WTF? That takes some talent! NSFW"
"And...SPIN! GO GO GO!"
"Wow"
"Fainted - Everything went better than expected!"
"Tell me what you see.. fooled me..."
"This is not a difficult concept."
"Not a difficult concept."
"Together through the good.. and the bad"
"Heard you guys like treacher collins syndrome."
"Art... At it's very finest."
"So I was a on Youtube.."
"Pedobear comments on YouTube..."
"Best product combination  ever."
"The only gift I'd ever want."
"Lady Gaga... Looks like she ate most of her MEAT dress..."
"Gaga looks gross in meat corset"
"Nananananana... [PIC]"
"NANANANANANANANANANANANANANANANANA"
"The Great Escape"
"YOU CAN'T ESCAPE (nsfw)"
"So much wtf...I don't know where to begin"
"Attack!"
"Attack!"
"You can't run..."
"Stealth hump."
"No idea."
"Life"
"The salesperson told me it's the game that all the kids want..."
"Offense prepares aerial attack."
"Piglet!"
"Australian army vehicle disappears"
"I have absolutely no sympathy for them"
"Ignorance is a choice."
"Show some respect."
"Probably the best wine label ever!"
"Have you seen this bird?"
"New York in 137 years"
"Wish you were here."
"Yes...this is a real tattoo"
"Tattoos not 2 get"
"4chan's good deed for the year."
"Carpet stains? Not a problem!"
"Shove that K up your ass."
"The devil is in the details [500x330]"
"Try explaining yourself out of this one Disney."
"Morning!"
"Soft kitty  warm kitty  little ball of fur..."
"Why was six afraid of seven?"
"2011"
"saw this on Facebook. thought you guys might like"
"part of body  say it !"
"Book of Color"
"Book containing every color."
"I am upset that Furbys came back but not these."
"Currency when I was in elementary school [fixed]"
"Currency when I was in elementary school [FIXED]"
"The best kind of gentleman"
"Like a sir"
"Who else would pay money to see this game get a reboot?"
"My favorite game back then"
"Why doesn't r/aww have Baby Elephants? [FIXED]"
"d'awww"
"'MERICA"
"oops"
"Listening to a rich friend talk about their awesome vacation"
"How a lot of people feel on 4/20"
"why is oscar such a grouch?"
"I find this oddly inspirational."
"A baby hippo playing in the water with its mom."
"Seriously distracting."
"Really google?THIS is what you give me for &quot;sheep&quot;?"
"So I googled &quot;dog whore&quot;..."
"Ghandi dancing with some chick. (one of my favorite photos ever)"
"Was yesterday in the new Batman. Everytime someone came in in the middle of the movie."
"Old  drunk  legendary WWII orator... When he was 19."
"&quot;A fanatic is one who...&quot; -Winston Churchill (988x1280)"
"Hugh Laurie and Stephen Fry play chess in Fry’s rooms at Cambridge  1980."
"How I Feel as a Grown Up on the Carousel"
"Smashing."
"Possibly my faborite Nigel .gif ever"
"Cat laughs amused"
"I saw this on somebodies facebook. They are using this for them now. *facepalm*"
"i was so close"
"Just an average day at the park..."
"I have no comment other than that this is pure joy"
"???? profit"
"Black Ops 2 - Some revolutionary stuff going on there."
"I see your &quot;cat whore&quot; and raise you a &quot;horse whore&quot;."
"little hands Mitt"
"ABS braking Explained."
"ABS braking explained."
"Back To School ?!?!?"
"So... im just gonna set this here... (gif)"
"Premature Ejaculation"
"Weirdest Boner"
"This kid has style"
"Rockin' it"
"Earlier today  my friend asked me what part of the new testament i found unrealistic. My response:"
"My 10y/o brothers face when I explained that youtube doesn't show nudity so that's why he couldn't find &quot;boobies&quot;"
"Brand names are expensive... Seems legit."
"Seems legit"
"I went to 4chan for the first time..."
"I am driven by two main philosophies..."
"NdGT right to the point."
"Happy birthday you magnificent bastard!"
"Now THAT's a good Cosplay."
"Wow..."
"Catch me!"
"Nothing to do here"
"This kid had it goin' on"
"Looking for a new pair of sunglasses for my trip to Europe. How do these look?"
"it will be like this forever"
"Dear America  much love  Australia[FIXED]"
"Dear America  much love  Australia [Fixed]"
"Dear America  much love  Australia [FIXED]"
"First WTF I ever saw on the internet. NSFW"
"iPhone10"
"iPhone 10"
"Iphone 10"
"Just pre-ordered it."
"Iphone 10"
"iPhone 10"
"And then Apple decided to sue Skyscrapers and Dildos."
"I'll hold off on buying the iPhone 5 until this is available"
"iPhone 10"
"How I feel when I find out I share my cake day with Kirk Cameron..."
"That's a lot of tossed salad!"
"They probably could have worded this headline a little differently."
"Don't lie  newspaper editor  you knew EXACTLY what you were doing."
"/r/pics doesn't have much of a sense of humor."
"Potentially Tragic."
"Found this gem in the paper today."
"I hope they get more in their redundancy package"
"Time to do Wakey wakey to master."
"Self-deprecating sense of humor"
"Tulip fields in the Netherlands"
"This was run in my school newspaper and has caused quite an outcry from students"
"This comic made it into my University's Newspaper somehow. The school was outraged  I thought it was funny..."
"I think he was on a break..."
"If you give a mouse a cookie...."
"All the karma!"
"So fucking badass that it hurts."
"Agressive Reddit Couple."
"Warning!!!!! Sexy Overload!!"
"Tahitian Perfection"
"Sun  water  wave  surf. Oh and a rainbow. This gorgeous photograph by Zak Noyle was the winner of Surfer Magazine’s ‘photo of the year’ and it’s easy to see why."
"The Energy of Life"
"How Grumpy Cat feels about being all over reddit lately."
"A kid's WTF moment."
"I think I found my Halloween costume for this year"
"Mind = Blown."
".....I never knew"
"imgur: the simple image sharer"
"No Mr. Bond I expect you to die!"
"Bestcatgif.gif"
"MFW I'm too slow to ALT+TAB out of a porn page"
"I've been...expecting you..."
"Hello Mr Bond. I have been expecting you."
"Into your soul."
"SO DRAMATIC."
"Official Poster for Israels Holocaust Remembrance Day"
"Have some hope"
"And people say penguins are flightless birds."
"Wheeeee- SMACK."
"I have never had Nutella  tell me  is this accurate?"
"My link karma is almost as high as my comment karma. This is how I'm feeling."
"I'll just take this."
"Ewok Puppies: I'll just leave this here."
"How I feel trying to get to the front page"
"Enjoying that ice cream?"
"Nipples"
"When you hit max level  you stop leveling up"
"When you reach maximum level  you stop levelling..."
"I see what you did there.."
"He's Got Stars in His Eyes..."
"How I feel [every damn time] after I get off reddit"
"Who else remembers this crazy movie?"
"What I want to do to those who say YOLO."
"Billy Mays maize maze"
"How I feel each time someone steals a post"
"Racing Scooters on the Roof"
"Incredible rooftop test track in Turin  Italy."
"Minecraft-Slendy crossover"
"really cannot handle this cuteness!"
"I hear Reddit loves Emma Watson..."
"Sleep positions may determine your personality? whaaa?"
"Sometimes you wake up on the wrong bed"
"This was on my newsfeed  I thought it would be appreciated here."
"They must be married."
"I think they're confused..."
"Who need swag when you're the great cornholio"
"Who needs swag when..."
"The comment threads when a attractive woman posts on reddit."
"wtf"
"Faces"
"E Pluribus Unum"
"Your brain is not ready for this [GIF]"
"Laserflies"
"So I was looking for lizard puns..."
"I was looking for lizard puns..."
"Poor Giraffe"
"Every day I'm..."
"Every day I'm..."
"Billiard Champion!"
"Fuck Yeah!"
"Not a single fuck was given that day.."
"Well  I'm convinced."
"Sweet baby Jesus!"
"Wal-Mart employee's continue to amaze me."
"You can't fix stupid."
"Best protection ever"
"In a safe place"
"Ostrich made of human arms pulling a carriage...."
"Just trying to beat this heat..."
"puppy is tired of this blazing Texas heat"
"When people try to draw on me at a party."
"my bank account had $0.14 ... today i got paid"
"Some men just want to watch the world burn"
"Saw this in R/funny but this is its true home"
"Fuck you."
"I eat how I want."
"Because fuck crust"
"My favorite piece  you think my co-workers will be mad?"
"Every 5 minutes  there's a new one..."
"The Assassination of JFK. (Alternate View)"
"Cats in zero gravity."
"What?"
"Human Baby...that is all."
"How can I tell if my son is gay?"
"Today  my internet went down"
"The outside world"
"In the spirit of Dark Knight"
"Hey guys"
"So cute!"
"The Redditor's Sweater."
"Corgi farts"
"wut."
"lulz were had..."
"Listen up  disciples!"
"Your move  captcha..."
"Your move  reCaptcha."
"50 Link Karma"
"This is how I browse r/funny"
"Hey I didn't touch it!"
"Woah  we gotta badass over here!"
"How I feel about all the lemon posts"
"How my cakeday posts have gone so far."
"How I see people posting caps of their own Facebook statuses"
"How I imagine it feels to buy yourself Reddit Gold"
"Upvoting the one person who replied to my post"
"My wife when she lays down a &quot;wicked burn&quot; on me during an argument:"
"So I decided to delete my Facebook."
"How I feel when I like one of my own posts on Facebook"
"When none of your friends see your successful post."
"The Staff Meeting"
"So this really happened..."
"Pfronten  Germany"
"The Bro Couch - I prefer being on top  personally..."
"I would never complain about sleeping on the couch again"
"fapfapfapflap"
"How cute is this?"
"What I think whenever someone does (: instead of"
"Emoticons go this way"
"I wish my face was like this so I could sleep with the covers over my eyes and still breathe"
"This poor lost lumberjack can't get a break."
"This man has some balls"
"Amazing Insults by Great People"
"Hai.. W-Whatchew got there.."
"How I felt after learning potential new GF is a fellow redditor"
"Finally figured out who Shitty_Watercolour is!"
"That Guy Has Some Nice Tits!"
"My Favourite Band posted this picture  Couldn't help but laugh."
"Dude's got some tig ol bitties"
"If you haven't played this game. I suggest you do so."
"My #1 rental game.. Would be a great app!"
"Ladies and Gents  Jason Segel"
"Natural selection"
"DJ Jesus"
"DJ Jesus"
"One of many"
"Oh you know  just a corgi puppy sleeping on it's face."
"Corgi sleeping on its face. (x-post from r/pics)"
"Women don't handle beer very well."
"imgur: the simple image sharer"
"Perfect Timing."
"I hear reposts are the best way to get karma  so here's a repost of a repost that is inching it's way to the front!"
"Seems legit"
"The original (and favorite) D-bag to use swag"
"uhm...im a bit confused."
"Jimmy John's is getting a bit aggressive with their advertising"
"Fuck tree"
"My cat really likes water."
"Redditor makes their cat dehydrated then puts the cat in sink and turns water on to drown it. Just for the precious karma."
"Trying to make sacrilegious puns. Nailed it?"
"Kids  we have a new student"
"To do list..."
"Sunrise at the North Pole with the moon at its closest point."
"Sunrise at the North Pole"
"Well that is just an unfortunate name"
"How you know when you got a fat ass."
"Optical Illusion"
"Photograph  *not* a Painting (from National Geographic  story in comments)"
"This is 100% real photo. No editing done to it. (xpost from pics)"
"This picture is NOT graphically altered  It is 100% natural."
"This picture is NOT graphically altered  It is 100% natural. [x-pics. Totally asking for it..]"
"If the Steam Summer Sale was in a mall instead of online"
"This is the most beautiful thing I've seen..."
"Red crabs climbing over a purpose built overpass to cross a road on Christmas Island."
"HHHHRRRNNNGGG!"
"Rare pic of Cece Frey from The X Factor."
"Rare pic of Cece Frey from The X Factor"
"Rare pic of Cece Frey from The X Factor"
"*SIGH*"
"All of the disappointment.."
"Such a nerd..."
"What's E3?"
"What's E3?"
"How I feel having nothing to post on my cakeday"
"I died a little when I found this."
"The Beatles about to make history"
"&quot;I'm sorry  ma'am? Oh  we're just about to make some history. No big deal.&quot;"
"Old Mcdonald had a farm...."
"Ballon Rodent"
"Camouflage"
"Time for bed kitty (GIF)"
"Time for bed kitty. (x-post from r/funny)"
"What happens when I woke up on time and actually going to catch my first bus"
"I love the shit  now what? look on the cats face at the end"
"playtime is over... nap time now."
"So  yeah I found this."
"Meanwhile in a parallel universe."
"What if..."
"LOL"
"Just when you thought it was safe."
"Thai handicraft... Carved from a single piece of wood"
"Boo!"
"Polar bear on a broken-up ice floe north of Norway"
"U.S. President Barack Obama and first lady Michelle Obama react to the Queen's fly ass ride arriving at Winfield House in London..."
"A game about a game about a game."
"So  I googled 'little sister'..."
"Take my Money..Take it All!"
"World's smallest helicopter"
"liking a last post on FB before deactivating my account."
"Upvoting someone who reposts your ignored OC."
"So that's how you do it...."
"The Perfect Setup"
"Not specific to atheism  but as an atheist I still found it very interesting."
"Someone corrects my spelling..."
"When people upvote a link with a celebrity they recognize"
"Whenever someone makes a good suggestion..."
"DOH!"
"I googled the definition of swag. Was not disappointed."
"How I imagine every Redditors cat"
"&quot;I searched 'Swag Cat' on google.&quot; FIXED"
"I'm doing it!"
"NOPE"
"Magic and Monocles."
"Just ordered this print for my living room"
"Star Wars - 150 yrs ago."
"Pokemon Snap for Wii U  that's what I want to see"
"not now  i must get to work"
"late  rushing to work in the morning"
"Almost as good as the old one"
"Me  except when I go to Best Buy."
"Not what they seem."
"Pretty much how I look when I dance after drinking"
"Just some cute-ass penguins... That is all"
"Let me play you the song of my people."
"Leave me alone."
"Leave me alone!"
"As a foreign exchange student  this is how I think American college students view Romney."
"Sieg Heil!"
"Welcome to the Internet"
"Welcome to the Internet"
"Googled &quot;i was not disappointed&quot;. Surprisingly  I was not disappointed."
"Googled &quot;awesome cat&quot;"
"The Phantom Tollbooth"
"Found on r/gifs. I thought you guys would like it as well [Phantom Tollbooth]"
"Yakety WHACKS"
"Phantom toll booth"
"How I imagine my 6'7'' friend at parties"
"Why I go to clubs"
"r/gaming 11/11/11..."
"Oh  Brazil..."
"I give up"
"Best punch ever"
"Searched for Funny Basketball face"
"And here is another pie chart."
"Japan"
"Move your Body"
"Batman and the gang sure know how to work it"
"I agree it's time to party"
"Upvoting dogs on r/Aww"
"I don't remember that episode... [gif]"
"God...? yes  I would like to report a glitch."
"How I imagine people who submit shitty links and stay at 1 upvote."
"A wise choice."
"You're not alone  young one... (xpost from r/funny)"
"It's so cute! and yet so ugly.. I give you the Aye-aye"
"where's me spinach?"
"Dropbears - A serious threat to all humanity"
"Meanwhile in Australia  a public service announcement"
"An important PSA for tourists considering visiting Australia"
"I Will Not Be Your Father!!"
"luke i will not be your father."
"Not one ounce of a fuck was given"
"I see your popcorn filled bathtub  and raise you a donut filled one"
"Can anyone explain this to me?"
"Virginity: Intact"
"I've tested them all.."
"When your hands are wet after going to the bathroom."
"Romanian child hands a heart-shaped balloon to riot police during protests against austerity measures in Bucharest."
"A Romanian child hands a heart-shaped balloon to riot police during protests against austerity measures in Bucharest. It is pictures like this that remind me of the fact that all is not lost."
"Thank you guys  the signal is better now !"
"I will never understand fashion."
"Ready to post !"
"Fashion"
"When sun becomes ring..."
"Mind=Fucked"
"Should you eat bacons?"
"THIS! IS! MINECRAAAAAFFTTT!"
"This photo remains the most wtf thing I've ever seen. I just want to know what's happening."
"dang that must have been some party!"
"Family..."
"It's not a party until dad takes his shorts off"
"How I feel after riding my bike to work for two weeks straight instead of driving..."
"HI YA!"
"Oh  Buttermilk!"
"I like kicking kids"
"This is the most beautiful cat I have ever seen"
"Ffffffffffffffffffff. That is all."
"Regal kitty"
"The sexiest picture of arguably the sexiest woman of all time."
"The Beautiful Print on her!"
"Mario Party (All of Them)"
"I lost so many friends to this game"
"So true  the game that ruins friendships"
"I will take your stars and everything you love."
"Crystal Cave - Iceland Ice Cave"
"Beautiful Ice Cave"
"If you do this  fuck you."
"Who DOES that?!"
"Everybody loves shower"
"monorail cat"
"The Cat Has Left The Station"
"Happy Birthday?"
"I need an adult."
"At least someone in the family knows this is weird..."
"Natural birth."
"This belongs here"
"I didn't realize home-births were considered a family bonding experience."
"Newborns are so beautiful"
"SFW cleavage"
"Problem solved."
"How to best make use of Builder's Bum!"
"How I feel like as the only single guy in my class (with 65 women)."
"How My Friends Get Laid"
"While watching the movie Watchmen..."
"When accidently open (m) links in gonewild"
"Trying to find something in a &quot;when you see it&quot; post. [FIXED]"
"After watching the first few episodes of Oz."
"Watching the screen during my wife's ultrasound"
"Get on ChatRoulette  not sure what I'm looking at...and then it hits me."
"Not a good start..."
"Ghost Rider cosplay gone wrong."
"A spoon full..."
"Some of my favorite atheism pics."
"When people say atheism is arrogant"
"Atheism: The Arrogant Belief..."
"Lol'd"
"Someone....didn't think this through....."
"The man likes his jazz"
"How do you get ready for a battle?"
"How I Imagine my girlfriend would react if I came on her face without warning... (SFW)"
"Thought this might belong here (xpost r/funny)"
"Solar Flare [gif]"
"Solar Flare"
"I see your 8am classes  post-grad work at 7am  bakery work at 4am.. and I raise you the graveyard shift in a Rehab facility(12am-8am)"
"I have now officially seen the guardian to the gates of my personal hell. [NSFW]"
"When I finally get to 3rd base"
"Old school saucy love (1920s)"
"Anti-Rape device? WTF?"
"We finally did it."
"Everyday."
"Nom nom nom nom nom... COME AT ME BRO!"
"Good God That Hits The Spot"
"When you run into an old friend at last call"
"Mt Roraima  Brasil......Astounding"
"Made yet another downvote gif"
"What it feels like downvoting reposts"
"Every time i post on Reddit this happens."
"How I imagine everyone who browses the new section (x-post from r/IASIP)"
"I do not get. Someone please 'splain."
"i got my mind on my money and my money on my mind"
"Sticky Notes VS. Cats"
"I can haz backin' up"
"Dat...AAAAAAAAAAAASSSSSSS!!!!!!!"
"I came out as an atheist to my grandparents today. They tried to convert me  and this is all that came to mind"
"It's that time folks!.."
"Would anyone else want to see an HD remake of this game? [FIXED]"
"I would literally crap myself."
"For my Cake Day  here's my cat gifs collection."
"What I think of when someone says the word reboot"
"Reboot needs a reboot"
"Spot on 4chan"
"No time to explain  Get in the car"
"Suddenly  horse."
"Whenever I stumble upon a highly disturbing small subreddit."
"I mustache."
"Hey you  yea you...."
"Girls used to show cleavage to impress guys. What happened"
"it's time you know the truth:you've been adopted..."
"My office has had the air conditioning out for the last week or so. As I heard it rumble to a start this morning  this is all I could think of..."
"You know she is craving for it (NSFW)"
"Not sure if awesome ... or even more awesome."
"Gay marriage in a nutshell"
"When my posts get five upvotes and just stop."
"I love Bill Nye  but Mr. Wizard was nearly blowing kids up before we even had color."
"Things you can only do with boys."
"Boys only"
"&quot;You're shakin' it all wrong!&quot; &quot;But shakin' it's all I know!&quot;"
"Flee the EARTH!"
"Flee ohio"
"GRIN!"
"Why is Bob Newhart on TV telling me that Mitt Romney killed his wife...?"
"Georgeous CityScape"
"&quot;I Want to be A Nurse...&quot;"
"Night photograph of my friend illuminating herself with an iphone."
"Eating Stormtroopers for breakfast"
"I proposed a solution to the wasp problem at our house. The wife is thinking about it  but the kids approve."
"When I want the joint back from the other side of the circle"
"Karma Whore First World Problem"
"And I thought Thanksgiving was supposed to be a happy holiday..."
"A problem I almost wish I had...almost"
"It's finally my turn!"
"No buns"
"I'm just gonna stay off &quot;social&quot; sites for a while"
"Legend of Zelda timeline. Pretty interesting"
"My high school life."
"Every High School essay I ever wrote.."
"'Tis the season..."
"Every time I see theists arguing...."
"How I view Redditors on r/politics"
"Dumbass dares = Best dares!"
"Tubship Troopers"
"The Toys Are Back... [NSFW]"
"Living in Cape Town (x-post from r/pics) (1200x797)"
"Ultimate WTF (NSFW)"
"An air bubble in a droplet of water in space"
"Surprise!!!"
"10 minutes after drinking from my quarter gallon coffee mug."
"Of course! It's all so clear now!"
"Fucking sucks x post r/nsfw_wtf"
"Boop"
"Pong"
"Tired of albino animals and bored of melanistic lions? heres a half albino peacock."
"peacock with selective albinism"
"OH  nothing much - just a tight rope walking goat with a tiny monkey on its back"
"Boom Boom Boom Boom"
"A true American badass"
"Fox News Throughout History"
"If FOX News had been there  throughout history..."
"My reaction when a friend asked if I wanted to see the hulk hogan sex tape."
"My reaction when a friend asked if I wanted to see the hulk hogan sex tape (x-post from/r/funny)"
"Does it fit?"
"Chameleon goes hard"
"Chameleon loves Fat Man Scoop."
"Chameleon washing his hands (x-post from r/gifs)"
"Fight!"
"Seemed a bit obvious."
"Funny looking cat.."
"Something does seem a little off."
"Awesome Panda"
"Pulp Fiction Panda"
"I don't want to work!"
"Get Down Tonight"
"Come on baby  let's do the twist"
"Club Panda"
"Panda Doing the Twist"
"Panda..."
"Perfect"
"this is what failure feels like when i post something i find worthy... but reddit doesn't approve"
"Jump! [gif]"
"You win this round gravity..."
"Most effective in Connecticut"
"The future is so bright ..."
"When I see an overweight person exercising"
"How NOT to rob a Wendy's."
"Oh HI!"
"MY new brother"
"Requesting the highest of fives!"
"Sonic and son"
"sleepytime"
"If only sonic was this cute..."
"Seahorse giving birth"
"Seahorse giving birth"
"Every male Redditor's dream"
"The Hunger Games' Seneca Crane is working as a waitress."
"Firefox is having a problem with windows"
"The window must be strawberry flavored!"
"Having a bad day? nope."
"What a rude dog!!!"
"Look out for that penis snake! [sfw]"
"&quot;Penis Snake&quot; recently discovered in the Amazon"
"&quot;Penis snake&quot; (actually a caecilian)"
"fuck off"
"Get out of the way!"
"Dump"
"What...?"
"Just a little pi"
"Ecce Homo 'Shops Album"
"That looks much better now"
"What in the fucking fuck..."
"Don't Google 'Reddit slut'"
"SLUT"
"Shit that freaked me out"
"pee dream"
"How I feel every time somebody wakes me up"
"POW right in the kisser"
"Reddit's effect on the development of a talented artist..."
"Now you can hate this world even more"
"Landing like a boss"
"Happy (and fresh) Star Wars"
"Happy Star Wars! [4x Fixed]"
"I admit to sometimes driving like this."
"I damn near sat through the whole thing."
"Obi-Wan and George Michaels"
"Gif Mashups"
"Look what they just played on Fox"
"has it really not been done yet?"
"Getting back from work knowing tomorrow is Friday..."
"Happy Jedi"
"Its just perfect. I know its been used before  but its perfect"
"Speedin' Dirty"
"Obi Wan Kenobi - Wake Me Up"
"Obi Wan wants you to take him on"
"Blast Off!!"
"Million dollar seat"
"When you're walking down the street on a hot day and your balls keep sticking to your thigh. (Guy Problems)"
"Possibly the best extra any movie has ever had."
"Pussy."
"&quot;Pussy: A Song Inspired by Lil Wayne&quot; - By Super Saiyan Jalen"
"Bunnies trump all your cats..."
"A young Christopher Walken"
"Taste the Rainbow Mother Fucker!"
"Taste the Rainbow Mother Fucker!"
"care bears don't fuck around"
"Diversity"
"Diversity."
"Ricky Gervais  summed up"
"The latest Reddit craze!"
"COME AT ME  BRO"
"I hate television..."
"Real G  baby"
"This kid's got 99 problems  and they all bitches."
"Unfortunate reality"
"Unfortunate reality"
"How I Spend My Free Time"
"Greatest Profile Photo Ever....."
"New Monkey Discovered - He seems to have a mellow soul"
"come on bro..."
"Quit playin yo"
"Eggs in the morning."
"Eggs in the morning."
"The Grand Lightning Show at the Grand Canyon"
"The awesome power of nature..."
"When someone you think is really cute in a profile pic  but then you meet and realize..."
"Whenever my girlfriend puts on a headband"
"Bunny ears"
"Things that go BOOM in the night"
"I don't know about you guys  but this is how i learned about supply and demand"
"My favorite Calvin and Hobbes comic."
"why? because fuck you."
"What dating feels like:"
"When I try showing reddit to a friend"
"Googled pancake nipples and this is what came up"
"Pan's Breakfast"
"Not Llamas"
"These two"
"FLUFF THESE LLAMAS"
"Why do they look so happy?"
"Decided to type into Google &quot;The most adorable thing ever in the world.&quot; Well  can't say i'm not satisfied."
"I swear  every damn cat a redditor sees..."
"Oh.. No  I wasn't.. I was just.. Shit."
"Let me clean that out for you."
"We really could have used you 2 hours ago  asshole..."
"Dammit  Phil  you had one job! ONE JOB!"
"Catduck"
"Looks like peter parker has a cat"
"How to get down from a refrigerator."
"Cats are role models. Appreciate them."
"I guess Easter came early for this guy"
"Baby Macaque - NGC Photo of the month - july 2012"
"A baby Macaque from India"
"This is a baby macaque from India (x-post from r/pics)"
"Saw this on r/pics thought it belongedd here"
"Jamie Hyneman: Born To Dance"
"Let me show you the dance of my people."
"My entire high school English career"
"Haters Gonna... Tailslide??"
"Haters."
"Apparently honesty isn't the best policy"
"eHarmony must be a woman"
"EHarmony Rejection: What do you like most in a woman?"
"Oh yeah that's the stuff"
"Aww yeah"
"That feeling..."
"Eaaaaaarrrr flapflapflap"
"Bombur Catches an Upvote (OC)"
"I'm a good citizen  I'm a good father  I recycle  and I masturbate."
"Another reason why I love Louis C.K."
"Can Disney please bring this back  now that it owns Star Wars?"
"A bit of toy history  has been in this guy's aunts backyard for decades (x/post from StarWars)"
"Epic gym photobomb"
"Steam summer sale is on."
"Prohibited"
"When my dealer calls me to come pick up."
"that's a big croc"
"Not weather related  but jaw dropping. The people in a village on the Niger River in Africa were losing fellow villagers at such a rapid rate  that they had to call in the Army to hunt down the culprit. A 22 foot  2500 pound Crocodile. Speechless...."
"Meanwhile in Zimbabwe"
"Jaws"
"&quot;there are many fish in the sea&quot;  yes yes  how comforting"
"BUTTER"
"Lubrication is key!"
"A true hero"
"I got this!"
"How to handle road rage"
"Message Received"
"Mitt Chimpney: It's not racist if you do it to a white man."
"You tell em red."
"Wise words."
"Bring back any memories?"
"Friendly Easter PSA. Jesus Was Not A Zombie."
"Found on Facebook thought it deserved better."
"&quot;What? Oh no. Just tyin' my shoe.&quot;"
"AISE KROM"
"aspergers"
"How I know I'm getting old..."
"One does not simply..."
"Can't help but adore Thor"
"I heard scratching at my front door. I opened it. MOTHER OF GOD."
"I Heard Scratching.... [Fixed]"
"SHARE THE LOAD"
"Aye  see men?"
"Knocked the f**k out"
"Brace Yourselves  the Train is Leaving"
"HOLD THE TRAIN HOLD THE...."
"We have bigger problems..."
"Kansas State Mascot Kicks Kid In The Face"
"I'll show you papers tomorrow..."
"How I felt today"
"How I feel today."
"Just kidding  it's still Thursday"
"Just kidding!"
"just kidding  it's still Thursday."
"How I feel every Thursday"
"it's thursday  fuck this shit"
"At least it's not Monday..."
"Oh yea  it's not Friday yet."
"Pretty much sums it up"
"This is me at work right now..."
"How I feel every Thursday..."
"How I feel on a Thursday"
"HIFW i came to work to realize it was only Thursday."
"Me every day at work."
"How I feel today about school"
"Oops  just kidding"
"Fuck Thursdays!"
"How I feel today"
"How it feels today"
"Fuck this shit!"
"How I feel at 3:30 every day"
"Fuck this shit!"
"How I feel on Fridays [FIXED] (xpost)"
"I may be the only one who hasn't posted this today so here you go..."
"Fuck this shit"
"Just kidding!"
"Thats about right"
"...It's still Thursday..."
"Still have lots of work to do?"
"Fuck this shit...."
"ughh."
"My day so far.."
"At least it's Friday-Eve."
"You're almost done"
"TFIF!"
"Oh."
"How I feel working on essays today the week before finals"
"Sums up today very nicely."
"Just Kidding"
"Me all day at work today"
"The sad reality I faced today..."
"When your statics homework answer matches the back of the book."
"Never let me go..."
"I love you  come here"
"Lol... it just works"
"The McKayla Lisa [OC]."
"The McKayla Lisa [credit to /u/yarrpiracy; X-post from r/AdviceAnimals]"
"The McKayla Lisa"
"La Giosmirkda"
"The McKayla Lisa"
"Oh no! Shes at it again!"
"Searched up &quot;Beauty&quot; was not dissapointed."
"Added my birth picture to Facebook timeline."
"How I feel finally getting air conditioning"
"How I feel when I accidentally put my head through the arm sleeve..."
"I drive a classic car w/o AC. This is how it feels getting out now that the weather is 106°"
"The only white rhino I care about"
"Technology... you're doing it wrong"
"Wailord used body slam!"
"My reaction towards an unexpected good grade on a test"
"Happy First Contact Day! Only 51 years to go!"
"Found out today was my cake day  thought it was tomorrow.."
"When I found a box of Thin Mints that i didn't know about in the cupboard this morning"
"My reaction to the &quot;restoration&quot; of a fresco of Jesus in a church in Spain"
"When I'm driving down the road and see a chick on a motorcycle"
"This is what it looks like when I start up Diablo III"
"One day...."
"The 360 teabag"
"360 T-Bag"
"How i play basketball..."
"I pity the fool"
"We all know that look..."
"titties"
"When i submit a post and the first comment is about a spelling error."
"Flying a helicopter"
"Me trying to get to the front page"
"Mitt Romney on foreign policy"
"Batman:The Caped Crusader"
"Max?"
"A dish best served hot."
"His face says it all."
"He looks very unhappy"
"What did I do to deserve this?"
"Every time I try fancy dance moves"
"Taken down like a boss."
"50 shades of chicken (found)"
"Student Organization &quot;Morally reprehensible&quot; Shirt Design Refused via Email back in January (screenshots attached) Your opinion?"
"I want to wrestle her"
"Engage!"
"Captain Jean-Luc Picard"
"What's going on Patrick?"
"Yeah!!!  hes good."
"Like a boss."
"Like a boss"
"Fuck you  other dolphin!"
"He's been overlooked for the last time..."
"Best Father in the world O_o"
"African fish eagle  a trout and an ice cube."
"Eagle is not amused"
"&quot;Not funny guys&quot;"
"Life is hard"
"Angry Birds"
"Speechless..."
"You rage you loose."
"If I ever had to hit a bitch..."
"Shut it  bitch!"
"Marriage!"
"Do you have a minute to talk about Christ ou-"
"How to make an animal Australian - Just add size and deadliness!"
"Yoga Pose #upwardfacingdog"
"Wait  that's my yoga mat..."
"I guess the fashion police are cracking down on mom jeans."
"Some Men Just Want to Watch the World Burn"
"Noah's ark(requested)"
"Dora in 40 years."
"Hahaha"
"Male chastity belt"
"This looks like an electron microscope version of a tremor like worm monster!"
"Stuff being magnified? How about a hydrothermal worm."
"He loves sweeping..."
"oh this old thing..."
"1 adult  2 children please"
"What it feels like to post on Reddit sometimes."
"Pupperoni Roll  Barco  Woofarito.. you choose"
"Bruce Lee plays ping pong with nunchucks like a boss"
"Bruce Lee with a ping pong ball."
"The first word you see describes you."
"Epic photobomb [definitely NSFW]"
"When you see it (NSFW)"
"How i felt as little kid at the dinner table."
"Perfection"
"The Stockholm Metro"
"A moment of silence..."
"reply to a front page post a few days ago. looks like it didnt work out..."
"I shall call him... Mini-Prince!"
"little Prince charming"
"Thug Life"
"Remember this dinosaur? Any memories?"
"My Face When Ra Al Ghul (Portrayed by Liam Neeson) Said and Put Emphasis on the Word &quot;Taken&quot; in the New Batman Movie"
"My face when I walked in on my roommate masterbating..."
"That moment when one of you posts hits over 30 upvotes..."
"worn out kitty"
"When you see a mosquito on your friend's shoulder"
"When you see a mosquito on your friend."
"When people say &quot;YOLO&quot; i have the urge to do this!"
"How I feel after spending my days off this week being sick."
"Meanwhile on Fox News..."
"I am not a clever man. [Buttersafe]"
"You should not have come here human"
"I'm not a smart man."
"I am not a clever man."
"Then again  who is?!"
"This is an echidna. That is his penis."
"Tasmanian Echidnas' Four-Headed Penis"
"If you're a hot chick   me and every other straight guy here and on the planet do this to you in our minds"
"silly turtle what are you doing"
"I don't even care that it's an ad  whoever thought of this deserves the biggest hug in the world."
"Genius bus advertisement"
"After missing one lecture at university"
"I Googled &quot;most American picture ever&quot; was not disappointed"
"Not sure if this is a good way to tell your kids that your father is in jail."
"Interesting children's book title"
"Book I found in the hood."
"FUCK THIS SHIT"
"One of the funniest fake ads I have seen (slightly nsfw)"
"Shit happens"
"Let's see if the baby is awakOHMYGOD!"
"Almost the weekend."
"RE: Fucking Repost!"
"Decided to see what all the fuss was about with /r/spacedicks. How I felt afterwards..."
"James Spader"
"Jewelry for fidgeters. Love it."
"You'll need an actual stretcher after this..."
"Stretching... Not even once."
"Does what ever a spider CAN !!!! GET IT?!??"
"Community is on today!!! Yay!!!!"
"Abed Knows It (X-Post From /r/gifsounds"
"whenever i hit r/wtf"
"Trolling like a boss"
"What it feels like when I drive in the morning after a powdery snow fell."
"Hand-sized baby sloth  anyone?"
"I can't be the only one who thinks sloths are adorable  right? My family thinks I'm crazy..."
"I'm in ur chair  warmin my eggs (nsfw: cat genitals)"
"When my teacher asks me to answer a question on the board..."
"Passing notes in class... with style."
"cheating done right"
"Amazing Parisian Door"
"It's going to be a long month for this guy"
"They're not even trying to subtle anymore"
"I don't think this ad is advertising what it thinks it's advertising."
"Me so holy.."
"Me so holy"
"The Internet"
"I &lt;3 Batman!"
"I live with 4 other women. We're all on the same &quot;schedule&quot; So once a month for an entire week..."
"End of the Earth."
"So Close"
"So close [x-post r/gifs]"
"soup for sluts"
"The Japanese know their target market!"
"Kangaroo got pwned!"
"The day Reddit was blocked at work."
"Thor channeling some serious Nicolas Cage right here"
"god i love the cage"
"My reaction when cake day submission gets downvoted"
"Whenever my best links get downvoted to oblivion."
"How I felt when Chrome crashed on me."
"Whenever one of my hardcore heroes dies in Diablo 3"
"Smallest penis in the harbor [SFW]"
"just a dinghy (with 2 000hp)"
"sometimes you just can't beat the original"
"naive jeremy"
"Welcome to the real world"
"Bush Viper Snake"
"Bush Viper"
"Gotta Love Hores!"
"Java Jive"
"Louis CK on the ten commandments"
"simbaaaa-ahhh shit!"
"Holy Shit! Give him some marbles!"
"I demand marbles as tribute!"
"ALL HAIL! THE GOD OF REDDIT!"
"How a typical night of me trying to pick up girls goes. [FIXED]"
"So Reddit  I heard you like spiders."
"a whole lot of nope in one small package"
"The thing about smart people"
"Old  but hilarious"
"who wants to be a millionaire special edition."
"Can I call a white a friend?"
"Poster ad for the Canadian Paralympics"
"How to tell if a stripper has Daddy issues?"
"Damn Germany! You scary!"
"In Croatia  people dress up as Krampus  the evil anti Santa that punishes bad kids."
"Just bathing NBD"
"MFW a comment highlighting the amount of reposts gets downvoted"
"Not Everyone Enjoys Sex."
"Fall is coming!"
"Dudley Do-right"
"Dudley Do-right"
"At least he tried"
"BEST. FRIEND. EVER."
"Not sure if paralyzed or unconscious"
"Best Friend Ever"
"Let me help  OOOPs  sorry"
"Beets"
"The tender side of an ignominious cruise ship failure"
"Animal Channel: Boat Edition"
"So I stood up and..."
"Most of Jacksonville  FL"
"How I feel in high school"
"SwansonTard"
"Let's turn that smile upside dow... Oh Jesus  I've created a monstrosity."
"Just as loveable."
"mfw i cant think of something to say about no-shave-november"
"I was just wondering what it looked like"
"Me  a dog lover  reading through all the grumpy cat memes."
"Guess he isn't so grumpy after all!"
"be yourself"
"Happy hardcore dancing animals"
"Almost as good as kate upton"
"First post. Straight up disco infernos"
"Board game or not  this game still kicked ass"
"The commercials for this thing were the best."
"Rated-G for all ages"
"I'm not sure that I should laugh"
"Ped"
"Wait a minute..."
"Seth MacFarlane's latest creation."
"As a child I was proficient in this instrument."
"Cats /gonewild"
"Meet Waz-Up Sloth"
"Why feminism is important"
"What if the male Avengers posed like the female one?"
"What if the male Avengers posed like the female one?"
"Dean Martin once gave his famous burger recipe to a celebrity cook book. This was the result."
"How I feel reposting a GIF on my cakeday."
"An Artist's Rendition of Reddit"
"Reddit's &quot;Soul&quot;"
"When I go to University  this will be on my dorm door."
"Jolly Good!"
"Fucks Given? Not today old Chap."
"Fucks Given? Not today old Chap."
"Couldn't have timed it any better..."
"How I Feel When The Upvotes Start Coming In"
"On Fridays."
"How I feel at work knowing that in 8 hours I am going on vacation"
"Wifey came home with a Victoria's Secrets bag"
"patrick star"
"WTF happened here Patrick!?!"
"The Day I Discovered Gonewild...."
"When I found out the lead actor for Walking Dead was British"
"When my professor tells us she's a redditor and plays Skryim"
"GET IN MY PANTS!"
"Cross-dressing man penetrating a Range Rover"
"Found this on my facebook wall..."
"I laugh every time I see this."
"How I feel when I post something in r/atheism"
"Trying to fly a jet in BF3."
"Series of photos showing the exact moment a tank shell hits Syrian rebels"
"Aurora seen from space (gif)"
"Because He's The Hero Gotham Deserves Not The One It Needs."
"Welcome to the Internet. I'll be your guide."
"The first time I fired up a 3 speed mower."
"Runaway Lawnmower"
"Trying to go up to the bathroom in the middle of the night"
"Boy  that escalated quickly"
"Found this while recycling my old newspapers. Apparently  not a single fuck was given that day."
"Hit the random gallery button on imgur. Never laughed so hard in my life."
"Well  you got that right."
"How a sewing machine works."
"Celery  nature's toothbrush... for your colon!"
"butt brush"
"brushie brushie brushie"
"It Will Be Our Little Secret…"
"Who should REALLY be the Olympic commentators..."
"On my Reddit birthday I submit to you  the cutest fucking thing I have ever seen!"
"Cute bunny"
"Jut a baby elephant in a raincoat."
"damn your cu...well ok then...."
"The stones look so Zen. [792x720]"
"Close up of an army ant biting a finger"
"Finally installed my new printer"
"I have a feeling I didn't install my new printer correctly."
"Holy shit? They really do exist??"
"And we shall name him... Ewok Jr."
"This showed up in my newsfeed."
"I never realized Julia Roberts was that scary..."
"Not sure if I've figured out reddit yet (fixed)"
"Kitties &amp; Titties"
"What I expect from reddit after work"
"As a christian male  This is how my reality changed after coming to /r/atheism. Thanks for enlightening me."
"I think my eyes are bleeding"
"&gt;MFW BENNED"
"My first blow job. [SFW]"
"Oh Yeah!"
"What it feels like getting nothing but assists.."
"Black baby bear!"
"Thanks Pandora  for letting me know what Lynyrd Skynyrd looks like!"
"I typed &quot;swine flu symptoms&quot; into google images and..."
"Analogous to watching your new posts on r/funny"
"I must go  my people need me..."
"kill it!"
"The after sex piss"
"Kill it!"
"How it feels trying to pee after sex"
"Beer Pong"
"I don't think this is how you play beirut."
"The best things in life come unexpected."
"Here comes Santa Claus  here comes Santa Claus"
"You think he can stop?"
"Ladies... ladies..."
"Call J.G. Wentworth"
"Photobomb Level; Shark"
"Unbelievable ice formation"
"So many good memories. [Fixed]"
"The best Halo map."
"My Plan to Get to the Front Page- Possibly NSFW"
"Baby Owls... adorable"
"It's a cute little...uh...er...animal?"
"Fuck gravity"
"This just makes me smile"
"I hope so too..."
"Why I go to birthday parties."
"Just to make sure he gets noticed."
"Son  you make me proud."
"Well then..."
"Imitation is the most sincere form of flattery"
"The best part about surfing Reddit on Alien Blue"
"Why I love Alien Blue. (Reddit iPhone Client)"
"Why I love Alien Blue. (Reddit iPhone Client)"
"How i feel about all those steam giveaways"
"For the haters after a downvoted post makes a comeback."
"The bus knight"
"My small attempt at an Earthbender vs. Waterbender fight."
"Battle of the elements"
"Henry Behrens dancing with his pet cat."
"Eating seafood  half-submerged in the sea with the sand sifting through your toes"
"At the last supper..."
"Home Depot is just so helpful"
"Thanks for offering help  but I'll manage."
"MRI Scan of an Artichoke"
"Alex Honnold observing the landscape of Yosemite [1024x683]"
"Iconic image. Colorized."
"The most Russian name ever"
"He's sleeping with the tooth fairy I just know it"
"Le happy merchant"
"The average performance I get when casting friends into my film class projects."
"Please give me a carrot  please give me a carrot  pleeeaaaseee"
"High five!"
"....And you will know my name is Lord Vader!  When I lay my vengeance upon thee."
"I want this on a T-shirt"
"I thought you were never coming back."
"How a dog shows love"
"This is one if my favorite pics ever."
"Whenever I go out."
"So  this is how the earth looks from my &quot;space&quot;!!!"
"Pretty Awesome Quote"
"Logic never fails"
"Get The Fuck Out of Here  Dog."
"Oh Hitler."
"UFCF - Ultimate Fictional Characters Fighting - Collection - Imgur"
"How not to advertise a dog for adoption"
"What I want to do when people disrupt an interesting class."
"thaitanic"
"Ready to set sail captain"
"&quot;I'll never wet go&quot;"
"Recalling my first &quot;make out&quot; with a girl"
"Your favorite Nintendo DS RPGs?"
"I just wanted to recommend this game to ANYONE. IMO  the best I've played."
"Say Ah. Ahhhhh!"
"Gorgeous."
"AHMYGOD GET IT OFF!"
"Squid is hungry"
"DOWN BOY!"
"Saw this on Facebook. Thought you guys would enjoy it."
"BUUUURN! (xpost from r/pokemon)"
"Yeah i'll have a larger pepperoni pizza!"
"Well  shit"
"Someone figured-out my password.."
"I feel let down inside..."
"Grandma's cookies have long been heiled 'world's purest'."
"Where do i join?"
"Pay attention to me instead  pwease!"
"1 Megabyte"
"This frog is awesome"
"can i eats this?"
"This frog ate a light."
"Every time  omegle. Every time."
"Facepalm"
"WTF Ren"
"It's a good day when you see this on your news feed"
"Blowjob Lips."
"Rowan Atkinson on anti-theism"
"They really are just like us!"
"Is it just me or are tabloids running out of gossip."
"Short version of Othello"
"Spoon........"
"Hey guys  look who it is!"
"Got it over 18 months ago as a joke. Probably one of the biggest mistakes of my life. (x-post r/funny)"
"The look in his eyes - he knows he's made a horrible mistake"
"Sweet tat  bro!"
"A bearded man teaches you how to properly brush your teeth (and beard)."
"This is seriously the most intriguing story ever told.."
"This turned up on my Faecebook this morning. I think I'm going to have it enlarged and framed."
"Blue Glaucus - Just learned of the existence of this animal."
"Glaucus Atlanticus  mother of all slugs."
"Not sure if she had sex or if it snowed.."
"Baroque Obama"
"Baroque Obama"
"Send Link..."
"No love for midgets."
"When my family hears my mum say &quot;Dinner is ready!&quot;"
"Prince: The Early Years"
"Just some wanna-be musician hanging out in Minneapolis in the early 70s."
"Prince!"
"Well now i feel more prepared to be a dad!"
"Life as a T-Rex"
"philosophical words from t-rex"
"Realizing you've just missed your cakeday by a few hours."
"From bad to worse in 3 seconds"
"Cute Chubby Penguin"
"Fat penguin"
"Drowning in a river of shit"
"peace"
"For my Cake day I present to you my favorite gif..."
"A protester advances"
"ALWAYS CHECK."
"NOPE NOPE NOPE! This is how phobias are formed!"
"The world's worst toilet"
"Not sure if I can ever use a toilet again...."
"Nope."
"When I just found out it's my cake-day."
"So many glasses..."
"Walking into the bathroom after someone forgets to flush"
"My most stressful moment from childhood [Fixed]"
"Busey Family Reunion"
"But why?"
"Gary Busey Creepin"
"Mr. Busey"
"How I feel being 22 and seeing younger women...[FIXED] [FIXED]"
"Penn State's new mascot"
"How I feel as a 30 year old returning to college.."
"Still  to this day cracks me up every time i see this."
"Walking into school on the first day..."
"Assassin's Creed Ezio Cosplay Nailed"
"Johnny Cash at Folsom Prison (1968)"
"I think Psychonauts is done downloading"
"That's quite a large update..."
"A personal favourite from Awkward Family Photos"
"Just a friendly easter bunny"
"Im Done With Easter...."
"The Interwebs"
"Every Time I Open Reddit"
"Reddit when I have a paper due tomorrow"
"Dont Lie  you'd so watch this."
"You *know* you'd watch it..."
"this your brain on sinks"
"I didn't think it was possible for a spider to be cute  but here it is  a newborn spider."
"Sand Magnifiied 250x"
"Frozen Lake"
"A Frozen Lake (X-post from r/wallpapers)"
"Please note the seat belt sign has been turned on we ask you to remain in your seats..."
"I would not feel &quot;safe&quot; flying there"
"Having achieved my first full year on Reddit  I feel this sums up my relationship with you guys."
"Having achieved my first full year on Reddit  I feel this sums up my relationship with you guys. [FIXED]"
"No shave November in a nutshell"
"Genghis Khan during his time [xpost from /r/history]"
"Entry - Exit"
"Low five!"
"Slappin' the cat"
"Saw this nice bird sitting in the bush... Totally dead."
"D'oh - I am mortified."
"This is what a happy cat looks like"
"Do you want a bag for that?"
"Someone is going to regret this tattoo"
"Nickelback Superfan"
"Yup  going straight to hell for laughing."
"RETARDS LOL!"
"Blink"
"OWNED LOL"
"Don't tell me how to live my life!"
"Blink if you want me"
"This always got me to go outside and be active as a kid."
"Test your might!"
"High Kick Pow! (fixed)"
"bitch please! High kick Pow!"
"That's that"
"evolution is a bitch"
"Evolution is a bitch [FIXED]"
"Well  I guess that's that"
"Looking back on the original three"
"The Original Three"
"WAR!"
"Only a little racist..."
"Meanwhile  in Japan..."
"Redheads"
"Venn Diagram - Evolution"
"Makes sense to me"
"This is the reason Venn diagrams came to be."
"Had an interesting night club photo come up on my news feed..."
"Best Rave Shot I've Seen  at Stanton Warriors"
"My entire collection of Animals Giving High Fives (68 images  ~55 species)"
"Oh  but it's art."
"This is how I walk out of my room after having sex and I know my roomies are home."
"Passing a test you didn't study for."
"coming out of the bathroom after a ghost poop"
"How I feel when my toddler visits his grandparents and my wife and I have a weekend planned"
"Watch out  we got a bad ass over here"
"Poor jorge"
"Probability mindfuck"
"Probability"
"The Corgi and the Snowball"
"Does this annoy you as much as it does me?"
"No matter how the VP debate goes  won't stop thinking about this."
"The most beautiful storm cloud you will ever see (photog: Camille Seaman)"
"A massive storm cloud twists above wheat fields in western Nebraska [1247×787]"
"soon...ely"
"You know what looks weird? A lynx."
"Colorado's lynx made the front page  here's a high-res picture of the Canadian lynx  they are quite impressive! Photo Credit: Keith Williams"
"Best friends forever"
"Peta Kills Animals"
"PITA in a nutshell..."
"When I saw the photo of hot Mario and Luigi in leather"
"Come back here  fingers!"
"Come Back here  Fingers! (X/post- gifs)"
"Father of the year? Ummm..."
"Like father  like son..."
"Father of the Year."
"Parenting at its best"
"Yet another person making us Tennesseans look bad."
"My son decided to be a cigarette for Halloween  I decided to play along."
"We've all experienced this."
"Wat?"
"A friend was browsing through an old yearbook here when she came upon this guy."
"Navigating my day after proper caffeination"
"You Were Wrong"
"Guess who?"
"I'm not to sure what I was expecting..."
"Guess who?"
"Skyrim Modders need to make this happen ASAP"
"HardCore Christian"
"They're making ads about it now."
"Two in one wtf! The link itself is a major wtf with the lack of class and then this a xpost from r/funny..."
"FB Gem I just found (she even tagged homeboy)"
"My friend sent me this from her newsfeed."
"Don't bread your stupidity."
"Worth the read. Would read again. Ctfu."
"My Christian friend posted this on Facebook."
"Found this on my news feed. Every girl I know can't stop talking about this movie."
"For all parents  I just wanted to spread the word"
"Found this awsone status today"
"UK Police Troll a Troll on Facebook"
"UK Police Troll Back on Facebook"
"Helpful review!"
"I like Wiz Khalifa"
"They are taking Carrie Underwood far too seriously"
"I got a gem in the FB feed today."
"Saw this for the first time today and immediately wanted to slap this girl in the face."
"Zach Braff love GW!"
"The latest in child apparel"
"How I feel when something I've submitted is actually getting upvoted."
"On God's and Heros[x-post /r/standupshots]"
"On gods and heroes."
"I CRY EVRYTIM"
"Glass of Water"
"Dat ass"
"Leader of the Renegade"
"Batman's Day off"
"Pick me!"
"how i feel whenever there's an update for anything"
"It is my actual Cake Day and this is what I feel like doing at work today in celebration!"
"That's a very nice desktop you have there... ssssss"
"someone put this as the wallpaper on all the computers at my work. I work in an elementary school."
"So this explains something..!"
"Golden Hoof Gun Heels."
"A pic taken of a current bushfire in Victoria  Australia taken during the night."
"What we are facing right now in Victoria  Australia"
"Fires lighting the sky in Victoria  Australia."
"I was wondering why the guy in the bathroom yelled goooooooaaaallllll"
"Flight director of the Mars Curiosity rover  Bobak Ferdowsi"
"This is the dumbest fucking thing anyone has ever believed."
"Christians: Reject evolution  believe that you can be impregnated with a black baby from a 3D movie"
"Conception via 3D porno? Seems legit."
"Really  Erik? You see *no* reason not to believe her?"
"What the hell?!"
"3D film made woman pregnant!"
"Uh  BS  Much?"
"*Boop*"
"Why clothes in fashion magazines look great and the same clothes on you look like crap"
"This would be perfect for a quantum physics test."
"So I was browsing rooms to share on craigslist  when found this as an image attachment"
"Exact portrayal of how I learned to roll a joint."
"Freedom"
"Crabzilla [fixed]"
"Japanese spider crab"
"Joseph Stalin was a pretty good looking guy back in the day"
"Who knew Stalin was such a hipster?"
"a NOPE full of color"
"Read and heed!"
"Neat motorcycle stunt"
"Too cute to even look at"
"Spooning Squirrels"
"Piglet is napping on his strawberry"
"Insanity Protestor"
"My reaction to finding money on the street."
"How I felt when I heard MTV cancelled the &quot;Jersey Shore&quot;"
"This is how I feel when I get upvote after upvote after upvote!"
"Bugs Bunny?"
"Eat up  little guy."
"My free time in elementary school [Fixed]"
"when my family try to sing happy birthday on my real-life cake day"
"Loki likes spaghetti"
"Bacon Crossbones"
"Not exactly what he was planning..."
"Can you feel it?"
"missed my cakeday.."
"Shaolin cat"
"Soon..."
"Walked in to Wal Mart tonight to do some last minute X Mas shopping..."
"Only thing I could think of when I heard Will Arnett and Amy Poehler split up."
"Cool Fog This Morning In St. Louis!"
"Meanwhile in St. Louis....even though we weren't as lucky as Colorado and Washington"
"Must have legalized pot in Illinois as well."
"Amazing picture of The Beatles."
"Beatles."
"A really cool aerial shot of The Beatles"
"Evolution"
"Evolution"
"Evolution of the human species in a gif"
"evolution of humans... the future is not so bright."
"Oh  you!"
"Oh  you! (xpost from gifs)"
"Business cat goes on a trip"
"Reddit CEO on a business trip"
"A day in the life of CAT"
"DUN DUN DUN DUN DUN"
"A cat goes to work..."
".016 seconds after a nuclear detonation"
"I smell BACON!"
"Mars Rover snaps a stunning photo."
"Shadowy vista of the endeavour crater on mars  taken by NASA`s opportunity rover"
"Meanwhile  on the other side of Mars...."
"A man and his tiger"
"Me too  Darren  me too."
"I see what you did there"
"Finally  Facebook gold."
"Two new GTA V screenshots."
"New GTA V Screenshots"
"New GTA V Screenshots"
"So I looked up piercings on Google Images  and this was the first result.."
":O"
"Neil Degrasse Tyson explaining science as only he can"
"This is why I don't like my generation."
"Zach Braff filling gaylords"
"Filling Gaylords"
"Yeah  4chan stole from reddit... said no one ever."
"Zach Braff likes to oil up his followers asses."
"Watching my parents use a computer"
"What the hell were they thinking?!"
"watching my parents use the computer"
"When I'm on the Phone with my Mother"
"When I die the same way twice in a video game"
"Watching my parents use a computer"
"Capitalism"
"My childhood is completely gone."
"I could've sworn this was already a game"
"How Fucking Retarded is the Planet?"
"This is truly the definition of a repost"
"Sweet Baby Jesus on a Grill - Imgur"
"Turtle Burgers - Saw this on FB.... Suddenly I am starving."
"Elk plays Frogger (NSFL)"
"Cars play ping pong with Elk"
"Suddenly  deer."
"Shits about to go down"
"Thank you Burger King! Your awfulness saves lives."
"Thieft Level: Asian"
"Thigh Strength"
"Math teacher fail."
"This teacher needs some help"
"Where do you keep your Pokeballs? (x-post from r/pokemon)"
"Annnnd there goes the childhood."
"I see what you did there Nintendo"
"Well That's Unfortunate"
"Mcpope"
"When i tried that expired peanut butter.."
"Still laughing my ass of."
"rock paper scissor logic"
"Something smells fishy about this place..."
"Natural Selection."
"After a week long family vacation."
"Young Stephen Hawking"
"My friend has the best awkward childhood photo ever."
"Come at me"
"Can you do this....?"
"Since we're posting pictures moms shouldn't see..."
"Chicago Skyline (X/Post from Funny Guess this belongs here)"
"oh no..OH NO OH NO OH NO.. phew"
"Don't worry  Snoop will show you the way."
"Snoop Dog makes dreams come true"
"How I feel as a Californian  when I am told it is raining outside."
"The letters of the day are &quot;A&quot; and &quot;K&quot;"
"STILL my favorite picture on the interwebs."
"POTATO_IN_MY_ANUS mad at POTATO-IN-MY-ANUS (x-post from /r/cringe)"
"Mitt Romney (x/post from trees)"
"Mitt Romney."
"Master Sword Zelda - Picked it up from 4chan while back"
"My favorite wallpaper."
"He knows whats up..."
"Pokemon Drinking Game - Corrected Version"
"Well I will be playing this board game tomorrow."
"poor aquaman"
"The Bubble Man - Chandra Winsu"
"When I heard that Taylor Swift is single again."
"Pius XII and Hitler."
"Where is this from?"
"The nobel price of peace goes to"
"Seriously  cats love it!"
"I found this on Facebook..."
"inflatable unicorn horn for cats!"
"Finally found Facebook gold!"
"He just looks so happy to be wearing that."
"the most useless product i have ever seen. ever. (maybe re-post)"
"poetry in *meow*tion..."
"Special Breakdancing Move"
"Simply buses"
"real jesus vs republican jesus"
"Old Jesus vs new Jesus. MORTAL KOMBAAAAAAAT"
"Maybe YOU should be called Woody..."
"Where is that dog at?"
"Calvin and the Stars [843x403]"
"US Elections are coming up. So we might as well have some fun. Remember  there are no sides in the wars of photoshops."
"How I feel after sifting through ten pages of /new."
"Everytime after I text a girl how I really feel about her"
"How I Feel When Your Dog is Cuter Than Mine"
"Every time I see a cute pet post that isn't on /r/aww (.GIF)"
"How I feel when there are way too many r/aww posts on the frontpage."
"The official gif of r/Aww"
"Old  but still one of the few pics that actually makes me laugh out loud"
"Walruses."
"That's it  NO MORE ABORTION!"
"You mean to tell me..."
"r/spacedicks huh?"
"Curiosity made me click /r/spacedicks"
"The aftermath of going to /r/spacedicks"
"'MURICA"
"'Merica!"
"JFK Riding a Dinosaur"
"Ronald Reagan Riding a Dinosaur"
"'Merica!"
"My new favorite picture of President Obama."
"Taxidermy  huh? I give you Ms. Sarina Brewer..."
"Taxidermy"
"taxidermy"
"Fantasy Time"
"For all you fans of Adventure Time (by illustrator Juan Manuel Orozco)"
"Teefury  shut up and take my money!"
"Happy Thanksgiving...give where it counts"
"How I see Wikipedia asking for donations"
"Jimmy what Da Fuq?"
"CoD Black Ops 2 - New Class: Bard"
"Real World Bard"
"How I feel about getting a job."
"For the month of October  PornHub is donating 1 cent for every 30 views from its big tit and small tit categories to breast cancer research."
"Found on facebook!"
"This time it actually is for science."
"Now you can Fap while supporting breast cancer research! No excuses men."
"Zing!"
"Gay Love"
"I wonder how long she's been waiting to do that"
"Does this angle make me look fat...?"
"Cat's don't have pretty stripes...do they?"
"The only king I'll be hailing on June 14th..."
"Canadian Graffiti [FIXED]"
"Many  many hours were spent here. [FIXED]"
"Mark it zero."
"Whenever someone tries to spoil the ending of a movie."
"The fact that you are not ready."
"The mere fact that you call it that..."
"parasite in the eye"
"Shit just got real."
"Ever wondered about those &quot;For a good time call...&quot; in public bathrooms?"
"Good Memories"
"Going to miss this guy the most (last season of the Office)"
"what is the tiniest fuzzy thing you've ever seen?"
"Mini monkey"
"#1 in cuteness!"
"Oh  this little guy!"
"I would keep him in a pocket all of the time..."
"Hi r/aww. I'm a marmoset"
"You know he's content..."
"How I feel when getting an upvote."
"My Girlfriend when I fart in her presence"
"Recognized my sister on /r/gonewild. [FIXED]"
"Watching CNN go from Obamacare is unconstitutional to constitutional."
"When someone hits me with a funny insult."
"How I feel when there is 12 minutes left of my cakeday and I have nothing prepared!"
"Reddit  peering out the window."
"How I would feel if I ever make the front page."
"Just want's a tiny bit of cheese or peanut butter and somewhere warm to sleep..."
"Push me. I want to go higher!"
"For my cakeday I give you this hamster on a swing"
"Little Swing for a Little Guy"
"This Just Makes me Laugh"
"Something that Batman failed to realize"
"Going straight to hell"
"Third World Success - Kony"
"Easier than ever"
"Facebook &quot;like whore&quot; Extremist"
"I'm sure it was a good idea at the time...."
"Here comes the sun...."
"I found this account logged into a public computer at my university's library  so here's a picture of a book I loved as a kid!"
"Drink four beers at once with the Beerterfall!"
"Drinking Level: Just Graduated with a physics degree I'll never use and $100 000 of debt."
"Don't mess with a Girl Scout....."
"I always knew batman was a pedophile"
"He Knew What He Was Doing  Batgirl"
"WTF was he trying to do?"
"Might even be cuter than a cat"
"Best Shakespeare quote"
"Shame and guilt issue!"
"my favorite women's magazine..."
"&quot;The Shame and Guilt Issue&quot;"
"The Neverending Story was a lot different than I remember"
"This moose knows you've been looking at his genitals. And damnit  he's pleased you did."
"The true story behind the Rugrats Tv Show"
"Are you sure this is you?"
"trying to get into a bar/alcohol while underage"
"Trying to get into the bars with a fake i.d"
"Funniest one I've seen so far."
"I've always thought Seattle was one of the prettiest cities to fly in and out of on a sunny day. Needless to say  that's a bit of a secret."
"This is the example my science teacher used to show us how to set up our science fair projects. As a Mexican I kind of thought this was funny. (Fixed)"
"How I feel every time I try to reach the frontpage"
"How I feel when the first vote is a downvote."
"I had to try this  here's the result"
"You Didn't know they could type."
"One of my favorites"
"Probably my favourite game of all time."
"Zoidberg slinky fail"
"How I feel everytime I post something on Reddit"
"Today. I couldn't do anything right."
"[REQUEST] please resize to a desktop background"
"Reading the comments in r/gonewild..."
"I'm out"
"Boys for life!"
"At least its safe and consensual  right?"
"It's Called Mindset (xpost from r/seduction)"
"Best Mitt Romney GifSound yet!"
"I thought the first part worked"
"Broke Back Mountain 2"
"Favorite Gif by far(might be repost)"
"We've grown up guys. It's time to embrace the reality of lion king."
"Creative Left-Right Brain Ads by Mercedes-Benz"
"Stay. Very. Still. [VVVVVV]"
"WARNING:Do not watch if songs become lodged in your brain no matter what"
"Every time I fart in the shower."
"Flash"
"What the hell did he do"
"Redneck limousine"
"The rules."
"Dem Asians"
"It finally makes sense! (SFW  x/post from r/4chan)"
"first world problems in a third world country"
"True story"
"Batman vs. darth vader"
"Almost witnessed a fight on the train"
"NOPE!"
"That's what you get for kicking your dog"
"Echo station 3-T-8  we have spotted Imperial walkers."
"Rebels vs. cat"
"Star Wars Episode Meow: The Empire Strikes Cat"
"no.1 thing i see on reedit gaming"
"This happens to me on occasions too..."
"How do magnets work?"
"How magnets work..."
"That's good advice"
"When I found out Jersey Shore still has one season left"
"Whenever I try to downvote something on the front page already."
"Yo dawg"
"He Doesn't Already Know"
"My Biggest Problem That Christians Call Me Out On."
"First world problem"
"Happening right now"
"Karma First World Problem"
"Every night I'm shuffelin'"
"The woes of the Summer Steam Sale."
"Teenage first world problems."
"All the time...."
"Well there's also the baby...(madden FWP)"
"first world problem....... o_O"
"The most wonderful Iron Man Photoshop I have ever seen."
"Dan the Downer."
"All this talk about PETA makes me want to get one of these."
"Improvised hair tie"
"So sad!"
"thick sausage  anyone? [FB]"
"one of the most random pictures i've ever seen"
"Just try to describe its awesomeness"
"A viking on a unicorn that is expelling rainbow diarrhea  yielding an AK 47 in space."
"unicorns have rainbow diarrhea"
"Leaving work on a friday! [x-post from r/funny]"
"The rush to Iftaar"
"How I am when I'm late for work"
"When I accidentally click on r/politics"
"Saw these two friends at the zoo today"
"Bambi and thumper"
"This kid is fresh"
"You can smell it but you never tell her"
"Cold and warm hi"
":)"
"Will Smith  Steve Urkel  and Reggie Miller"
"What kind of black magic is this?!"
"Action body shaper! Quite the party."
"Do the Twist"
"I believe in helping people but this is ridiculous."
"Somebody buying lobsters and steaks with food stamps."
"Google'd 35058607036b12d3312ao wasn't disappointed."
"Google'd 35058607036b12d3312ao wasn't disappointed."
"This may not be the best way to describe yourself.."
"How to paint a squirrel"
"How to paint a squirrel"
"My first painting lesson"
"Mega balls... WTF?!?"
"Do these make me look fat?"
"I really hope if Aliens came to Earth  that they didn't go there..."
"Close up of a peacock feather"
"His Majesty King Carl XVI Gustaf of Sweden. We are very proud of him"
"Ladies and Gentlemen  the King and Queen of Sweden! (x-post /photoshopbattles)"
"What I imagine the Swedish president saying..."
"Shoop Daweeden"
"Swedish Queen and King cheering for the Swedish handball team during the London Olympics."
"Aww"
"Sl-Enderman drawing i made(with photoshop cs3) what do you guys think?"
"Marijuana o.o"
"My new Mouse Pad"
"Well hello..."
"No dogs allowed...:P"
"round and round"
"Hey Buddy  You are an A-Hole  not a genius."
"Can't get this out of my head while browsing Reddit. I even bob my head a little for a big finish."
"Getting nailed on the cross"
"Predator meets T-rex meets Fish. That must have been an epic orgy"
"The Bible Drinking game"
"Saw this  thought R/athiesm would get a giggle. I know I did."
"My mother  to this day..."
"San Francisco  1906"
"San Francisco  from airship  in 1906"
"Google suggestions short and to the point"
"Google  Aren't we a little old for this?"
"Today's Google Doodle: When you see it  you'll Poopie."
"You're not fooling anyone  Google."
"I read google's birthday doodle as poople"
"Is that... is that RoboCop?!"
"Too true"
"Ebay Auctions; they're more serious than you would think"
"Evolution of the Batman logo - Imgur"
"Bizarre Hand Creature"
"WTF am I looking at?"
"The appropriate response to every &quot;Lazy College Senior&quot; post....."
"How I feel when I try to talk to people logically"
"Playing Borderlands."
"How I have to be as a Wildlife Biologist when uneducated creationists try and debate with me"
"Not a single fuck given."
"Pictures from last weeks F1 accident"
"OMG"
"Frog says &quot;No&quot;"
"Frog crossing his arms"
"Frog says…"
"Finally got my copy in the mail!"
"Can you help me understand a possible contradiction in Islam?"
"How not to cut a tree down"
"when my laptop tells me that I have 5 minutes of battery life left"
"Whenever my computer tells me I have 7% power left."
"How I feel whenever my crush likes something I do. Even the simple things"
"This happened. True story."
"Every day of my life."
"And I don't blame you for thinking so"
"My kind of bunny."
"When my friend asks me to be his wingman..."
"Orange Sun Scintillating"
"How I feel upvoting a post at -1"
"How I feel whenever I make a new post"
"&quot;I don't care if they have never committed a crime  atheists are the reason crime is rampant.&quot; What??"
"Texas Tan Lines"
"Life got a little scary there for a minute"
"Listening to NPR this morning..."
"this pisses me off about reddit"
"My only hope of ever making the front page."
"Just cats playing Tennis"
"herpa derpa durr"
"Picture of a cute baby dog I found on the internet"
"Handsome Jack Logic (Borderlands2)"
"IT WAS YOU"
"Went to the zoo the other day..."
"My ultimate fear when my Fiancee says she has a job interview"
"Soon..."
"The Reddit God is not appeased"
"Passive-aggresive Jesus"
"A man riding a flying alligator. That is all."
"Just passing by."
"Found this gif... wat?"
"Just a man on a flying Crocodile"
"flying on a crocodile"
"Interior Crocodile Alligator"
"What God looks like"
"Well this sums up my whole week"
"Tony the Dancing Bear"
"When you feel sexy."
"Tutorial: How to not cry."
"Facebook You vs The Real You"
"Mystery fruit"
"How to make a simple door"
"how to make a door (x-post from r/funny)"
"What's the matter party ape? You all partied out?"
"My alltime favorite pic"
"I know that feel  bro."
"This would happen to me if I decided to take up cycling"
"Why I Hate Commuting On A Bicycle"
"Directed by Michael Bay"
"The fate of most posts"
"Michael Bay Presents: Le Tour de France"
"They see me rollin'  they hatin'"
"How the.... What?"
"Abearica FUCK YEA"
"Stowage of a British slave ship [x-post r/historyporn]"
"Oppa Warcraft Style (xpost /r/wow)"
"Romney campaign has a new logo"
"Meanwhile  on this side of the internet..."
"Romney  Believe In America"
"You nerds don't know the meaning of embarrassment"
"that kid"
"You nerds don't know the meaning of embarrassment. (Xpost from 4chan)"
"Blow in her face...(SFW)"
"Im coming Home"
"i'm comin home [fixed]"
"This makes me happy"
"Another reason why Aquaman is so lame"
"Onward  Aquaman  to glory."
"like a motherfucking boss"
"Aquaman  stop  you're drunk."
"The real reason you should be terrified of Vice President Paul Ryan."
"There's so much going on in this picture..."
"Gay Unicorn"
"Bronys come in all shapes and sizes."
"You're welcome."
"The three states of matter"
"What I expect posting on my first cakeday will be like"
"Just us two enjoying our first spring together"
"Aww  this is a baby echidna. Enjoy its cuteness."
"Cute hedgehog is cute"
"In the absence of any other explanation  I'm going to assume that this cat owns a vending machine business."
"For my cake day  I give you this."
"I don't even know how this happens."
"I haven't visited this subreddit for 10 days! This is how I pooped when I remembered it..."
"When You Think It'll Be Easy"
"How I feel when I'm constipated and something finally comes out"
"When you just need something to cheer you up...."
"This little Elmo goes along with this song perfectly [xpost from /r/pooplikethis]"
"How I poop when I can't poop"
"Push it!"
"This is how I poop when I try to think of a good poop mashup that people will enjoy..."
"How I poop when it just won't let me be satisfied."
"it had to be done"
"Smell the rainbow"
"My current favorite picture from my downloads folder."
"It's been nearly 20 years and i still haven't beaten this guy...."
"Getting ready for Christmas."
"Hurr Durr"
"who else has done this?"
"My entire childhood"
"Future in modelling?"
"Jesus vs Batman"
"When a reposted reactiongif makes it to the front page of r/gifs"
"Pika. Oh Pika Pi!"
"5 Seconds of Summer"
"The enhancement of English language"
"Here's a picture of Hitler on a Sled."
"They're learning.."
"I'm pretty good with a bo staff"
"Saw my friend do this ^^"
"Rip my friend ! You took one for the team!"
"R.I.P MIKE"
"Worst Floor Plan Possible: Homeless edition"
"Paint me like one of your french girls"
"Reddit ! In the morning i got him in my farm how's it ?"
"Having a bad day? Make this your wallpaper. Problem solved."
"haha  awww."
"USA Vs. Mexico- Border Volleyball"
"...going off the rails on a crazy train."
"After watching the Olympics for a few days on the American Networks (Fixed)"
"Korean Parents know how to embarrass their kids"
"Fitness Plan"
"fell asleep texting"
"Merry Christmas Grandma"
"Grandma's Alright"
"Sup."
"We just call him eccentric"
"Buttsex"
"Pic from movie set... thought You may like it"
"Amazing Behind The Scene Photos of Famous Hits [From Inception to Start Wars]"
"Conserving Heat [PIC]"
"The original &quot;gaaayyyy&quot; seal"
"after watching the debate  I think I'd rather vote for this guy"
"Notice a difference?"
"Impressive Collection"
"The long and short of the NBA (x-post r/nba)"
"But Lord  why was there only one set of footprints?"
"Footprints...inspiring and informative"
"I'm sure this has been posted before  but I just saw it for the first time and laughed my ass off."
"Exodus  episode IV"
"She sure does love tasers!"
"She sure does love lasers!"
"Searched Nazi Cat  was not dissappointed"
"when i searched best gif ever  the results showed this belonged here"
"Now now Pickachu  play nice."
"Don't be a Pikachu....it's my cakeday"
"After seeing an earlier post about &quot;Slender&quot;  I decided to check it out. This was me after about 15 seconds."
"Old  but still got swag."
"There is no school like the old school."
"Who needs a iPod when you have a boombox?"
"This is my favorite song"
"back in my day... - Imgur"
"When ever Tyler Perry says anything."
"Vietnam Veteran Dog"
"Dramatic Dog"
"One month at a time  please!"
"Tom the Turkey is mad this year................ someone must of been naughty"
"Put that stupid tongue back in your mouth  Jerry..."
"when you try to make food at 2 AM"
"Why do people badmouth donkeys?"
"For all you redditors out there."
"To all Redditors  who need assurance now and then  remember"
"WOOF! ...WTF"
"A stool just for sluts"
"YEEAAAHHH!!"
"The Bacon Rock"
"Zombies be damned"
"Inb4 this is the best version of the song....."
"Who remembers this stuff? Gawd it was awesome."
"Dog gettin' busy"
"My Virginity"
"Yes  Very Safe."
"How I picture myself: sitting atop my glorious Reddit pedestal"
"To all the skeptics..."
"what's the difference?"
"What's the difference?"
"Birth of a unicorn"
"My favorite cartoon"
"Make a fist and point it at the center. Now it looks like the stars are whizzing by faster."
"Dat ass (NSFW)"
"Like a Glove!"
"Easily My Favorite GIF...badass"
"Those Parking Skills Really Payed Off"
"A cloud covered valley in Lombardia Northern Italy"
"Here's how to throw a foam party"
"It's simple... We kill the Big Bird"
"Trees covered in ice"
"Surreal Photo Shows 'Belt of Venus' in Pink Sky"
"Surreal arctic landscape. Those are trees covered in snow  the pinkish streak in the sky is the Belt of Venus."
"This is a largely forgotten classic cartoon that was a big part of my childhood."
"Well played Google..."
"Google has its priorities in order  I see."
"My reaction to finding out my biology teacher is a creationist."
"I would do anything for a job right now  but I won't do that."
"The cutest pig climbing into a hand!!!!"
"The cutest piglet.."
"Who ya' gonna call? GHOSTBUSTERS!"
"Scary stuff"
"I Will Destroy You"
"Your Mom"
"I don't have a title but thought reddit would enjoy"
"First time on /r/poop"
"My reaction when I learned that there was an r/sexwithdogs."
"Everyone was so excited for the new IPhone!"
"The UW band director catching a field goal like a boss"
"Noon..."
"Soon...ish"
"Bad Police Medic  No Donut"
"Bill Nye  The Fucking Science Guy."
"Nice one Bill"
"Even Courage Wolf can be sensitive at times ..."
"Wolf hug!"
"Found this on tumblr  not sure if it's been posted here"
"Sometimes wolves need hugs  too."
"MFW a girl I just met says she loves me"
"I love you!"
"Poor choice of words."
"Wisteria"
"Wisteria Tunnel in the Kawachi Fuji Gardens"
"trololol"
"Searching Google for a &quot;lol&quot; .gif  one of my top results will haunt my dreams."
"Resistance is futile"
"Doors? Where we're going we don't need doors!"
"The cost of things...."
"Priorities of the human species."
"The Cost to Fund SETI for one year..."
"Japan's latest invention"
"Nothing to do here."
"When I realize it's Friday but I thought it was Thursday"
"Rocket Man"
"Japanese Rocket Man"
"Space!"
"I'm gonna be so high tonight"
"Japan's latest invention [FIXED]"
"Don't. Stop. Japan!"
"Don't Stop Me Now"
"Saw this on /r/gifs and couldn't resist"
"4-3-2-1 Blast-Off!"
"Inappropriate Father's Day sale"
"Spoil your father for fathers day"
"Spoil dad this Father's day.."
"Spoil fathers day.. (first post)"
"Interesting and descriptive title"
"How I felt when I considered posting a funny comment about someone with Downs for Karma"
"Paranormal Blacktivity"
"Walk It Off."
"Gangrene is some gross shit."
"A quick reminder."
"When the conversation turns to politics"
"When a post of mine gets several negative responses"
"I embarrassed myself in public and this is how I felt"
"MRW when my girlfriends mom walks in on us fooling around."
"When I repost something by mistake"
"So I went to see what the buzz is about at /r/spacedicks"
"Everytime I visit /r/WTF"
"When browsing /r/wtf"
"No title just enjoy."
"Sunrise and the International Space Station (STS-119)"
"I love this kid"
"Gifs  I need your help. I have an obsession with this gif for no reason. I need to know where it is from."
"When I think of never having to do chemistry and math ever again."
"How I feel finishing my exams and having 3 months of summer"
"Its my cakeday Reddit! This is me waking up in the morning remembering this."
"Power of the Boogie [6:03]"
"What day is it?!?!"
"When I saw that Harvard was interested in me"
"2 Fabulous 2 Furious"
"Fabulosity rating: OFF THE CHARTS"
"FABULOUS"
"I've got the Power"
"I can't stop watching this. How?"
"I spend a lot of time thinking about Sonic"
"Which one of you have this as your OK Cupid profile?"
"The very best of OKCupid."
"A typical day at Goldman Sachs."
"This Is How I Imagine Romney"
"Lemme break it down for you"
"We're not in Kansas anymore  Toto."
"Oh don't mind me  just doing a little spring cleaning!"
"You'd think she'd like being all dressed up."
"Not Skyrim  it's Iceland. (crosspost from /r/spaceporn)"
"Oh the internet!"
"So THAT is what it means!"
"Yoda + Ewok = ?"
"Seems legit..."
"Obersee Lake  Berchtesgaden National Park  Germany"
"Where does the line start?"
"No tongue  please!"
"Kitty kissing booth"
"I Deer you!!!"
"I deer you.."
"say it to my face!"
"Remember to always park your truck in a safe spot..."
"How to make a truck magically disappear."
"Imagine playing  any game you love."
"Timing"
"Sup shorty."
"give me 5!"
"What every girl wants"
"Still counts!"
"Nope. Nope nope nope."
"When was the last time you were this happy? [Gif]"
"Meanwhile in China..."
"The story so far... [UPDATE]"
"An old picture I found on a /b/ thread."
"I was in a bar..."
"Mind=Blown"
"Just how insignificant we really are... [gif]"
"Your Mind will be Blown"
"Me while watching: &quot;Yeah...okay  sure....so?......fine......not surprised.....what I thought....impressive  but yeah.....so it's big?.....yep........damn............shit..............seriously?....................fuck...................fuuuuuuuuuuuuuck&quot;"
"I thought it was going to be another one of those &quot;Scale of the Universe&quot; things...nope. Wait for it."
"2001: A GIF Odyssey"
"Some men.."
"Realistic Potter"
"If you see someone drowning..."
"How insensitive"
"Laughter is the best solution"
"There's a joke here somewhere but the cuteness is distracting."
"not sure if this should be posted to r/foodporn..."
"Pug Life"
"Hamster is always watching you"
"He's watching."
"The hamster is always watching"
"Somebody's watching me..."
"Hamster is always watching you"
"He watches...he ALWAYS watches."
"My first one. Evil Hampster."
"when my friend says she doesn't like nutella"
"how i responded when my brother said pokemon isn't real"
"Every time I see Joffery in Game of Thrones"
"To Paul Ryan and his speech"
"How Reddit feels about Paul Ryan."
"I want a hangover just to enjoy the full effect of this drink"
"Is this ever going to be released?"
"Oh Deadpool. . . ."
"WTF Pakistan International Airline Ad"
"No one is in charge - and honestly  that's even cooler."
"Adam Savage On the Universe"
"Girls having fun"
"Staredown"
"every fucking morning"
"Brief summary of reddit's traffic stats during Obama's AMA (NSFW)"
"My reaction to NSFW posts with Asian girls"
"I don't think many Christians seem to remember the first four."
"Man asks do I know you. Says No I dont. Walks away. Files police report"
"Searching for an animated unicorn gif when all of a sudden.."
"One of the greatest pictures ever."
"this picture..."
"The slide for bad kids."
"Post birth child abortion."
"That's why I never got a doll"
"And people ask me why I don't like dolls."
"Made me laugh harder than it should have"
"Whatcha thinking about?"
"Sharks are respected"
"Shark antimagnet"
"annually."
"Check out this Chick's pussy (SFW)"
"Friends"
"Cuddly kitten &amp; chick."
"I love baby animals"
"Our new babysitter is kind of a bitch... [Fixed]"
"This is what happens every time I try to not procrastinate..."
"Hitler looking at the Gustav Rail Gun (1942)"
"Holy Shit!"
"Almost finished..."
"Sometimes you need to nap in the middle of your snack."
"The first day of the rest of your life..."
"How Reddit motivates me"
"Our universe versus. parallel universe."
"Our universe vs. alternate universe"
"Amazingly timed photograph"
"Camera shutter synced with helicopter blades"
"I found this to be quite smashing."
"Waking up early on a vacation day"
"MFW my ex tells me her latest boyfriend has been cheating on her."
"Bill Nye Delivers!"
"Beautiful Dance Moves"
"A Mathematicians dance moves"
"my DOMAIN is the dance floor."
"I was looking up help for a math problem and found this. Was not dissapointed"
"Pardon me  wash my what?"
"Give this man a medal"
"Day Diver"
"Stahp"
"Donald Duck stares into your soul"
"You know you want these."
"Sums up every youtube comment"
"This just about sums everything up on YouTube"
"Not even once."
"My buddy did this during some midnight editing"
"Not even once"
"Albino Chimps are adorable."
"Young Albino Chimp"
"You are not alone"
"How i feel browsing Reddit lately"
"How i feel browsing Reddit lately"
"Booty Cup Flip"
"Who wants to play flip cup?"
"It's a matter of taste"
"Not Sure if Eye of Sauron or Portal"
"I suddenly had the urge to play Portal."
"This is what I feel like every time I post something on Reddit."
"Looks kind of like Rapture from Bioshock (x-post from r/scuba)"
"Aquarium scuba diving"
"For 3000 users  SNSD GIF dump! Some are repeats  but definitely worthy."
"Dumbleroar"
"The MGM logo gets an update"
"If reddit was a movie.."
"Look at my gun!"
"And I don't care who knows it!!"
"Brainwashed Mormon"
"Source of this Pic?"
"Taft Inauguration"
"Cats in a nutshell."
"Mmmmmmmmmm"
"Marriage is only between a man and a woman? Really?"
"&quot;Marriage must be as it is defined in the Bible!&quot; Really? Are you SURE you know what that means?"
"The Biblical Definition Of Marriage"
"Which biblical marriage?"
"this scared the shit out of me"
"When I watched an old episode of Ren &amp; Stimpy and I heard the phrase &quot;Peruvian Butt Plug.&quot;"
"When I found out Lance Armstrong is being stripped of all his Tour de France victories"
"Scuba Cat"
"Security for Satan"
"A picture of someone's cat."
"Yes  yes you can."
"This is  and forever will be  my favorite cat picture"
"This hungry cat always makes me laugh"
"She wanted to try a burger"
"Can I has cheezburger when the cheezburger comes"
"Find the cat"
"Vote up if you found the cat"
"Can you find CAT in picture!?"
"Find the cat."
"Too many cats. r/aww needs golden retrievers"
"When it's OK to say FFFFFUUUUUUUU"
"New Barbie. Um ok  noted."
"Does she  now?"
"Secret Service cat doing his job"
"Little funny death comic."
"Low Self-Esteem."
"This has always been my favorite Cyanide and Happiness comic..."
"Seaplane carrier... (favorite picture of all time)"
"You had ONE job!"
"Feel like being the troll of the elevator in your building? If yes  follow the instructions."
"Hipster level: 99"
"So I found this on my feed today..."
"Like a sir!"
"Guess the Browser."
"Instantly."
"Purify yourself!"
"The Klan's Day Out"
"8 Things We Would Not Know Without Wikileaks (Infographic)"
"Toaster USB hub with toast flash drives"
"Toaster USB hub with toast flash drives"
"Oh thumbdrive  you so silly"
"All you haters suck my balls."
"Put your finger"
"You wont' be disappointed [gif]"
"You will enjoy this."
"Put your finger here"
"For my cake day I give you this."
"I raise you everything and give you  the Lamprey"
"Most WTF headline ever"
"My new comeback"
"A classy new way to respond to stupid fundie claims (X-post from r/funny)"
"HIFW My gaming PC breaks the 1st day of the Steam Summer Sale"
"When I don't know the answer to the first question on an Exam."
"Whenever I miss my chance to get top comment  because I arrived too late."
"It's funny because it's true."
"Once you hate someone"
"Meanwhile in Flordia"
"Best reaction to a zombie ever."
"Best reaction to a zombie ever. (xpost from r/funny)"
"Reddit's reaction whenever I post something I think is funny"
"I had no idea on what to do when this came out  but it was fun and still is"
"I have the strangest boner... yea"
"For those with squid fetishes....enjoy. NSFW"
"Another icon of childhood reveals a dark side!"
"Where did his hair go?"
"An Olympic swimmer next to an Olympic gymnast"
"The friend that was always there for you!"
"Poor Lance Armstrong..."
"I actually hope this is a repost so I don't have to give Facebook credit."
"I know it's a repost  but it still gives me a chuckle."
"just a wolf jumping over a fence"
"GIF Sound Mashups"
"Perfection [gif][Fixed]"
"My stride? Ain't nothing gonna break it."
"Strolling Down The Slope"
"Stunning Photo of Atlantic-Norway Ocean Highway"
"Soon..."
"With. Out. Fail."
"As A Guy Who Can't Get Black 2 Until The 19th  This Is Me All Week"
"Hexagonal Columns formed by Lava"
"Could be worse"
"Im gong to hell for laughing at this but still"
"Dear Iceburg "
"Guys she's made the jump"
"She could see the future from back in 1969"
"Trying something new"
"I'm not very Romantic..."
"Bang bang  my baby shot me down..."
"This Dog is Awesome"
"God's gift to women?"
"This has been circulating on Facebook. Anyone have good troll ideas or responses as to why the Pres can't control gas prices?"
"This emu is a fucking pimp."
"I buy these so I can throw away a plant every 5 months"
"Drink dine dance"
"Nightclub photos..."
"Yeah... I think you've both had enough of that first option."
"Guess he's a southpaw."
"WE ARE NOT WORTHY"
"Road trip mix CD."
"Is This The Real Life?"
"Frog fucking fish face"
"Shut the fuck up"
"Shut the fuck up"
"My favorite drinking buddy"
"i live in a glass house... er  shell..."
"what a douche"
"Told the pizza guy to 'fuck this bitch up with bacon'. His response: 'I'm gonna murder that motherfucker with bacon'."
"This is one of those pictures where you look back and think  &quot;Oh God...what was I thinking?&quot;"
"Harry Potter: The Later Years"
"I'll take three (NSFW)"
"I don't even"
"My favorite part of bath time when I was a kid..."
"The best part of having a bath as a kid"
"The thing about smart mother fuckers is..."
"Ink in water"
"thought you guys might be interested."
"batman goes nomnomnom"
"Batman is hungry"
"trying to figure out a costume for hunger games tonight with friends. have no idea what it's about. finally settled on going as a &quot;hunger game.&quot;"
"looking for a hunger games costume for the movie tonight. no idea what it's about. settled on going as a &quot;hunger game&quot;"
"Oh...alright then."
"Who likes tiny palm-sized baby Pandas?"
"table"
"Cat fight"
"You can't grow a tree.."
"I HAVE A DREAM!"
"After many painful crate openings it finally happened!"
"A great quote from Susan B. Anthony"
"Susan B. Anthony"
"something to remember this tuesday..."
"Turns out Lance Armstrong didn't use Drugs..."
"The FINAL Definitive News on Lance Armstrong"
"Goddamnit Lance."
"Everyone's reaction when my fart text ringtone went off during my exam in my lecture hall today..."
"My mom's tech impaired friends' reaction to me setting up their printer."
"Finding out that Bayonetta 2 is exclusive to the WiiU"
"Before there were XBOX Live achievements..."
"Happy 54th birthday to Bill Watterson  creator of Calvin and Hobbes!"
"A Russian Motorcycle"
"Finally my Facebook feed came up with some good old fashioned WTF?!"
"Having fun while gaming"
"meanwhile on a russian beach....."
"More Jam Mom..."
"Just a great dane  sitting on the London underground  like a boss"
"First cakeday  favorite gif."
"Awkward Bathroom Stall moment"
"Awesome hotel in Zaandam  Netherlands"
"Dream Honeymoon Spot"
"Would You Like to Be in This Hotel?"
"SHOW ME YOUR WAR FACE"
"Show me your war face"
"How I feel when i preform oral sex on a woman"
"Every time Annoying Childhood Friend came to visit"
"Bang  bang  bang on the door baby. (First gifsound)"
"The Truth About Diglett"
"Meth Lab."
"Whenever I see a 'TIL' that I've known about for years"
"Halloween has changed"
"South Park Family Portrait"
"Water on Mars...... Picture taken by nasa and proved."
"When I receive 10+ upvotes"
"Floating Lanterns - Thailand - by Patrice Carlton"
"Thousand of Taiwanese killed by demon fire bags falling from the sky."
"Jesus parties hard."
"Jesus is a lightweight"
"What probably happened."
"Noticed this written on a keyboard in radio shack"
"These moves get all the ladies."
"Bioluminescent phytoplankton in Cape Town"
"Felis catus leporidae"
"Crunchy nut doritos"
"These always get me."
"The real reason the Nazis lost."
"I Googled &quot;Facepalm&quot; and found this."
"Took me 3 hours...but I finally did it..."
"Not much but the furthest I ever got (SMB)"
"Nope  still not a single fuck"
"&quot;Yay! The sun is finally out! I love summer!&quot;"
"When it happens we're all screwed."
"I've found the best movie ever!"
"A poor old man .....oh wait."
"It's been a weird day on the train..."
"This is my November (x-post from Movember)"
"Cash or I'll vote for him (from facebook timeline)"
"He must be rich by now."
"After visiting 9gag and 4chan for the first time..."
"She want the ph(d)"
"Pint sized terror"
"Sorry this may creep you out a bit"
"My reaction when somebody tells me I look creepy in a wifebeater."
"My neighbor found a dead bird and got it tested. The bird was carrying Nile Fever. My new reaction to all mosquitoes around the house..."
"samuel l jackson"
"my fav fruit"
"Equine hug"
"Darkwing duck is good at guitar hero"
"When math needs to be done"
"hl3 confirmed."
"Seems Legit"
"Clinton nostalgia"
"Who I imagine is upvoting all the reposts..."
"who i imagine reposters are"
"I made a downvote gif from Jmc1077's post"
"on a clear day  you can cycle forever..."
"Hey boys.."
"Big sharp NOPE"
"I see your little devils spawn blobfish and raise you a Finding Nemo Villian"
"I see your little devil spawn blobfish and raise you this angler fish."
"I see your Blobfish  sea pig  and hag fish  and raise you an angry angler"
"Diablo In The Living Room [x-post-diablofunny]"
"As I pass one year on reddit the reality is setting in."
"No more internet for me today. NSFL"
"Gangsta as fuck."
"When I agree with someone who has been downvoted  then get downvoted myself."
"To me  this is the essence of WTF"
"Who could be grumpy at a face like that?"
"I came"
"Quite humorous I must say"
"CABLE TIGER"
"tiger made of zip cords."
"tiger made of zip cords. (x-post /r/mildlyinteresting)"
"I love that this happened"
"Uh oh..."
"Perfectly my case .."
"So my friend asked Siri a question today..."
"Well screw you too Siri!"
"My sister's having a lot of fun with her new iPhone"
"African or European?"
"Oh  Siri"
"With a bunch of friends when Siri decided to say this out of nowhere"
"Tell me a joke about Chris Brown and Rihanna"
"&quot;Historically Hardcore&quot; brought to you by the Smithsonian."
"Indecisive Indy."
"Sometimes  timing is everything..."
"Deciding whether or not to make a funny comment that could piss someone off"
"When I saw that the Curiosity team AMA actually wasn't full of pun threads and circlejerks."
"3-D Pac-Man Chalk Art"
"3-D Pac-Man Chalk Art"
"How I feel with a Mac during the Steam Summer Sale"
"How I feel as a mac user seeing all the Borderlands posts."
"No big deal."
"How women see me at the bar"
"1 beer  please."
"Saw this on r/trees but it definitely belongs here (Carl Sagan)"
"animated spray paint motorcycle"
"the night dominator"
"Searched &quot;weird&quot; on Google. This is what popped up."
"When my girlfriend falls asleep and I go to play games.."
"Cycles attached to these railings will be removed"
"Let me give you a hand with that."
"So exciting!"
"It only took Gabe 4 years to go crazy."
"Oh Google  I see what you did there."
"Googled &quot;anagram&quot;"
"What we may have saw in our textbooks."
"I checked out a book from the library. And got this..."
"A plea to my cat"
"The Rock smuggles guns onto Splash Mountain in Disney."
"Every time someone starts an interesting story"
"MANLY!!!!"
"parenting 101"
"Free advice from the Internet"
"Have you tryed switching it off and back on again..."
"Excited Lama"
"When someone says 1 Direction are better then the Beatles"
"Just called back a number a minute after it called me and it's disconnected. - Imgur"
"Someone in my class said 9GAG was a funny site"
"My girlfriend made this for me"
"Cupcake puppies?"
"Just a dog and some cupcakes"
"Princeton Students after a 1893 snowball fight between freshmen and sophomores."
"Best Wi-Fi name!"
"Bill's wifi?"
"Spinning decks."
"DJ in the muthafuckin house"
"American Gandhi"
"Bowling: You couldn't be doing it more wrong"
"-300 [.GIF]"
"Bowling"
"Bowling"
"A Different Type of Crotch Shot"
"Too soon"
"tanning naked?"
"To all my fellow redditors who went and saw TDKR and had to get up for work early this morning..."
"Response to every link on /r/mildyinfuriating"
"How I feel when i see a post get shot down due to bad grammar"
"Every time I see Garrus."
"My new boss' reaction when I let slip that I'm a redditor..."
"Looked up batman found this"
"this is bad  but i couldn't stop laughing"
"Last name walking."
"not sure if srs.."
"So I play Magic: the Gathering pretty much every week with this guy."
"Are they going to add more detailed features/locations to the Maps app?!"
"Fuck streets  here's some useless 3D buildings."
"This sofa looks very comfy...wait  what?"
"This is what we're doing with them when you're not looking (NSFW)"
"That makes my musical brains hurt"
"Tan Lines of Summer"
"Just found this baby polar bear getting tickled"
"Playing with yourself..."
"He does it so gently (x-posted from r/LotR)"
"RELEASE ME  HUMAN."
"This picture makes me oddly uncomfortable"
"Masonic Tool Chest"
"The Best Side of the Moon"
"I think this is your stop..."
"I dare you to break into my house"
"My one and only friend."
"Ewww.. That better be some sort of candy."
"How I feel when the girl I plan on marrying breaks up with me:"
"Listening to Muse: 2nd Law (2012) remembering how awesome Origin of Symmetry (2001) is."
"Pic from Hubble - Makes my head hurt thinking about how many galaxies and stars are out there! [Source - BBC Website  link in comments]"
"80s family portrait"
"Easy does it..oh shit! OH SHIT!"
"Gonna get it !"
"Transformers: Revenge of the fallen."
"Satan: more powerful than God."
"It's like rows of crayons."
"Pretend pistols"
"PewPew says my pistols"
"In my life so far in school  this is the only main thing where I want to rip someones head off"
"In my life so far in school  this is the most minor thing that makes me want to rip someones head off"
"Eagle owl in flight"
"Flying Owl"
"Which face should I do next?"
"A dying breed  but one of my favorites."
"Still makes me laugh every damn time"
"Why do you ask?"
"Lava."
"Lava"
"A friendly way to alert people of potholes."
"Am I the only one who thinks this upon seeing a check with a DSLR?"
"Everytime I see someone post a photography album to facebook"
"Cowasaki"
"Oktoberfest: Redditor from Munich here! This is my walk to work in the morning..."
"Munich redditor kills a bunch of innocent bystanders then snaps a pic  all for that sweet second-degree karma"
"what I saw on my way to work"
"My roflcopter goes SOI SOI SOI SOI SOI"
"The rofl copter is coming for you (Knife Party Remix)"
"Ok reddit. What are your favorite gifs? I'll start."
"Ain't no one fuck with tiny hippo. [REPOST]"
"tiny hippo"
"How to lose business fast [Fixed]"
"Jews dont like to visit this shop."
"lag"
"Fucking lag..."
"Not sure if a repost but made me laugh"
"Great Steve Jobs Editorial Cartoon"
"When Steve Jobs got to heaven..."
"This is why Batman hate Search engines?"
"HOLY SHIT A STICK!"
"I think they are onto something here."
"Only thing missing is a kitten."
"Oh hello there."
"Soon."
"Shower logic"
"Batman Rises.."
"YOU DON'T KNOW MAN"
"The Fountain of Doubt"
"Just bought this game on eBay and I could really use one of these right about now."
"Game Genie"
"Dem Moonwalk skills"
"My favourite headline ever!"
"Making the headlines! (crosspost from /r/pics)"
"Can I interest you in a cupful of ferret?"
"How I feel whenever I'm in the presence of a 9FAG"
"Only two Redditors showed to last night's meetup. I still think it went okay.[NSFW]"
"I love me some Dickerdoodles!"
"Baby’s First Baby  Now with real Pregnancy Action"
"D:"
"Greatest cat photobomb ever."
"Porn for redditers"
"Thor's sister"
"Thor's sister"
"Thor's sister"
"A new twist on Chia Pets"
"My girlfriend wants a new house  patio  pond  brand new kitchen  home cinema AND some privacy from the kids. Here's what I've got:"
"My first attempt at one of these"
"Unce Unce Unce Unce"
"What is love?"
"My reaction with the new girls at my school"
"Too soon?"
"Wicked skateboard trick!"
"She knows the difference between you're and your..."
"What is love? from a 6 year old"
"What is love? as interpreted by a 6 year old"
"Woke up this morning  and realized its fooooottballl seasonnn!"
"Ducklings with mom"
"Your Halloween costumes ain't got nothin' on this one."
"Seagull Retaliation"
"And On That Day..."
"The truth is revealed"
"Luckiest cat in the whole damn world"
"Finding out the Feds shut Megaupload down"
"When 9gag claims they invented memes. [Fixed]"
"To every redditor who downvoted my new puppy"
"Talking about Games that should get a HD remake..."
"Spiderman's a pimp"
"The Stokkur Geyser in Iceland has erupted every 4-8 minutes since a 1789 earthquake - here it is a split second before erupting."
"Fjord in Norway"
"You can never have enough of these fjords."
"Just some ink and water."
"Every time a friend shows me something I saw on reddit"
"What it's like being friends with a Redditor"
"Every dinner with a newly converted Redditor friend."
"When ever I get a &quot;Funny Friday&quot; Email at work.."
"How I feel when facing someone in FIFA/NHL online and they won't skip the replay of their goal"
"When a non-redditor shows you a &quot;new meme&quot;"
"When my non-redditor friends show me something funny"
"How I feel when my friends show me things they found on the Internet"
"My friend recently became a redditor. This is how I feel during class when he tries to show me pictures."
"When my roommate shows me post on Facebook that I saw on Reddit a week ago"
"Goddammit Jesus  stop doing that"
"The best way to feel like you're making a difference in the world...(FIXED)"
"We all have this type of friend..."
"A man and his plant"
"Can we all agree that this guy is the coolest man ever?"
"NOW you die"
"boots and cats"
"Damn cool"
"It's so....true"
"Now I want both."
"He will be a redditor someday"
"I'm just gonna leave this here."
"Demons! Leave this baby's body!"
"Allrighty"
"The hardest concept known to man. [FIXED]"
"Browsing facebook  when suddenly..."
"I want you"
"Why volleyball is awesome"
"Why volleyball is awesome"
"Please tell me this is real and not Photoshop."
"When I see that I'm on the big screen in an electronics shop"
"Best picture I've seen all day!"
"What chalk looks like under the microscope"
"This is chalk  magnified [pic]"
"This guy really doesn't care about the size of your jeans"
"I absolutely love this man"
"Someone  somewhere..."
"Someone  somewhere..."
"Just Gollum"
"My reaction to all these nasty fish poping up"
"Boy  that escalated quickly..."
"&quot;You develop an instant global consciousness&quot;."
"Swimming with portals"
"Dear DICE  make this happen"
"fuck that shit [&gt;2mb gif]"
"What are they transporting?"
"Terrorist Plot in My Math Textbook"
"Interesting response on my phonics test today..."
"It's my ball... mine."
"Upon finally hitting 2 000 link karma...phew"
"Bad Luck Brian took a trip to Gotham."
"Bad Luck Brian trying to be more spontaneous"
"This show gave me courage as a kid"
"Yep. I know that feeling well."
"OH  THE HORROR!!!!"
"No! don't eat that OMGG!"
"Computing skills"
"Had to leave the pup with the in-laws last weekend. MFW they send me pics of him."
"This is how waking up from a dream where your post made first place feels"
"Came back from a trip to Amsterdam to find I'd missed my first cakeday"
"Can I get a source for this gif please?"
"mfw my buddy grabs the last beer the fridge."
"I think I forgot to stop my stopwatch..."
"So I Found Out Why My Battery Was Dying Fast."
"The Genious Who Invented Planking"
"The ultimate in Parental Trolling - Frogdad"
"Oh look at that vagi-whaaat?!"
"What is this I don't even"
"Floating island"
"My favorite photobomb"
"The Perfect Card"
"How Redditors Roll"
"Damn straight."
"‎&quot;In that brief moment  more things lived and died in that universe than we could possibly imagine.&quot;"
"Marijuana - Harmless?"
"The problem with pre-ordering anything  especially the Nexus Tablet"
"Put him in the friend zone!"
"As an IT Professional... This guy is my IDOL!"
"America's Got Talent 1930."
"Now this was entertainment... anybody can jump over cars."
"My gambling addiction started here"
"This is where my allowance went every week as a child."
"the choice is yours"
"&quot;Say my name!!!&quot;"
"Must be true then"
"I'm 30  just bought the first new car I've ever owned. Haven't had it 24 hours and someones already doored it."
"Fat Cat cooking"
"Would not recommend."
"Get me 5 cases!"
"Full &amp; Highest Resolution  Evil George Washington"
"What the flying fuck"
"I gave my life for you"
"Just an elephant...visiting a sea lion."
"Saw this unstoppable machine on my newsfeed and had to share it."
"FUCK YEAAHHHHH!!!!!"
"There's always that one guy. Every goddamn time."
"Its my cake day and i really dont have anything to share sooooo"
"I dont really have anything good to share on my cake day sooo... howbout dis?"
"DOG  now in GIFSound!"
"I'm a.."
"I dare you not to laugh..."
"YEs"
"You are who you make yourself. [X-Post from r/GetMotivated]"
"Friend called to tell me I missed my cake day"
"How I feel when I read anything &quot;Batman&quot;  let alone 'spoiler'."
"How I feel about all these &quot;cleverbot fight&quot; posts"
"To everyone voicing their opinion on Chick-Fil-A  this is what I say to you."
"It's my cake day."
"My reaction the the Obama AMA"
"I don't have an iPhone. My reaction to every post bitching about iOS 6."
"How i feel as a non american about these posts about the presidential debate"
"Just saw GameStop's Black Friday sales ad scans..."
"when you see it.."
"Please tell me one of you knows how to make this."
"If people are going to worship a fictional character  they may as well pick a better one."
"Thought you guys would like this."
"Optimus Prime vs. Jesus Christ"
"point proven."
"I thought this Optimus Primve vs Jesus comparison chart was stupid  until I got to the &quot;Success Rate&quot; one and it made me think a bit more."
"Why you shouldn't steal food at work."
"It's called teamwork  Trevor."
"And where have you been all night?"
"Change my litter  I gotta pee."
"There was ice in the bottom to give it weight. Gotta love roommates."
"MILK!"
"Tubular sunset  dude"
"So True..."
"What I think about religion"
"This seems fair to me!"
"Religion is like a penis"
"Religion is like a what???"
"I couldn't agree more"
"How to get viewers for a crappy TV-show"
"Can someone explain this?"
"It's not a party until this happens"
"It's not a party until this happens [xpost from pics]"
"Telling everyone I'm fine after the breakup"
"Learning at a young age"
"Once the best  always the best."
"I NEED this jacket. You don't understand..."
"Shredding a tidal wave of whiskey"
"picked up this dandy jacket at a yard sale for $4.00"
"Sucks to suck  Jim."
"And this is what I think of your Brazilian Lulista political views..."
"The bank I work at is an old swimming pool"
"Kevin  what happened?!"
"&quot;Hey guys  pranking people is getting boring. Let's try pranking animals!&quot; &quot;Brilliant Tim!&quot;"
"If anyone asks me to do anything after 5:00PM today  this is how I will calmly respond."
"How I feel as a female on reddit today"
"Every time I'm on the phone with Verizon tech support"
"Fly creationism"
"Just pray about it"
"They can fix you if you're gay AND NOW if you're Asian. ಠ_ಠ"
"Welcome to the U.S."
"I guess there's still hope...."
"Finally found some facebook gold. [fixed]"
"I finally found some Facebook gold!"
"My free time in elementary school. [FIXED]"
"Meanwhile... In r/new"
"going through r/new"
"A word to those starting college this year"
"This is why I shop online..."
"Conga Cat"
"Subway Baby!"
"A boy and his elephant that is all (x/post from aww)"
"How is this not r/gaming's favorite game?"
"Oh youtubers."
"I wish my parties were this fun..."
"Iron Man / The Avengers"
"Wallpaper Collection (1920x1080)+"
"Penguins on an Iceberg"
"Ordinary Batman Adventure Problems"
"Poor batman"
"Plitvice  Croatia"
"Take my money now"
"I just googled &quot;what is reddit?&quot; this is the 13th result"
"My son facepalming like Picard."
"My son facepalming like Picard (X-post from pics)"
"Baby Picard"
"So my friend got hit by a volleyball at work last night"
"Life of a cameraman at a volleyball game (x-post r/pics)"
"How to shut up a nagging wife. [nsfw]"
"I am not here..."
"Wife asked me when I was coming home? I sent her a picture of a pile of paperwork on my desk. Later this evening she sent me this text. I was about to tear up."
"I fucking love bunnys!"
"how i felt having both a migraine  and my allergies flare up yesterday"
"Take A Ride On My Tower of Pisa"
"Pocahontas..Smashing!"
"COME ROLL IN ALL THE RICHES ALL AROUND YO-"
"Hey Jude Flowchart"
"Flow chart for my favourite song by the Beatles"
"Flow chart for my favourite song by the Beatles"
"How I feel when someone starts singing &quot;Call Me Maybe&quot;"
"I Give You Bunny-Cat"
"Becoming an atheist"
"This is the world we are leaving to the future generations."
"Upvote To The Face  Bitch!"
"How did this happen?"
"Are you in compliance?"
"A new way to play video games? [NSFW]"
"Posted on boyfriends new account for him to show him how  already has more karma..."
"Once in a lifetime"
"Dalvin and Holly"
"Silly T-Rex"
"T-Rex Hates Pushups."
"Me too T-Rex"
"Nope...Nope...Nope..Call in the Nuke Strike"
"NOPE! i could hardly post this"
"Googled &quot;nope&quot;. I guess I got what I was looking for."
"He speaks the truth!"
"Air Horn Prank"
"Good morning."
"Air horn prank"
"Presidential Pie"
"&quot;Stop Eating My Strawberry Cake!&quot;"
"How I feel when the Adderall I took a 1/2 hour ago suddenly kicks in."
"I just won an eBay auction by two seconds and this is how I feel."
"How I feel when I win a game of CSS when all other teammates are dead..."
"How getting on the front page felt"
"My reaction when I beat a Korean at StarCraft."
"Lie to me Pinocchio"
"Lie to me pinocchio..."
"Macbook pro."
"Seems legit."
"Radio 2 - Unsung heroes of the billboards."
"Photographer's little helper"
"Smart little guy!"
"Carol never wore her safety goggles..."
"Today is the day"
"Today is the day"
"I must try this."
"You messed with the wrong family"
"Chewbaccas gone down the wrong road..."
"Look at all the fucks I give."
"Koo Koo the Bird Girl."
"He can shoot it down with that?"
"Whatcha lookin at cat?"
"Too much bacon? Nahhhh"
"I took this pic of my frozen windshield  and I think it kind of looks like a mountain range."
"Frozen windshield [x-post from /r/mildlyinteresting]"
"Don't worry about me  Get the car!"
"Shit your truck."
"Stunderwater Sneak"
"When shouting &quot;Fuck tha po-lice!&quot; just won't do."
"So very true."
"Definitely doing this next time I'm in a Disney store"
"Just chilling with my bitch"
"Don't Mess With Rabbits!"
"Bad kitty   wait WUT ?"
"How every fight ends with my girlfriend"
"Found this on FB.. Thought id leave this here"
"Sesame Street on ice cream"
"Sherbert"
"When someone sits down in front of me  blocking my view of the cinema screen."
"Can't. Stop. Watching."
"Roller Coaster"
"Grandpa Redditor"
"*gulp* Stuffed Friend [comic]"
"This made me WTF... Also I checked and this was posted like 2 years ago. Don't click the link if you're going to have a repost hating cirlclejerk..."
"Clarissa makes a new friend."
"Jesus no here"
"fuckkkk..."
"bats are awesome"
"Just wanted to jump by and say hi.."
"Clint Eastwood and baby Armadillo. What does Reddit think?"
"Charming"
"It's my birthday and this is hilarious."
"Not so clever"
"EXTREMELY realistic cupcakes [NSFW]"
"Find it quite funny how much I used to love getting this in a happy meal...anybody else with me?"
"The Blood of the Lamb shall cleanse us....right?"
"The spirits told them to... [xpost from wtf]"
"The Sufi dervish treatment for health or addiction problems."
"Parenting: You are doing it right"
"This is how MY dog greets me when I come home from work..."
"Gets me every time!"
"Dick in the box."
"1) Cut a hole in the box"
"White people problems"
"So I just realized I'll be off the internet for the next 10 weeks and my first cakeday is this month.."
"Went to wedding  met guy  talked and flirted with guy for 5 HOURS  find out said guy is engaged at end of night..."
"My reaction to Imgur's maintenance  when all I want to do is look at this heartbreaking photo of parents and their dying daughter."
"Finding out I have Strep throat 4 hours before an open bar party in a private club..."
"Basically reddit right now"
"Clutch can be an asshole sometimes."
"Oh today's your cakeday?"
"Happy birthday to tha ground!!"
"Posting my favorite picture on Reddit for my cake day."
"Music Stars: Now vs. Then"
"The eyes..."
"How couches are made"
"Thank you to all my fans"
"find the cat..."
"Mine."
"Don't you hate when this happens?"
"Meta Photobomb."
"At fancy dinner with the president of the university  one of the college deans and I suddenly arrive at the fact that we're both redditors."
"I got fired  and realized I'd never have to deal with my horrible boss again."
"When I open my news feed  and see nothing but bible verses."
"The Shawshank Omelette"
"He strikes again"
"AOL (1996) vs. Windows 8 (2012)"
"Importance of history."
"Seriously?"
"God is amazing!!"
"And my childhood is now ruined."
"childhood ruined"
"As a German  this is why I love Euro Cup and World Cup  its the only time this doesn't apply"
"Shhhh..."
"Just like the olden days"
"Play with the moon..."
"Moon Shots"
"You like things that look shopped but aren't? Try this!"
"Hydrogen Peroxide Potassium Iodide burst"
"Well.."
"FOR SCIENCE!!!"
"Hydrogen peroxide mixed with potassium iodide"
"Coming home after a week long family vacation"
"Crack Cat"
"Kitten escape!!"
"Just in case you haven't seen this stereo gif before:"
"Surface tension"
"Truck vs Wind."
"You Shall Not Pass!!"
"That time when you stretch and your bones go pop pop pop pop and everyone stares at you like this"
"When the urinals have no divider"
"Just a Bird Feeding its Baby"
"Feeding time"
"And Then There's Mark..."
"mark is not a creative man."
"http://imgur.com/7VOph"
"I know these have become commonplace  but she's 22."
"Mesmerizing"
"How I feel at school on 4/20"
"Every. Damn. Morning."
"Ballooooonnnn... what is with that dude's belly button?"
"the moment you find out your girlfriends phone died"
"Oh Asia  not again."
"Goats don't give no shit."
"I do what I want!!"
"Baaaaaadass"
"How I imagine people on /r/aww"
"Venom emerging from a tennis ball.jpg"
"Venom emerges from a tennisball"
"Venom"
"D'Awwww"
"Just a nibble!"
"It's always phunny in silladelphia. (x-post from /r/IASIP)"
"MFW I found out the company I want to work for doesn't drug test"
"How I react when I finally see what they're talking about in &quot;When You See It&quot;"
"Gives me shivers"
"When my post goes from negative to positive karma"
"Your beverage  sir."
"Its my first cakeday  so here's a random image from my personal &quot;WTF&quot; folder!"
"Whenever i try to hit on girls."
"Whenever I try to impress a girl."
"God found him!"
"Whenever someone writes &quot;EDIT: Why are you downvoting?&quot; Or something similar."
"The difference between the iPhone 4s and 5."
"Found this neat style of art."
"You know that American politics have gotten out of hand when this motherfucker wades into the fray."
"Parenting"
"Why does this tickle me so much."
"Baby Chameleons"
"Baby Chameleons"
"complete 180"
"Don't abuse your computer"
"Well  that escalated quickly..."
"People Who Shouldn't RAP"
"So this is what it looked like downtown Manhattan...(the water funneled into the World Trade Center construction)"
"Beans Motherfucker."
"Expectations."
"As we know  camping can be intents"
"The coolest tattoo ever"
"nom nom nom"
"An X-Ray of a Stingray"
"X-Ray of a Stingray"
"Now this is a portrait!"
"Hand guy"
"I call him handman"
"Erm... ?"
"Just pimped the shit outta my dog!"
"Ain't nuthin but a g' thang  baby."
"Thats my dawg."
"Mime."
"What About A Catapult? (xpost from r/funny)"
"My thoughts on how Assange might get to ecuador."
"LOTR Catapults"
"This just keeps getting better and better"
"Who remembers this great show?"
"The reason flamethrowers were invented"
"Nope...nope...nope!"
"What would it take for you to slowly walk through this?"
"Decisions  decisions."
"Welcome to the English language."
"Welcome to the English language..."
"Notorious B.I.G. as a kid"
"If you could reason with religious people  there would be no religious people."
"Sex change operation"
"I fucking LOVE passports"
"OH MY GOD!"
"Down for the count..."
"After a night of drinking"
"How I feel after landing from a Ryanair flight"
"This popped up on my FB feed"
"R-Money just dropped his new album"
"R-Money just keepin' it real"
"found this today on facebook"
"R-Money: Binders Fulla Women"
"Binder$ Fulla Women"
"R-Money's Debut Album (x-post /r/4chan)"
"Romney's Rapping Career"
"R-Money"
"R-MONEY!"
"Binders Fulla Women: The Mixedtape by R- Money"
"Don't know if this is a repost or not  but I am risking it anyways. R-MONEY's got the binders! [x-post?]"
"Album of the year"
"Finally something funny popped up on my newsfeed [FB]"
"Mitt Romney's Rap Record"
"R-money"
"Binders Fulla' Women Release Party TBD"
"R-Money  Binders fulla women"
"R-Money -- Binder$ Fulla Women"
"Welcome to the 21st century."
"This came up on my Facebook feed today *facepalm*"
"Binders Fulla Women"
"Binders Fulla Women"
"R-Money"
"Seems Legit"
"Binders of bitches"
"R-Money in tha house ya'll"
"The newest Rapper from the hood of the 1%."
"Women? I've got binders full of them!"
"So I heard about this new rap album thats topping the charts"
"My first thought upon hearing this."
"Binders"
"R-MONEY"
"This is the last time..."
"The Internet has ruined me"
"This is the last time."
"Because Merica."
"Casually Eating Her Cheese"
"'cause... 'Murica."
"NO. Why? No."
"This was broadcasted on CNBC. Look at the ticker at the bottom (xpost /r/pokemon)"
"This was broadcasted on CNBC. Look at the ticker at the bottom (xpost /r/pokemon)"
"Bit into an apple and found this"
"FUCK DA POLICE!"
"FUCK DA POLICE"
"I said I wanted kitties!!"
"When you see it..."
"Thanks THQ"
"Jesus is always by your side."
"Printers..."
"Freaking printers"
"I had no idea that the ocean was THAT deep.."
"Good Guy......Everybody"
"The good guys in our lives. (sorry if repost)"
"See? There are plenty of good things in life."
"LOL! imagine think this behind u XD"
"Meanwhile in Poland"
"The Streets Run Brown with Poo!"
"Pedobear convention in Poland"
"How it feels to be a Brian on reddit today."
"How I feel having just completed the last of my undergraduate work."
"When I give my own opinion on Reddit and I don't get downvoted"
"Happy Christmas Pup!"
"Rude Awakening"
"Dont you guys just hate when this happens"
"Dog trolling done right!!"
"Head Face"
"4 heads  1 face..."
"It's almost...scary."
"...Why?"
"Sir  Yes Sir!!"
"A diver feeds"
"Reddit: I present to you...a Jack-Russel with a dick on his back...really."
"That's what I call a wiener dog [SFW]"
"Is there something on my back ??"
"Wiener dog"
"Skittles  taste the rainbow."
"I miss this show.."
"Black People"
"What a great photo."
"Black physicians treating a member of the Ku Kux Klan in the ER"
"Black physicians treating a KKK member in the ER"
"Okcupid's reaction to Adblockers"
"Saw this on OkCupid today. Why can't every website be like this?"
"I'm impressed and disturbed."
"'merica"
"Found this a while back...thought you might enjoy"
"Pretty Much"
"This is how a candlefire looks in zero/micro-gravity"
"NO! ...Fuck this. I'm out"
"When I see that creepy Colgate kid..."
"Blackmobile"
"Rude Sloth"
"How I feel blatantly karmawhoring on my cakeday"
"Just reached 50 link karma and 50 comment karma at the same time"
"Everyday I'm..."
"On The Other Side"
"Did not even recognize her."
"Nicki minaj before all the fake."
"WHY?"
"How it feels to chew 5 gum"
"just a dog working construction. nothing more  nothing less."
"Seeing all these &quot;Look at what I just built&quot; pictures.."
"That roofing dog is an amateur."
"5 gum"
"Ninja's don't wear watches...."
"Opposite day"
"Opposite Day!"
"This is one of the greatest costumes I've seen this year."
"I need to buy one of these  then stand in an arcade during halloween."
"Want"
"Pro tip: Dress up in this and stand as still as you can in an arcade."
"Taking homework too seriously."
"How I feel as a new Redditor trying to get Karma"
"All of my friends are getting cars for graduation"
"HIFW I find out my school is making me pay $200+ For each of my textbooks on top of tuition"
"After five unsuccessful posts"
"Just testing neural connections in my arm."
"How I feel when I click &quot;Random&quot; and it takes me to to /r/nope and then /r/spiders back to back."
"Probably a repost  but I do love this"
"Yeeeeee"
"YEEEEEEEEEEEE MUFFFFFINNNSSS"
"Are humans allowed here?"
"Googled &quot;babies everywhere&quot;....why??"
"I'm having some problems."
"How to touch a wall with an apple  and it's apparent dangers."
"Instructions on Youtube"
"come at me bro!"
"haters gonna hate and hawking gonna hawk"
"Contrary to popular belief... Pimping is easy"
"For some reason these fit together perfectly"
"Cats are not great problem solvers"
"For my cake day I present to you my favorite gif."
"Oh hai....."
"What's going through my head as I scroll down my newsfeed on facebook."
"When I run into strangers at my smoke spot"
"Haven't seen enough huskies lately  so...."
"Happy animal's day! Here's a picture of the dog of my dreams."
"Puppy!"
"He must like bacon..."
"By far  the best thing I've ever found at Goodwill."
"The Throne of Reddit"
"is mine big dog =) is very cute dog =) is friend very not angry (cool)"
"Genius"
"AMAZING"
"This man needs to be locked up"
"Oh  hey!"
"when someone from the Parks department came into the nursery I worked at"
"When I'm told to smile for a picture."
"How I felt whenever I a scene from the trailer while watching TDKR"
"Stumbling upon unexpected tits. [Fixed]"
"How all kids act when there name comes up in a story."
"Yum! Pizza! [gif]"
"What sorcery is this?!"
"Vote for Dole"
"I'll just leave this here..."
"Why I Don't Like Bananas"
"What the.. I don't even..."
"Bananaman"
"Just hanging around on google... BANANAS!"
"This shit is bananas"
"What the actual fuck?"
"How awesome are bananas?"
"Crazy Asians"
"Banana WTF"
"It may be awhile before I can eat a banana again... [gif]"
"because china!"
"because japan!"
"Japanese Dole ad  too strange for words"
"Nan Man."
"I just can't.."
"Not Sure How to Feel.."
"Banana power?"
"Still unsure what to think of this .gif after three years."
"ummm couldn't think of a name... Banana's seem appropriate."
"Many  many hours were spent here. [FIXED]"
"Many  many hours were spent here [fixed]"
"The Best Halo Map [Fixed]"
"It has arrived..."
"Just started working a bitch job at a law firm."
"University"
"The Snake Bus Advertisement"
"Snake on a Bus"
"You're Welcome"
"Mac 'n Cheese"
"HYUCK HYUCK HYUCK"
"Mac' and Cheese"
"Majestic."
"Mac &amp; Cheese voyage!"
"Not a hoax  not an imaginary story!"
"Heath Ledger as the Joker skate boarding over Christian Bale as Batman while they take a break on the set of The Dark Knight."
"Heath Ledger skate boarding over Christian Bale on the set of The Dark Knight."
"Heath Ledger skate boarding over Christian Bale on the set of The Dark Knight. [x-post from r/pics]"
"The Joker kickflipping over Batman"
"GET SOME!"
"It's simple... We ollie kick-flip the Batman."
"Self-portrait level: NASA"
"Astronaut self portrait"
"Totally going to Prof this when I get home!"
"When the top comment on a youtube video is &quot;thumbs up if you're still listening in 2012&quot;"
"Every time I browse ShitRedditSays."
"My reaction to 95% of my newsfeed"
"Silly officer.."
"My exact reaction to getting something everyone said I never would."
"Every time one of my posts gets it's first downvote."
"How I feel when people cry that something has already been posted."
"When I post a link and see 0 upvotes within the first two minutes"
"I see your 8 a.m. class  7 a.m. post grad work  your 4 a.m. bakery  and raise you 5am CLOCK OUT  then a 8am start. (Sometimes I get no sleep for 2-3 days straight. - Sound engineer"
"As a full time student and full time employee. This is my reaction to all of you complaining about time."
"Young Joseph Stalin  the original RPG."
"The liquid of life"
"You've got to be fucking kidding me"
"Perspective"
"Living in Alaska"
"I don't get why Republicans keep fighting for things that clearly don't exist. Oh wait..."
"Whoa dud... HOLY SHIT!!!"
"YOLO?"
"My first attempt at a meme.. has anyone seen this before? Upvote it you drunk fucks  upvote it."
"Those Assholes..."
"Overly Manly Man's thoughts on Movember..."
"An elder coworker quoted Hank Hill"
"Bandaid?"
"50 Shades of Handy"
"Umbrella?"
"Overly manly man"
"My Dad pulled this one when we were talking about working out."
"Friend's grandpa dropped this last night"
"Escher's Relativity in Lego"
"So  I googled 'Gypsy scrotum'. Was not disappointed."
"Why you should not buy cutting knives from the dollar store."
"Made in china"
"George Washington fending off a group of zombies with only 2 handguns and balls of steel."
"NeandertaLLica"
"Neandarthallica"
"Still skeptical about evolution?"
"Neadertallica"
"3 people so far posted this in 2 weeks might aswell post it to."
"I can't take my eyes off this for some reason.."
"Loki has no idea the power he has been given."
"EX sent &quot;wish you were here&lt;3&quot;  this was my reply"
"ya know  that's a damn good question!"
"Turn Anything Into A Sandwich!"
"I would buy them..."
"Nutella would be amazing with these.."
"Sandwiches will never be the same."
"I feel certain this is a repost  but someone please tell me who this girl is. (Cosplay)"
"Tinkerbell"
"Tinkerbell is not impressed"
"we are just an advanced breed of monkeys... [1920x1020]"
"Coronal Mass Ejection on August 31  2012"
"Send this to your haters"
"Realizing someone has saved over my game file."
"Those silly voices."
"What I did when I saw my midterm schedule."
"Kitty Push Ups"
"Reddit in a nutshell"
"Reddit's workout channel"
"Epic Princess Leia cosplay/crosspost from /r/curvy"
"Front page here I come!"
"Animals Are Dumb [.gif gallery]"
"Animals Are Dumb [.gif gallery]"
"The dilemma I face everyday"
"Probably a repost  but every time someone types in all caps"
"Wrestling."
"Pile of upvotes with cheese and salsa."
"Out of all the sandy pics I have seen  this one made me twitch"
"Countdown to chaos"
"This is enough to put one's teeth on edge."
"Uh oh..."
"The dentist's cat  drumming up business."
"Giraffes..."
"The diagram below best illustrates"
"Get Well!"
"my mate just uploaded this... straya carntt"
"I don't think it will get well."
"Parks and Recreation's Ron Swanson  as illustrated by Sam Spratt"
"Ron Swanson. That is all."
"Parks and Rec..... the fuck?"
"Ron Swanson. Yes  that's a chest-stache. I love you randomgur."
"I can't be the only person who would watch this."
"Googled &quot;most blasphemous thing ever.&quot; This can't be right..."
"Ron Swanson (Parks and Rec)"
"Exiting the Universe"
"Oh yeah Dipsy  I know you like that..."
"Teletubbies..."
"Where is /b when you need em?"
"r/gaming today in a nutshell."
"Realizing Obama's AMA wasn't a hoax..."
"The first picture ever taken (1826)"
"You know that photo of the first camera ever made? Well this is the first photo it ever took"
"Okay Mr. Japanese Man  consider us even..."
"My first cake day and I couldn't think of anything else to post. I have no shame."
"Cake day."
"Ummm  I'm gonna need to get those cakeday reports this afternoon..."
"I just realized it's My cake day. does it mean anything.?"
"What I expect since it's my first Cake Day..."
"mind=blown"
"How I feel seeing all the kittens on r/awww and knowing I can't have one."
"How I felt after I showed my boyfriend something on reddit he already saw"
"Me  at work  on my birthday."
"How I feel when I get downvoted on my Cake Day"
"When I see you try to be clever with the  &quot;I see your x  and raise you y&quot;..."
"I just found out that my little cousin gets to perform with Mckayla Maroney at the end of the month. This was my reaction."
"when someone flirts with my girlfriend in front of me."
"When I try really hard in a comment on a rising post but the post never makes it"
"Did you know?"
"I give you our king"
"Presenting Sir. Meowington  King of cats."
"Let's say a big AMEN to Saint Reddit..."
"Our new government can't spell..."
"When I resume a story line that I previously played while drunk."
"Bill Cosby's Magical Hot Dog"
"Bill Cosby's Magic Hot Dog"
"I like to use this one on the ladies (Fixed)"
"Do You Think Its Still Funny?"
"If you can read this.."
"Changing clothes like a boss"
"I was not aware this is an option"
"Oh no no no no..."
"SPACE CAT lost in space..."
"How To Make Chocolate Milk"
"Breakfast for champions.NSFW"
"Yaaay! It's my 1st Reddit birthday! Here's a raccoon carrying a kitty."
"Look what I found"
"When you saw only one set of footprints  it was when I carried you."
"Look what I found"
"Did someone lose a cat?"
"Anyone lose a cat?"
"Uh...nothing to do here."
"I'd like this one  sir!"
"i found your cat bro..."
"NPH tweeted this picture this morning  probably repost but just wanted to share b/c it's the cutest thing I've ever seen"
"Not sure what the fuck this is... possibly NSFW [ALBUM]"
"This defines the meaning of What The Fuck"
"Fap Time"
"Probably why there isn't many comments on GW posts"
"Meanwhile in Thailand..."
"I've seen this over and over for the &gt;1 Year that I've been here  and I can't  for the life of me  find the origins of it. Can anyone help me out?"
"Mind BLOWN"
"Mind BLOWN"
"The brain named itself."
"The brain named itself."
"Learning there was an /r/reactiongifs [FIXED]"
"I accidentally stumbled upon r/AskReddit"
"Me after seeing The Avengers. What a surprisingly superb movie!"
"Reddit  tonight I drank for the first night in six months due to a liver scare. This is what it was like."
"When I read about the Higgs Boson particle"
"As a spaniard   this was my reaction the first time I drank Dr. Pepper"
"Not even from this subreddit  but when I saw it I couldn't contain my laughter."
"When an old flame texts you at 3 a.m."
"Epicness"
"Mind blown.."
"How I feel after reading though r/todayilearned instead of studying."
"Been on Reddit for almost 1 year now  and this is still my favorite gif."
"Today is 10/11/12"
"this is the perfect mind blown .gif  it makes me laugh every time i see it. its even better with sound(comments)"
"George Brownridge  a man of many talents."
"Rugrats."
"Rugrats."
"OHHH My..."
"This is surprisingly accurate..."
"How gangnam style was made !"
"The miracle of birth (NSFW)"
"It's calling me.."
"Best nostalgia costume I've seen this Halloween"
"Probably one of the most awesome costume involving a bike I've ever seen (x-post from r/pics)"
"How to properly animate a douche"
"Paul Ryan"
"Paul Ryan the Beefcake"
"Everyday is arms day"
"Revised Christmas Song(s)"
"Awesome street art"
"Amazing sidewalk art"
"I present to you all: Morgan Freeman's daughter"
"I'll just place this here.."
"So I just found this wallpaper and I automatically thought of you guys. (NSFW)"
"Naked Jesus shooting rainbows out his Cheetah-tits  at skull monkeys riding flying zebras."
"monkeys with guns  flying ontop of zebra  over a rainbow thats being projected from the mouths of two leopards heads  that are held by naked man. All while being hundreds of feet up in the air. W.T.F."
"Some girl had this as her cover photo on Facebook. I just... what?"
"Speechless..."
"Rockin' the Onesie Pajamas"
"You!...You just go get in your crib"
"Fuzzy Puppy in Footie Pajamas"
"A cow photo-bombing a horse stuck in a fence"
"photobombing cow"
"just a cow"
"Nuclear-Strength Photo Bomb"
"Photobomb cow. Your doing it right!"
"Photobombing level 100"
"epic photobomb"
"Whenever I'm at a club..."
"Who knew Blue was such a boss?"
"Turtles"
"But it's true!"
"To do list"
"Ocelot kitten!"
"Dwarf leopard - kitten"
"I can't describe this"
"This little guy will stare into your soul"
"They probably don't even know... [x-post from r/funnysigns]"
"They probably don't even know"
"Let me pet you"
"Tiny cat ... I do not fear you ...*pat pat*"
"...so  Scrabble."
"and the parents of the year award goes to...."
"Mother of the year"
"Call 911 [FB]"
"Meanwhile  in America.."
"'MERICA"
"Have it your way at BK"
"Wheelchair scuba diving"
"Wheelchair scuba diving"
"A truly committed scuba diver"
"Looks like he misplaced his Movember..."
"An octopus being brought into life"
"atheism/trees"
"Pirate Pup"
"A dog dressed up as two pirates carrying a treasure chest."
"Best. Costume. Ever"
"Will be building one of these for tomorrow evening"
"This dog really pisses me off..."
"Always a comfort to come home to."
"U Mad Bro?!"
"honestly how would you feel?"
"Alright  Reddit  show me the picture that NEVER FAILS to make you laugh. I'll start."
"This is a blatant repost  but it makes me laugh every time I see it."
"Easily my favorite picture on the internet."
"Faggot Dog"
"This will always be my favorite picture on the Internet."
"This will forever be the funniest thing on the internet to me."
"Awake mode: Deactivated"
"Jurassic Butts"
"Jurassiquest"
"Really... just..."
"There's a snake in my boob!"
"There's a snake in my boob!"
"That's enough internet for today [nsfw]"
"Um...wtf? [NSFW Nudity]"
"You Raise A Valid Point Ice Cream"
"How I feel when I tell myself I need to eat healthier"
"Tough Day..."
"Tough Love Baby on Josh"
"It's a good day"
"I declare today... OTTER DANCE FRIDAY."
"NOPE NOPE NOPE"
"fuck everything about that door placement."
"How I feel during no shave November."
"As a girl with four part-time jobs  this is what I fantasize about..."
"As a girl with four part-time jobs  this is what I fantasize about..."
"For all those with lazy cats...I bet you're soooo jealous"
"That thing in the middle ..."
"Skrill Cosby"
"another trip to the grocery store..."
"Did you eat your veggies today?"
"o_O ... O_o"
"how i felt when i was introduced to reddit"
"When I'm not high and my friends are."
"My brother quit smoking. Every time we walk past somebody with a cigarette  he looks something like this."
"The morning after smoking..."
"Too Much Halloween Awwww"
"Unexpected problems [pic]"
"Unexpected Problems [pic]"
"I laugh every time i see this"
"Really old  and probably a repost  but still the best picture on the internet."
"Firefox encountered a problem?"
"Unexpected problems [pic]"
"Nick Cage on his way home from Las Vegas"
"Caged!!!"
"Hello..."
"My GF sends me this pic to identify  thought you guys could help. What is this?"
"A car I saw today"
"It all makes sense now"
"How I imagine the leader of anti-Semitic party in Hungary felt after he discovered he is Jewish."
"How every guy in college view incoming freshman girls [FIXED]"
"There should be a place where only the things you want to happen  happen"
"Just a couple baby duck-billed platypuses"
"all the cute belong to these two"
"Just some baby platypi"
"I see your Otter and raise you baby Platypuses"
"2 Baby Duckbill Platypus"
"/r/aww needs more platypuses"
"Strangest cute you will see today. Baby Duck Billed Platypus"
"Reddit needs more platypus"
"Eye drop"
"Eye Drops"
"Eye drop"
"How I feel as an expectant father trying to pick out a name without a deeply religious meaning."
"Painstakingly restoring my music library after a crash. Still in the Fs."
"Missed 23 hours of my cakeday..how I really feel right now"
"I was anticipating my cakeday  and missed it by 10 days."
"how i feel when i get downvoted for no apparent reason"
"How I feel after my first post to Reddit [FIXED]"
"How I feel when my &quot;This is the one&quot; post gets downvoted to hell."
"How I feel when people randomly jump aboard the downvote train on one my comments"
"I just realized it's actually Thursday  not Friday..."
"Whenever my posts get downvoted.."
"When I think I have karma gold  and get shut down."
"When I get 0 downvotes and still can't get a post to take off - Imgur"
"How I Feel About My Boss Being Gone Through Monday"
"When you're about to leave for 2 days of offline studying and realize it's your cakeday."
"How I feel after driving to my 8am class to find out it has been cancelled..."
"How I feel at work... everyday.."
"How I feel when I'm studying for an exam tomorrow  after having three exams today."
"Last meal"
"Mitt Romney - The Juan Percent"
"Man  Mitt Romney's really going for those Latino votes"
"Jesus would vote for him"
"Juan percent"
"Senor Romney"
"He ees the Juan percent"
"Mitt Romney  now part of the Juan Percent"
"Slightly Racist"
"Play any song while watching this"
"How I feel when there are no messages on my work phone after my lunch break..."
"Casual Racism"
"I Love Eating This Chicken  My fingers I'm Licking"
"Champagne bottle is a weapon"
"Cham-pain"
"My favorite Star Wars action figure when I was a kid."
"Dead Ewok action figure"
"But isn't that..."
"The next big leap forward in technology!"
"The letter opener"
"D'awww Mr. Bunneh Rabbit"
"McPimpin?"
"This guy was told by his Homeowners Association he couldn't fly the American flag in his yard."
"Lucha Libre: The coolest form of wrestling possible"
"Clash of Culture"
"The Journey"
"Yup..."
"I just taught my cat to drive."
"Getaway Cat"
"Sadly  it didn't work for me"
"The most beautiful castle in Europe Mont-St-Michel"
"Photobomb level: Steve Irwin"
"Best photobomb ever?"
"I shit the queen!"
"My girlfriend just started watching Downton Abbey. All I can think about is this picture."
"pizza day was the best day of the week"
"did you love it or hate it?"
"&quot;What a beautiful morning. Today is going to be a good day.&quot;"
"This is why it was only a rehearsal. You have to get the little things right first"
"It's pretty bad when you fail at walking..."
"aaaaaaand she's gone..."
"That crap made the front page!?"
"When my post gets more downvotes than upvotes."
"Here's a picture I took from my plane a couple years ago that I thought y'all might like."
"when one of my comments suddenly starts getting up votes..."
"Went to fight a traffic ticket and the cop didn't show up...this is how I felt!"
"When I noticed it was my cake day"
"beautiful ....."
"While browsing Craigslist..."
"Wash your hand.... please guys."
"Okay"
"Do what it says  then have your mind blown"
"Super!"
"If Beavis was given a lighter"
"No fap November? I'm out"
"I liked the no fap September idea  so I thought I'd try my own no fap October..."
"Worst family picture idea. Ever"
"WTF Spooning."
"Creepiest family photo ever"
"Family photo shoot! Look at how close we all are!"
"Its my birthday today- Broke up with GF recently  200 miles away from home and alone on a work trip"
"twenty minutes into my 21 birthday and only one Congrats on Facebook"
"How i feel after spending one whole year on reddit."
"Yup  that's a shark..."
"My neighbor's kid  every fucking day!"
"My new Will Ferrell downvote gif."
"The only explanation for why awesome posts have 55% upvotes"
"mmmmm.... donuts"
"Pyramid of captured German helmets outside Grand Central Terminal  New York  ca.1918 [1024 × 853]"
"I didn't know Jesus wanted THAT kind of relationship"
"Smokin' You Out. He Stays In."
"So I was on Facebook and noticed my girlfriend's dad's profile picture... I'm not afraid to meet him anymore."
"There just so much win in this photo. If it was a movie  I'd pay to see it."
"Just one of the best pics ever"
"The internet at it's finest."
"The internet at its finest."
"How I feel every time I post on reddit"
"Still my all time favorite .gif"
"This is Gumbi's house"
"When someone tries to show me something I seen on Reddit months ago"
"He don't like basketball"
"Every post of mine"
"I LIEK CHOCOLATE MILK"
"Chocolate milk"
"Spin me Round 70's edition"
"Hard to describe  but I bet you watch it way longer than you plan to."
"Screw carving pumpkins this year.. I'm using watermelons!"
"Starry Bacon"
"I'm sure most of you have already seen and drooled over this piece of art  but must be reshown because BACON!"
"Vincent Van Gogh's Starry Night made with bacon."
"Pots."
"There are two kinds of Romney supporters. The obscenely rich and the obscenely stupid."
"Boats 'n Hoes"
"Samwise knows what he wants."
"I need more of this in my life..."
"Samwise Gamgee gets it right."
"What Samwise was really on a quest for"
"My interpretation of the Presidential debate last night..."
"Oh no you di'n't!"
"I told my girlfriend she looks like Mckayla Maroney... she was not impressed =("
"I told my girlfriend she looks like Mckayla Maroney... she was not impressed =("
"ios 6"
"Toby the Red Panda"
"Once you go black.."
"My reaction when Walmart told me not to take tips from customers whom I've just helped with groceries."
"No Fap February?"
"When my friends and me play charades drunk."
"Apple sues Sandy"
"apple and nature"
"Apple Sues Sandy!"
"Me when I see thumbnail pics of girls at the beach on my Facebook feed."
"My face when I see a NSFW on my front page"
"Cute and sexy"
"Get Well Soon!"
"I hope he gets better soon."
"Get well soon dead coon"
"Get well soon  sweet Raccoon"
"Found this guy on the side of the road."
"Get Well Soon!"
"Get well soon!"
"Goodnight Sweet Prince"
"I found this on Facebook today..."
"live the dream  unicorn cats"
"An inflatable unicorn horn for cats - they love it!"
"They will definitely love this."
"Cats love it!"
"Giada misses the point"
"Crazy hand."
"Hungry Hungry... (fill in the blank)"
"When I see my parents while I'm with friends"
"When I'm in my parents car and I see my friends coming."
"When you find your sibling looking through your internet history."
"Meat...spin you say?"
"whenever someone tries to get on your laptop without warning you"
"What did you expect from a subreddit named spacedicks?"
"Whenever i see someone looking at 9gag"
"&quot;Mom! I just discovered a cool site called reddit!&quot;"
"When my wife saw my daughter on 4chan."
"How I feel watching my boyfriend browse Reddit..."
"NOPE"
"Shark in the suburbs courtesy of Sandy"
"This cracked me up."
"First time trying anal..."
"This fox is not a part of your system"
"You're telling me.. it was him all along??"
"Busted!"
"Attention Plankers:"
"When I see someone &quot;plank&quot; this is what I want to do."
"When i found out my brother posts 'memes' on Facebook"
"death by cute...gets me everytime"
"Excuse me  but we were trying to sleep. kthnxbai!"
"just a kitty cuddling a teddy"
"Ok. This is just too much"
"His teddy always keeps him safe from danger"
"When me and my buddies hit the club."
"Coming to dog food store near you."
"The Package is what it is..."
"Coming soon to a dog food store near you. Xpost from pics"
"Bison knocks over a weaker bison so the wolves can get it. [gif]"
"Outta My Way!"
"Damn  nature..."
"Adorable woolly bull helps puppies getting fed"
"An accurate depiction of a repost getting more karma than the original"
"Don't be sad."
"Dinosaurs"
"Salvador Dali and his pet Anteater!"
"Horrify: verb (used with object): to distress greatly; shock"
"Woke up today and my cat kind of looked like nicolas cage"
"Was looking a photoshopped pictures of Nicolas Cage and found this. What the honest fuck?"
"I wish I were this smooth..."
"The day it was legalized."
"There’s a hidden stack of pancakes on the $5... Every argument ever is invalid."
"Hidden stack of pancakes on the $5 bill."
"Hangovers are dangerous..."
"Hangovers are Dangerous"
"Grahambert knows the internet too well. Haunted house pic.."
"Reaction Shots from a Local Haunted House: Nightmares Fear Factory"
"Check out this pic of an atomic bazooka"
"1 2820 Nearly every month  someone submits a TIL &quot;there was an atomic bazooka.&quot; Well  the atomic bazooka sits in the lobby of my office. (i.imgur.com) submitted 7 hours ago by axel_thatcher 840 commentssharesavehidereport"
"Keyboard Cat's Great Great Great Grandfather"
"Keyboard Cat Level: Infinite +1"
"Play me off"
"Vintage keyboard cat"
"The Entertaining Pussy"
"Take it Away Sam *fixed*"
"Finally  the Ipad accessory we've all been waiting for."
"Text from Dog: cat in the yard"
"No hands"
"this just popped up on my news feed"
"What a Ho!"
"In a parallel universe..."
"Meanwhile in parallel universe!"
"Mirror pic!"
"What gets me is the sunglasses"
"Now I see everything"
"I always knew Miyamoto was amazing."
"The Creation of Mario"
"When I'm driving at night and the oncoming driver and I both dim our lights."
"Daft Punk agree."
"Pretty neat."
"Did an image search for manatees  found this. No longer want to swim with manatees."
"The Skid Mark"
"Words to live by"
"Scatcat part 2"
"Ridiculously Photogenic Fox (X Post from /r/Animalporn)"
"Note Passing; Gangnam Style"
"Note Passing; Gangnam Style"
"Even those based on real people -- are entirely fictional."
"Parkour"
"Parkour [fixed]"
"Let the bodies hit the wall..and the floor"
"Parkour (X-Post r/Funny)"
"Walkway 9 3/4."
"No words  cute kitty is cute"
"My partner in crime"
"Silly monkey I remember my first time on the internet."
"They see me rollin'"
"All I could see when I saw the new hobbit poster"
"The newest poster for The Hobbit has just been released"
"Great new poster for The Hobbit"
"The newest official poster for The Hobbit"
"NEW HOBBIT poster"
"That one really photogenic dwarf."
"International Mustache Convention preview!"
"Dendi fits right in to the new Hobbit poster."
"All I could see when I saw the new hobbit poster"
"Pool climbing wall...looks fun"
"Whenever someone posts a picture of their cat.."
"How I feel redditing on vicodin"
"Reddit with beer goggles."
"After finding out that I could use the &quot;A&quot; key to upvote"
"Browsing r/aww"
"There's got to be a pun for this."
"A creative usage of power cords."
"...and stay down."
"...and stay down"
"How I feel when my posts go from 1 &gt; 0 &gt; 1 and back to 0"
"DOUBLE KILL!"
"The problem with Guardian Angel..."
"I get knocked down."
"Blade 4: The only one worth watching"
"Party on  Wayne!"
"The Internet's undersea world."
"And not a single fuck was given"
"When I realized it was my cakeday."
"Crossing the street when I'm drunk."
"How I feel when someone tells me to get a job."
"Every time people tell me to get a better job"
"My reaction to all unemployment rate talks..."
"I need a job too."
"after graduating college"
"thought this belonged here possibly (nsfw)"
"My hands hurt just looking at this"
"Super Mario 64 may have destroyed your joystick  but did it give you blisters on your palm?"
"Destroying N64 Joysticks Since 1998"
"Destroying N64 joysticks  palms  and friendships  since 1999"
"If this is how the world ends... I'm going to be pissed."
"If humans waged war with Bowser..."
"my new favorite .gif"
"Just took a test..."
"repost  but it gets me every time."
"Easy going me getting into an argument"
"when my frient asks if i want to smoke another bowl [8]"
"Yes  whatever floats your..."
"here's stevie wonder with a poem"
"there is no need to be upset"
"How I feel about stupid things that usually make me angry after a nice bowl."
"don't worry"
"I have no idea how to explain this."
"There is no need to be upset"
"Am I the only one who hears this song when I see this GIF?"
"If you're upset right now I just want you to know.."
"OAG.....I made this for you reddit"
"Had to be done"
"Had to be done [fixed] just wish the gif was longer"
"My siblings' reaction when I told them I'm an atheist."
"There seem to be a lot of Christian Bale gifs  and I really enjoy them. Hit me with your best one."
"Pretty much sums it up"
"Every one of us  every weekend."
"Today  I lost my dear friend because I opened up my feelings to her"
"How I feel today after learning a friend is going overseas and I won't be able to contact them for a few months.."
"When Justin Bieber got a movie deal"
"Me when I realized I missed my cake day..."
"When I realized I missed my cakeday"
"This makes me so sad!"
"How I feel when inviting close friends to my 21st birthday party via facebook  and they decline"
"How i feel when someone steals my jokes and gets all the laughs and credit"
"Caught my cat watching Sarah McLachlan's TV commercial."
"Every time you downvote a cat picture..."
":c"
":'("
"My friend wanted me to buy a game with him so I could play with him..."
"YES THIS IS DOG I'M ON MY WAY"
"forever alone"
"The Rock's costume for Halloween"
"Dwayne 'The Rock' Johnson dressed up as The Hulk for Halloween"
"I can't tell the difference  both are pretty shit !"
"Spot the difference ..."
"Can you spot it?"
"For the life of me I can't find it"
"Found this on my news feed..."
"Can you spot the difference?"
"Rare White Rhino Being Born"
"Lick your ass before kissing me girl"
"Whenever a see a sale in the electronics section."
"When my girlfriend points out a hot chick."
"Oh damn... She's fine"
"Baby God Father? Nope. It's Asian Mob Baby's Town Now."
"Bluths are back."
"This week's Entertainment Weekly cover..."
"The Reunion!"
"That face."
"And now the story of a wealthy family..."
"Guess who's back?"
"The Royal Arrested Development Cast"
"First photo of the Arrested Development cast fully reunited!"
"Bluths are back. [Fixed]"
"Arrested Development EW Cover"
"Arrested Development Season 4"
"How I feel every Friday... [img]"
"doesn't night life sound more like this?"
"Night Life [FIXED]"
"Amazing pixel art"
"The City at night"
"If L.A. Noire was made in the 80's"
"Judgmental Gorilla"
"Unimpressed Gorilla"
"Unimpressed Gorilla"
"Digging for gold  gorilla style."
"reddit  I have a confession..."
"So I searched the le googs for &quot;muscle man&quot; intending to find Regular Show's Muscle Man....All I want to know now is WHY?!"
"..."
"Seems legit.."
"All aboard the crazy trailer!"
"No matter how bad a day you're having at work work it could always be worse. You could have this guys job..."
"Karma points please!"
"Cake Day! Am I doing it right?"
"When I realize it's my cake day"
"It's my cakeday!"
"Just feeding a lion"
"Just feeding a lion"
"Saw this on Facebook today..."
"I only thought it would help..."
"Well wishes"
"Clean your room  they said."
"I agree  goats are like mushrooms..."
"Goats are...."
"My favorite meme. I re-release it back into the wilds of Reddit."
"he stole my heart"
"I found this on my phone. I honestly can't remember why I would download this."
"Facebook with another gem"
"Once you go..."
"A campaign button at the DNC."
"Driving on the freeway in Michigan. I imagine it's like this is many other places  too."
"For the past month."
"Whenever I see this meme..."
"Fuck These Batman Jokes!"
"Angry Waltor"
"This will be me if the Tigers win today"
"0D"
"Cyclops shark"
"Albino Cyclops Shark!"
"Albino Cyclops Shark!"
"found this on my facebook feed today"
"cutest photobomb ever!"
"Quick  take the shot before --- (sigh) damnit."
"Party Hard"
"Shhh it will all be over soon"
"I know exactly what to do"
"Pastrana is a Badass.. (Source?)"
"Ok  let's go!"
"Just hoppin' onto my new ride."
"Bicycle"
"meanwhile in the russian circus..."
"Tiny Bicycle"
"Mini-Bike [gif]"
"Mini-Bike"
"Watching today's game (pretty much the entire game). Frankly  I'm exhausted."
"He should never shave his mustache again."
"This sums up High School for me."
"Sums up high school for me."
"when i put in a thumb drive the right way the first time."
"After busting my ass off and losing 30 pounds  my fat co-worker asked what diet I was on..."
"when I write a piece of code and run it ..."
"Nyquil"
"Nyquil Kitten"
"Golden Husky Mix"
"If dog's and hedgehogs could talk"
"How I feel now that Matt011ss made this new gif"
"Me when my girlfriend asks what looks better on her"
"I got tired of seeing the low quality Morgan Freeman gif  I decided to redo one"
"Every time I see &quot;(Insert game here) Logic&quot;"
"Your reaction to it being my cakeday"
"My response on how I feel about my school's upcoming homecoming week."
"My thoughts on who won the Presidential Debate"
"I just realized it is my cake day"
"What the advertisement should have been."
"funny monkey"
"The reason why you don't want Brazilians on your team"
"How I feel when trying to get passed the knights of new and on to the front page"
"So  there's a lone fly in my room"
"How I flirted in grade school."
"This subreddit is actually great for reminding older music. Thanks guys!"
"Groovy Knoxville"
"This made me giggle."
"A Woman's Fantasy"
"Meanwhile in a parallel world..."
"My personal favorite  been using this for years!"
"Tiny baby polar bear  that's all"
"The Tiniest Polar Bear"
"little baby polar bear... i think... maybe not..."
"Baby. Polar. Bear."
"Tiny polar bear"
"Mesmerizing..."
"When all my friends arrive to a party."
"Bounce!!"
"The first thing i thought when i saw this gif"
"Simple work set up"
"Matterhorn Mountain [1920x1200]"
"My God  it's full of stars!"
"Everyone in my house right now."
"Whatcha you lookin at bitch?!"
"A is for America"
"How I feel when someone makes the same joke I made 30 seconds earlier  but gets a bigger laugh"
"When a girl reaches for something and I notice they haven't shaved their pits in a couple days..."
"Not to be played while drunk"
"Not your regular game of chess"
"Gangnam style"
"So I found the most offensive Halloween costume to reddit"
"So I found the most offensive costume to reddit"
"This guy had the most offensive costume to reddit"
"Something that will piss off most of reddit"
"This may make reddits blood boil"
"I love this!"
"from an unemployed recent grad to employed recent grads"
"I see your 8 a.m. class  7 a.m. post grad work  your 4 a.m. bakery  and raise you  1:45 a.m. to start cooking breakfast for my battalion. (bed at 10 p.m.)"
"To the Republicans trying to purge minorities from the voter roles..."
"Mosh pit"
"Twinception"
"Now that's money"
"nuthin but a G thing"
"I asked my friend why he wasn't in college he sent this"
"'Rollin 'round the hood  you can call me george washington."
"Driving Like A Boss!!"
"Leaving Work"
"How it feells finally breaking 100 karma."
"Anyone who comments on my submissions."
"Reddit whenever someone bashes a conservative"
"What /r/freekarma does all day everyday"
"Surfing Reddit when I'm under the influence"
"Whenever I browse reddit when I'm drunk"
"Anything grumpy cat on adviceanimals today."
"Lurker me  when I discovered upvoting is easy and might make someone happy!"
"Browsing Reddit on Adderall"
"Got teeth pulled today. Usually I'm pretty thrifty with my upvotes. This is me after the Vicodin kicked in."
"How I feel browsing /r/funny with my 5-year-old daughter"
"I don't always remember to upvote  but when I do..."
"Having a vagina does not grant you the right to do this"
"This made me feel a little better today..."
"Yellow Hurts"
"I'm so fucking lazy"
"/r/gonewild"
"Writer's Block"
"So I spent an hour on /r/aww today"
"I hate these..."
"The Ultimate Zombie Fortress: Mont St Michel on the top of a volcano  surrounded by another volcano  on an island in the middle of the ocean."
"The real life Tracy Island! A Volcanic island Aogashima  part of the Izu Chain off the coast of Japan"
"The inhabited volcanic island of Aogashima."
"Aogashima Island"
"One day when I'm a billionaire ... volcanic island of Aogoshima"
"So I was Scumbag Steve for Halloween"
"Scumbag Eve at it again"
"Scumbag Debra Morgan"
"How I feel immediately after using hand lotion"
"When taking group pictures in school"
"Being an ASL student and meeting a deaf person for the first time."
"Grand Theft Auto: Gotham City"
"Not every man..."
"Olympic themed Ad: Durex (x-post /r/funny) [720x524]"
"Hilarious Olympic advert"
"Not everyone wants to be as fast as Usain...."
"Learn the Difference (worldwide edition)"
"My reaction to pretty much every overheard conversation on the bus."
"How I feel when I realize I've let out a disastrous fart in public"
"&quot;Hey man  did you see that thing on Reddit today?"
"The stare that every supporter of SOPA/PIPA gets."
"Expression when finding bible contradictions"
"Why so many Christians become atheists..."
"You....lost....MY.....porn? (SFW)"
"Hey camelhorse you've been here for 3 years!"
"Fixed"
"Just realized it was my cake day 20 min before it was over."
"Me  after finding pictures of my parents from the 80's."
"Me  after finding pictures of my parents from the 80's."
"After my friend told me how amazing nickelback is.."
"When someone mentions the new show Here Comes Honey Boo Boo"
"I'm looking for this in a higher resolution  help ?"
"The first time I saw a vagina"
"The first time I saw a girl's who-who."
"Dat Ass"
"Coming in for a closer look..."
"Saw this gif and thought of you guys"
"DAT ASS (First edited gif)"
"This has to be Zach Galifianakis' finest moment"
"Temple made of gold"
"Go  Go  Go  Go!...Sheeeeiiiiiiiii--!!!!!"
"Pizza Fork"
"Right after I found all of my pillows ripped apart (She thinks I can't see her)"
"When I saw I missed my cake day. (FIXED)"
"My favorite superhero."
"I'm a Fucking T-REX!"
"There's been a lot of before/after pics lately  but I think my transformation beats all others."
"Sleepwalking dog"
"lets start this weekend right meow"
"Pour me another drink right meow!"
"Not sure what to make of this..."
"What is tha- wtf is going on here?"
"If this isn't WTF  I don't know what is..."
"He's sexy and he knows it."
"How I feel about celebrity news."
"Sin B/Tan B"
"I Was Never Good at Math..."
"sin b/ tan b"
"laughing at this more than I should"
"for math geeks only."
"If bobbity divided by shoobity equals zip zob zoobity  then..."
"Took me a minute"
"I love a little math humor."
"Jeep Cherokee stuck on the U.S.-Mexico border fence."
"Time to ramp up our defenses!"
"Jeep left teetering on USA/Mexico border fence"
"Border Crossing Level: Nice try  very creative"
"When I see someone look at their controller before they press a button..."
"How I feel when my roommate watches an episode of a mutual TV show without me."
"I just realized I missed my cake day..."
"How I feel when trying to decide if my post sucks or if I just think it does because I've been staring at it for 20 minutes trying to think of a clever title."
"Everytime I see an AMA for someone awesome  then realize it was only an AMA request."
"No  it's not turning right."
"No words [x-post r/gifs]"
"When you see it"
"When you see it..."
"What do you think of my gf"
"Ron Swanson"
"Swan Ronson"
"Swan Ronson"
"Canine fireworks"
"You just gotta ignite the light and let it shine..."
"Who comes up with these ideas?"
"Brush'em"
"Right through the soul.."
"The Universe"
"Ilya Bryzgalov on the universe"
"Father and son..."
"Real Life Simba"
"this kingdom will be yours one day"
"Real Life Lion King!"
"Wanna take a ride on the BMW Oracle?"
"My Reaction When Getting A Few Upvotes Then Many Downvotes"
"Whenever I show someone my favorite movie and it looks like they don't like it"
"When my post gets a ton of comments but only 1 upvote"
"When I post something I think is hilarious and then I get no upvotes"
"Baby skunks"
"Well o.O"
"Cocaine  for kids!"
"Instantaneous Cure!"
"I could use some of these  I've got a toothache in my nose."
"Good. For. You"
"When a repost of my OC makes the front page"
"My reaction when I saw the 12-year old kiss Carrie Underwood."
"Bizarre Google Street-View Images"
"WHY? WHY IS THIS A THING?"
"Still my favorite fucking gif."
"All throughout high school"
"I remember this gif being more popular in the old steam days"
"Well if its a Steam Nostalgia Trip This GIF Can't be Forgotten."
"Plz don't leave me"
"Better take his advice."
"it's like looking at a lava lamp"
"The importance of focal length. [xpost from /r/photography]"
"me (and you too) as i'm reading reddit during work"
"Just Steve Carell"
"He never did get good at that game."
"scissors = 0"
"Poor Edward... =("
"Spideys Ignition"
"Spidey Shuffle"
"Spidey is WHIMSICAL!"
"Danse macabre"
"They said any song would work with this gif so ..."
"&quot;This gif will go with any song&quot; My ass."
"They said any song?"
"Does it really go with any song?"
"Myth Busted"
"Spiderman gets physical"
"No  not just any song."
"Love this..."
"USSR"
"Coolest nature pic I have seen in a long time"
"Beautiful fall"
"Interesting bathroom paint scheme..."
"Sidecars save lives."
"Y U NO VISIT"
"don't wanna mess with these cats"
"Tired pets."
"The end is nigh."
"Well Fuck"
"Game over humanity"
"Motherfucker"
"Nope taken to a new height."
"I have this gif from a while ago. I thought you guys might enjoy it."
"You haven't lived until you've raved with Stephen Colbert"
"Stephen Colbert + Dick Figures"
"Colbert"
"how i celebrate my first successful post"
"Rape is an art..."
"Aren't sloths adorable"
"So that's what rhymes with sloth.."
"What rhymes with sloth?"
"They weren't all gems..."
"Happy Birthday to the man who inspired millions."
"&quot;We are star stuff contemplating star stuff.&quot; - Carl Sagan - Happy Birthday you magnificent bastard!"
"So it's this guy's birthday. Thank you for inspiring me to learn incredible things."
"No matter what your game may be  we all had our own problems with this asshole"
"Reddit likes cats and boobs right??"
"Wow that was close!"
"Woah  That was close!"
"When someone tells me they're vegan"
"&quot;Look  I have this karma machine...&quot;"
"How I feel missing the Obama AMA!"
"how I feel when alot of my friends write a status about the fucking weather.."
"I can't believe it's real [TM]"
"Our children will have it very hard some day"
"One of the hardest difficulties our generation will create"
"Future kids of Reddit users"
"I Google image searched 'One more day to Canada' ...found this"
"Chewbacca on a squirrel killing Nazis."
"Chewbacca on a Squirrel Killing Nazis"
"Chewbacca riding a Squirrel... and killing Nazis (x-post from /r/funny"
"They say that a picture can explain a thousand words... Well sometimes it think it has to!"
"Oh.Hello!"
"Sarah Jessica parkour"
"Shepard's Delight."
"Squidward can't stop"
"Because no one likes a disorganized pile of kitties"
"Batman is the towel rack Gotham deserves."
"TIL there is a &quot;cutest dog in the world&quot; and his name is Boo."
"Houston  we have ignition! NSFW"
"Life"
"Life finds a way"
"is a MacBook an instrument?"
"My view on skrillex's music"
"What will your mother say?"
"Sometimes  to become a lion  you must first become a dogg..."
"&quot;Sometimes  in order to become a lion  you must first become a dogg&quot;"
"Snoopimorphs"
"To become a lion..."
"Warning sticker on Chris Brown's new album."
"The warning label a Chris Brown album deserves"
"How I feel each time I downvote a post while browsing new"
"Can't. Stop. Watching."
"Checkmate."
"Whoa"
"I'm just gunna leave this here."
"I'm just gunna leave this here."
"Infinite Spirals [gif]"
"Cat stole my phone."
"My childhood has officially ended. Cookie monster is dead"
"My childhood has officially ended. Cookie Monster is dead."
"When I Get Really Excited To Do Something And Then Do It Half-Assed."
"whenever I try and answer a question I think I know in class"
"Definitely NOT shopped"
"Floating doggy leash! And that other thing.."
"Found this on pic on FB. Someone pulled the Ole switcharoo."
"Saw this on facebook and I've still got tears in my eyes"
"Meanwhile  in America..."
"Pluto's thoughts on not being a planet"
"Oh Pluto"
"Guitar Urinal: Play guitar while peeing."
"PARTY HARD"
"Trust me I am a professional"
"Party hard! (sorry if this has done before  it wouldn't surprise me)"
"Found out it was my cake day while on the toilet"
"I remembered my cakeday"
"Dog blowjob + turkey"
"NO!!!whatthefuckMINEyouass......i'll fig-.......... Okay  never mind"
"Why are we fighting again?"
"Whenever my buddy and I fight"
"Make friends  not enemies."
"My first thought upon seeing this .gif"
"They're Friends Now"
"Just a guy and his best bud..."
"One of the few funny ones I have found of Facebook."
"Aw  for me?"
"The following week after No Fap September."
"Ring around the rosie"
"Amazing Pencil Art"
"From left to right: Han Solo  Darth Vader  Chewbacca  Leia  Luke Skywalker and R2D2"
"From left to right: Han Solo  Darth Vader  Chewbacca  Leia  Luke Skywalker and R2D2"
"Troll Bike"
"Hey is that Mike over there? MIKE YOU FUCKING PEICE OF SHIT!"
"wrgqasv"
"I think I'll choose another pack"
"This is what they sell in Danish stores [NSWF]-ish"
"Anybody want a piece of dic.. i mean sausage?"
"O thats why its called a sausage."
"started doing this in my office chair as soon as it came up on Pandora."
"This happened by accident"
"My friend and I after we pass a test"
"WE LIKE PIZZA"
"A proud American tradition."
"Day9 in Tiaras (first post ever)"
"OH GOD WHY"
"Honey Boo Boo and Aphex Twin"
"Run as fast as you can..."
"what the fuck"
"Scumbag Cellphone"
"What the image should have been when Reddit was down during Obama AMA"
"Reddit has a new &quot;reddit is under heavy load&quot; picture!"
"no...no....noooooooooooooooooo"
"There's a new &quot;Reddit Under Heavy Load Picture&quot;!"
"I wish I could be him.."
"Love to hate and hate to love it  but it's a great representation"
"Poor reddit"
"Literally one minute after posting... Reddit is (obviously) back up but I was so sad for a few minutes."
"Stop upvoting crappy posts!"
"Nemo 33: The world's deepest swimming pool"
"Facepaw"
"Iron man gives no shits"
"Screw it  I'm Iron Man"
"fuck you  im iron man"
"Secret identities? Screw that"
"Superhero Logic."
"Fuck you  I'm Iron Man."
"Fuck you  I'm Iron Man"
"Unfortunate page layout there."
"Best Parking Double Kill"
"Seriously  Firefox..."
"People seem a little too worried about what's going to happen..."
"too damn high!"
"Starting a new political party. The Temperature is Too Damn High Party [moved to imgur]"
"This was my reaction when I learned my in-laws house is going into foreclosure because god told them to mortgage it to invest in a floundering MLM."
"im fed up with it"
"My first thought when seeing my new girlfriend's bed for the first time..."
"Had to put on dress pants again. This crossed my mind."
"Why so many?"
"This still makes me laugh every time."
"I too googled 'nicolas cage as a baby' and this is what I got..."
"how my New Years resolutions end up"
"My new exercise shirt."
"How ever Redditor's new years resolution goes"
"How every Redditor's new years resolution goes"
"Thanks  Jesus  for the food"
"Thank you Jesus..."
"Thank you  jesus..."
"De nada"
"Thank you  Jesus."
"Thanks  Jesus  for this food."
"De Nada"
"I just about died."
"This is what I always thought of when saying grace.."
"Be thankful for Jesus... he has done much for you."
"who to thank for the food on your table"
"Thanks  Jesus  For all this Food"
"Thank you  Jesus."
"Cakeday WOO"
"Glory be to hypnocat  give me your cakeday upvotes"
"cats."
"Apparently it's my cake day. You know the drill. Because cats."
"Couldn't say it better."
"What are you thinking about little duck?"
"Alternative shoe lacing"
"Wish I was this smooth."
"As every dog knows..."
"my dating game"
"Please?"
"Come on  guys!"
"Heavy Metal Frog"
"Zero fucks given..."
"Parking 101"
"Firefighters fighting a bushfire in Australia a couple of years ago came across this thirsty Koala. Not sure if it's been posted before  but it's adorable."
"What you did there Juicy Juice... I see it."
"When my wife turns on the X Factor."
"When I walk into the wrong class..."
"A more satisfying and logical ending to Lost"
"How Lost really ended."
"Fairies do exist!"
"Gargoyle + Furby = Poodle Moth"
"Reddit  I present to you the Venezuelan poodle moth."
"r/aww did not appreciate the Venezuelan Poodle Moth. I thought you guys might."
"Thought you guys might enjoy this; the Venezuelan Poodle Moth"
"Haters gonna hate"
"I don't want anybody else"
"He knows it"
"Deal with it!"
"My reaction when factions are complaining about being raided and griefed."
"Police officer hit by Molotov Cocktail. Greek riots."
"This is a police officer who had a petrol bomb thrown to him during the Greek riot of 2011."
"Riot police hit by molotov thrown by Greek rioters"
"Leashes and Wheelchairs  man. That's my cup of tea."
"You wanted roots..."
"What the actual..."
"They see me rollin.."
"Caption this.."
"We call it Xtreme soccer."
"How I feel once my boss leaves the room"
"How I feel seeing the 8am  7am  and 4am gifs: I wake up at 6am for school  get home  and work until 8-10."
"How I feel after doing physics all day"
"How I feel turning 18 the day after the US elections..."
"HIFW no one comments or votes on my posts"
"zoidberg incredible hulk"
"When a girl replaces me for my best friend."
"Tiny hermit crab"
"Creepiest Cat I've Seen All Day."
"Second creepiest cat I've ever seen!"
"We're fucked"
"Memes"
"this is me when i upvote something"
"Found this on a polish website."
"How I feel about all of the recent weight-loss success stories."
"Lick-n-stick tattoos"
"Crappy Taxidermy!"
"Crappy Taxidermy [Album]"
"The pig who's secretly a pedophile"
"Saw this in my Facebook news feed"
"My personal favorite faceswap"
"My personal favorite faceswap"
"Looking good bro!"
"Hey buddy"
"HAPPY THANKSGIVING GUYS"
"Well. That's all the internet I need for the day."
"Came across this... The real reason Nokia phones are indestructible"
"I thought it fit..."
"Boss spoilers for the next Metroid game"
"Freedom Park Charlotte  NC"
"Ending a dry spell"
"when i masturbate for the first time after a long family vacation"
"Coming home from a 3 week vacation."
"How I'm going to feel like after No-Fap September"
"went to get some iced tea."
"Iced Tea"
"Our most requested beverage"
"And my local paper wonders why they're going under..."
"Looks like we have a chance (x-post r/funny)"
"Oh  the horror..."
"I miss playing Mario Kart 64. Decided to recreate some of the tracks. [2]"
"cat problem"
"IED"
"Oh man  it's true..."
"I'm sure this is repost  but what the hell  Morgan Freeman is the man"
"This image is tripping me out"
"Trails of pizza delivery riders in Manhattan. [964x568]"
"This is what it feels like playing Mario 2."
"The ending of The Dark Knight Rises in a nutshell [possible spoiler]"
"The End of Dark Knight Rises **MAJOR SPOILERS**"
"The end of Dark Knight Rises [spoiler]"
"How I feel when I come up with a clever post but am afraid of forgetting it"
"After spending an hour working on my essay"
"How I feel when I'm writing an essay.."
"Postponing my essay to post this..."
"didn't think this is what it would look like in real life?"
"didn't think this is what it would like in real life (x-post r/gifsound)"
"Really good elevator music"
"My favorite scene in the Gangnam Style MV"
"Gangnam Style is the best"
"this.."
"How everyone should ride an elevator"
"So my dad wanted me to faceswap him into Gangnam style  this is what I gave him."
"birthday"
"How am I supposed to read this?"
"I tried to smile at a cute guy on campus today [FIXED]"
"Just Nicolas Cage doing his thing"
"Attack of the Cage"
"Epic Nicolas Cage"
"I cannot be Caged"
"Not really sure how to caption this one"
"LOL  repost."
"Where are my fellow Native Americans at?"
"Repost."
"Relevant"
"The Average Asian Aging Process"
"how Asian women age  pretty accurate I'd say"
"The Asian time bomb"
"As someone who married an Asian woman  I can confirm..."
"as a white guy with a korean gf  i fear this..."
"asian aging process"
"Too much cute. I died."
"When you see it."
"Unsafe earth..."
"Run!"
"Life lessons from The Legend of Zelda"
"Dodgeball downvote by kkantouth"
"What I do when I visit /r/apple"
"How it feels getting downvoted on your cake day..."
"Han’s Story."
"I can already see the next Star Wars edition update..."
"ANDY"
"Opened up my laptop to see this playing..."
"Anon telling the truth."
"An explination of online forums."
"Limp Biscuit?"
"Pillsbury Gonads!"
"&quot;Oh  the Who-manity...&quot;"
"Trick or treat"
"Breaking Bad Parenting"
"Evil minds"
"Not sure if repost"
"Not sure if repost"
"How I feel about shit on the front page recently"
"Not sure if repost…"
"How a re-poster's mind works [Not sure if re-post]"
"A white/gold Brush-Tailed Possum with its baby."
"This sums up my morning."
"My fear in the morning!"
"Typical Asian Kid Problem"
"Oh Timmy..."
"Why does this exist?"
"Boom!"
"Just chillin' at the pool"
"Boom!"
"I will not ask again."
"Get out of my seat!"
"Atheism+ has started training soldiers"
"You see this shit?"
"God  Otters are so cute"
"Unstackable Cups"
"Oh Hai! (tiger cub edition)"
"Gladly"
"Kitty vs hair dryer"
"Kitty vs Hair Dryer (X-Post from r/gifs)"
"Somebody hit my car. I'd be pissed if he weren't so funny."
"P.S. My Bad"
"when scumbag steve hits your car"
"Broken cow. [nsfw]"
"Please sir don't take my ball part 2"
"Invisible bike ver. 2.0"
"Catriots of fire"
"Were gonna need a montage"
"We're gonna need a montage"
"This is the picture I use for pretty much every party event I create on facebook"
"A repost but a good post"
"Well that's one way to use milk"
"Remember when r/WTF had that wonderful renaissance a couple of months back? Yeah  me too. That was nice."
"Can anyone explain to me what is happening?"
"There are quite a few fetishes being catered to here... [NSFW]"
"wut"
"The first WTF thing I ever saw on the internet."
"the original WTF"
"Wut"
"what is this from? Saw it a while back and was wondering if it was from an obscure movie or something..."
"I don't know where  I don't know why..."
"Mastodon chilling with some groupies after the show."
"No time to explain!"
"My Study Habits"
"How I feel downvoting several posts in a row"
"How to get to the front page of Reddit."
"Money Time!"
"Make It Rain"
"I got this!"
"That one friend who tries to stop a heated argument between two people..."
"This is how I feel when downvoting something on the front page"
"Kodak moment"
"Stopping  you're doing it wrong."
"Why that's a nice shirt."
"So yeah… Just get a good picture of me standing in front of this building…"
"How I feel when people post &quot;How I feel when..&quot; gifs"
"So tomorrow is Friday the 13th"
"How I feel about Friday the 13th posts."
"How I feel about all the friendzone posts on Reddit"
"Oh  it's international women's day today?"
"My friend's reaction to when I told him it was my &quot;Cake Day&quot;"
"Every time someone talks about Peeta from the HUNGER Games I can't help but think [FIXED]"
"Every time I log into Twitter/Facebook"
"My response to Adam Sessler leaving G4"
"When my local radio station starts a segment on celebrity gossip."
"My boss when I explained it was my &quot;cakeday&quot;"
"In response to all of these &quot;When I noticed/ irl game pictures&quot; posts"
"When someone tells me they went to the gym last night"
"Christians have a super-secret subreddit?"
"What I thought when I heard Barack Obama was doing an AMA [FIXED]"
"Obama did an AMA... MY reaction."
"As a person who wakes up at 2 AM everyday for work  and I see people complaining about going to school at 8AM and work at 7AM..."
"How I feel about Redditors who don't like cats opinions of how Redditors who do like cats will react"
"How I feel about my cake day or anyone elses cake day"
"Too cool for words"
"Rollin"
"Photorealistic pencil drawings by Diego Fazio. They are not photographs"
"&quot;Sensazioni&quot;-- An Incredible Drawing By Diego Fazio"
"hypnotizing"
"How i feel every time i look at something from /r/WTF..."
"Awroo"
"Fuck Yeah"
"Like father like son"
"Family Matters"
"Wookie puppy"
"I would feel like Han Solo driving the Millenium Falcon everywhere i went."
"Chewbacca Dog"
"Chewy pooch!"
"Stealing WiFi [FB]"
"Cute couple..."
"My thought process for every game I've bought so far..."
"How I decide to buy games on Steam"
"How I take advantage of steam sales (x-post from r/funny)"
"spin me round"
"We're fucked."
"How I feel taking a test I didn't study for."
"Me reading through r/askscience"
"Me trying to read a client contract at work."
"Me reading all the Higgs Boson posts"
"How i feel reading the AMA from the engineers of the Curiosity Rover Mission"
"Reading the Curiosity team AMA"
"As somebody who is in a basic Japanese class while playing through a Japanese copy of Pokemon Black 2  I feel like this."
"When I tried to learn how to dungeoneer by looking up guides on youtube."
"After attending my first meeting at my new job"
"Undecided voters last night"
"I just joined a stem cell lab as an undergraduate researcher. Pretty much sums up my day."
"Trying to read a simple sentence in Latin after years of not studying it."
"Well I just laughed like an idiot for about 5 minutes"
"Aley-oop"
"Best Gif Ever  credit to NOTTHEDROIDS105  i think. In case anybody hasn't already seen this one."
"Best Gif Ever  credit to NOTTHEDROIDS105  i think. In case anybody hasn't already seen this one."
"How I feel when I think its my Reddit birthday and noticing that it passed a month ago."
"This gets me every time."
"Various types of monsters"
"Unluckyman being unlucky"
"Well shit..."
"Genetics in action"
"This is how genetics work"
"Why it's hard for me to enjoy my food..."
"Another Overly Attached Dog"
"I'll be watching you"
"Let's trade......."
"Salvation!"
"Just what I've been waiting for!"
"I don't doubt that"
"Rainbow Wave"
"my friend took this while surfing in california. incredible."
"So many things are wrong with this"
"Nice Leotard old man"
"Confused dog on an escalator."
"Dopey escalator dog."
"Vertical walking"
"Ain't nothin' gonna break it"
"Chuck Testa..."
"Accidentally dropped flour on my horse."
"Ridiculously Photogenic Guy"
"r/atheism"
"Overly Attached Girlfriend!"
"Summer sale coming bleargh..."
"Nothing like beating a dead meme"
"What is this I don't even"
"Don't touch the lava."
"Going to a new relative's place for Thanksgiving"
"How I feel getting endless amounts of letters from colleges"
"How I feel entering the gym two hours later than usual"
"Reading the roster for Sony All Stars Battle Royale"
"How I feel browsing /r/gonewild"
"I stumbled accross this while viewing a friends facebook"
"Puppy staying warm"
"Mean while in canada"
"My buddy asked me to pass out flyers for his new shirt company  this is what I texted him when he asked how it was going."
"(X-post) My buddy asked me to pass out flyers for his new shirt company  this is what I texted him when he asked how it was going"
"Friday ..."
"Pizza's here!"
"/v/ Gives Game Purchase Advice"
"The strongest argument for gay marriage."
"Kissing booth"
"You'll never know the truth."
"Darth Vader dancing"
"Sometimes I abuse my right to the internet. (click Show Video on the right to improve your experience)"
"Meanwhile  at the dark side..."
"Milkman after bombing of London. (1940)"
"When I'm at work."
"Sorry Reddit  Just Another Re-Post"
"Hes not here right now"
"OK Guess I'll come back later..."
"Mmmmmm no no.."
"The Weasley family reunion."
"When payday comes around and I think I'm rich"
"This .gif always cracks me up"
"Bert!?"
"My reaction to finding out Jersey Shore will be canceled... then immediately discovering Snookie has a spinoff show..."
"I think I'm mentally scarred for life after seeing this."
"Baby + Daddy + Face Swap = LOL"
"How I feel after browsing r/Christianity for a while..."
"How I feel every time I look to see how much I have in the bank.."
"TopGear in trouble with PETA. (xcross from r/pics)"
"I don't see the harm in that."
"My dog would be pissed!"
"First Picture of Bacon Cosplay EVER - Vintage April 1894"
"Bacon Outfit? Yes please."
"While browsing pics and funny...."
"Every time I'm in the bathroom at a restaurant."
"i cant be the only one..."
"How I feel about Reddit as of late."
"How I feel as a Christian who likes both atheists and people of faith"
"How i feel when people upload pics with alcohol"
"Seriously guys...every time I see a good girl gina post"
"I can't be the lone ent here..."
"How I feel when I log on and see 5/120 people online"
"to those of you who constantly shut down you believing friends just for stating their beliefs"
"After seeing all these pictures people take of their horrifying injuries..."
"After living in the college dorms for a few weeks..."
"Seriously  this never happens"
"Bring on the downvotes"
"It's the little things that really bug me"
"This lil' guy is just having so much fun! Awwww"
"Reddit  I submit to you a happy little duckling to brighten up your day"
"Little swimmer"
"When in r/gonewild"
"Jack Black  master of seduction."
"How boomerangs actually work."
"I'm glad Link is above the laws of physics."
"Champagne nut shot"
"Cheers"
"A gamer's movie idea's."
"Movies meet games."
"videogame characters in movie posters"
"Hmmm....."
"Wednesday knows how to groove."
"Dancing while the earth dies screaming"
"Wednesday Adams be TWERKIN'"
"How I Feel On Fridays (T.G.I.F)"
"Wednesday dropping the funk!"
"Kids these days have no respect for authority."
"It's Mr. Fredricksen!"
"Found him!"
"He does exist."
"The guy from UP [IRL]"
"CoD Gif"
"After having &quot;The Talk&quot; last night  my roommate decided to put the TP the other way like I said. This is not what I had in mind."
"He must be from Canada"
"I laughed way to hard at this OKcupid submission."
"Okcupid has some classy fellas."
"I would love to be a therapist"
"Useful little app"
"Just another weatherman..."
"Brace yourselves.."
"who'd if thought this is in Scotland..."
"who would have thought this was in Scotland?"
"Facts of Life."
"Mr (E)T"
"Mr (E)T"
"Mr (E)T"
"MR. ET"
"How I feel when I find &quot;perfection in porn&quot;"
"The moment when I saw the guy in front of me in my Sociology lecture on Reddit."
"Repost"
"My face when seeing the Lexi Belle photos from the front page"
"&quot;If homosexuality spreads -- ducks could take over the world&quot;"
"Creationist believes homosexuality will lead to Ducks running the world"
"Beware: homosexuality may lead to duck dictatorships."
"no time for explanation. get on the horse!"
"Donald ducks 99 problems"
"How I Treat the Girls on /r/Gonewild That Beg for Upvotes"
"How i feel browsing r/new"
"YOLO?"
"Walking around the teenage-infested mall on a Friday"
"Whenever I go to the mall during summer where all the tweens hang."
"I was at the mall when I heard it..."
"ALRIGHT WHO SAID IT"
"Can't Fucking Stand It."
"WHO SAID YOLO?! WHO SAID IT?!"
"how it feels picking up my little brother during freshman year in high school"
"that kid told me what I was about to see  I thought he just had tourettes"
"Big balls have their disadvantages. (NSFW)"
"Pig. Poop. Balls. (Exactly Like it Sounds)"
"Searched Google images with a URL instead of the image. This was the first result."
"And so it begins..."
"Rise of the planet of the cats.."
"So close  yet so far"
"This is me whenever I try to get into a relationship"
"Sprinkler nut shot"
"The Reddit Invasion - Reddit Timeline and Infographics"
"costume of a genius"
"to my fellow 90's companions"
"I'd hate to live next to this family"
"Haters gonna hate."
"fuck it's shit i'm outta here"
"Me when I barely make it through a yellow traffic light"
"You want me to take a nap?"
"Today is the last day of my 8-year commitment to the US military. This is how I feel."
"How I feel never getting upvotes"
"She's going the distance..."
"Haters Gunna Hate"
"I want to go up. NOW."
"i can make it  i can make it"
"run kitty run!"
"How it feels to be friend zoned and not know it"
"how i feel trying to reach the front page."
"Hey I just met you and this is cr..."
"A wild Honey Boo Boo sneezes....."
"It's snot  right?"
"Achoo!"
"Anyone else think this would be a cool Mod Idea?"
"Medieval Batman"
"god i wish this was a skyrim mod !"
"The Dark Knight"
"Favelas of Brazil. The boundary between wealth and poverty."
"I've been waiting 14 years for this feature"
"The best new feature of BW2"
"The best new feature of BW2"
"I have no idea what I'm doing"
"How I feel being told I'm an approved submitter"
"Me trying to figure out what to get for my family for Christmas..."
"Playing DOTA 2 for the first time"
"So I tried using the Source Filmmaker for the first time."
"Me my entire final today:"
"As an American trying to apply to medical school in England"
"So I decided to try Guild Wars 2"
"My sport knowledgeable friends convinced me to do fantasy football this year  this was me during the draft"
"Seems like a lonely place"
"Where Do Astronauts Hang Out?"
"Where Do Astronauts Hang Out?"
"Where do astronauts hang out?"
"Animorphs: the lost book"
"I would read the shit out of this."
"To sell propane  you must become propane"
"To sell propane  you must become propane."
"Propanimorphs."
"coolest sculpture ever?"
"PAYBACK UP IN THIS MOTHERFUCKER"
"Not what they meant when they said grab the bull by the horns"
"Gotham Style"
"Oh MY GHOTHAM LORD !"
"Oppa Gotham Style."
"Norway anyone?"
"Joseph Gordon-Levitt."
"The Greatest Man to Ever Exist"
"Feeling skeptical?"
"Joseph Gordon-Levitt"
"Joseph Gordon-Levitt"
"Haters gonna hate"
"How i feel when people come round unannounced."
"So fresh and so clean"
"Favorite &quot;haters gonna hate&quot; gif."
"No shame just games."
"Shame"
"the saddest cat to ever wear a bell"
"How I Feel When a Girl Breaks Up on Facebook"
"Walking into Mcdicks at a [6] with more than $5"
"When I go to the bathroom right after the cleaning crew went through."
"When my girlfriend tells me her period is over"
"As long as the caption is clever  I don't care how many times this .gif gets reposted."
"How I feel before a post"
"Ctrl + Shift + N"
"Seeing I've been a Redditor for eleven months"
"Just threw this together. looks pretty cool."
"My friend Told me I slapped like a skinny bitch. Then I gave it some effort"
"This could have been a lot worse."
"When my parents cancel a weekend vacation plan last minute to stay home and spend time with me."
"Every time my boss tells me I need to work late 5 minutes before my shift is supposed to end."
"Me Poochsta"
"Peanut Butter"
"Peanut Butter Derps"
"Peanut Butter."
"They had to know that was bound to happen when they put it out..."
"This guy is probably going to prison for statutory rape."
"Derp in a swing."
"heard barking for awhile  went outside to find this"
"Dog steals a sled."
"This dog knows how to do it"
"MINE"
"GTA in a nutshell"
"&quot;I'll have that........ thanks!&quot;"
"This has been my Cake Day so far..."
"How I felt when I fell off of my longboard the morning of my 20th Birthday"
"How most people feel against a reposter"
"Christmas came a bit early for her."
"SO MUCH COCAINE"
"sucks to be that guy."
"Onya Paul"
"Nice work Luke!"
"Thanks  Nordstrom."
"Wow  a whiff of sanity."
"You had one job. When you realize it..."
"Time to work with 4chan for the greater good."
"Seal"
"And now that your rose is in bloom...A light hits the gloom on the gray."
"Seal"
"Whaa?"
"So I googled &quot;gay seal&quot;"
"Googled gay seal  found this"
"This popped up on my Facebook news feed with no explanation at all."
"Googled 'Seal of Reddit'  was not disappointed."
"Seal"
"When Drunk Bears Attack"
"Bear go home you are drunk"
"Drunk bear"
"Young girl at a club bouncing huge tits in a small tight shirt"
"To Kanye  Love Kanye"
"His greatest fan."
"True love."
"For all my friends who are on vacation and come to my work with a smile just to say hello"
"Guide for newfags to follow before posting."
"How I feel when dumbass college students feel the need to waste the professor's and everybody else's time by explaining how their recent camping trip was in any way related to chemistry at all."
"Baby Bodybuilder"
"Oh fuck  oh fuck  oh fuck"
"Deep breathes  you got this!"
"Bro  do you even lift?"
"Mommy  can I have some of that Armstrong stuff?"
"Oh Hai! ⦿‿⦿"
"Happy pufferfish is happy"
"Smile!"
"Even smaller version of new iPod mini already in stores... the secret Apple doesn't want you to know."
"This is still my favorite Photoshop of all time."
"I'm on THAT part of the internet again..."
"wat."
"The fuck? O_o"
"Hey...hey wait are you faceswapping me? Dude  cut it out..."
"My favorite face swap"
"Googled n64 mods and found this"
"Bellyface"
"Face Swap"
"My favorite face swap."
"I don't even know what to title this."
"This is still my favorite Photoshop of all time."
"Caught one!"
"Googled &quot;fish face swap.&quot; Was not disappointed."
"Pick your shit up"
"Littering"
"I do believe these people are going to have a bad day."
"Just another late-night McDonald's run"
"He strikes again!"
"Better call the cops"
"Just grabbing some Micky Ds when all of the sudden"
"Out of the night  when the full moon is bright"
"Pavlov's Dog"
"Currency when I was in elementary school [Fixed]"
"Currency when I was in elementary school [FIXED]"
"I am the Bat-yawn."
"baby bat yawning"
"Baby Bat Yawning"
"I hope my Friday night is as cool as these guys..."
"I am trying this at my next school dance"
"cant stop laughing"
"Amazing shot of young couple getting arrested and trying for one last kiss."
"Criminal Love outside a Manhattan Police Station"
"&quot;Ridiculously Photogenic Criminals&quot;"
"Had faith in humanity...and it's gone"
"Such a lethal killing is completely unprecedented."
"Such a lethal killing is completely unprecedented."
"So i googled Nicolas Cage for once."
"Bubble: Mid-Burst"
"Bubble in Mid-Burst."
"Bubble just before busting"
"A monstrous dust storm (Haboob) roars through Phoenix  Arizona"
"What if..."
"I have the sweetest boner right now"
"I thought I'd seen everything!(NSFW)"
"(╯°□°）╯︵ \_/"
"Threw It On The Ground"
"You knew it was a good day when one of these bad boys rolled in."
"Shopping cat"
"Wilt Chamberlain and Andre the Giant -- holding up Arnold Schwarzenegger (on the set of Conan)! [PIC]"
"Wilt Chamberlin  Arnold Schwarzenegger  and Andre the Giant on the set of &quot;Conan  the Destroyer&quot; - TOTALLY AWESOME!"
"Wilt Chamberlain and Andre the Giant -- holding up Arnold Schwarzenegger"
"Arnold and Andre and wilt."
"Go  Go..."
"Fatality!!!"
"This was playing when opened today's wtf gif"
"Soldiers of the internet"
"Religion Explains the Dinosaurs"
"Extinction of the Dinosaurs [FIXED]"
"MY favorite way dinosaurs could have died."
"Running late for ninja class..."
"Fastball"
"MFW when I called my ex girlfriend a bitch at prom"
"Amy Poehler and Will Arnett separate"
"Went to a party and hooked up with a girl that has no friends. Now she texts me 400 times a day. I feel like..."
"What."
"Lolwut"
"What..."
"What..."
"Bring amber lamps"
"My coworker went to the doctor today for a pinched nerve in his back. Diagnosis: Ostrich"
"This has to be the cutest dog that i have ever seen."
"The most non-cute thing I have seen in my life."
"awwwww baby...:-)"
"The most adorable thing I have ever seen."
"All of my aww."
"My favorite gif of all time"
"Little puppy hugging a thumb (gif)"
"This is one of my favorite gifs ever  enjoy!"
"Someday I hope i can do this."
"What are you looking at?"
"Reading the posts on here  it's easy to forget that not all Christians are narrow minded-bigots."
"Living the college dream!"
"Saw this in my news feed today."
"forgive me america"
"Forgive me  America."
"Trying to disagree with someone without being rude"
"My reaction whenever someone asks  &quot;Oh! Do you read reddit too?!&quot;"
"When someone says this .gif has been used too many times"
"GTFO Grandma"
"Can't possibly think of a title for this"
"Can't possibly think of a title for this one"
"When something I upvote in /new makes it to the front page"
"Sitting in the middle of campus watching girls pass by in hot yoga pants and short shorts."
"Here's how I feel today."
"Obama: deal with it"
"How my mouth feels after getting my braces off."
"How I Feel About Neil deGrasse Tyson Doing Another AMA or How to Get Downvoted all to Hell on Reddit."
"&quot;How can you not care?&quot;"
"No ducks were given that day."
"silly duck"
"So I'm in Puerto Rico  and this idiot cuts me off and nearly punctures my car tire"
"How I react when I log in and see I made the front page."
"He thinks he's people"
"Can I get a push?"
"Just a day at the park with Harry"
"Can someone give me a boost here?!"
"Well that's...awkward"
"Awkward"
"Very Awkward"
"Multiculturalism"
"Wall sockets from around the world!"
"I think this race is already won..."
"Just another day at the beach"
"Photobombing dolphin"
"Holy Carp!"
"Found him"
"See how many you can name."
"Another reason not to live in Australia"
"As if we needed more reasons to love Sir Ian McKellen"
"Gandalf wearing sunglasses on the set of The Hobbit."
"I Googled Awesome Animals and this was the first thing that came up"
"awkward.."
"How it feels to chew 5 gum"
"Sitting at the kids table during dinner on a holiday."
"I've seen it before  but this always gets a laugh out of me."
"Gotta love the stories from the Bible."
"I remember this game."
"Angels: The worst kind of bullies"
"Angel"
"Mm  yes. Right there."
"Homer sugar on me."
"Oh fuck. Ohfuck. OhfuckohfuckohfuckohfARRRRGGGHHH!!"
"Diglett Dig"
"Me dancing at parties"
"How the average Redditor spits game."
"Drunk sex summed up pretty good"
"Why I hate the club"
"Obama  Bill and Binders"
"Oh Bill...."
"Nirvana meets Charles Barkley"
"/r/new"
"Leroy has done it again"
"The original Ronald McDonald. This would have scared me away from hamburgers for life"
"A new Lamborghini"
"Bill Gates wants a new car"
"If only I made as much a year as he does a day...."
"This is why we can't have nice things."
"Sean America Connery"
"Freedom!"
"HAND-DRAWN AWESOMENESS: THE PERFECT ESCAPE"
"Touch of creation"
"Fuck it  I'm out."
"Hallelujah I believe!"
"I'M SO happy it's Friday I could fly"
"Christians: 1  Atheists: 0"
"My favorite gif"
"Televangelists through the Danger Zone - [3:31]"
"Preacher jet transformation"
"Every damn night."
"Katy &amp; Ri-Ri"
"My approach to talking to my angry girlfriend"
"How I feel when I see a questionably attractive chick"
"I'll just have to keep holding my breath waiting for this one's sequel..."
"I'll ask for a sequel to something too!"
"Epic paper plane guide."
"om nom nom nom..."
"Om nom nom tree"
"I know it's probably a repost but it's the funniest thing I've ever seen."
"Observe the majestic Derpasaurus in its natural habitat."
"How I feel when my posts get downvoted"
"Every time I think I made an awesome post."
"I could watch this forever"
"Best Mascot Ever (repost from r/funny)"
"Dat tail!"
"How I felt after just coming out of my last final ever"
"When I let my mom use the laptop  but forget to clear the browser history"
"How I feel trying to reach the front page"
"Watched this classic [gif] for about ten minutes today  I laughed the whole time."
"om-nom-nom-nom-oof!"
"how i feel trying to make front page."
"How I feel as an adult trying to roller skate"
"I can't stop laughing"
"Well shit."
"Well shit."
"walking to class after taking an adderall"
"obama sempai"
"found this in... 4chan?"
"Sometimes in life  the gods smile upon you  my friends."
"I don't see the big deal..."
"Pandemic 2 challenge accepted. How did I do?"
"I can finally win!"
"The moment you realize you're wrong in an argument."
"How I feel when reddit tells me I can't possibly be an Arab Atheist that &quot;Looks white&quot;."
"Browsing r/funny/new/"
"My reaction when I click on a username from gonewild only to find that the link I saw was their only post"
"Valley of Fire State Park  Nevada"
"How i feel waiting."
"Thought a few in here might enjoy this"
"Coming back to a successful comment after several hours"
"One Of The Only Games I'd Want An HD Remake Of.&lt;3"
"The greatest game nobody ever played."
"Anyone else remember this game?"
"12 years later  this game still rocks."
"Wait a minute  sequels? I'd like a sequel to this."
"Drinking Vodka"
"The biggest lie ever told. A lie bigger than your mother."
"Who the hell participated in this test?"
"0_o ARE THEY ON CRACK?"
"A Facebook ad by Bing. This is the biggest lie. ever."
"So I was taking pictures of bubbles..."
"Redditor soaped the dick of Invisible Man just for karma."
"Walking through my college after having sex for the first time"
"How I react when I'm expected to work on my cake day"
"like a boss"
"Hurricat"
"Clubbing on bath salts"
"So I was browsing club pictures when suddenly..."
"Evil Laugh Snake without the balloon. Go r/photoshopbattles go! [x-post from r/gifs]"
"I wish I could get this to work better."
"Evil Snake..."
"Evil Laugh"
"Bert and Ernie on Drugs"
"Dawww."
"I'm sure this will be funnier in 3 months"
"Yup"
"Repost"
"Lol google shows how to get karma"
"HAHA OMG"
"How to reap the karma."
"I'm sure this will be funnier in 3 months."
"This is gonna be hilarious in a couple months too"
"I'm sure this will be funnier in 3 months."
"I'm sure this will be funnier in 3 months"
"I'm sure this will be funnier in 3 months [Fixed]"
"I'm sure this will be funnier in 3 minutes"
"I'm sure this is funny  now that its three hours later."
"I'm sure this will be funny in 3 months."
"Is it funny yet?"
"I'm sure this will be funnier in 3 hours."
"I'm sure this will be funnier in 3 months [FIXED]"
"I found this on /r/funny and I think /r/funny would love it!"
"Or in four hours..."
"Google delivers"
"I'm sure this will be funnier in 3 months [fixed]"
"More like a day"
"I'm sure this will be funnier in three months [FIXED]"
"I'm sure this will be funnier in three minutes"
"Let's see if it actually works..."
"I'm sure this will be funnier in three minutes."
"Hey guys look at this hilarious OC I found."
"Forget 3 months  how about now?"
"[x-post /r/funny] I'm sure this will be funnier in a few months"
"How About Now?"
"Why wait 3 months?"
"When I have nothing clever or creative to post on my cakeday."
"When my computer bricks."
"When flipping tables becomes too mainstream for anger..."
"How I'll try to raise my unborn daughter..."
"this little girl is a badass."
"Theyyyyyyy're acceptable!"
"Why not...."
"Makes me want to stay on the planet a little longer"
"What is this New York Times you speak of?"
"Happy baby is always happy. Always."
"Seasons + Tycho - hours"
"This makes me happy"
"&quot;You die after about 80 of these&quot; An Xpost from r/gifs."
"Time keeps on slipping  slipping  slipping..."
"Seasons of Beauty"
"Almost like travelling in time"
"Time of the season"
"A photo a day"
"i think its fitting  first try"
"How it felt hitting the FRONT page"
"Shots!"
"SHOTS"
"I dare you not to count them"
"Flu Seasons back once more"
"How I Feel When The Work Day Is Done"
"When I realize that I've just said/did something stupid"
"It's easy being Pro-Life when......"
"It's easy being pro-life when....(x-post from r/Pics)"
"Hey guys 8)"
"Everybody meet Zues. 8)"
"Have you seen THIS dog?"
"*sigh* the good old days..."
"This is probably why I am so mad all of the time"
"No Time to Explain..."
"When dire emergency occurs..."
".......Is that a cactus?"
"This is /r/trees right now."
"That feeling you get when one of your post finally becomes somewhat successful."
"For the last 18 months  I've worked two jobs to support my family. Today is my last day at my late-night part time job."
"When me and my co-worker found out we both reddit..."
"100% Historically Accurate"
"The War on Terror in a Nutshell"
"Cat fucking owns kid"
"How SRS is feeling right now"
"Little boy slaps cat. Cat KO's HIM."
"Tough kitty retaliates"
"He won't do that again"
"Still one of my favorite gifs ever"
":O !"
"When I'm drunk and want to get my girlfriend in the mood..."
"How I feel trying to dance for a girl"
"Yes I do."
"The way atheists imagine the Last Supper."
"Now this is a last dinner I'd like to attend."
"The Last Supper"
"A Momonga!"
"Cute Little Animal"
"brain freeze"
"Dog licking an ice-cream"
"Pupsicle"
"Mmm  now thats a bloody good icecream"
"Made from shattered CDs."
"A hummingbird made of old CD pieces."
"SCIENCE"
"Bill Nye the Science Guy and Mythbusters"
"Hey mom  can I play next?"
"Bread crumbs."
"Aw yiss"
"motha. fuckin. bread crumbs."
"Yiss."
"Well it sure beats &quot;I love dicks&quot; [FB]"
"I present you my fav FB repost"
"It is the dawn of a new age of warfare  Ladies and Gentlemen  the Elite Hoversoldier."
"suddenly a flying sniper appears - Imgur"
"Then suddenly  a flying sniper!"
"Rollin' In Style"
"When someone on the internet starts threatening me."
"When my friend tells me her boyfriend doesn't watch porn"
"Whenever someone says &quot;not photoshoped&quot; or &quot;totally real&quot; in r/pics"
"When I get waved on at an intersection that I got to first:"
"My reaction when a good female friend tried convincing me that her ex bf would delete all the nude photos she sent him over the years....."
"Whenever a Christian tells me a carpenter-god came to save me 2000 years before I was even born."
"Whenever people talk about &quot;Karma&quot;"
"Whenever I see that a another country has demanded that the US change a policy or arrest a person who has offended them"
"HIFW I see the bing commercial saying they are better then google."
"When a teenager says they are mature for their age."
"When someone labels a post &quot;[Fixed]&quot;"
"It's a trap!"
"Got some new glasses..."
"I always knew it."
"God hates cats therefore god hates reddit"
"John Wayne Gacy (convicted serial murderer) dressed in a clown suit. *shudder*"
"Just a guy being an awesome parent!"
"When it seems like you are going to have a nice 1v1 situation in a multiplayer game..."
"How I react when I make a funny comment and get upvoted"
"wake up  realize i have the day off..."
"How I feel getting Friday off"
"Just noticed that the lady in this .gif looks like she's saying &quot;Beat me.&quot;"
"FUCK YEAH!"
"How i feel being new to Reddit and not having negative comment Karma anymore:"
"How I feel having enough money to pay all my bills on time this month..."
"How I felt when I logged on to Reddit today. Mars Curiosity Rover Mission AMA?"
"Finding out the girl you're flirting with is a Redditor"
"My reaction to Jersey Shore getting cancelled."
"me while watching Slick Willy's speech last night..."
"When the upvotes start coming in."
"NOPE to the power of NOPE (bee on eye)"
"Nope. [X-Post from pics]"
"2 things on Earth completely freak my wife out. The human eye  and bees. I sent her this link without mentioning what it was."
"Just imagine how this would feel"
"Oh hell no!!"
"Come at me  bro."
"Come at me  bro!"
"Boyz In Da Hood"
"Ladies  this is how you pose for a picture in a club when wearing a dress."
"Batman Comic"
"I love it batman!!!"
"Nothing can deter The Joker."
"Lol So Hard"
"SURPRISE!"
"How to be a dick. Step 1"
"Bunny wants a carrot."
"Some sort of salamander."
"I see your seapig  and raise you the cute axolotl"
"I see all of your guys's wierd sea creatures and raise you an IRL mudkip."
"you do this so well."
"From what I hear  she really gets around..."
"Oh Suh'nap"
"8 million and one."
"Showed up on my facebook feed."
"Well  he deserves an A+ for creativity..."
"I don't see how any of these answers are wrong..."
"SOON..."
"Cat suspense"
"How I feel watching my karma slowly rise."
"Your mother and a host of other things that are funny"
"a cookie never hurt anyone."
"I can has a cookie now? k thanks bye"
"This is how i feel with all the rain at the moment in the UK"
"Lil' Wayne ....."
"That´s not how you should eat it"
"Asian Ice Cream"
"Working Hard or Hardly Working?"
"Working hard or hardly working?"
"This chocolate looks delightf-WARGHABALGARBAL"
"I regret NOTHING!"
"mmmmm... Chocolate death"
"Just a chocolate dipped cockatiel..."
"Dog Jump FAIL!"
"Barrel rolls. Do one."
"Hey  catch me..........aw  fffuuuuuu...."
"Do a barrel roll"
"Dog chasing car  puppy jumps out of moving car to play"
"My favourite gif of all time. Probably a repost  but toats ma goats worth it."
"Enough!"
"Was in a bad mood  so I googled fuck you. I now feel better."
"Doing homework  when suddenly"
"Get Away From My Plant"
"Nature is beautiful."
"Karma  Karma  Karma  Karma  Karma Chameleon!"
"Hi there."
"The Art of Animals"
"FALCON PUNCH!!!"
"Falcon Punch!"
"Falcon Punch! (xpost from r/funny)"
"Do a barrel roll!"
"CATS!"
"If pussy is the key to happiness  this chick is ecstatic."
"Yo  for all you Harry Potter fans."
"You're a gangster Harry."
"I'm sure its been asked before  but how many of you would say that this man had a major influence on your personal beliefs?"
"Carlin on religion  can't believe it's been 4 years already. RIP George ( ; _ ; )"
"I am going to hell for laughing..."
"I Googled &quot;Vestigial Tail&quot; and found this..."
"I googled &quot;Vestigial Tail&quot; and found this... [X-post from r/WTF]"
"OUCH!!!... I dropped a quarter in the garbage disposal and my gf said &quot;Don't worry  I'll get it &quot;....ooops."
"Math in a nutshell."
"So I was talking to a Christian the other day and this is basically how it turned out"
"When I hear someone say  &quot;It's in The Bible  so it must be true.&quot;"
"Whenever my parents tried to give me &quot;The Talk&quot;"
"When people start talking about the endings of movies I haven't watched yet"
"Kick ass!"
"Kick ass!"
"the advantages of being colorblind."
"the disadvantages of being colorblind"
"Cat of the Future"
"Steroids  not even once."
"Anybody remember how good this series was before Atari ruined it?"
"Every Single Night!"
"Laughing soo hard right now"
"Berenstain Bears tackle the hard questions"
"The secret of happiness is ?"
"The Secret to happiness is...."
"My reaction when I found out Drake smashed a bottle over Chris brown."
"My reaction when I found out Jersey Shore is going down after one more season."
"Waking up to realize that after one long year of waiting  my cake day has finally arrived."
"Storm stroll"
"Am I the only one who sees the resemblance?"
"Goal to take over earth is working"
"Photoshop ruins my life."
"Role reversal"
"Ice-T and Coco"
"Those damn penguins..."
"Best costume ever!!"
"Lincoln Snake"
"Pacman fruit!"
"He exists!"
"Remember when you threw that shoe at me...?"
"A Spider never forgets"
"Fuck .."
"I'm screwed."
"I would cuddle her anyday. Bow chika wow wow"
"Le reddit"
"Beatles Bee Gees"
"Proclaiming the Beatles"
"Abbey Road-Quest!"
"How I feel whenever the song &quot;Rolling in the Deep&quot; comes on the radio."
"Just found a dead pixel"
"How I feel watching memes get abused on Facebook."
"Whenever I see people try to use memes on Facebook"
"My reaction to hearing about Elder Scrolls Online"
"When I found out that Bill Nye was coming to my school... and then subsequently realized that I had a Comp Sci final during his talk."
"So  missed my first Cake Day due to work...."
"Me after getting on r/gifs and there is nothing but overused re-posts"
"MFW Ryan Gosling is most likely for 50 Shades Of Gray film"
"When you get a fucking goldeen in Super Smash Brothers."
"Upon learning that Apple is ditching Google Maps for their own version on the iPhone..."
"How I feel when all the links are purple."
"Excuse me  Chicago school lunch comin through..."
"Photo of the Endeavor's cockpit"
"Step in to my office...Endeavor's cockpit."
"Party Hard!"
"Too Drunk to Drive?"
"Pig Rider"
"Sharks with people teeth [PIC]"
"Suddenly  I'm not afraid of sharks anymore..."
"Coming This Year on Shark Week"
"We're gonna need a bigger dentist"
"The only toaster I care to talk about on Reddit. [FIXED]"
"nothing much  just Salvador Dali taking his anteater for a walk."
"You will never be this interesting"
"Salvador Dali Taking His Anteater On A Walk"
"Scary to think that not too long ago this was accepted by society no questions asked"
"Here’s a picture of Elijah Wood taking a picture of Elijah Wood with a picture of Elijah wood."
"there's nothing to see here!"
"Look at all the bothers he gives!"
"How I feel about my 'cake day'"
"Pooh doesn't give a fuck"
"0 bothers given."
"hearing my friends talk about the new i phone"
"Winnie the Pooh is gonna fuck your bitch"
"Hates Gonna Hate"
"How I feel the night before a big exam"
"Everyone Needs A Hobby"
"Meanwhile in Fukushima..."
"Why Japan  Why?"
"What South Dakota wind can do."
"A little wind in South Dakota today."
"Here is a shot my friend took from the road of the massive semi blow over just east of Kadoka  SD on I-90."
"Little windy today in western South Dakota"
"Silly trucks. Go home  you're drunk."
"Round round"
"Come at me bro"
"My zombie style kung fu is best and will defeat you."
"you threw it  YOU find it!"
"This one always makes me laugh"
"Serious bummer."
"Trying to figure out which on of these 3 guys is the biggest jackass.....tough call"
"Awesome TF2 Soldier cosplay"
"Just five more minutes.."
"Just a yawning hedgehog"
"Baby porcupine"
"I must have!!"
"Slender checks under his bed for Chuck Norris"
"Home right now...gone fishing."
"Off rapper Gucci Mane's Instagram"
"Look  I'm really sorry... I was gonna tell you  I swear. Maybe we can just go for a walk and we can talk about it?"
"Soon..."
"Who wants cream?"
"Now this is weird  even to me?"
"It's just a flesh wound!"
"imgur roulette strikes again"
"I've never seen that on the menu?"
"Macca's decides to cater specifically towards the homosexual..."
"Let us celebrate Columbus day...."
"Foolproof"
"sTAYING IN THE fROZEN sPIRIT i SUBMIT fROZEN sEAL"
"Easier than your sister."
"My response to my friend when he asked me to save him from his roommate's annoying music on skype"
"The checkmate atheists to end them all."
"Well I guess they got us there"
"It's ok little one"
"So a deer walked into a bar."
"So a deer walks into a bar..."
"So  a deer walked into a bar..."
"So a deer walks into a bar.."
"This is me leaving for class every morning..."
"When my girlfriend wants to talk about marriage"
"I just turned around in the middle of having a shower and came face to face with a massive spider."
"How I feel when arguing with a Republican or a feminist [might be repost]"
"With confidence... [xpost /r/india]"
"...with confidence!"
"...with confidence!"
"'Merica"
"How I feel watching President Obama's DNC speech"
"Following the United States presidental elections from Europe"
"Whenever I add a girl on Facebook [fixed] Audio NSFW."
"Every move you make"
"I'll be watching you."
"What I think I look like when I get caught staring at a cute girl across the classroom."
"A week later  what I remember from New Years Eve."
"How I feel about the recent trend of posting .gifs to r/gonewild"
"The most majestic of all gifs. Ron Fucking Swanson."
"Me after I hit 1000 karma points"
"How I feel when I get two karma..."
"Took my first lightning shot today. Also shit my pants in doing so!"
"Porn &amp; Pancakes"
"breaking news! Pancakes just got sexy!"
"I think FOX News is running out of stories"
"Ron Swanson  thats all."
"Politics Made Easy."
"He gets my vote this election."
"I want to see THIS man running in the 2012 election."
"I know who I'm voting for in 2012"
"Patrick Star 2012"
"Repost  but since it's election time"
"The Evolution of Joseph Gordon-Levitt"
"The Evolution of Joseph Gordon-Levitt"
"JGL's dreams are made of this"
"The irony is outstanding..."
"How I feel like when I tell my team that I buzzkilled a guy who was about to get a nuke in Modern Warfare 2"
"When Obama found out that my username is Ob-ama"
"How it must feel to have +1000 upvotes"
"Struttin'"
"Water Bottle Hunting"
"A One Thousand-Piece Bacon CheeseBurger"
"Getting a B- in Organic Chemistry  guessing on the whole final."
"Old Man Yells At Chair"
"The reviews of Clint Eastwood's RNC speech are in!"
"This pretty much sums up Client Eastwood's speech at the RNC."
"Sorry Clint  but the Simpsons already did it."
"Clint Eastwood at the RNC"
"Hey  Clint! Simpsons did it  Simpsons did it!"
"Clint Eastwood's...eccentric behavior got a write up in a local paper."
"Coverage of last nights RNC &quot;surprise&quot;speaker"
"Clint Eastwood  Simpsons Style"
"Clint Eastwood's speech at the RNC reminded me of this."
"Clint Eastwood at RNC"
"How I see Christians complaining about something"
"When fucking up a joke and the punchline is met with killing silence"
"Feline disrepect [nsfw  maybe? I don't even..]"
"oh japanese  you're so weird..."
"This is beyond our level of comprehension"
"I'll just leave this here..."
"What...I don´t even.."
"Apparently Mario Kart was inspired by Alaska"
"I bet the view from the car is super awesome"
"This should be the opening for every episode."
"Slap the bitch out of Joffrey"
"Tyrion Slaps Redux"
"Game of Thrones catharsis"
"Reddit's reaction to the majority of my posts"
"I was Karl from the movie UP and I ran into this nice little asain at a party."
"White people"
"It is time party..."
"Slick moves"
"White people..."
"Conan drops it."
"found this while searching for 'foot tattoos' on google"
"My wife showed me this from pinterest. I won't bury the lead. It's the first tattoo that ever bummed me out."
"Was Playing Saint Rows 3 When This Happened...."
"I think my game broke - Imgur"
"A bat embryo. And it is freakin adorable."
"Bat embryo"
"Bat Embryo"
"Thought this belonged here(ex post from r/wallpapers)"
"then and now"
"You've got mail!"
"Mommy and me time"
"Photo of Schwarzenegger love child released to press"
"How I feel when asked a math question."
"O.O"
"Don't you guys hate when you're going to sleep and this man shows up?"
"Why hello their"
"We Have Avenged You"
"Master Derp"
"Saw this on my news feed i couldn't stop laughing.."
"DUURRRRRR"
"Tim Allen as... Buzz Lightyear"
"Real Life Buzz Lightyear (amazing CG art)"
"Buzz Lightyear"
"out cold (xpost r/gifs)"
"How all of my mornings look like"
"He's not dead  just derp"
"I imagine this is how I look when people try to wake me up."
"Waking up for work hungover"
"dead tired."
"Little known fact"
"An ad campaign for Vancouver’s Science World."
"Sorry People of America - From Libya"
"Best Halloween costume ever."
"Cool Ranch just got cooler..."
"Salt &amp; Pepper can pack their bags &amp; go. This is genius."
"No kitten left behind."
"How i feel downvoting something with 100's of upvotes"
"Don't Bother!"
"Just a Tiny Clown Surrounded By Orthodox Jewish Men"
"When my witty reply gets more karma than the original comment."
"I want this NOW!"
"You can't have the X Factor  THIS IS ENGLAND!"
"Sleepy Sloth"
"Sleepy Sloth"
"Tired sloth is tired."
"Sleepy Sloth"
"Book him Mr. Bluebird."
"We all are honey   we all are ."
"I have no regrets."
"For my cake day  I present a chicken being wobbled!"
"Chicken  what are you doing."
"A woman wearing a strange outfit."
"The Maturity Climb. (I wish I could show this to my ex...)"
"The Longer You Look  The Truer It Gets"
"Victorian Super Heroes"
"WTF on so many levels... I couldn't stop laughing at #7."
"These Guys Aren't Playin'"
"Couldn't stop laughing at this"
"When there's only a little bit left in your water bottle"
"Lapping  and lapping  and lapping..."
"We are all born with a hole in our chest..."
"The unknown doesn't have to be scary"
"God prefers who?"
"Dammit  Spongebob!"
"Meanwhile  in Canada (x-post from /r/Canada)"
"Meanwhile  in Canada (x-post from r/Canada)"
"Meanwhile  in Canada (x-post from r/hockey)"
"Bad idea."
"I think here it will get a better reaction from (r/wtf)"
"Instant regret."
"statutory rape?"
"So judgmental!"
"because this is what i love staring at when im peeing"
"We need more of these"
"ACHOO!!! ... oh shit! (NSFW?)"
"Shart?"
"Just when you got over your fear of dropping the soap....."
"&quot;Bless yo-.......&quot; (Nsfw)"
"That's a mighty sneeze"
"What its like watching a .gif i haven't seen yet on my phone."
"Right place  wrong time"
"I couldn't stop laughing at this"
"Gesundheit.."
"This cracks me up whenever I watch it."
"Always makes me laugh"
"Vampire Teabags?"
"I'm just gonna put these right here"
"Is it cold in here?"
"Face = Priceless"
"My nips are rock hard."
"My nips are rock hard."
"Gandalfstyle"
"Gunzerker Style"
"When I noticed today was my cake day."
"Good Family Pet"
"How Steam sales feel with a new 2TB hard drive."
"How I feel about Australia"
"Kitten wearing an angry frog hat"
"They're so CUUUTTTEEE!!!"
"Just some waterskiers"
"Permpkern Sperce Lahtter"
"I guess this Starbucks hears all the girls at my school."
"role reversal"
"A little role reversal for you all"
"I'm in the mood"
"Meanwhile in Soviet Russia"
"Meanwhile in Soviet Russia"
"He might think she's crazy but he wouldn't mind at all"
"[NSFW] Funny GIF I found on Stumbleupon made me go WTF?!"
"Me next  me next!"
"When I wake up in an ex's bed after a night of drinking."
"What?! Oh  you again..."
"When someone wakes me up during deep sleep."
"Every goddam morning"
"Koi-magnet"
"Good morning!"
"He's about to take off!!"
"Yes  this is a human being(NSFL)"
"8 O"
"I think I am turning into Taylor Swift?"
"Socially awkward penguin IRL"
"Socially awkward penguin at the zoo"
"How I feel when I show up to the wrong class"
"SAP in action"
"Socially Awkward Penguin"
"&quot;Enjoy your meal&quot; &quot;You too&quot; Nothing to do here! Vrooom!"
"Socially Awkward Penguin in Action"
"He is just a bit awkward"
"Marge  it's 3am"
"Ainsley makes one of those FB 4 panels"
"Did you know? (x-post from 4chan)"
"=D"
"Please help us raise awareness."
"The easier statistic would be to find the number of people on reddit this hasn't happened to"
"&quot;oh you're doing something important? well  im just gonna sit riiiight...here.&quot;"
"No. Stop. You're done. Your time on the internet is over. [GIF]"
"Cats love keyboards"
"Hey  this looks like my spot!"
"Just shopping"
"Newborn porcupine"
"Newborn porcupine (xpost-pics)"
"This is my nightmare"
"Wait for it... Wait for it...."
"Cannot unsee"
"SnoopRomney"
"He lost 47% of his face."
"This is how I feel getting downvotes"
"A reliable weapon."
"The greatest invention ever created by mankind."
"Sometimes the best description for a picture  is not having one..."
"Dat Ass"
"So I hear the iPhone 5 is going to be $800"
"When I realize that I am manually breathing"
"After going through all the safety rules and the overly-graphic things that could happen when they are ignored in my first tech class.."
"Stupidity  level: Expert"
"Fool proof glass"
"Are we on frontpage yet? (tissue cross section of marram grass leaf)"
"Happy cross section tissue of a marram grass leaf"
"This is how I picture every Redditor when I read through comments."
"After seeing him everywhere  how I imagine andrewsmith1986"
"Accidentally clicked photo booth and saw what I look like when I Reddit [FIXED]"
"what i picture everytime i think of a troll"
"Hahaha wow reddit. That Chick-Fil-A pictures is one of the biggest  most stupid generalizations I have ever seen.. How about this  this is a picture of every atheist. Why are you bitching about doing community service when yall never get out of the house?"
"What I imagine Apostolate looks like"
"How I imagine the r/gaming moderators"
"How I imagine the commenters at /r/GoneWild [FIXED]"
"When my boss starts trying to explain how it wasn't his fault we lost our client..."
"After seeing &quot;Comment Score Below Threshold&quot;"
"Me walking into the theatre next week to see The Dark Knight Rises"
"Photo of researchers as they try to approach giant panda Taotao and its mother Caocao in Wolong National Nature Reserve"
"I'm 7 years old too. - Imgur"
"Dont always assume"
"I thought I was digging too deep into Reddit  when I found this in an odd  tiny subreddit"
"funniest face swap I've ever seen"
"I'm sure you are  Nick."
"So am I  Nick."
"How I feel after finally finding my favorite guitar pick."
"Spongebob and friends!"
"Spongebob + Realism"
"H. P. Lovecraft's rendition of Spongebob Squarepants"
"I don't remember SpongeBob being this morbid..."
"Where am I? What is my name? And can I have that ice cream cone?"
"Arrested while on acid"
"Arrested while on acid"
"Didn't realize it was my cake day until 8 pm today... here's pretty much how it went down."
"how I felt logging onto reddit on a different computer brand  using IE  no RES  and all the default Reddits..."
"How I play Skyrim after installing a new graphics card"
"It's my first cake day and I have nothing to post...this is how I feel."
"Every Valentine's day.."
"&quot;We Built It&quot; - GOP"
"&quot;We Built It&quot;"
"Yes  yes you did..."
"Yes you did"
"The GOP should probably get a new staging manager"
"Bad sign placement at the Republican National Convention."
"GOP built the U.S. National Debt:"
"Well  RNC  when you're right you're right"
"Well  RNC  when you're right you're right"
"Funniest part of GOP convention"
"Uhm.. not sure that's what Republicans were aiming for when they set that up..."
"Poor sign placement"
"Republican Convention: I think you're doin' it wrong."
"Finally  something truthful from the convention"
"One truth to come out of the RNC"
"We built it..."
"Target nailed it."
"Target understands"
"Me when I walk into my kitchen to see how many dishes I have to do"
"Say cheese.."
"When I go to work on a Friday..."
"me when asked to &quot;say cheese&quot;"
"Every family photo."
"Little Niggas....."
"Sometimes  we don't need to see it in HD."
"Sponge...bob?"
"Spongebob has changed since I last seen him..."
"What girl fights mostly consist of"
"Pretty much sums up my Thanksgiving..."
"Me  every meal."
"How I feel after eating fast food for the first time in months."
"Pug Life"
"How I felt when two of my four finals were online and the other two were open book."
"I can't stop giggling. [xpost /r/gifsound]"
"I hate it when this happens to me [Comic]"
"We all know that feel"
"Pretty funny!"
"(xpost from r/funny) Does this happen to any of you?!"
"Isn't it the cutest banana you've ever seen?"
"The reason we struggle with insecurity... -Steve Furtick [600 x 342]"
"Unfair comparison."
"It's your movie  not theirs."
"As far as I'm concerned  this is witchcraft."
"It's not a gif  I swear!"
"Click this and thank me later. Not a gif."
"Click this and thank me later [pic]"
"Open your mouth and take a minute to relax"
"Glasgow knows best"
"Subways of the world"
"When alcohol is involved.....miracles do happen!"
"o_O! Mind Fuck."
"Mind blown"
"Woah.... [Xpost from Woahdude]"
"I take full responsibility for this"
"Give it to me  baby"
"Nearly overdone  but... it fits."
"There is no need to be upset"
"The Deadly Kiss of Civilization's Gun"
"Damnit 4chan"
"How I feel when there's not enough time for the other team to defuse the bomb."
"You can dance if you want to......"
"How I feel having both my birthday and last day of high school in the same week"
"How I felt finally getting a girlfreind after 18 long years."
"LIVE TO WIN!!"
"a perfect match?"
"How I feel when I've made a successful post:"
"The Heroes of Atheism!"
"Found this masterpiece on 4chan. I think that Reddit will like it!"
"i want to ride my bike"
"When your girlfriend introduces you to her attractive friends"
"Tip of a ballpoint pen"
"What I was like after seeing all the negative reviews of the iPhone 5"
"Old but still relevant."
"Mastodon Applied."
"The 'Z machine ' the largest X-ray generator in the world  designed for testing in extreme conditions. Due to the extremely high voltage  it is submerged in transformer oil and deionized water  for insulation. Still  the pulse on discharge causes impressive lightning."
"Mittens 'Tiny Face' Romney"
"Kitten mittens"
"My face after I post a link and then notice grammar mistakes."
"Getting a mass amount of upvotes for a post and then seeing them slowly trickle in"
"Catception"
"Ahh  now I know"
"I would love to see him at the Olympics! x)"
"I Miss Him"
"Garfield"
"Current Indoctinational System."
"Current Indoctrinational System"
"How I imagine getting on the front page must feel like... [FIXED]"
"So  a girl hit on me today..."
"What it probably feels like when you submit a link and you come back later to find a lot of karma."
"I have been unemployed for 11 months. Today I just got a call for an interview from 4 different companies!"
"How it felt when my girlfriend told me I gave her three orgasms."
"&gt;MFW I finally get to type up a comment first on a good freshly submitted link  go to post my comment  and discover it has been deleted. &gt;:O"
"We Forced Game 5!!!"
"Checking my powerball numbers and finding out I won 3 dollars"
"How I feel when asking an attractive girl for her number  and succeeding."
"When I'm sick and my pee finally turns clear after drinking a ton of water all day"
"This makes perfect sense"
"Scariest Olympic Moment Yet?"
"Ermahgerd erm a derlphern"
"Scariest Olympic Moment Yet? (xpost from /r/gifs)"
"It came from the depths of hell (x from gifs)"
"OK  I guess it's up to me."
"Reminded me of when the Great Fairies pop out of the water. (x-post from r/gifs)"
"HIFW coming up after holding my breath too long underwater."
"The Olympics"
"With everything that is going on with Chic-Fil-A  this is really nice to see"
"Keep doing what you're doing Target"
"How I feel about the elections"
"I don't follow politics at all. This is all I've been picturing for the past month or so"
"South Park had it right all along"
"I think I'm in love."
"Oppa Batman Style!"
"His butt turned my wiener to dust"
"Not even sure what I'm looking at"
"We got zeros coming in hot"
"The Ultimate Weapon of Mass Destruction"
"For my cakeday  a collection of some of my favorite gifs."
"Bearded dude shooting a deer ass-canon at another dude riding a flying deer who then blows up spectacularly."
"Wot."
"Please...For God Sake!"
"What the fuck - conscience cat"
"When I see headlines reading &quot;Congressional negotiators reach agreement to avert shutdown&quot;  this is what runs through my head."
"Whenever Anyone Does Anything Wrong..."
"Whenever I see someone browsing Reddit without RES"
"When I see a friend reposting from 9gag"
"Me when mutual friends are about to add my ex to our Live party"
"this kitty asks all the questions up in here!"
"My face when I realize that OP hosted anywhere but imgur."
"this kitty asks all the questions"
"When I hear &quot;I introduced my grandparents to Reddit!&quot;"
"When teachers have sex with their students"
"Whenever I see new tokers try to roll a J"
"Every time my parents add a browser toolbar add-on"
"When someone purposely starts an argument about politics"
"Watching a Subway employee making my sub."
"When one of my roommates told me he still uses Internet Explorer"
"Watching Biden at the debate tonight..."
"Halloween - Star Wars Style....."
"Death Star and Alderaan pumpkins"
"Horsing around"
"yoga ball of doom"
"Never fails to make me laugh"
"Horse pilates fail"
"What happens when I try to play sports..."
"Horsing around"
"Horses and yoga don't mix"
"Every time I try to use an exercise ball"
"Breath Damnitt!!!"
"I only have 35 minutes left  so here's a monkey kissing a cat"
"The moment you find out they are bad at kissing"
"Not sure if cuteness or pure savagery..."
"Sometimes I am just too drunk to give a fuck."
"George Lucas on the set of the new live-action Star Wars film"
"George Lucas and his new friends"
"Hey you"
"unk2step"
"This is how I dance at clubs."
"So long sucker"
"Human Ingenuity"
"Cats are like Spongebob."
"Chinese is hardcore"
"My face when I log in facebook these days"
"When i log into Facebook and see memes"
"Whenever I decide to browse r/Gore or r/MorbidReality"
"People driving into a canal thinking it was a street from the floods in Florida."
"Don't want to replace the back glass? Here's a alternate solution!"
"When you forget your flying suit"
"There goes one of his lives"
"This has to be a repost  but it still makes my day every time I see it. Fuck it!"
"My stomach still hurts..."
"Checkmate!"
"I wish I was a dog just so I could wear this costume."
"This was in pics.. if I've ever seen anything that belongs in /r/aww..."
"Excuse me good sir we've got a present for you!"
"Dogs carrying a box - just brilliant!"
"I wish I was a dog just so I could wear this costume."
"I wish I was a dog just so I could wear this costume."
"So true."
"What mother nature really thinks of us."
"New favorite GIF."
"I regret absolutely nothing"
"Equestria Chickens."
"How I feel blatantly browsing Reddit all day as an unpaid intern."
"when i don't delete a comment downvoted below threshold"
"Still my favorite GIF and also how I feel after a year here."
"I just realized it's my cakeday. One year and countless hours later.."
"So  I purchased Max Payne 3 rather than D3."
"Makes me laugh every time."
"So I saw The Dark Knight Rises in an IMAX Dome theater today [FIXED]"
"After Being on reddit for a year and wasting countless possible productive hours browsing blue links"
"I regret not doing this sooner"
"After a Year of reddit"
"How I feel after going to The Hobbit midnight showing last night and having two finals today."
"My cakeday is the day before the end of the world"
"Was shunned for using the word 'retard' in the title of a post that netted me +1 000 karma."
"My buddies convinced me it would be a good idea to go out drinking last night  this is me in class right now."
"The Chainsaw Katana"
"Back the fuck up!"
"Photobomb"
"Don't Think I've Ever Seen A Better Photo Bomb"
"Where can I buy one?"
"Virginity force field"
"ACTIVATE!!"
"deadmau5"
"Every time I get a blowjob"
"When I go to take a dump and forget to bring my phone"
"Every time I get tipped at work"
"How I feel when I see Robert Redford with a beard"
"&quot;Bacon CheeseBurger please&quot; &quot;Im sorry Sir  we're out of cheese... but i can substitute it with more bacon if you like?&quot;"
"Let's get it on..."
"As a Canadian  this is how I felt during the US heatwave."
"How I feel when people tell me to have a nice day the day of my 21st birthday."
"When people ask if my wife has read 50 Shades of Grey..."
"Ooooohhhh Yeeeeaaahhhh....."
"How I feel after just starting to watch arrested development and seeing all the related posts"
"When I found out the male birth control pill also causes mild weight loss."
"When I told a veteran Redditor that there is a gif for everything"
"Take care  kid"
"When my little cousin saw someone with a snapback and said  &quot;swagfag.&quot;"
"How I acknowledged a fellow coworker after overhearing that he's an active redditor"
"A pair of Leias sunbathing on the Stars Wars set."
"Wow  your car art is really... unique."
"&quot;Hey Boys&quot;"
"Big Bird's fate if Romney Wins the Election?"
"The Indoctrination"
"This single wordless illustration caused me to question my religion years ago  and birthed the proud atheist I am today. Wanted to share it"
"Silly spidey ;)"
"Can anyone explain this?"
"Just a kid smoking a cigarette with his cock."
"I don't even..."
"STOP RESISTING!!!"
"Stop resisting!"
"Downvoting something that already has negative karma"
"Yee peng festival (Thailand)"
"Facebook's take on '50 Shades of Grey'"
"Dammnit girl  how many days in a year?"
"Looks like someone is a little confused with this summer's biggest blockbusters"
"He was just trying to help out."
"Facebook delivers"
"First world problems. (Just saw this on my home page.)"
"Some theists can play nice...[FB]"
"The litter tray is empty."
"pussy cock"
"Sounds about right"
"Even Twi-Hards know this!"
"Twi-Hard much?"
"Every time a 12 year old with a headset on XBL gets a nuke in Modern Warfare 2 it sounds like..."
"This was on a wall at my friends school. Made me think."
"Black Monopoly"
"Truth Hurts"
"No chances whatsoever."
"I've never played this variation of MONOPOLY...!"
"[Calvin and] Hobbes and Bacon"
"I wish they would make more Bacon and Hobbes comics"
"Hacked my friends account. Do me a favor. You know you want to."
"When I see a pretty girl looking my way."
"My darling eye…"
"I had to do this..."
"How unfortunate"
"How I feel when I refresh the frontpage and nothing changes..."
"MFW i see a 9gag watermark on a good link"
"The agony of defeat"
"I forgot my cake day  and this is how I'm feeling right now."
"How I feel making the front page...but under a throw away"
"Justin Bieber just released a new song."
"whenever I see someone post an intelligent response that solves the issue..."
"How i feel when second page is also filled with McKayla Not Impressed meme's"
"A Monkey and a Dove"
"Meanwhile on Tumblr..."
"Reddit paparazzi"
"Recent Reddit Meetup"
"Baby Ocelot!"
"I think I'll be visiting the health foods store more often now..."
"Drinkin Soda...."
"Damn birds."
"Not sure why I googled 'cat whale'"
"One of my favorite pictures to date."
"I shall call him  Killer Cat"
"So I finally decided to visit 9gag to see what all the fuss is about..."
"My First Visit To /r/spacedicks.."
"How I imagine black redditors when seeing the Denzel &quot;Mah N****&quot; pic."
"When the downvotes start rolling in."
"How I felt on my 18th birthday."
"I turned 18 today. This is pretty much the only thing on my mind."
"Kittens in a bowl!"
"Trying to take notes in class"
"It is what it is: Sink full of kittens."
"This cute cat karma had yet to be posted in r/pics yet (x-post ...)"
"When you're in the theater and a movie has subtitles"
"My neighbor thinks a dog has been shitting on his yard"
"My secret is out"
"You sir  are brilliant"
"I was only there for the ice-cream!"
"O.o"
"Ping-pong..."
"i feel this is appropriate for my first post"
"Kitty Kung Fu Ping Pong"
"Catty Beetroots"
"Look at that COOKIE"
"How I feel when opening the Steam Store lately"
"The first time I had sex."
"For ME?"
"Whenever I'm having a bad day  I just look at this and instantly get cheered up"
"how i felt when i found out that the wedding i'm going to has an open bar all night"
"Still my favourite gif on the internet."
"Meeting a Redditor IRL (FIXED)"
"Obama's Divided Nation"
"One of those times color might be helpful."
"Walk into the bathroom at Chili's and I see this"
"Batman"
"I guess Batman isn't always so serious."
"Why so serious?"
"When I see the waiter coming with my food."
"Very True"
"Love Me Sexy UW"
"I'm as confused as a blind lesbian in a fish factory."
"FELINE! DISRESPECT! FROM! BEHIND!"
"FELINE! DISRESPECT! FROM! BEHIND!"
"still cracks you up"
"Just a tiny bit off balance"
"How I feel as a new redditor"
"Skill level...Fat Dad"
"Bitch  I'm Fabulous"
"How I feel when someone says it's their &quot;Cake-day&quot;"
"This pretty much sums up my feelings for my cakeday"
"How I feel on my 2nd last day at work"
"How I feel when you downvote my self post."
"MFW I missed my very first cake day and all that cake day karma..."
"WTF America"
"Pizza &amp; Cookies"
"Here is a squirrel. He's eating pizza."
"where can I get one?"
"Good use for a stuffed koala"
"Somewhat disturbing mask... Possibly NSFW..."
"Austrailia...NOPE"
"Koala Mask"
"Amazing Magic Trick!"
"It's magic!"
"I can barely see his movements!"
"Magic..."
"Walk Hard"
"Silly bitch..you cant eat the floor."
"My precious..."
"Basking in Butterflies"
"Every redditor yesterday"
"Everytime I post on reddit"
"How I've spent my cake day so far"
"What is inside McNuggs"
"I hear your kid likes Chicken McNuggets? Yummy."
"The veteran"
"Yeah  I see EVERYTHING."
"I've seen some shit"
"I've seen some shit."
"The Badass 1920's"
"Punching the ticket"
"Me  for the last 30 min. of DKR."
"Someone's not having a good day..."
"Saw this snowboard season ending injury on my facebook wall"
"My friend's cat went to the vet"
"Abandoned building in Vallejo  CA that experienced flooding. (xpost /r/abandonedporn)"
"Does thins ring a bell? (A repost from my hard drive.)"
"Two posts on front page of a tiny subreddit AND went from 15-41 karma."
"When I talk to my ex about my job "
"Journalism at its finest."
"SRS is gonna get ya!"
"So this just popped up on my news feed... They are starting to get a little relentless."
"Saw this on fb."
"WTF Facebook??"
"Ok then..."
"Ignore if you want Grandma to die. (FB)"
"These Facebook 'like and re-posts' are getting serious . . ."
"Always have a good laugh when I see these on fb."
"People actually post this"
"Fuck you  Facebook. I love my grandma."
"Me after I accidentally click on a link from r/spacedicks"
"When my girlfriend asks if her new outfit makes her look fat..."
"At the first sign of overly attached girlfriend..."
"This guy takes lyrics WAY too literally"
"When I see my ex at a party"
"When I'm running late to class.."
".-."
"Hi there."
"This kitty is cold chillin."
"i have a picture of a cat... now you can have a picture of a cat"
"My cat likes to play mind games"
"Meow Mix"
"Seems Legit."
"Peek-a-boo!"
"Northern lights over a volcano - Iceland"
"Northern Lights over Volcano - Iceland"
"Bhutanese monastery built into the side of a mountain 900 feet above the ground"
"If you do this to a memorial of a person who had suffered from mental health  then f*ck you Justin Beiber fans!"
"If it fits..."
"Baby Zebra Frolics"
"The Credible Hulk"
"Truly the best superhero..."
"What would Gaben do for you?"
"Dog confused by escalator."
"Hawk vs. Fox (x-post from /r/pics)"
"Oh  oh  I see! Running away  eh? You yellow bastards! Come back here and take what's coming to you! I'll bite your legs off!"
"hawk Vs. fox"
"The eagle and the fox"
"Stressed out? Relax with this."
"Same idea as Mapes  but my two cents"
"..."
"Poltergeist"
"LLLOOOUUDDEERR!!!"
"I'm  like  90% sure this couple is the same guy. (FIXED"
"I do this to my cat all the time"
"How I feel browsing Reddit at work when the boss walks in."
"Yes officer that's exactly what happened."
"Assailant suffers injuries from fall"
"Fisting: You're doing it wrong."
"So this is who's running reddit..."
"Welcome to Reddit... How can I help you?"
"If reddit had a customer service center."
"How I imagine reddit headquarters"
"Reddit HQ"
"Still the best slang synonym for &quot;awesome&quot;"
"New phobia."
"What the f.... nope"
"Smashing book"
"Smashing book! [x-post r/gifs]"
"Smashing"
"When people comment on my posts"
"Every time I come to this subreddit"
"If countries' populations matched their land area."
"Hitler self shot"
"it can't be fake"
"It must be real"
"I just got trolled by the Iron Man Avengers USB flash drive...."
"I just got trolled by the Iron Man Avengers USB flash drive.... [xpost from r/comicbooks]"
"I just got trolled by the Iron Man Avengers USB flash drive...."
"CD mosaic of Freddie Mercury"
"Cool picture of Freddie Mercury made out of discs"
"Freddie Mercury made out of Queen CD's"
"CD mosaic of Freddie Mercury"
"I see your Bob Marley  I raise you Freddie Mercury!"
"A cool memorial to Freddie Mercury"
"Mr. Feeny"
"Hearts  stars  and horseshoes. Clovers and blue moons.."
"Flag of Canada (xpost from r/pics)"
"This is me."
"Who wants a treat?"
"New branding...one of my friends sent me this from middle of nowhere(east)....."
"drunk Shoe designer!"
"fucking exibitionists"
"Hillary gets an eye full."
"Hillary to Christina: That's a nice set of...um...awards you have there."
"Hilary Clinton checking out Christina Aguilera's boobs"
"I Knew It! Its Right In Front Of US. She's A Closet Lesbian"
"Hey...Hey..My eyes are up here"
"When I heard Clinton got caught checking out Christina Aguilera's cleavage  this isn't what I expected..."
"Finally a Secretary of State I can relate to."
"your chest is exceptional"
"Definition of win"
"You wanna piece of me boy?"
"Human statue of Liberty"
"As an American Moving Out of the Country in August  this is how I view the 2012 Elections"
"How I felt walking out of my AP exam today"
"He's still alive!"
"You guys  he's still alive!"
"KFCeption"
"He's real!"
"He walks among us"
"Saw this guy today at KFC.."
"Colonel...what are you doing"
"Colonel Sanders 1890-Present"
"No  it can't be!"
"If I was him  I would ONLY eat at KFC"
"Poor Guy"
"The only dance I'll ever need to know. [FIXED]"
"Obama riding a corgi"
"Banana Phone"
"I need this on my wall!"
"All I want is a heart..."
"All I want is a heart..."
"At the mall"
"One cookie to rule them all."
"Oh great.."
"When I log back in to see unexpected karma."
"Baby sees a firework for the very first time"
"When I log back in to see unexpected karma."
"Baby reacts to fireworks"
"Da nose knows"
"when i realize its my first cake day"
"Just Dwight"
"I beat somebody in a duel on Borederlands 2"
"Any time I win a duel in Borderlands 2."
"My cat is going to jail"
"Om nom nom"
"I got 99 problems  and they're all fucking ticks."
"Having The Time Of His Life!"
"All ages event in Toronto..."
"All ages clubs are downright stupid [somewhat NSFW]"
"Why is there a venue that facilitates this?"
"Came up on my newsfeed - wtfail/win?"
"What have we raised..."
"When did Brittney Spears get a new tattoo"
"good question google  good question"
"Taking a picture of my horse yawning and suddenly... Xenomorph horse! (x-post from r/animals)"
"Reddit in a nutshell"
"Google searched: &quot;average redditor&quot; this is the 3rd result."
"Lets show this prehistoric bitch how we do things downtown"
"DON'T CROSS THE SAVIORS"
"Who You Gunna Call?"
"Happy Easter..."
"Disney Princess"
"Louis always gives the best advice...wait  WHAT!?"
"This did not belong in r/funny in my opinion"
"Had a run in with a wasp the other day...this popped into my head."
"Now that it's summer..."
"Got violently attacked by a wasp today  this is all I could think"
"Nice &quot;where you game&quot; shot. I see you and raise."
"Nah man I'll clean it tomorrow..."
"My friend's new profile picture  taken in Cambodia."
"I was told my friend's profile pic was perhaps TOO interesting for /r/mildlyinteresting. So here it is..."
"My friend's new profile picture  taken in Cambodia. (x-post from /r/MildlyInteresting)"
"My friend's new profile picture  taken in Cambodia. (xpost r/mildlyinteresting)"
"Rock climbers urinal"
"True story"
"Met two Gods"
"Googled funniest Nicolas Cage pictures. Was not disappointed."
"May the iForce be with you"
"iPhone 20"
"iPhone 20"
"Here your IPhone 20 masters Kenobi"
"How i see internet explore"
"Inspired by the infomercial gif collection posted earlier  I created this downvote gif."
"I hate when my cans attack me.."
"A baby giraffe. That is all."
"I see your baby elephant &amp; raise you a baby giraffe!"
"Baby giraffe"
"Adorable"
"Just a baby Giraffe being adorable."
"baby giraffe.. so cute it should be illegal"
"How I felt when my 8 year old cousin said all PS1 games sucked."
"Tennant Sonata"
"How I feel living in London and seeing people complaining about their hot summer..."
"How I feel as a Scottish person reading about how everyones summer is too hot."
"As a Brit  this is how I feel about the Americans' &quot;heatwave&quot; posts."
"In the recent heatwave  this is how I wish I would feel."
"How I feel during every Steam Sale."
"My reaction to the Steam Summer Sale  as someone who is broke."
"What it feels like to have no money during the steam summer sale"
"How I imagine British Redditors after seeing all these links about their storms."
"How I feel with everyone getting steam gifts from random people on Reddit"
"How I feel watching America enjoy their summer...."
"Summer [FIXED]"
"How I feel as a PS3 owner waiting for Dawnguard..."
"Rejection."
"Feels bad man"
"Everybody Hurts  Doctor."
"Purple  so much purple."
"I burnt my bacon"
"What I hear when i see this GIF."
"First gifsound...is this right??"
"Steam looking acquire Valve  says insider - FORBES"
"Disciplinary letter"
"So apparently the office prank-war has gone too far..."
"My Life's Goal is to Receive an HR Letter Like This"
"2 Days Before My Long Distance Girlfriend Comes To Visit..."
"lolololol"
"Meanwhile  in South Korea."
"Family Photos in Asia"
"It's how we actually won the Cold War."
"Raygun 2016"
"JK Rowling's reaction to negative reviews of her new (non-Harry Potter) book"
"J.K. Rowling's reaction to negative reviews of her new (non-Harry Potter) book (crosspost from /r/reactiongifs"
"How I picture Lance Armstrong right now."
"I is hoomen too"
"That's what I call a weiner dog!"
"If it fits  it sits..."
"Idk"
"Still one of my favorite GIF mashups."
"WW2  summed up quite nicely."
"HIFW a restaurant won't serve me breakfast when I'm 1 minute late"
"Optical illusion [pic]"
"NSFW...oh  wait. It's totally SFW."
"Illusion [Pic]"
"Optical Illusion"
"An Optical Illusion"
"A Collection"
"A Collection"
"overused? not with a hat! ***probably karma whoring***"
"Damn nature. You scary."
"Damn nature. You scary."
"Fun Fact."
"Best.Wedding.Ever [Fixed?]"
"one HELL of a wedding"
"I dont even..."
"So  yeah... This."
"Name it. I can't."
"Weight Lifting Level: Jedi"
"Jedi Olympics"
"Poor woman.."
"Fixing a pipe in Venezuela"
"Fixing a pipe in Venezuela with a Vuvuzela"
"New Favorite Gif"
"How I feel when my Spanish-speaking friend is on the phone with his mom who doesn't speak English."
"Me being white as a snowman driving into a town with Spanish signs everywhere"
"My response to being told there is no more Horchata at the Mexican restaurant I was at."
"When the bartender says I've had too much to drink."
"A shark tank collapsed at the scientific center in Kuwait!"
"Escalator Temporarily Out of Service... [sharks]"
"Shark tank collapses in Kuwait!"
"The collapse of a shark tank at The Scientific Center in Kuwait"
"I think I'll just use the elevator."
"COMBINED  NONE CAN DEFEAT US"
"Last March of the Crabs"
"As a US citizen this is how I will experience the 2012 presidential election."
"Everyday of grad school"
"Me  trying to think of a cake day karma post."
"Shut up  rick."
"Shut up rick"
"Googled &quot;douchebaggery.&quot; I wasn't disappointed"
"Mother posted this on my wall  I decided it belonged on Reddit."
"STOP!"
"...so this was my punishment."
"Dang weed is always making me forget to clear history"
"This is how I will punish my kids."
"Now that exams are done..."
"On a cold rainy day..."
"Nap time"
"How I look when I'm in an argument on Reddit..."
"How I feel after having caffeine for the first time in months"
"Whenever I type a witty insult in response to someone"
"Will Smith knows how to introduce a lady"
"cat infinity"
"A glitch in the Matrix. It happens when they change something."
"Infinite cat (xpost from r/Cinemagraphs)"
"Long Line of Felines"
"Whatcha doingggg???"
"Through me off for a second  great costume."
"Really into arcade games.."
"Yeah  so I randomly searched on Imgur...this is what I found. I feel bad about my skills now..."
"X-Ray of a 250lb woman and a 120lb woman"
"LOL. ZZZ."
"The jews did this"
"Found this on the sidewalk near a kingpins house  should I keep it?"
"Here's what a stack of $205.6 Million in cash looks like."
"$300 million dollar seized from a mexican drug dealer."
"Autumn bring an increase in geomagnetic storms."
"My buddy threw his phone and punched his laptop in anger and at the same time I was looking at this picture"
"So that's where babies come from [NSFW]"
"You deserve a standing ovation."
"MFW someone tells me I should lose some weight"
"SUCK IT red light!"
"&quot;Be Like Han&quot; (courtesy of /r/quotesporn)"
"The latest League Infographic... Teemo dies 75 times per second?"
"League of Legends Infographic"
"League of Legends: An Infographic"
"Patrick plays Slender."
"Can you describe him for me?"
"wee woo wee woo..... WEE WOO WEE WOO"
"WEE WOO WEE WOO WEE WOO!!!!"
"Seriously  how!?"
"Look at them"
"Wassup mang? Gif sound mashup"
"When my friend starts talking to me about something I already told him I dont care about"
"How I feel when people start down voting my comments."
"Fuck you if you bring this to the movie theater."
"Fuck you if you bring this to the movie theater."
"Fuck you if you bring this to the movie theater. [fixed]"
"Fuck you if you bring this on a plane."
"Fuck you if you bring this to the movie theater. [fixed]"
"[fixed]Fuck you if you bring this into my life"
"Fuck you if you bring this into my restaurant[FIXED]"
"How I feel when I meet up with my friends after graduate school finals."
"Writing the date for the next month"
"How I feel getting to the end of a subreddit"
"Every time RES loads a cached version of Reddit"
"My reaction today in my Philosophy of Religion class when we spent an hour and half talking about how magic is real."
"When I use my friend's computer who doesn't have RES"
"After 2 months of unemployment  I got a job  and this was me after the first day without Reddit"
"Whenever I get off Reddit..."
"How it feels to wake up after being bedridden by the flu"
"How I feel after ten days with no power and no running water because of Hurricane Sandy."
"Planking with style..."
"Fail? NOPE  PLANKING."
"Badass cat."
"&quot;Get it away from me!&quot;"
"Who's the pussy now!"
"Starter Kit"
"Dear Criterion and Ea  please re-make this game. Thanks."
"This show is for kids?"
"Of all the stuff ever on Spongebob..."
"Family vacation"
"What sorcery is this?"
"weird illusion"
"Fluffy Happy Clouds"
"Michael Jordan's Reaction to Kobe's Statement about the US Olympic Team Being Better than The Dream Team."
"When a non-engineer tries to explain something technical to me as if they know what they're talking about"
"When a non-engineer explains something technical to me as if they know what they're talking about"
"The original come at me bro..."
"Shadows"
"Paints with Shadows and Light"
"I contend we are both atheists..."
"We are all atheists"
"Assassin’s Creed Jacket"
"&quot;The best engine in the world&quot;"
"Ever seen an hour-old elephant?"
"Zoidberg  is that you?"
"Cant Touch This"
"Every time I see a play like this..."
"Rage faces football"
"little boy is not impressed"
"Kitty Pilot"
"like dis if you cry evry time."
"I don't want to live on this planet anymore [IT Crowd style]"
"When I heard my friends pronounce memes &quot;me-mes&quot;"
"When my friend said OC on 9gag goes to reddit"
"After reading the &quot;most heartbreaking thing you've witnessed&quot; thread..."
"How I feel when someone corrects my spelling in a reddit comment."
"When my vegetarian sister asks if I want to stay for dinner"
"haha"
"Payback!"
"I know what I'm doing this Halloween!"
"No excuses  i'm doing it this year."
"My Reaction Jersey Shore Getting Cancelled"
"Mmm  let me get some o' dat."
"Smile!"
"Every week"
"To the Batmobile?"
"TO THE Fat...Mobile...?"
"Being from NewYork this is how I picture the Chik-Fil-A and Romney supporters..."
"Nic Cage. As Superman. That is all."
"Some things just are not meant to be..."
"The Superman that almost was"
"Warning!"
"Found this awesome picture. Hope it's no repost"
"to Hadouken a child"
"Hadouken"
"Parenting Win"
"In the event of a water landing"
"Hope the irony isn't lost on you"
"Irony in action"
"Pathos at its best. Including dinosaurs  owls and candles."
"Pucker up  Pumpkin"
"Kids….."
"How I feel when trying to get to the front page of Reddit."
"This is how I imagine being a mother would feel like"
"Parenting"
"Cat + Slide = cute"
"First dinner at the strip club"
"Brothers are such a pain in the ass..."
"Brothers are such a pain in the ass..."
"I CAN'T GIVE ENOUGH UPVOTES!!"
"After 6 months of Reddit  this is how I imagine /r/Cats"
"what's that you say?"
"I'm super  thanks for asking!"
"How Men pee"
"I think I'll invite this guy as bartender for my next party"
"Meth: Before &amp; After"
"A Mandarin Dragonet in all its colorful glory"
"Animals' reactions to being placed inside a cardboard box."
"Animals' reactions to being placed inside a cardboard box"
"Chomp  Chomp  Fuck you"
"My Favorite Fuck You"
"I see your 4am bakery  7am post-grad  and 8am class and raise you: M.S. student  work by 11am"
"Oh my..."
"I Googled &quot;Ron+Swanson+Halloween&quot; and found this beauty."
"That's a Whole Lotta Grumpy."
"Sperm whale is not ready for his closeup"
"Ran into this little guy while I was swimming today"
"Hi whale!"
"OMG CLERP CLOPS!!!!"
"Prepare for landing  Link"
"A dry martini under 1000x zoom"
"Ohh Colin"
"Collin knows how to walk."
"I was just redditing &amp; I got this crazy idea in my head  and I had to make it right away. I present to you all... Colin Mochrie Style!"
"Colin Mochrie Style!"
"My reaction when I leave work on friday."
"Finding this gif"
"When my gf says her period is over..."
"When I realize it's after 9 and appetizers are half-priced at Applebees"
"When I finally found a man who makes me orgasm every single time"
"My reaction when  after 4 attempts  my shitty car finally starts."
"My reaction when I reached the 1000 karma mile stone today"
"Coming back from a concert to find your last post got 100+ karma"
"My reaction when I just realized tomorrow is Friday."
"How I feel taking my senior portraits"
"King of the Internet"
"Fast asleep"
"Chocolate from every orifice man"
"Well  do you?"
"But...why??"
"GLUP GLURP BLRBL - Yup this belongs here"
"Looking through the 'new' section of r/funny"
"Funny"
"Reaction to Tyler Perry"
"When somebody surprises me with a link to r/spaceclop"
"After stepping in HUMAN shit at the gas station."
"When my girlfriend tries having tickle fights with me"
"Is this true?"
"How Europeans see America  and vice versa."
"Man  owls are really fucking weird."
"Here are some owls"
"Oh no you didn't!"
"Owls..."
"Friendzoned  rich  or both?"
"Guy buys girl a $30k car... wait for the kicker"
"She has a good head on her shoulders..."
"Nuclear explosion photographed by rapatronic camera less than 1 millisecond after detonation"
"Nuclear explosion photographed by rapatronic camera less than 1 millisecond after detonation. [pic]"
"Nuclear Explosion Milliseconds After Detonation"
"Nuclear explosion captured one ten-millionth of a second after detonation"
"Nuclear explosion less than 1 millisecond after detonation"
"Nuclear explosion  less than 1 millisecond after detonation."
"Nuclear explosion  less than 1 millisecond after detonation. [x-post from r/PerfectTiming]"
"It's my cakeday. Time to pull out the pussy."
"Manly way to carry a baby"
"No matter what  Morgan Freeman is in charge."
"It looked like a bean"
"A real live bean!"
"Paul Ryan says that fetuses look like a bean. I agree."
"Lightning storm."
"Catatumbo Lightning in Venezuela"
"chatlog"
"A Classic (ancient) WWII gif"
"Repost  but i couldn't find anything else to share for my cakeday  so here's my all-time favorite gif."
"He asked for his dad to come home"
"Men dressed as mexican wrestler breaks into a grocery with two ostriches (xpost from r/mexico)"
"Mexicasn Robbery"
"Buddy just asked me to go on an adventure"
"Whenever someone mentions taco bell in another room. - Imgur"
"Genius."
"Genius"
"Sunken boat in Antarctica"
"Trapped Under the Antarctic Ice"
"Still nope"
"Your koalafications are irrelephant"
"PLEASE tell me this is fake."
"Little Pig in Boots"
"I must have one!"
"Electric Pole Hanging After a Wild Fire"
"Hanging in There..."
"Grass fire aftermath"
"This is what I do if someone gets too close."
"Me watching my neighbor throw her boyfriend's belongings out a 2nd story window."
"When your friend curses at their parent and your in the same room..."
"When I realize it's my cake day!"
"Neutering means what?!"
"My reaction when i got to know Neil Patrick Harris is gay."
"My reaction when I saw numerical evidence of period doubling in simulations of my model."
"Trying to get to the front page of Reddit."
"To those of you who wonder why spider man was not it The Avengers"
"How i feel trying to reach the front page"
"What would be the best method to melt ice off of this vehicle practically in a relatively inexpensive fashion? Also how long would my approach take? Thermodynamics assistance needed."
"Thats just unfortunate"
"Bottled Water... this is how they tricked us into thinking it's superior"
"Watermelon MRI"
"Jack Nicholson in his greatest role  wait for it:"
"angry birds"
"Probably a repost but every time I need a laugh fix this does it for me."
"How I feel when a comment I make gets downvoted"
"Hahaha! This is so grea-FUCK!"
"When I think I'm making a golden post"
"Chik-Fil-A"
"How NOT to eat a watermelon"
"Everything i post on reddit"
"Found this gem in r/downvotegif.Hope you enjoy"
"CSI Zoom"
"I've been advised this is old  but I first saw this today and I can't stop laughing"
"Why I can't watch CSI any more."
"Oh CSI.."
"My face when Ke$ha come on the radio"
"That moment when your girlfriend takes her birth control and you realize what those packets were on your mom's dresser 10 years ago"
"When someone posts a picture of their baby to r/aww."
"When my mother uses &quot;YOLO&quot;"
"My face when a girl in my bio class asks &quot;what if genetic engineering isn't what god wants for us?&quot;"
"My face when I went on /r/spacedicks for the first time today. - Imgur"
"When I catch my brother watching porn."
"What it's like reading the comments in r/gonewild"
"My face when I read that Clint Eastwood will be speaking at the RNC tonight"
"Mitt Romney's reaction to Clint Eastwood's speech"
"&quot;I'm a WHAT now? A meme?&quot;"
"Watching Clint Eastwood at the RNC"
"Clint Eastwood this morning after watching his RNC speech last night"
"When my wife asked me to watch Honey Boo Boo tonight. &quot;Just give it a chance&quot; she says...."
"my reaction when i found out there was a r/transgender (first post)"
"The Black Night Rising."
"I watched Django Unchained last night. I couldn't stop thinking about this."
"Crazy  Beautiful."
"Beautiful  Crazy people"
"Somebody's grandma being a badass in WW2"
"Someone's Grandma Being A Badass In WWII"
"Most Expensive Sunscreen Ever"
"Just got this shirt for my friend as a Bday gift. I think he'll like it"
"MINNNIONNNNN!"
"A wild Snorlax appeared!"
"The saga continues!"
"no comment  just wanted to share ;)"
"Who needs Patrick Bateman throwing upvotes at them when tacos could be so much better?"
"Oh Harry!!!"
"knew it"
"Well this gave me a 9 and 3 quarters..."
"There's something odd about this dog."
"Fences can't stop me"
"Overly Manly Man's dog?"
"Well there is probably someone who would..."
"Urgh [NSFL]"
"Awesome"
"Just a baby sloth"
"Just a baby sloth hugging a stuffed girraffe"
"Baby sloth cuddling a plush  cutest thing ever."
"Baby sloth hugs a plush  so cute"
"The Cute sloth trend still going?"
"the moment where you know you messed up"
"Reverse thrusters!!!"
"Forever alone"
"Forever alone pillow."
"Heaven for Atheists"
"Turns out only Atheists get into heaven"
"As a person who knows nothing about Skyrim  but sees all the hype for it on Reddit..."
"I wonder what happened next"
"Going in for the smooch."
"Holy polar bear."
"What I noticed after the obAMA"
"But woman can do things men can't..."
"Me too."
"Every time I try to flirt with a girl"
"How I feel anytime I get downvoted"
"How I feel when I get downvoted"
"When a classmate starts talking during a review lecture"
"My girlfriend every time I open the new boob meme"
"Me  whenever someone makes a repost  and it makes front page AGAIN"
"How I feel when I see someone get more comment karma than me with only one comment."
"&quot;i'll probably get downvoted&quot; = downvotes | &quot;i'll probably get upvoted&quot; = no upvotes"
"How I feel after I missed my cakeday because of school."
"how I imagine internet arguers"
"Now that we're back to reposts and no longer costume/pumpkin OC..."
"Adorable"
"My face when playing the 3DS"
"They will haunt you in your sleep"
"As someone who owns 2 pairs of shoes  what I imagine a girl does everytime she buys another pair."
"The concept of a woman's love."
"omg shoes"
"Soon..."
"Works every time"
"Cats slipping on the slide"
"Sliding Cats"
"3... 2... 1... Wait a sec."
"I need a leaf blower now!"
"I'll bet this started with &quot;Hang on  I have a great idea.&quot;"
"Spinning chair"
"What is this?"
"Awesome Japanese Candy (from r/WTF)"
"Explain this bullshit!"
"SCIENCE!"
"Preparing candy like a chemist [x-post from /r/gifs]"
"The Moonwalk Superstar"
"If you want to sleep tonight  do not click this link."
"god help us all"
"An accurate representation of all group projects in High School."
"This mesmerizes me and makes me giggle uncontrollably."
"Nothing to see here..."
"A majestic family of owls"
"Bridge that casts penis shaped shadows."
"/b/ captions James Holmes"
"It was startling"
"I wish I didn't enjoy this picture as much as I do. You will feel like a bad person after looking at this  too."
"dafuq??"
"Apparently this place also does not allow Curiosity Rovers"
"Staring Contest? Challenge Accepted."
"These awful home offices will make you vomit [Pics]"
"Going for a ride..."
"So I saw The Dark Knight Rises in an IMAX Dome theater today"
"It doesn't stop  but you won't care."
"My 8 year old daughter's unexpected response to a writing assignment about being female..."
"My 8 year old daughter's unexpected response to a writing assignment about being female...[X-Post from Parenting]"
"Not sure if repost.. but made me smile"
"Fuck The Police"
"This guy deserves a medal"
"Who I'll be supporting throughout the coming election."
"Why doesn't my favorite candidate ever run for election anymore?"
"Charizard  I choose you!!!"
"I see your blindfish and raise you a giant goldfish"
"The Amazing Metal Kramer"
"every time i see a person on the road driving the same car as me."
"everytime i see someone driving the same car as me"
"How hardcore Christians view Rick Santorum"
"Whenever I see another Subaru"
"My reaction whenever someone tells me that they are also an Atheist."
"When the car behind me runs the red light after I do"
"Whenever I see another fat guy with a hot girlfriend."
"When i'm a dollar short but the caffeteria lady lets it slide"
"When my comm. professor mentioned Obama's AMA..."
"When I start texting someone and the 'send' button turns blue."
"Being from a mostly white area  this is me when I'm visiting the outskirts of Los Angeles and I see another white person"
"Anytime I see someone with the same phone as me"
"How I feel whenever I'm forced to write a check on the spot."
"Golf"
"Golf"
"HIFW giving people advice on flowers at my part-time job at a florist."
"Anyone have the backstory here?"
"I accidently right-clicked on &quot;Inspect element&quot; on Google Chrome. This is how I felt."
"This is so WTF  I can't describe it in words"
"Thomas the tank engine finally snapped"
"Wifi Wars - does anyone have pictures of passive aggressive network names to upload?"
"Hipster Jesus"
"B.C. = Before Coo"
"Taking one for the team just isn't enough sometimes."
"Valar Dohaeris"
"Summary of The Internet"
"The Bizarro Internet."
"Admit it  guys. It's true."
"NC State needs more buses..."
"This guy is a dipshit."
"How to catch a bus"
"He was desperate to get to class on time"
"Found this on the bulletin board in my dorm. 10/10 would lol again."
"mother of god"
"Holy mother of god"
"I'm Batman."
"Batcatman"
"So i was having a shitty day.. then this popped up on my newsfeed.. day made!"
"Ancient Legends"
"My thoughts on the debate."
"something about romney's smile"
"A giant eyeball found by beachcombers in Pompano Beach  Fla.  is mystifying wildlife officials. What kind of creature do you think it's from?"
"Eye of a yet unidentified sea creature. What do you think it is?"
"Don't mess with chocolate  you'll get shanked!"
"IDGAF"
"My wife just painted this  I swear..."
"Here's a picture my BF Leonard drew."
"My girlfriend makes such amazing art."
"My girlfriend doesn't think she's so great  but I just love her painting skills. What does Reddit think?"
"My girlfriend drew this. What do you guys think?"
"My gf amazes me with her art too!"
"An anatidae friend of mine said I should post some of my girlfriends art for karma. What do you guys think?"
"My girlfriend just sent me this picture she drew! [OC]"
"My girlfriend just sent me this pic she drew! [OC]"
"My gf drew this during class  what do you all think?"
"My girlfriends art really impresses me sometimes"
"My girlfriend amazes me with her art"
"My wife painted this... What to you guys think??"
"My girlfriend's art amazes me..."
"My girlfriend drew this self portrait. [OC]"
"My girlfriend drew this self portrait [OC]"
"My girlfriend painted this. She thinks its bad  but I think it's ok."
"I drew this picture of my girlfriend."
"My girlfriend amazes me with her art..."
"Hi  I'm knettel38 and my mom drew this amazing picture"
"My girlfriend amazes me. She doodled.this up today"
"Awesome drawing my best friend's girlfriend's cat's former owner's little cousin did with finger paints"
"HEY! I was floating here."
"Wat."
"&quot;Hey! Cut that out...&quot;"
"Dear Einstein.."
"Master Debaters Mass Debating... [xpost from /classic4chan]"
"Wanna go for a walk?"
"It's my reddit birthday  so here's a dancing otter"
"How I feel right now at work knowing I'm leaving for Vegas tomorrow"
"Lightning lighting up a huge cloud"
"Lightning lighting up huge cloud (X-post from /r/pics) [495x620]"
"Oh  no! They've finally caught on!"
"A friend had this on Facebook... I guess I'm a goat. That's ok - goats are cool."
"If you find an Atheist in your neighborhood....."
"What should you do if you find an Athiest?"
"Why so grumpy mister atheist?"
"BEWARE MR. GRUFF"
"hippity hop"
"Happiness dog double plus style"
"Yo baby  don't stop now."
"cleaning the corgi"
"Cleaning the Corgi (X-Post from Corgi)"
"Firespinning to Arthut Brown"
"Fire"
"Fire [Fixed]"
"Best Friends"
"I love you  Man!"
"Calvin and Hobbes...years later  after a long time apart."
"Calvin and Hobbes...Reunited at last(fixed)"
"Aww giant tiger hug"
"My gf says we need to talk"
"&quot;Okay  Class  come up and tell us something about yourself!&quot;"
"Time to hit the old dusty trail"
"Time to hit the ol' dusty trail"
"This kid is going places."
"My new wabbit"
"A Cup Full Of Bunny"
"And Stay Down!!"
"Why I no longer live with roommates"
"I can't wait for the next book."
"Hugh Jackman and PSY (fixed)"
"Oppa X-men Style?"
"i can die now"
"Karma's a biatch!"
"After my team argues all game then gets one ace and wins"
"Awkward..."
"This could get fun"
"College really isn't necessary"
"College really isn't necessary"
"Friend's first day on Reddit...r/spacedicks"
"How I felt 5 minutes into my biochemistry exam."
"I accidentally hit the share button while on a porn site"
"When I finally strike up the courage to ask a girl home"
"The moment I deactivated my Facebook."
"Worst super hero ever."
"My nephew's Skylander costume [x-post from r/gaming]"
"Should have gotten a sit down one"
"Out of control"
"Stuart was always dating outside his race"
"It's not what it looks like! I was just  uh  helping her find a contact!"
"Try Knocking?!!"
"Imperial vs Metric - makes perfect sense...."
"Arbitrary Retarded Rollercoaster"
"Saw this landscape photo and I just had to make this [Mario RPG]"
"The edge of the world"
"edge of the world"
"A well-rounded redditor meal"
"14 Delicious Cats"
"Facebook status rage"
"my favorite pic of the POTUS"
"Insert cock here"
"Insert penis here"
"Maybe if I move really slow it won't fly away..."
"Why I love the show Scrubs"
"When my friend posts a 9gag link to Facebook."
"Meeting a Redditor IRL"
"The Border Between Belgium and the Netherlands in a Cafe"
"The Netherlands/Belgium border."
"I grip my phone just a little bit tighter"
"The longest traffic jam in the world recorded in China. Its length - 260 kilometres."
"Longest traffic jam in the world  recorded in China (260 km)"
"Give me a break!"
"Gimme a break LeBron!"
"Ridding the waves"
"Oh salad..."
"Competitive Spirit [gif]"
"Whenever I try to set a friend up with a girl..."
"Brilliant"
"AAHhhhAAHhhAAHhhAAHhhAAHhhh"
"Creepy Gary buddy gif"
"Just sayin..."
"This is my cuddles. There are many like it  but this one is mine."
"Cut cat sleeping with doll"
"Bloodsport: The Musical"
"Van Damme rocking out on the set of Bloodsport"
"How I felt when I realized I was on holidays."
"Today is my birthday and this perfectly represents how I feel today."
"Blood Sport Band - I still crack up over this one"
"Vandamned"
"Can not stop laughing"
"That moment when you realize..."
"That moment when you realize..."
"The Scotsman's Apprentice"
"Free Beer!"
"I'll see your &quot;Facebook  are you ready to die?&quot; link and raise you a head."
"Well folks  we had a good run..."
"Behead Reddit?"
"Fuck."
"Those feels  man..."
"I've never wanted to cuddle with anything as much as I do this little guy"
"Caught a House Hippo"
"How I see my GF when she's nagging me to death"
"Hello Reddit today is my first cake day-I think it's time to party"
"She Made Bot Dance"
"my first thought. also my Favorite band"
"3 Times the Higher Education"
"The University of Redundancy"
"Good thing I am a Helicopter"
"Mad Cow Disease"
"The Tower of Silence"
"Just came across this weird story..."
"Parenting level: Close enough."
"Anarchy in america!"
"Whenever I make a new &quot;atheist&quot; friend and he states we should murder religious people"
"i  too  googled my username. did not disappoint..."
"Saw this on FB...thought that Reddit would enjoy it."
"How i feel when someone reposts my post and gets on frontpage."
"I think I will sit here..."
"I googled &quot;Most adorable animal couple&quot;; this was the first picture. I think it is still cute."
"Ouch!"
"morning!"
"BOOM! Headshot!"
"How I felt at every school dance and party I have ever been to"
"browsing reddit and listening to pandora  then this happened"
"Fatality"
"Poor Penguin [GORE]"
"One of the amazing  gruesome images captured by Paul Nicklen's up-close encounter with a leopard seal."
"Sometimes...you just got to laugh at yourself"
"Tis but a scratch [nsfw]"
"This little piggy went"
"[META] This post has nothing to do with your fascist subreddit."
"Aww  his first step-"
"Trying to hit the front page without a pet"
"I'm Standing!!! Oh $#!&amp;"
"Animals Hate Children [.gif gallery]"
"Teddy Roosevelt Vs. Bigfoot (x-post from /r/shutupandtakemymoney)"
"The first pair of boobs I ever saw"
"What I imagine I am doing every time I go for the yellow light right before it turns..."
"Logging on this morning  and discovering I had 1000 karma."
"When my wife says to me  &quot;Let's go have sex.&quot;"
"Whenever I wake up to see the post I made the night before made it to the front page"
"Must...turn...around...(gif)"
"nightmare fuel"
"Interesting tattoo choice"
"i guess she's into pedophiles? (NSFW)"
"Would you hit it?"
"Captain Lou Albano comes back to life to fuck this kid's shit up"
"What goes up must come down."
"Mattress Jump Fail"
"If you put Katy Perry's face on Paula Deen's head  it's still Paula Deen."
"If you put Wallace Breen's face on Paula Deen  it's ... Paula Breen!"
"If you put Katy Perry's face on Paula Deen's head  it's still Paula Deen."
"If you put Katy Perry's face on Paula Deen's head  it's still Paula Deen. (x-post r/WTF)"
"Dad they're in the yard"
"If Dave Grohl was your dad"
"I'm hungry!"
"Overly Attached Girlfriend with Stare Dad"
"I found this comic amusing"
"I feel it"
"I feel it."
"Well does he???"
"this is you  and everything you have ever experienced or known"
"gg vending machine"
"So nice"
"Step Well in India"
"Things have changed"
"Not sure if a repost  but it's rather touching."
"Maybe the French aren't so bad after all (just stumbled across this)"
"It's a couple days late  but here's more on why Americans should not hate the French..."
"Nicholas Cage as a baby."
"Caaaaaaaaaaaggggggggggeeeeeeeeeeeeee"
"Nick Cage man  he's everywhere!"
"Googled 'give me karma' and this popped up in images. Was not disappointed"
"Googled nicholas cage was not disapointed"
"Picture of a dog casting his wise old eyes upon a field in Japan"
"Napping Semis"
"Monkey see  monkey do."
"This just popped up on my news feed. It's a bit windy in the Dakotas."
"Sleepy Semi's"
"North Dakota winds + Semi(s) = FAIL"
"Napping Semis(crosspost from /r/pics)"
"Lol! Look at this gem i found!"
"[x-post from /r/pics] Napping semis"
"Silly trucks... That isn't how your supposed to sleep."
"Tired out trucks"
"Silly Trucks  you cant sleep there!"
"This guy."
"I did nazi that coming."
"This has gone too far"
"you perfect being."
"Perhaps the best BBC News caption you will ever  ever see"
"This man is my hero.."
"Whatcha Thinking About?"
"Insane..."
"Don't trust anyone you meet online. You could regret it."
"Protect your children"
"Googled Makes me laugh every time"
"Cat Dance's"
"Best Cat Gif Ever?"
"Bitch  I'm a busdriver"
"Missed my cake day by two hours. This is how I wish I felt."
"This is how i always envisioned it."
"Google searched  &quot;missed my cake day&quot;. Was not disappointed."
"The only reason why I go to the first meeting of a new club."
"I can't say I wouldn't have a similar reaction..."
"My favorite gif on my cakeday"
"WAFFLES!!!"
"Not even close"
"weird shit seems to always go down on this cam website... [NSFW]"
"To infinity and beyond!"
"You got a friend in me"
"Hello Jerry.."
"Free your mind"
"Found this picture  thought you guys might like it. I can't quite seem to make out the name on the right hand corner to find the source  but one of you probably can."
"Perfect games for the laziest of gamers."
"I'm a Winner"
"If classic video games were made in 2013  this is how challenging they would be."
"So this exists"
"I... I don't know what to say about this one..."
"My new horse is always hungry."
"Drink more water"
"What I imagine the possible &quot;aliens&quot; on Mercury might look like..."
"Water wants to be in you"
"DJ's of reddit. I found something for your pets."
"Just Mr. T dreaming of biscuits"
"..choose wisely"
"Good Guy Obama"
"Which of these men would you rather have run your country?"
"Those pics. This says it all for me."
"Why I choose Obama over Romney"
"Service"
"Cat amazed by flying friend."
"This. Is. Reddit."
"Reddit in a nutshell."
"The glued slipper prank."
"Flip Flops &amp; Glue"
"thats what you get for wearing crocs."
"Glued Slippers Prank"
"This man might be the most badass man that has ever lived."
"bear grylls eat your heart out ..."
"Please tell me this is true..."
"Epic Manliness!"
"This man might be the most badass man that has ever lived."
"I searched google images for space  this is what I found"
"How I explain to my friends what Reddit is."
"Have you ever wondered what a cat would look like flying through space on a giant strip of bacon?"
"A cat surfing on bacon in space."
"Bacon  Kitten  Space!"
"My first post. My Grand Entrance  this is my offering to reddit"
"Cat riding bacon"
"The overlord of Reddit."
"Googled &quot;Was not disappointed.&quot; Definitely wasn't."
"Probably a repost  but it's awesomeness excuses it."
"was looking for a new wallpaper when..."
"When nobody pays attention to my post"
"I imagine this is how people see me when they find out I'm a Native American majoring in environmental science"
"Enclosed: Neil deGrasse Tyson to those who don't feel NASA deserves its funding"
"Neil deGrasse being awesome"
"Neil deGrasse Tyson giving you the finger. That is all."
"You just got scienced."
"&quot;Hey Neil! Reddit is for LOSERS!&quot;"
"This sums up all my feelings towards stubborn creationists."
"NDT."
"How to avoid a speeding ticket"
"How it feels to be on reddit all day."
"How I feel after a long day of procrastination"
"There's more than one way to sharpen a pencil."
"Watching from a distance."
"Always use a designated driver."
"They see me rollin..."
"I'm lovin it!"
"Nothing is impossible in America."
"They see them rollin'."
"Wont let me post without a title"
"Ridin'"
"When I accidentally click a link without reading the caption first"
"FINISH HIM!!!"
"she lost her cubs and was depressed"
"A mother loses her cubs  but loves these little rugrats just the same"
"A tiger in california adopts baby piglets- full story in the comments"
"Happy Birthday to Neil Degrasse Tyson! May you continue to blow my mind with science for many years to come!"
"I want this. Now."
"Wat."
"TIL the continents can be rearranged to form a chicken"
"I've never been so creeped out by seaweed."
"When a &quot;Bro&quot; tries to buy my girlfriend a drink in the club"
"U MAD MATH?!"
"That's some legit math"
"Most Amazing Halloween Costume"
"me waving at a cute girl"
"caption contest (dog getting out of pool)"
"How I feel when everyone gets excited about Jersey Shore"
"HEY REDDIT LOOK AT THIS FACEBOOK POST [FB]"
"this gif goes through my head everytime i get a downvote  havent even made it out of /new yet."
"This always pisses me off in action movies."
"This ALWAYS happens to me on Battlefield 3!"
"Don't bring a gun to a bow fight."
"Suspicious flashlight"
"Aftermath."
"I know kung fu."
"I guess it makes sense..."
"that awkward moment when..."
"Not sure if I want to hunt this year...nsfw"
"There can only be one."
"There can only be one"
"I never get tired of this story."
"There can only be one M&amp;M..."
"There can be only one"
"Overly Attached Chicken"
"Coming back from college and seeing that 'popular' girls got fat"
"Once I read all of /r/all..."
"Cat seeing his owner after 2 years"
"How I feel being broke during the steam summer sale."
"Not being able to see The Dark Knight Rises until tomorrow night."
"Another Lonely Cat"
"Poor guy had no clue what was coming"
"Mortal Kombat"
"Red Vs. Blue first couple episodes"
"How the ghetto gets down"
"Everybody was ~~strikethrough~~kung-fu taekwondo fighting"
"What I picture when listening to people debate iPhone vs Android"
"So Hardcore!"
"FIGHT!"
"Mildly entertaining."
"Kung fu fighting"
"How I feel the day before my holiday break from work starts."
"Fuck Work!!"
"That moment  when you realize the post that was about to make you a reddit hero  has already been submitted and even has a wittier title."
"How I feel at work on my birthday"
"This is how I feel after having most of my recent posts only getting 5 or less upvotes."
"I just realized it's actually Thursday  not Friday..."
"Whenever my posts get downvoted.."
"Last day of my job tomorrow. How I see myself all day."
"When I think I have karma gold  and get shut down."
"When I get 0 downvotes and still can't get a post to take off - Imgur"
"How I Feel About My Boss Being Gone Through Monday"
"When you're about to leave for 2 days of offline studying and realize it's your cakeday."
"How I feel after driving to my 8am class to find out it has been cancelled..."
"20 minutes into stitching xkcd's &quot;Click and Drag&quot; comic and realising it was going to be 1.32 terapixels"
"How I feel at work... everyday.."
"Been preparing for a job interview all week... just got rescheduled for next week"
"How I feel when I'm studying for an exam tomorrow  after having three exams today."
"How I feel when someone moves out of MY way in the hall."
"Downvoting a post back to zero"
"The knights of r/new"
"Every time I win an argument on a technicality"
"After I beat my little brother in Video games"
"How I feel that America is leading the Olympics in medals."
"Whenever someone asks me a question."
"We all need more time..."
"Dat Ass"
"80's CEO logic: &quot;I like your idea  but let's get rid of that nature shit  and give the dinosaurs heavy metal armor and bad ass guns.&quot;"
"Nah  let's ditch the whole &quot;educational&quot; angle and give them bad ass guns"
"This morning on the Today Show  Kathie Lee dropped a puppy on its head."
"This morning on the Today Show  Kathie Lee dropped a puppy on its head (Cross-Post from /r/aww)"
"Kathie Lee Gifford Dropped A Puppy On Its Head This Morning"
"Bathroom Roulette"
"Bag of pee."
"Obama in da house"
"Obama-nation"
"My Reaction to an Angry Mob on Reddit..."
"How I felt when I realized I can see my computer screen from my toilet."
"MY EYE BLOWS"
"Typical Disney..."
"Success Kid 5 Years Later (x-post from /r/PastAndPresentPics)"
"Success Kid - 5 years later! (x-post r/pastandpresentpics)"
"Looks like success has done the success kid well! (x-post form /r/PastAndPresentPics)"
"a baby highland cattle"
"TSA is not amused."
"Thirsty?"
"Wait... that's not how I remember it..."
"Getting ready for Motherboy."
"Getting ready for Motherboy (x-post from arresteddevelopment)"
"Meanwhile in Poland"
"When an attractive person rates me 4+ stars"
"Hey Django..."
"When my wife asks if I want to have sex."
"Best upvote gif ever."
"When my girlfriend unexpectedly propose coitus"
"when i agree with someones comment on my posts"
"Sorry  no room"
"Butts make the best pillows. Life is good."
"Split."
"Split."
"A Real Nigga Haiku"
"Aye lemme holla"
"Redneck Doorbell"
"i hate ringing my friends doorbell..."
"I hate ringing my friend's doorbell. x-post from r/funny"
"Peyto -- Canada has lots of amazing lakes  here is one of them"
"69"
"My reaction when I heard that President Obama would sign the NDAA"
"I was out of milk  so I made mac n cheese with water."
"Lamb is on the Highway."
"Lamb in the fast lane!!!"
"Surreal Reflections in Iceland [1200×800]"
"Stealing kids candy..."
"Stealing kids candy..."
"I think the time has come."
"I think American politics is ready for a change"
"Mi Moosta"
"Veolia Environment wildlife photographer of the year 2012"
"Can you find the commonality?"
"Two Legends"
"Poor Spongebob"
"I don't know Karate...but I know crazy."
"Kitten spaz attack aborted."
"Words cannot describe"
"Well.."
"Just  Fuck."
"This is how I thought it goes."
"Best of all time"
"I don't know."
"Oh my God. What is it A Lady? Can't believe it!"
"Found this while searching for fluffy ferrets"
"This is me too consumed on reddit to realize my cakeday was yesterday"
"Found this on a photo stream at the bottom. Scrolled down  glanced away  looked back and WHAT THE FUCK. Creepy shit  man."
"Gave me a 'slight' shock"
"Dogs Mid-Shake"
"Sea Pug"
"I dressed my dog up as a seal for Halloween. Can't tell if he likes it or not."
"Doctor's orders  bitch"
"As I go through medical school now  I realize how often you come across this diagnosis."
"How I feel posting a comment on a Front Page thread"
"How I feel when applying to jobs lately"
"How I imagine both sides feel about political debates recently"
"Scariest bathroom ever"
"Sasha Grey is not too shabby(;"
"First I laughed  then I thought...."
"Hitler's Wallet"
"Still my favorite costume."
"A Man of Mirrors"
"A suit made entirely out of Mirrors!"
"I love it when Reddit stops working"
"I wish this was me"
"Reddit's new overload image"
"What it feels like posting with the popular opinion on R/Politics."
"What it's like posting with the popular opinion in R/Politics."
"Getting over 2000 upvotes"
"When I'm most productive."
"Reddit's Worst Enemy"
"1st year of time wasting down. This is how I feel about cats after a single year of reddit."
"You say you like cats reddit?"
"If she hasn't finished by now ... she will soon!"
"How I think I will look like by end of no shave November."
"My girlfriend's reaction when I say something stupid in public."
"Everytime I hear about my ex."
"[I live in Charlotte NC] How I feel people look at me this week when I mention I didn't vote for Obama."
"This is how I feel sometimes when my boss yells at me."
"how i felt browsing reddit today.."
"Obsessed with Skyrim"
"Missed Reddit yesterday"
"My thoughts when reading Rage Comics"
"That moment you realize you just finished watching all the episodes of your favorite show"
"Dad Rage comics"
"How I feel when I read rage comics about other rage sites"
"Hmmm...."
"Reddit Adventures: r/f7u12"
"Reddit Adventures: r/gonewild"
"Buy a mouse"
"Quitting Cigarettes"
"It's true  I've never had one. Never even gone on a date before."
"Got me like..."
"This is still the best face swap I've seen in a while."
"Some neighbor in some town somewhere trashcan."
"Chicken nuggets = family."
"chicken nuggets"
"The Best Image I've Ever Seen"
"I know what I am doing next year for Halloween..."
"A pick up line that i would totally fall for."
"NO PLANKING"
"'nuff said"
"So  I made a gif of a (summarized) Star Wars V"
"So  we meet again (classic)"
"Half the analemma curve - port city of Baku  Azerbaijan"
"Sunrise Analemma"
"What Salvia is Like"
"When I speed past a cop on the highway and he turns his lights on."
"Barbecuing for the first time"
"That moment with the weed hits."
"My reaction when a beat drops and the lights go crazy in a club"
"The first time I masturbated [FIXED]"
"First time visiting /r/SpaceDicks (SFW)"
"/r/atheism  I just have ONE thing to say to all of you."
"Hey Reddit  I just wanted to remind you of something..."
"Just in case you forget."
"Just thought you should know"
"Just a quick shout out to any Redditor who's ever gone out of their way to help a stranger"
"Epic Mario fish tank"
"Armadillo Lizard"
"I don't want to live on this planet anymore"
"Who'd have thought it?"
"'I fucking love science' is my favourite new Facebook group."
"Sun in Mars"
"My cousins puppies she just got them today. Vanilla and Nutmeg"
"Went to the museum today. Fought some pretty strong urges."
"When I call someone out and they delete their comment"
"When some teenagers walk up to me"
"Mad Cow"
"When I try to act tough."
"My favourite gif"
"Best. Gif. Ever (X-post from /r/gifs)"
"You want some of this? You want some of this!!?"
"Cow Fever!!"
"How I feel when I try to seem intimidating"
"Nah bitch  didn't think so."
"When I piss off my brother."
"We're ready for your close up  Mr. Nope"
"A spider magnified [X-Post from /r/WTF]"
"Can I be your friend?"
"Last night I had a dream that this guy was attacking the city"
"Whenever my friend and his parents argue while I'm at their house"
"My ear broke D:"
"oh  girl"
"Fuck the Police"
"GIF Sound Mashups"
"You can't fuck with me."
"Fuck the Police!"
"Haters gonna hate"
"Trolling the police"
"new advancements in IED disposal"
"STOP....."
"Yin Yang."
"I haven't the words for how happy this makes me."
"How I Feel Being In California Right Now"
"It's a repost. This is how I felt in Nashville today as Isaac creeps his ass up here."
"Who's your daddy?"
"blastoise piano master"
"Blastoise shreds"
"Clearly legit  if you ask me."
"Sonic the Hedge Peurco"
"I like to cut myself..."
"This is what happens when I try to post something funny on Reddit"
"Ah  the North Korean rocket launch..."
"Meanwhile  in North Korea..."
"What most submissions feel like"
"I found a gif that summarizes 2012 for me"
"Cat with existential crises."
"Brooding goth pussy [SFW]."
"My reaction when my plans for Friday fall through"
"A cat on a cold winter day"
"The Incredible Cat"
"Winter is coming and i don´t have any trees"
"Kitty watches over the North"
"So Calming."
"Oblivion cat!"
"He's a silent guardian. A watchful protector."
"He heard Catnip was Half off"
"I don't know why but this Is my favorite picture on the internet"
"I dont even..."
"Me  trying to Karma Whore on my cake day"
"Its my time to shine."
"Oh you sneaky squirrel"
"What graduation will probably be like"
"It's my cake day."
"Finally it's my cake day!"
"How i feel after just finishing watching Band of Brothers"
"The more you look at it..."
"Me every time Bane spoke."
"When my math teacher try to teach me something new"
"Jewel caterpillar"
"Crystal Caterpillar (x-post from /r/woahdude)"
"Jewel Caterpillar (x-post from r/wtf)"
"Classic....."
"He must've been playing Red."
"When I found out the president had the power to legalize weed by himself."
"A squirrel in a party hat."
"I see your snake in a hat..."
"I give you a squirrel in a party hat"
"Two hours of reddit when a NSFL post appears."
"Come Home to See My Girlfriend Watching Grey's Anatomy..."
"How I feel whenever I stay up so late that I receive a daily &quot;Record&quot; email from Wash U..."
"How i feel about no fap February as an unemployed person."
"Me in university English class when my prof made a grammatical error"
"After about 5 minutes on r/WTF...seemed worse than usual tonight"
"When a girl came over tonight  and wanted to watch Snookie and J-Wow"
"NPR is having a story about the importance of spiders and their existence"
"My mom just got Facebook and friend requested me."
"When your pregnant wife due in 1 week wants to have sex."
"Just found out that my professor doesn't take attendance."
"After phone in the ass  tacks in a vagina  and other gory post  this is where r/wtf and I part ways."
"Anyone know what episode this is from? I've looked all over."
"Happy Kid"
"So my friend sent me this picture  thought you guys might enjoy it."
"It's my cake day. Heard you guys like cute kittens"
"Surprise"
"Everyone Loves Cats"
"Timber Wolves"
"trolling Jesus"
"Adios Bitches."
"Haters Gonna Hate"
"He thinks he's a witch"
"Oh hi!"
"Pawse right there - you can't enter bear footed."
":P"
"Can I show you my tongue?"
"Aurora Australis  as seen from the International Space Station"
"You are disgusting."
"And here I thought people were more judgmental of strippers."
"For all you forever alone people ..."
"Every geek's dream."
"Toaster Grilled Cheese"
"Sunrise over a Mountain Waterfall [1920x1080]"
"Testing of the Peacekeeper re-entry vehicles  all eight (ten capable) fired from only one missile. Each line represents the path of a warhead which  if it were live  would detonate with the explosive power of twenty-five Hiroshima-style weapons"
"Educational graffiti"
"this dude has a point..."
"HOLY FUCK  Jesus was a terrorist.... #prejudice"
"I like Busses..."
"What is this I don't even..."
"You know you do this every morning in front of the mirror..."
"Googled What's Going On and this came up"
"Lynda Carter is bored"
"Women should stop doing the Duck Face and start doing this:"
"When you see it..."
"i left my cat alone with ragemaker for the afternoon and came back to find this"
"Shower Reage"
"imgur: the simple image sharer"
"Maybe 9gag is better..."
"imgur: the simple image sharer"
"The Book of Genesis: What Really Happened (Fixed)"
"This college student's parents were killed by Hurricane Sandy -- now she has to take care of her younger brothers and sisters by herself."
"Reddit  While most of Northern NJ lost power during Sandy  My friend Zoe lost both of her parents. (More info in comments.)"
"Reddit  While most of Northern NJ lost power during Sandy  My friend Zoe lost both of her parents. (More in Comments)"
"Test repost please ignore"
"Ice ice baby..."
"The best/creepiest face swap ever"
"Casual family pic"
"Big Bang Theory  is like dexter for the kids who grew up."
"Now my brain hurts...[gif]"
"This is why we can't have calm adventures..."
"Moiraine Lake  Canada"
"My reaction when I learned how much my tax return is this year"
"Finally after one year! Lets party."
"McDonalds isn't messin around"
"So I am watching the Macy's Thanksgiving parade and saw the Micky D's shoe car and balloon  but all I could think about was this....."
"The real reason Diablo 3 isn't out yet"
"Why it took me over an hour to make a 15 minute drive after 1cm of snow"
"Every time I watch SC2 highlights"
"Somebody said &quot;sorry!&quot; three times when we bumped into each other going through the door"
"The Government's explanation for the impending Zombie apocalypse..."
"Watching deadwood this is how i feel."
"Is this still relevant? I can't tell anymore"
"An atheist's response to everything"
"Didn't know how to tell my girlfriend so I just sent her this"
"I see your Bane conspiracy theory Rush  and I raise you my own."
"Theists vs. Atheists: Both Wrong"
"How I feel after watching the season premier of American Horror Story (Minor Spoilers)"
"In light of college midterms right about now"
"Bigfoot."
"What Reddit has been all day."
"What great advice!"
"Awesome Dad left this note on apartment door to make sure his son has the best halloween possible. (xpost from r/pics)"
"Some People!"
"Great Halloween parenting"
"Lindsay Lohan wearing a bear suit."
"If Charlie Sheen were a bear..."
"My all time favorite cocaine GIF"
"It's a hell of a drug"
"Beware of Dog"
"Yet another outsourced job."
"Tough one"
"Really?"
"Well $5 is tempting..."
"No brainer"
"Being a female  I can't answer this. But I assume you males choose death.."
"This has obviously not been influenced by Reddit."
"Can't I just shoot myself in the face instead?"
"It's a little late for that..."
"The world has at least 22 950 fools."
"As a ginger this was still a pretty hard decision"
"I think we ALL know the answer to this"
"I found a contributing factor to the impending bacon shortage."
"the four elements (1920x1080)"
"The classical elements."
"The four elements in glass"
"Response I get from my friends when I pass an ice cream parlor"
"Now that's talent!"
"It's my secret talent"
"Special talent"
"It's not what it looks like  I swear!"
"Too much time in /r/WTF can have this effect"
"Yeah... It's kinda like that"
"Cap'n Lincoln"
"I plan on doing this next time I tip"
"OH! So we're posting fun ways to fold money now?"
"OCD."
"Sneaky Bastards..."
"Shady ad"
"How my friends see me at a dance club"
"Mr. Rogers has Swagga"
"No one on the corner...."
"Swagga like us"
"TOINGGG..."
"I missed my cake day by a day. But here's my first saved link from 224 days ago."
"When my girlfriends mom cooks for us"
"Infomercial gifs"
"4 lightning bolts strike the Aegean Sea during a 2011 lunar eclipse - Chris Kotsiopoulos [1296x864]"
"30 second exposure of lightning during a lunar eclipse (x-post /r/ExposurePorn)"
"The anti Facebook."
"Are you tired?"
"Whenever I see something I upvoted in /r/new make it to the front page"
"Intimidation"
"Pink Floyd's Jewish Manager"
"I know that feel  bro."
"Koalas are so cute and cuddly!"
"Angry wet koala."
"Damn nature  you scary!"
"Has anyone ever seen a wet Koala Bear?"
"deleting systems 32 folder on /b/"
"Corgi Collision!"
"Girls gone wild - SFW"
"Honey  could you take a look at this for me?"
"Honey  could you take a look at this?"
"How I feel when there is a &quot;When You See It...&quot; Post"
"only in japan..."
"I really wanna know where do you go."
"When someone calls my name and I don't know where they are."
"Please  describe Mr. Wallace: what does he look like?"
"Old  but personally one of my favorite images ever."
"Does he look like a bitch?"
"He's cruel like that"
"He's cruel like that (x-post from r/funny)"
"When I created my first successful meme"
"When I realized I could block /r/atheism"
"what I imagine r/batman is like right now"
"Every time I get an upvote"
"Just a Baby Chimp"
"The importance of flossing is learned early."
"When I think my post is going to the frontpage"
"When I think my post will go to the frontpage"
"How i feel after posting on reddit."
"Matriarchy"
"Friend of a friend is a sound designer on the upcoming movie Planes. Here he is at work."
"So now you like elephants huh? You never liked my elephants..."
"So now you like elephants  huh?? You never liked my elephants..."
"God Fu*king Dammit"
"My reaction every time someone asks &quot;Am I doing it right?&quot;"
"How I felt deleting my old account and starting over after my ex found my GW posts...."
"When I realize I have no money and pay day is next week."
"Upon realizing that Reddit.com is blocked at work but 9gag isn't"
"How I feel missing the Obama AMA"
"how I feel when trying to post a funny .GIF but its been posted before"
"Me when I get email from a site that I just unsubscribed to."
"When you fucking forget to post something on your cake day"
"Makes me laugh every time I see it"
"DON'T TELL ME WHAT TO DO!!"
"Cat makes breaktrough physics discovery!"
"Cats are flexible"
"Cat Portal!"
"I've located a wormhole."
"I've located a wormhole."
"2 Girls 1 Cup Coffee Maker"
"2 girls  1 coffee maker"
"Just saw this on FB...not quite sure what to think of it."
"Holy Crap I Want to See a Show on THIS Stage!"
"Parenting at its finest"
"A knight reaches every spot without repeating [x-post from gifs]"
"Knight on a chess board (x-post from woahdude gifs gaming etc)"
"My 2year cake day celebration!"
"Spin it"
"Its not the most original sound  but I just realized its my cakeday and I'm in a rush."
"∞ duckface"
"Duck Face Level: 99"
"Grff."
"Don't know if repost but I ws in tears when I seen this"
"Life Cycle of a Leaf"
"How the USA feels when they don't medal in an event"
"Thanks for the confidence booster trophy case"
"Winner?"
"Probably the best picture of Mohammed I've seen"
"Best picture of a dog getting hit in the crotch with a tennis ball you will see all day. Yup that's my dog."
"teamwork"
"No..just no."
"Big mama Nope and all her disgusting Nope spawn."
"Click if you DARE.... [sfw]"
"Think about it..."
"Chilling on Moon [x-post from r/wallpapers]"
"Chilling on Moon [x-post from r/wallpapers]"
"Vote Victor. Easier link http://www.kinderchocolate.kz/ru/gallery /index.html?id=1370 We were winning before but his votes got reset. Time to make a comeback and /b/ needs your help. (And this is my first post on reddit)"
"What I see whenever I see Rob Dyrdek lately  specifically on Ridiculousness."
"sniffer dog"
"Police Pup"
"The story of Oedipus"
"Oedipus"
"Planes  Trains  and Plantains (cross-post from 4chan)"
"Would An Idiot Do That?"
"WELCOME TO 'MURICA!"
"A complex maneuver..."
"Coolest finishing move ever!"
"I told those bitches not to confiscate my trumpet. [NSFW]"
"You will never party as hard as this guy"
"How I feel after Civil Procedure"
"My names tim  but you can call me yolo."
"Myth busted!!!"
"Myth: Houses in Dublin  CA are impervious to cannon balls"
"Myth: Houses in Dublin  CA are impervious to cannon balls"
"This is probably a repost"
"Do you know how fast you were going back there?"
"How I feel after opening most reedit posts"
"Haters Gonna Hate"
"Watching the Dark Knight Rises after work. This is how I'm walking out of here."
"Heisenberg!"
"My girlfriend doesn't think her art is any good"
"My girlfriend amazes me with her art"
"my girlfriend amazes me with her art [fixed]"
"So my GF painted this..."
"Here's something my girlfriend drew. Give me karma."
"Just a little something my girlfriend is working on"
"Wait  what? Sheldon Cooper on Reddit?"
"Swedish Cops are the best"
"to serve and protect"
"Wait a minute..."
"You wanna go?"
"Look at me  I'm Dr. Zoidberg - Homeowner!"
"TAKE THAT"
"THIS is how you bring WTF back to its roots"
"I think this goes here [NSFW/NSFL]"
"So it seems Ben Franklin from The Office is pretty bad at shaving."
"No worries  brah..."
"A hairless rat bathing itself."
"Seeing content of mine  re-posted  on the front page."
"Seeing my own content  re-posted on the front page"
"Seeing my own content reposted on the front page"
"Stopreadingmyuser's reaction to seeing his own content reposted on the front page"
"When I hear that a US senator wants to waste time investigating yet another sports scandal"
"My reaction when I click a front page link and get &quot;This video has been removed by the user.&quot;"
"every time my brother hits me and i get in trouble"
"Whenever the top post has been removed by user."
"Whenever the top post has been removed by user."
"Why in science's name is there a &quot;Go Daddy&quot; Advertisement as a sponsored link? Go daddy... shouldn't it be completely rid of Reddit's domain? (PIPA) (SOPA) supporters FYI."
"Not to be a debbie downer but when did r/wtf turn in to r/borderlinespacedicks?"
"That's my cat."
"I come bearing gifts  I present THE GOD OF THE INTERNET"
"Dragon Grammar"
"Putting their heads together"
"HE DID IT!"
"Finally unfriendzoned!"
"Finally unfriendzoned!"
"It Has Happened."
"He did it!"
"I see..."
"I said don't touch me there"
"Stay out of this cat's business."
"barn owl or bullet?"
"The size of our moon [pic]"
"The Canonization of Bill Murray [pic]"
"The Canonization of Bill Murray (x-post from r/woahdude)"
"▂▃▄▅▆▇█▓▒░B҉i҉l҉l҉ M҉u҉r҉r҉a҉y҉░▒▓█▇▆▅▄▃▂"
"The Canonization of Bill Murray (x-post from r/woahdude)"
"Who made this and where can I contact them at"
"Back in the day..."
"Back in the day..."
"It finally happened"
"The photo that made me join reddit."
"This seriously KILLS me whenever I see it"
"Confession Bear was tired of all the hate"
"The poor man's turducken."
"Typical Thursday night."
"I just saw this on Facebook. I wish I didn't."
"I missed my first cakeday by a day"
"My thoughts exactly"
"Good Grief...."
"The magic of girls with glasses"
"Girls with Glasses"
"Captain Asshole!"
"Vigilante Justice - Imgur roulette"
"I can't even begin to describe the joy that this comic brings me."
"Whisker Brimley"
"Diabeetus"
"I wish my horse could do that..."
"Everytime I beat a yellow traffic light"
"Sweet power slide"
"Fuck logic  best special effects ever."
"Are you normal?"
"I'm running out of ideas to get more karma then my wife... But I'm gonna keep trying ... Here is cat shark.."
"Me when I hear the tornado siren."
"Buttercup really is an asshole"
"Baby Ninja Goat"
"OH DEER GOD"
"What I did after finishing my 3rd of 3 midterms this week."
"they had a awesome night and made a awesome drawing..."
"Sometimes  i just need to laugh a tit. Euh  no  a bit!!!"
"When someone pokes me on Facebook."
"Basically r/GoneWild."
"Saw the Cat Train  and couldn't resist."
"Should I care?"
"Sweet armor bro"
"90% of the time playing Twitch"
"Say a prayer"
"SOON"
"Soon. Very soon indeed."
"soon"
"You remind me of the babe..."
"Sexy and you know it?"
"MFW I found out 50 Shades of Grey is a trilogy"
"How I think it must feel to come home to a post on the front page."
"The lyrics left me in tears"
"Every student presentation I've ever done."
"Studying for my open book midterms..."
"I was gonna make a gay joke  butt ..."
"The true meaning of &quot;Fuck the police&quot;."
"A machine that solves Rubik's Cubes"
"Context"
"You don't need a demotivational poster to be demotivational..."
"How enormously insignificant you are"
"Giving a little perspective."
"Everytime I wake up with a hangover"
"I just accidentally deleted a trending link"
"When I look like an idiot in front my crush and her friends"
"How I feel after realizing I choose to attend college that's over 70% male."
"This is me realizing today is my cake day and that I have nothing..."
"The day it was legalized"
"Kick a Ginger day... god I hope this is real"
"Some mormons just left me a business card. Nailed it."
"God has a FLAN for me. [pic]"
"What am I doing here?"
"&quot;One of their more critically acclaimed albums...&quot; (GIF)"
"How I look like in a club when my favorite song comes on"
"When I try to introduce new music to my friends"
"Hanging out with my black friends."
"Fuck yeah!♫♫♫♫♫"
"American Techno"
"Definition of Karma Whore"
"What I imagine is happening when reddit is under &quot;heavy load&quot;. [NSFW]?"
"How I see people when they post cat photos on Reddit"
"When I get top comment in a thread."
"How I feel when my friends are out of town and can't play online with me"
":("
"He will always wait for Bart"
"Porr Milhouse."
"All see  no saw."
"Poor Milhouse."
"Just another soccer fight"
"Tim Tebow's Email Hacked"
"Tim Tebow's Inbox"
"Excuse me while I go pack my bags."
"BOOM."
"How to study longer"
"I have been studying wrong my whole school life."
"Such a promising start"
"So... do I move closer then?"
"I am a mini puppy"
"All I Want To Do Is"
"Wise words"
"Brave Kitty"
"This makes me anxious"
"Fearless Cat"
"Awesome cat"
"Monorail cat tries something new."
"Fearless."
"Just wondering on finding a job..."
"Siper Princess Peach philosoraptor"
"I'm actually curious about this now..."
"I dont know if this has been posted before"
"why?"
"God is Fabulous"
"Philosoraptor on KONY 2012"
"So Catholics..."
"Is religion trying to make us stupid?"
"So I guess the majority of Redditors are Catholics not atheists..."
"Good question."
"Philosorapter on Bad Words"
"where's the money?"
"Remember this the next time you're at a funeral"
"Shouldn't my karma increase"
"Lolception"
"Food for thought."
"Why does he even try?"
"One of the many plot holes..."
"Meanwhile  in the reddit office..."
"Galumphing along"
"Free samples?"
"How it feels when I try to run in dreams"
"...fine"
"How I feel when I eat something sour."
"After putting a hand full of sour patch kids in my mouth"
"Too sour!"
"So Sour-ful!"
"Some people just can't handle the sour."
"EVERY SINGLE TIME!"
"Have you ever been so hungry?"
"well... that esculated fast..."
"silly dog...."
"I couldn't stop laughing at this"
"That stare"
"C:"
"smile!!!"
"For my cakeday one of my favourite pictures"
"My reaction every time the top comment is informative."
"How to escape a conversation with someone"
"There ya go...."
"Tech support."
"Hooch loves his penguin"
"Pitbull and Penguin Snuggles"
"James Bond. Booze  bonks and bodies. Data compiled by The Economist"
"007 Booze  bonks  and bodies"
"The origins of DuckFace (X-Post from r/WTF)"
"Wtf ?"
"Mucus in throat"
"I hit a new low  today."
"This morning"
"Bachelor frog decides to diet"
"Can't say I'm innocent"
"I know we all do this"
"She is Just Asking for Splinters (x-post from /r/gifs)"
"Why."
"Useful for eating  and now as shaving cream!"
"Marty Poppins"
"Wat"
"When someone speaks a foreign language next to me."
"Angkor ..."
"My reaction through the entire new Resident Evil movie."
"Girl problems..."
"Insest is the solution! (x-post from /r/funny)"
"Fuck this guy &lt;---"
"I love counterprotests."
"Love It"
"Yet another westboro baptist church solution"
"My face after my professor introduced us to fixed actions patterns AKA FAPS"
"[HIFW] I was assigned a presentation in Comp Class."
"When someone tries to convince me to do something by saying YOLO"
"My girlfriend just dumped me for her ex..."
"I just realized i missed my cake day."
"When I see &quot;Fortune Cookie&quot; post making a come back..."
"Winning an argument on the internet"
"When I try to correct my teacher..."
"The Solar System and the number of times the planets have had been visited by satellites sent from Earth."
"50 Years of Space Exploration - an Infographic"
"50 years of space exploration - infographic"
"Fifty years of space exploration in one infographic"
"50 Years of Space Exploration"
"My wife occasionally checks my computer to see what I'm up to  so I put this where I know she'll find it."
"Liston.up."
"Contra-ry Shit"
"The truth behind Tetris..."
"This will always be my favorite gif"
"Why did I Google &quot;Most fucked up thing ever&quot;? This cannot be unseen. (NSFW/NSFL)"
"Would it be racist to call this racist?"
"Wind-Tunnel"
"When someone tells me the height and weight of their newborn.."
"Very cool"
"Veggie man"
"&quot;Vegetable Man&quot;"
"Thank God he didn't use ranch."
"Eat your vegetables they said..."
"He must really love vegetables..."
"Cold weather? Why not stay warm with this super stylish Reddit-inspired coat!"
"Ran into a fellow redditor."
"Straight dedication."
"Probably one of the best photobombs I have seen"
"A little bird got in front of my camera today"
"Merryperrperns"
"just found out jersey shore is cancelled...how i feel after the long years and hearing about this show everyday at work and school"
"Cereal.gif"
"Broke my leg a few months ago and ran for the first time today. This is exactly how I felt."
"I just had to do it..."
"Hey hey hey!"
"This is definitely a repost  but this pic always makes me giggle. Just want to share the laughter."
"Intense dolphin"
"Cyber Bullying"
"These aren't my glasses."
"These aren't my glasses."
"Come at me  bro"
"Kuato Total Recall Costume"
"Kuato's Baby Picture"
"Stuck Baby"
"How to be hilarious. Step one: find a baby doll and disassemble it. Step two: Be this guy"
"Kuato Total Recall Cosplay..."
"I think this is an obese man giving birth."
"Get in mah belleh"
"So  yeah  this popped up on Facebook."
"Best Halloween costume ever."
"This is probably one of the better tattoos I've seen."
"Realistic Tattoo [x post from r/wtf]"
"What? never seen a bird?"
"Shoebill Storks Look Evil as Fuck"
"Shoebill stork as The Joker"
"Russian Dancing Bats"
"Google image searched &quot;my mom made&quot;... this was the top result"
"Most of the girls i've met in College [FIXED]"
"Bad internet?"
"Well  not anymore  it's not."
"A picture of the amount of success I've had with reaching the front page"
"Scientific proof that god exists."
"I had made this GIF for my old blog's masthead. Hope you guys like it."
"Finally  a plausible theory that explains the extinction of dinosaurs."
"The life of a server"
"I don't think I wanna go back"
"How I feel when a girl first hints that we'll be having sex"
"When people tell me I don't sound like I'm from Alabama..."
"How it must feel to submit the same post as 100 different people but be the only one to make it to the front page"
"When today is a snow day and the Winter Steam Sale is today"
"Been here a while  and only just found the Reddit Preferences"
"Perfect for a rainy Saturday..."
"Otterly adorable."
"I wish someone would have told me this before I deconverted. It would have saved a lot of time and many friendships."
"Consumer society."
"Consumer society."
"My feelings as I just realized its my cakeday  and there are no cats around"
"It's my cakeday? It's my cakeday! ='D"
"Hurricane Sandy vs Casino Pier (Cross Post from /r/themepark)"
"Deal with it."
"I love my Pork and Beans."
"Ayyyyy!"
"I'll take my coffee Gangnam Style."
"ayyy sexy latte!"
"Emotional Scars"
"Scars"
"Invisible Scars"
"Emotional scars."
"Judging from this quote  this guy must be hilarious!"
"Best quote about porn I've ever seen."
"favourite isle at home hardware"
"sounds like a pretty nice little saturday"
"Home Depot knows what's up..."
"stocking up for the weekend."
"PARTY ON ISLE 15!!!"
"Is there any word about &quot;Crystalline Pink&quot; ?"
"Turrets now can have items?"
"new consumable!!!!"
"Best part is he almost looks like a fox"
"ladies and gentlmen....BURRITO DOG!"
"The Road to Hyrule"
"How I Feel Browsing the *New* Tab on /r/GifSound"
"After learning about using A and Z for voting in RES"
"Your latest shipment of downvotes has arrived!"
"Whenever I see a funny repost"
"How I feel as a Republican on r/politics"
"When a lie  opinion  or speculation is touted as fact regardless of what I believe..."
"Time to build an ant farm"
"Coolest rebel ever"
"Amazing picture from Libya."
"Meanwhile  in Libya"
"A fine day for some soccer"
"Soccer ball  I will follow you wherever you go..."
"The no fuck giving lvl 80 badass."
"It haunts my dreams"
"What....the......fuck"
"Well done please (NSFW)"
"Oh God Dwight  What?!"
"Just a broken gif of dwight."
"W. T. F. DWIGHT?"
"Space Shuttle Endeavor lifting off!"
"Beautiful Shuttle Launch"
"Some of my favorite wallpapers!"
"Shuttle Launch."
"Probably my favorite line from Workaholics"
"Haters gonna hate"
"I wanna see this movie"
"Ink birds [gif]"
"Ink birds (x-post from r/woahdude)"
"NO NO NO NO... aww okay."
"All I wanted was some popcorn..."
"Went to mcdonalds today..."
"must take forever to floss"
"How the fuck does this even happen..."
"&quot;Hyperdontia&quot; - Fake... but still made me &quot;WTF&quot;"
"Not Sure If I Should Laugh Or Be Scared"
"Ohi. [xpost from r/tacos]"
"Mmmmmm  TACO"
"My nickname is actually Beast and I fricken' love tacos  so this fits the bill!"
"It's an experience."
"Taco Sasquatch"
"mmmm  taco"
"Stahp."
"this made me laugh more than i should have"
"Batman"
"just awesome"
"I told you I was Batman"
"Jesus"
"Amputees participate in an orgy"
"After reading the &quot;What's the worst thing you have ever done&quot; thread"
"How i imagine people are on /r/religion"
"Black woman with white dick"
"This is what happens when the filming of a horse on woman pornography video goes wrong. [NSFL]"
"Where will you be when your diarrhea comes back?"
"Spider web built between antlers"
"Are you my mama ?"
"When normal lip plates are no longer enough."
"The deterioration of man [PIC]"
"what?"
"Been running for just over 2 years now"
"So I must have forgotten the Stopwatch on at some point..."
"Nearly 3 years ago  I accidentally left the stopwatch running on my iPhone 3GS. Today  on my iPhone 4  it's still ticking away."
"My friend decided to have his stopwatch on for 1333 hours so it would say this"
"My friend decided to have his stopwatch on for 1333 hours so it would say this [x-post from funny]"
"Im gonna try to see how long i can get this to run"
"Whoops"
"Last picture I got of my iPhone stopwatch before iOS 6 deleted it"
"It's been a long time..."
"How many years?"
"IT'S OVER 9000!!!!!"
"Looks like i forgot my Stopwatch time aswell"
"A male jawfish mouthbrooding eggs until they hatch"
"How I feel now that America leads the medal count..."
"My views on the Europe Vs. America debate for about a month following the Olympics."
"How I feel when sit still traffic finally starts moving..."
"Best bachelor apartment ever"
"I don't know if this has been on here or not  I don't care. What. the. fuck."
"I love Pokemon  but never would I..."
"747 carrying the Space Shuttle Endeavour"
"picture of a 747 carrying the Space Shuttle Endeavour taken from the passenger window of a C9 Pathfinder"
"picture of a 747 carrying the Space Shuttle Endeavour taken from the passenger window of a C9 Pathfinder"
"picture of a 747 carrying the Space Shuttle Endeavour taken from the passenger window of a C9 Pathfinder [1280×960]"
"picture of a 747 carrying the Space Shuttle Endeavour taken from the passenger window of a C9 Pathfinder [1280×960]"
"some flies fucking by the window"
"Picture of a 747 carrying Space Shuttle Endeavour  taken from the passenger window of a C9 Pathfinder [x-post from r/spaceporn]"
"picture of a 747 carrying the Space Shuttle Endeavour taken from the passenger window of a C9 Pathfinder"
"Picture of a 747 carrying Space Shuttle Endeavour  taken from the passenger window of a C9 Pathfinder [x-post from r/spaceporn]"
"Well good sir  I do say this is a fine day for a sparring match."
"Like a sir."
"They take my stapler then I'll set the building on fire..."
"How I feel after reading the comments on a r/gonewild post."
"How I feel when my husband decides to cook for once. [Fixed]"
"anyone who has bought winrar ?"
"My obligatory cake day post with bacon narwhals and religion busting Chuck Norris."
"Interesting.."
"The logic of my recently born little sister"
"This is not a tattoo  it is a lightning scar - also called a Lichtenberg figure"
"catwoman predicted the weather"
"YOU WALKED INTO THE WRONG NEIGHBORHOOD"
"Damn Right"
"Wrong neighborhood"
"Watching my friend trying to talk to a girl."
"Pretty much sums up the whole of r/NoFap"
"I love the expression."
"My Little Pony Centipede"
"Whoopi Goldberg in a Bathtub filled with milk."
"The stuff of nightmares"
"Childhood: Ruined"
"But I WANT to"
"Why don't you go where fashion sits?"
"OMG  Snooki is pregnant!"
"How i felt 10 minutes after i got a downvote"
"Darwins theory in action."
"I apologize if this is a repost  but it's looks like Drake has set Darwinism into motion."
"Jesus"
"Have you found Jesus?"
"Have you found jesus? (X-post from r/funny)"
"This happened after my legs fell asleep today"
"Even Asians can't Qwop."
"Whenever I try to run in a dream."
"Real Life QWOP"
"A true hero"
"Me trying to walk after sitting on the toilet with my iPad too long"
"Not all cops but yeah still funny"
"This just... works."
"for maximum strength dorkiness try Fry's theme song"
"groovin"
"Folding a shirt."
"Go H.A.M. I must"
"Made you look"
"Extreme landscape shot"
"The designated driver."
"Does this count as animal cruelty?"
"Simple but effective"
"When I feel like someone is following me"
"&quot;Sorry&quot; bus [updated]"
"Make-Up Artist Portfolio"
"What you wake up to vs. what you went home with.(x-post from r/pics)"
"Make-Up Artist Portfolio (before and after shots) from r/makeupaddiction"
"Whenever I read the &quot;sexy&quot; comments on r/gonewild"
"When I told students summer school lunches come from the local hospital"
"Just enjoying my jelly bellies and then taste a popcorn one."
"He just wanted something to read while on the can..."
"That's what friends are for"
"Nothing like a good pumpkin birthing"
"Since we're on the topic of bad tattoos."
"Now thats what i call dedication"
"I got really pissed off today  so.."
"Well  have you?"
"We are the middle children of history."
"This image sums up my childhood realizations."
"Everybody walk the dinosaur...?"
"Umm...YES!"
"America [ftfy]"
"Bitches love cats. Bitches love money."
"Thug life"
"Marlon Brando types with his cat  date unknown [1280x1280]"
"Sometimes it's just about Marlon Brando and a cat - /r/HistoryPorn"
"(^o^)"
"awwwwwww........yeeeeeeahhhhhh!"
"ROTFLMAO in the wild"
"Jason Segel explains what the muppets are like off camera."
"Jason Segel on The Muppets"
"Herp. Fucking. Derp."
"Pbtfbthbpbpthbp"
"The silo was too damn high"
"Someone has been playin way toomuch Red Faction!"
"Commence Thou then the fervid Hokey-Poke!"
"The Hokey Pokey  written in the style of William Shakespeare"
"Ant pushing a water droplet [896x590]"
"Ants. Nature's supermen."
"Oh yes  the attack of the giant clothespin."
"Just a little pinch"
"Saw this on Facebook"
"I sparkle."
"Let me just get this outta the way..."
"My boss asked me to work overtime this weekend"
"Gifsound never gives me up votes  so this is to all of you"
"Well  he has a point"
"In Da Club"
"Happened to me last night"
"what did i just find..."
"GGGGG!"
"A dragonfly in the morning dew."
"Spot the 4chan user."
"Classic"
"THIS is my favorite .gif of all times. Fuck"
"When I watch a gruesome movie with women"
"That sums it up pretty well."
"How I feel when a child falls on its face"
"And then when i tell the woman her husband DOES watch porn  this is how he reacts"
"Whenever I fart around people."
"My boss and my reaction to walking in on two coworkers having sex in the office"
"So my fundie father-in-law went out yesterday and ate a ton of Chick-Fil-A. In the middle of the night he had explosive diarrhea and vomiting."
"You know those gore pictures with horrible  but witty/funny titles? Most people's reactions vs. mine."
"Showing my friend reddit this morning not knowing there was a bunch of gore pics on the front page."
"No matter how many times I see this  I can't get enough of this gif.."
"My friend found this at school..."
"2 for the price of...wait...win"
"Vending Machine Jackpot"
"Drinking Problem"
"What I imagine a DDOS attack looks like"
"When I post something to reddit"
"How I picture new redditors after their first post. (X-post from r/reactiongifs)"
"What I do after I post"
"I did Nazi that coming."
"imgur: the simple image sharer"
"Where do I send my money? (Cake day)"
"NOMM"
"I don't always repost..."
"Oh nothing to see here  just being a karma whore."
"I don't always repost things when im high but..."
"Here's another repost."
"I don't always repost..."
"What I wish my reaction was when I find two of my ex-girlfriends talk to each other about me. I just end up crying and looking at pictures of cats on the internet."
"Making art out of something you'll burn."
"I'm sure he'll pull through"
"Soon"
"Is Batman Bruce Wayne or is it really Obama....."
"Barack=Batman"
"COINCIDENCE? I think not."
"MFW my friends say Kony is the worst warlord ever"
"HIFW I hang with 1st time weed smokers"
"this guy"
"Every time I see a repost that still makes me laugh"
"This is the end result of everyone liking the Kony 2012 link on facebook."
"Who I'll be voting for this November"
"Pleased fan is pleased!"
"WHOA"
"last name: ever. first name: greatest"
"When I learned I got the highest grade in my math class."
"Jersey Shore got cancelled!"
"Battle of the Ads"
"Ahhh  the song of my people!"
"How I like to imagine all cow farms"
"Congrats  you have achieved the level of bad ass."
"Nice Catch!"
"Everywhere I go... its eyes follow me"
"The most brilliant image I've ever seen."
"Alcohol Superhero"
"I am Captain Planet!"
"I googled &quot;The most american picture ever&quot;. I'm satisfied."
"It could have been pretty interesting either way."
"Nice Catch"
"What you looking at?"
"I giggle like a little girl every time I see this!"
"eeeeeeeEEEAEAAAAAAAAAHHHHHH...yes"
"When you are about to fall asleep and your calf muscles seize."
"This is just Beans making his way"
"Mr.Piglet   why u so cute?"
"cute teacup pig is cute"
"But you're to cute for bacon."
"This little piggy had roast beef."
"Mini Pig"
"No way! It's Norway."
"Norway  one of the most beautiful countries on Earth."
"When Someone Says They Can &quot;Watch This For Hours&quot;"
"Japanese Spider Crab"
"but dey was talking shit so dey deserved it"
"You know  that song"
"And.. This is why I never walked to school"
"When British people tell me their version of TV shows are always better"
"How I feel about all these 'train etiquette' posts."
"How I feel after putting in my two weeks"
"I was perfectly qualified for a job that paid very well. I interviewed for said job a week ago. Today they reposted the listing."
"My ex job emailed me. Saying I am required to respond to confirm receipt of email. Well..."
"I see your 8am post and raise you  1 am work at 7-Eleven"
"When someone you don't like tries to butt into the conversation.."
"Who?"
"want"
"Found this little gem on the interweb today"
"Ermahgerd!"
"So i saw this security van.. ERMAHGERD"
"This isn't a car! - Imgur"
"Your mother should have warned you about that too"
"&quot;My mother warned me about getting into cars...&quot;"
"This isn't a car."
"And yes it comes in black."
"I was warned about getting into cars with strange men..."
"Everyone on the east coast this week"
"Hopefully this brightens somebody's day"
"The result of my cat laying on my iPad and taking a picture of himself."
"Terrifying"
"DAT MOUSE"
"So.. close !"
"I'll only be as happy as he is once i reach the front page"
"birthday skeleton"
"Birthday Skeleton!"
"The birthday skeleton"
"Birthday Skeleton"
"My karma just...! No...no it didn't."
"Strawbs"
"I got hit on way more than slutty cat woman"
"My sister's halloween costume."
"I got hit on way more than slutty cat woman [FIXED]"
"&quot;da fuck is this?&quot;"
"They come in ones?!?"
"It comes in 1?!"
"No one would get hurt she said...."
"No one would get hurt she said...."
"I was never a fan of dressing up dogs for Halloween but.."
"The Nope is strong with this one."
"Found this dog while looking for costumes"
"This may be the best and more terrifying dog costume I have ever seen"
"Top o the mornin too ya guvnor"
"Just fucking bury me in it."
"Coke Spider"
"My favourite cocaine related gif"
"Classic Pooh!"
"Burn the villages  burn the farms! Let them know what it means to downvote the wrong thread."
"Something something Game of Thrones downvote gif"
"Come at me bro?"
"I googled &quot;funny pictures&quot; and saw this  made me wonder what they saw there haha"
"Not exactly what I would call cheer leading"
"Got in 3 hours of The Legend of Grimrock last night. My first impression."
"When I'm coming back from the bathroom at a restaurant and see my food is coming..."
"I feel that this is WTF appropriate"
"wouldn't want to wear this in the locker room..."
"Hahaha"
"Don't know why it makes me mad! But it does!"
"&quot;Look dude  funniest think ever !&quot;"
"when my brother says I should buy him something"
"I thought you said there was going to be apples"
"This is called humanity."
"This is called humanity."
"Gangnam Style regret"
"Gangnam Style regret"
"Gangnam Style regret"
"How I feel everyday learning new things in University."
"Real live QWOP"
"Not the best form of parenting"
"Dad of the year"
"It ain't gonna..."
"So  today's my reddit birthday  and I haven't karma whored before  so I thought I'd share this with you."
"Three wishes"
"The Steam summer sale has arrived..."
"How my wallet feels right now..."
"What I've learned about college."
"Watching volleyball at the Olympics... (x-post from r/reactiongifs)"
"Look Closely."
"When I get an unexpected compliment..."
"So I saw a Youtube comment screen-cap on the front page  and realized it was mine."
"Seeing a screen-cap of a Youtube comment on the front page  and realizing it my comment"
"How I felt about the Scarlett Johansson pics."
"When I discovered this subreddit"
"This guy is a total bad ass!"
"Show off"
"Fuck you gravity"
"When I see a couple fight and the girl mentions his dick (x-post from reactionsgifs)"
"Getting a better grade than the Asian kid next to me"
"Facebook friend of mine inspected an apartment where the tenant was recently evicted. This is what she found"
"Sith Toast"
"Some Dark Humour..."
"Well this is a coincidence."
"Autumn in Japan"
"Selfish Athletes Vindicated! There IS an &quot;I&quot; in team."
"Well that finally explains a lot."
"There is no &quot;I&quot; in Team?"
"Behind the scenes."
"/r/gonewild as of late  &quot;(f)irst time +18+ be nice&quot; ="
"so we just found out they're closing our office at 1 tomorrow"
"Twerk it!"
"Saxy pelvic thrusting"
"Thrust thrust thrust"
"When my friends wanna to get over and game the whole night"
"My favorite photo bomb"
"Shut up and take my money"
"Shut up and take my money!"
"Shut up and take my money!"
"shut up and take my money"
"And people say they hate Mudkips"
"What I instantly thought when I saw the Mudkip."
"'Merica!"
"America... FUCK YEA!!!!"
"a kitty kneading dough has never been so precious"
"What music is all about [x-post from r/music]"
"Realizing that this gif fits with PSY - Gangnam Style perfectly"
"What is Gandalf?"
"Welcome guys !"
"Ghetto Gandalf"
"Buckaroo Gandalf"
"The Fresh Wizard Of Middle Earth"
"gandalfs song"
"Bad Rock! (Found on Stumbleupon)"
"Down Boy  Bad Rock!"
"Atheist group I follow posted this. It would have been a crime not to share"
"What it's like when my girlfriend finally reaches my orgasm"
"Every time I try to shake ketchup out of the bottle"
"ketchup mishap"
"When I discovered porn...."
"Whenever I go a week without masturbating"
"After watching porn for the first time."
"When I click on a link and get 37 subsequent pop up ads"
"After not fapping for two weeks."
"Every time I wait a few weeks to masturbate..."
"My Friends Sister Got This At a Jump Rope Camp. It's Supposed to Say Rope."
"To all you swag people"
"I'm actually fairly certain THIS is why photoshop was invented."
"If you think the famous hamburger bed was good  other options exist. The description has me sold."
"Just thought to take a moment on this glorious National AIDS Day to remember a king. Fuck AIDS"
"Cliffhanger"
"Whaaaaa?"
"Grab my hand"
"Dog-sledding"
"&quot;See you later bro&quot;"
"WWWWWWWEEEEEEEEE!!!"
"Bro what are you doing?!? I wanna try..oh shitfuckgoddamnit"
"Nigel Dog"
"Facebook... Literally."
"Don't judge a book by it's cover"
"So  these guys are getting together for something airing November 18th...."
"Alton Brown just posted this on facebook. My body is ready..."
"Alton Brown just posted this to his facebook page  with the caption &quot;November 18th. That's all I'm saying.&quot;"
"From Alton Brown's Facebook page"
"Photo on FB says &quot;November 18th. That's all I'm saying.&quot; I can't wait!!!!"
"Alton Brown and The Mythbusters? Nerd overload."
"Alton Brown with the Mythbusters"
"So much awesomeness... brain... trouble... thought making..."
"Holy Trinity of Science Awesome! 3 heroes in one place."
"Alton Brown and the Mythbusters. My Culinary science dream."
"Alton Brown is making all our dreams come true"
"Alton Brown in a car with Adam Savage and Jamie Hyneman."
"What I think when I hear people complaining about illegal immigration"
"And I thought I was the only one."
"Best newspaper headline ever"
"Flying dildo!"
"Slow news day"
"Flying dildos???"
"Wedding Drama"
"what a bachelor party."
"Too soon?"
"Snow cone kitty."
"I has a rainbow of flavor"
"Tasting the Rainbow"
"Your move  iron man"
"Indestructible"
"It's okay  she's with me."
"Best Friends"
"Every fucking time..."
"MEIN FUR"
"Evidence vs. Belief: A Tale of Two Bunnies"
"This is how I feel when I argue in favor of Science against a religious individual."
"What faith looks like"
"No its still a Duck."
"Think of the puzzle box as the bible and the pieces as science"
"Reddit  it's my cake day. I told Google to &quot;get me to the front page.&quot; Will this do?"
"A redditor asked Google to &quot;get him/her to the frontpage&quot;. He got this. (x-post from r/funny)"
"My favorite face swap."
"Here come the down votes.. God bless 'Murica"
"Forced Panda Slide!"
"This is a taxi made by and artist in Finland... [NSFW]"
"Mimosa Pale  an artist from Finland  invites her fellow citizens to climb into her vagina-themed bike taxi."
"Take a ride inside a vagina in Finland [nsfw]"
"Shocknam Style"
"Gangnam style"
"Immediately after opening a poop link on WTF..."
"Came down the stairs pretty quickly and found this.."
"This game was the shit when I was little."
"Every Damn Time I Post on Reddit..."
"For my 365th day on Reddit  I chose a pic i took  marked my calendar  and today  realized that  thanks to the leap year  my cakeday was yesterday."
"Aaaaaaaaaaand....Fuck!"
"&quot;It's like an entertainment complex in the middle of a sewage system. Who designed that?&quot;"
"&quot;It's like an entertainment complex in the middle of a sewage system. Who designed that?&quot;"
"This was in the gym locker room at my school."
"An argument against Intelligent Design"
"This animal is a straight boss"
"I felt like this needed to happen. Thug Platypus."
"Where the hood at"
"INTERIOR PLATYPUS ALLIGATOR"
"Perry the Platypus"
"Here's what i learned from Jersey Shores"
"When people link an unrelated pic so it's not a self post and they get karma."
"Shrapnel"
"That was close! - FPS Russia"
"Okay  that was awesome. But  seriously? How has this guy not died yet?"
"The most important thing I've learned after nearly 4 years at one of the nation's top colleges"
"Baby  you be lookin' fine!"
"You can't explain that"
"The first time I cheated on a test"
"Everytime I get done fapping to weird porn."
"Alone in the dark."
"Forever... Racist?"
"Alone in the dark"
"Gets me every time"
"Well?"
"Catwoman makes me jizz in my pants"
"Catwoman makes me jizz in my pants."
"Remember the terror"
"When I heard Obama made an AMA [FIXED]"
"The reason why Obama isn't getting my vote"
"The Screen that occupied most of my afternoon on 08/29/2012."
"Hans Zimmer's studio. Where old  meets new."
"This is your captain speaking..."
"Stop."
"Captain Speaking..."
"This is your captain speaking."
"Googled &quot;reddit gold&quot;"
"A Murder Mystery On Our Hands!"
"I fear that the murderer may be amongst us..."
"A collection of my favorite internet animals"
"A collection of my favorite internet animals"
"What my 6 yo cousin looked like walking in the candy store with a 5 dollar bill"
"Animated Animals"
"Two Step"
"Biden at the VP debate tonight"
"Cow Girl"
"Las Vegas Slots vs Electronic Voting Machines"
"Gambling is more scrutinized than our elections"
"[PIC] Best album artwork in the history of bearkind."
"I remember my first time using Photoshop. I didn't use the result as album art."
"I was looking for a picture of Hobbes I could get as a tattoo  which led to this"
"x-post from r/funny. Doin Thangs."
"Great album cover  or greatest album cover?"
"When I grow up  I want to drink beer just like my daddy!"
"I'll just leave this here...."
"a tiny little octopus hug"
"Tiny Octopus is awesome!"
"Baby Octopus"
"What the hell happened to these?!"
"Currency when I was in elementary school [FIXED]"
"Currency when I was in elementary school [FIXED]"
"Well that's one interpretation of Easter ...."
"Books"
"My reaction to any e-reader device."
"I KEEP IT REAL"
"9/11 inspired T-shirt."
"If Your This Guy  Fuck You."
"So who makes these shirts?"
"The only reason why i watch &quot; how i met your mother &quot;"
"2484 Well played  psych exam... (imgur.com) submitted 8 hours ago by EccentricOddity 900 commentssharesavehidereport"
"Well played  psych exam...[Fixed]"
"Watching the 2102 RNC Convention"
"When a friend tells me he doesn't pee in the shower..."
"Poor Clive"
"The best option"
"Bad idea or an efficient use of space? You decide."
"Two people just got fired at my office and this is how I feel."
"happens to me all the time"
"I've been seeing alot of these lately...starting to wonder what kind of &quot;people&quot; make up the internet...."
"NOBODY KNOWS YOU'RE A HORSE LIME"
"Meanwhile  in Germany..."
"Meanwhile in Germany..."
"Studying hard."
"this dog....yes"
"He just lacks confidence"
"He just lacks confidence (x-post r/pics)"
"They always say German Shepherds are the smartest dog breed..."
"Dat photoshop-bomb"
"Saw this on Facebook after the debate."
"That stingray really gets around..."
"Get in here"
"Fowl Play"
"This dog digs chicks"
"puppy rape"
"Get ya pussy in here!"
"It's rapin' time !"
"Dafuq is this"
"Rachael Ray's Inspiration"
"A sound track for failure"
"Well where else would he keep it?"
"So this happened..."
"Breakfast level: Engineer"
"Just chillin' in class. Warning: Bacon included."
"Excellent Execution"
"Here's what the internet had in store for me today. I apologize ahead of time (NSFW)"
"no  Japan  no!"
"Someone said Japan? NSFW"
"Why on an octopus?"
"Teasing an Octopus"
"Oh  Japan.."
"Some Hot Squid Action [NSFW]"
"Kissing with tongues..."
"Kiss me  baby"
"Why would you kiss like that!"
"Benito Mussolini's headquarters"
"The headquarters of Benito Mussolini and the Italian Facist party in the 1930's"
"Go on without me!!"
"I actually feel sorry for the guy."
"Look out North Carolina"
"Mario's a dick"
"This is how some people decide to tackle the problem of potholes"
"the heroes this planet needs (it means hole btw)"
"Slow motion cat jump"
"Not just a karma machine  but an amazing athlete as well"
"Slo-mo Cat Attack"
"So Close"
"Slow motion cat leap"
"Like the slam dunks of cats"
"It's the only way to destroy it!"
"Do it Frodo"
"Reddit  I Don't Have Any Cats  So I Got This Person to Earn Some Karma For Me on My Cake Day"
"How browsing Reddit feels when you don't like cats."
"Someone unsubbed me from everything but r/aww"
"This is why i love labs  such beautiful dogs"
"A room in which to do some light reading...."
"This was meant to be..."
"I can't help it at yoga class..."
"dat gangnam style"
"Gettin' real tired of your shit  nancy."
"Getting' real tired of your shit Nancy"
"The Original Ridiculously Photogenic Guy"
"Arguing with Fundies"
"I agree."
"Look at my Gatling gun."
"This Is What I Think Of Traffic"
"How i feel riding my road bike among a bunch of cruisers."
"Still my Favorite gif."
"Everyday on the MBTA Bus in Boston"
"Still my favorite gif. [Fixed]"
"I'm a bus  bitches."
"Insensitive Bus"
"Eatin' some O's."
"Why?"
"Hello  Mr. Goat."
"Wut?"
"well alright then...."
"They're so cute when they're young."
"Baby Predator?"
"Absolutely no fucks were given"
"Sweet dreams"
"Most convincing proof of global warming"
"Gabe Newell officially supports &quot;green gaming&quot;"
"In Memory of John Lennon  who was shot dead on this day 31 years ago by a Religious Nut. Lennon  you are bigger than Jesus."
"Imagine no religion..."
"Trick or Treat!"
"Saw these two pictures next to each other in a CPR instruction handbook  I couldn't resist"
"Basketball Jazz Fusion"
"So this popped up on my Facebook feed [FB]"
"/b/ predicting the election"
"HIFW my mom explains me her computer problem"
"How I feel when my mom explains me her computer problem."
"2012"
"Awesome building"
"How I feel when I make a witty comeback..."
"Gangnam Style"
"Oh...you say a it's a long weekend"
"My new favorite gif"
"Just a big ass balloon"
"That's a hot &quot;ass&quot; balloon."
"My dad just texted this pic to me. I'm not sure how I should feel about this."
"Meet Flareon"
"Changing lanes"
"I told my friend I made a reddit account he sent me this picture"
"It's dangerous to go alone."
"One of the better shirts I've seen."
"I'm not real smart"
"I always smile when I see pictures of the two of them. The Obamas are so cute together!"
"That squirrels trying to steal that car!"
"Caught this guy trying to break into someone's car"
"Perspective"
"knock knock"
"Never give up"
"Door Cat"
"How I feel as a 200 lb guy getting out of the backseat of a 2-door car"
"Perseverance [gif]"
"Helping get wtf back to wtf"
"HOLD UP"
"homie dont play that s**t"
"Benjamin Netanyahu reveals to the UN a top-secret document explaining the Iranian nuclear program."
"Netanyahu of Israel told the U.N. today that Iran’s ability to build a nuke will be irreversible by next year. He &quot;argued that a 'clear red line' must be drawn&quot;. Thank god he brought diagrams."
"Netanyahu Learned MS Paint..."
"Benjamin Netanyahu reveals some top-secret Israeli intelligence at the UN."
"Iran must get their bombs from Acme"
"Wile E. Coyote speaks to the UN."
"Apparently  making a bomb is not that complex."
"When I saw all the sales on steam"
"My face when I stick my head out the window of the car on the highway."
"Hitting some OG Kush after a 6 month T break"
"I couldn't help myself"
"Jesus got suspended from school"
"Saw this in r/funny.. thought it belonged here too..."
"go get em jesus"
"Wish this was my kid! Daddy should be proud!"
"Thought I should share this  happened to a friend of mine..."
"Just crawl it off..."
"Uh-oh... LaQuisha had a tumble"
"wait............I think i left the stove on"
"FRACK!"
"Houston  We Have A Problem..."
"Other-world problems."
"Dear person who posted scripture to my last post."
"Near miss"
"What I feel I have to do to get Karma these days."
"When it's dead silent at night and you're looking for food in the kitchen.."
"When you realize mid-sentence that your argument is wrong... [fixed]"
"Probably the best way to tell your partner or previous partners you have HIV/AIDS"
"To all those back-to-school kids"
"This is the picture I sent my mom"
"Halloween Mario Cart in a College Town"
"The Maltese Tiger"
"The 5 Stages of Incessant Pop Music"
"Paris"
"Nicholas Cage stars in..."
"I guess we know who won the war... (more Mario propaganda?)"
"Kate Upton Dancing"
"Salsa dancing dog (x-post from r/gif)"
"I got a job in my field yesterday after graduating 2-years ago. I don't even care it's my cakeday."
"Mambo!"
"You will never be this classy."
"Seems like they just shoved Ryan Reynolds on this photo"
"I just keep starring at Mila and Olivia"
"Now THAT is camouflage"
"my favorite .gif sound mash-up [OC]"
"The feeling of a space heater after a cold morning ride..."
"I spent way to much time on this..."
"The only way to skip."
"World's only elephant hospital  Thailand"
"How I imagine those who approve SOPA..."
"The Green Mile  Ukraine"
"Railroad tunnel"
"Organic train tunnel"
"The Fuck?"
"Not the Bob Marley shirt  the other thing."
"Photobombing champ!"
"A Taste of Dick Black"
"You can make your next move now"
"Norwegian construction workers"
"Norwegian construction workers"
"Roadworker's coffee break"
"Raccoon Buffet"
"Somebody lost a bet..."
"Mind = Blown"
"Seems legit"
"moo gusta"
"Mario Halloween idea"
"Mario Halloween idea"
"oh shit oh shit oh shit oh shit"
"Noseybonk... (x-post from r/wtf)"
"Well  that's creepy..."
"Oh those doctors...."
"Medical advances."
"Just some people playing volleyball using the border fence as a net."
"fun things to do with international border lines"
"Whenever people tell me they're &quot;not really stressed&quot; about finals."
"Whenever I see a &quot;This was on the pizza box&quot; post"
"My favourite .gif"
"When i try to smash a bug that's entirely too fast"
"As an OCD person...this his how I make my bed every damn time"
"You Can Lead A Donkey To Water...."
"I should of picked up a &quot;get well soon&quot; card.."
"Found this on my friends Facebook  get well soon"
"I want to be a bunny rabbit"
"Whenever I get a new winter hat"
"Gotland = Starry Night"
"Van Gogh from space. By NASA's Landsat programme."
"I didn't know an environmental problem could be so beautiful"
"Earth doing Van Gogh's starry night"
"This is what Gotland  Sweden looks like from space."
"So my buddy saw a spider on the wall..."
"The Border Patrol and their puns"
"How musical artist should care about his music (xpost from /r/music because of a bot banning this picture by error)"
"From Louis C. K.'s Twitter Feed. I love this guy."
"Congrats  Miggy?"
"Good Guy CM Punk"
"This guy cracks me up!"
"Poor kid..."
"I can't be the only one sitting on the edge of my seat for this &quot;gift.&quot;"
"his name has never been so accurate"
"Woody."
"So I this was just on my Facebook news feed..."
"Wrong time to be called Woody"
"Woody x 2"
"Future Sea World Performer [gif]"
"My neck was sore yesterday and this morning - this is all I wanted to do when I realized it felt better 10 minutes ago"
"Came out as an atheist to my grandma  she sent me this email"
"How I looked at my friend when I found out from a comment that its my cake day"
"Sweet Dreams  kitty..."
"My favourite gif of all time!"
"who said it?"
"Mr. Romney or Mr. Burns?"
"I think this is all I need to know before this years elections."
"Men in the baby food aisle...glad I'm not the only one"
"Chamonix  Haute-Savoie  France: A Snapshot From A Mountaineer's Life . . . Photographed By Kamil Tamiola"
"Living with 3 ladies with sync'd menstrual cycles - Imgur"
"Poor guy"
"For my first cakeday I give you my favourite gif. Enjoy Reddit."
"The saddest picture of a cat I have ever seen."
"Mind Blown  in many strange ways."
"How I feel browsing r/askscience"
"Explaining the finer points of my major to my religious family"
"How I felt after reading the Mars Curiosity AMA"
"Everyone after the Mars Curiosity AMA (x-post from r/reactiongifs)"
"My irrational childhood fear"
"My childhood irrational fear"
"My reaction when I watched porn for the first time"
"Dat chin"
"Sunset on Mars"
"This game should not still make me anxious"
"I see your myst and raise you a zoombinis"
"I heard Ebert &amp; Roper gave it two thumbs up. (NSFW)"
"When a risky click turns out okay."
"How is this done?"
"Made me think of you guys."
"Target Acquired."
"Censorship Tells The Wrong Story"
"When I come across a penis when browsing /r/gonewild"
"Whenever I browse /r/gonewild and see a [M]ale post"
"After going to an all boy high school for four years  this was me in my first college class that had girls in it."
"losing an argument"
"This is professional photobombing"
"boop"
"boop"
"Cat and owner relationship level: 80"
"Boop"
"An old bridge  perfect circle"
"When people gang up on me in the comment thread."
"Went look for a different gif. &quot;Browsing r/new.&quot;"
"Browsing r/gif and listening to queen."
"President Obamas new campaign poster!!!!"
"My faovrite comic of all time"
"The shirts explain a lot."
"awkward family photo"
"How a Gamer feels Waking up on the Last Day They will live in a Dorm..."
"And suddenly I feel so insignificant..."
"Earth's location in the observable Universe"
"Earth's location in the observable Universe - AM I THE ONLY ONE WHO NOTICED THIS?!"
"We are definitely not the only unique and special little snowflakes in the Universe"
"It took God 7 days to make earth  I can't imagine how many trillions of years it took him to make the rest of this."
"Every once in a while I have to look at this to put things into perspective"
"You are insignificant"
"You're Small"
"10 Canine Commandments"
"I know this is old  but it makes me cry every time..."
"Sorry if re-post but glad to see this today"
"How I feel wearing a top hat and a bow tie."
"Lucky i'm not a christian"
"WTF did the internet do to me?"
"Blending"
"Evil Otter is Evil 2012 hq"
"Evil Otter"
"Don't think this otter likes his watermelon very much."
"Followed the delicious recipe perfectly  now to taste my meal for the first time"
"Sad Otter is sad."
"Otter eating watermelon (fixed)"
"Camping day 2  long day hiking with the wife  going down... [fixed]"
"Otter doesn't like watermelon"
"My face when I went down on a Girl for the first time."
"Not quite Gollum. . . but. . ."
"I had no idea Kristen Stewart was on Spongebob..."
"My life."
"mad world"
"How my life's been feeling lately."
"How I feel having a job after 2 years of unemployment."
"Mad Ocean [3:07]"
"Meaning of life"
"Mental note....No silly string by fire."
"FINISH HIM"
"Having a hard time waking up this morning... My boss sent me this...."
"Henry"
"One of the most beautiful places in the world  Killarney  Ireland"
"Beautiful photo of a castle near a lake in Ireland."
"My god. Can anyone tell me where this is?"
"How I feel whenever my parents tell me to get a job"
"When people tell me I should get a 2nd job in this economy"
"Parents wondering why I still have an internship after graduation instead of a Jorb"
"When My Parents Tell Me to Go Out and Get a Job"
"Romney's 47% start talking back."
"Quack Quack Motherfucker"
"My thoughts on all the &quot;what _____ thinks I do&quot; posts."
"My reaction to all of the 4-panel &quot;Hey  did you know?&quot; things I see all over facebook..."
"Magnificent noble old oaks"
"A very old tree grove."
"Shark Attack 6: Infinite Pursuit: From CollegeHumor"
"Shark Attack"
"The Circle of Life"
"One of the best car sales ads EVAR!"
"Greatest. Classified. Ever! 1995 Pontiac Grand Am GT."
"This guy knows how to sell a car."
"The funniest Craigslist ad I've ever seen. I want to hire this guy to sell everything for me."
"I don't think I understood Psy right away  this is what I heard."
"The Internet."
"Shake  Shake  Shake  Senora"
"Anyone care for a dance?"
"roll over"
"Roll Over"
"Awesome Baseball Photograph"
"Amazing picture of a Baseball game"
"America."
"The Simpsons Timeline"
"Years from now when our children ask us  &quot;What did we do after 9/11?&quot; we shall explain it to them using this..."
"Actually not so &quot;funny&quot;."
"American foreign policy..."
"DirectTV  Viacom  and I"
"Troll Level: Master"
"It Was Awful"
"Grumpy old man"
"Never again."
"I had fun once"
"Father of the year award goes to..."
"How I felt when I doubled my comment karma with one post"
"Geese know how to party."
"How I feel when black guys say I can dance"
"cash for birds"
"Cash For Birds"
"SHAKE THAT!"
"im 24 and this is how my dad describes raising us"
"Parenthood"
"This is why I avoid looking after kids"
"Only Built 4 Hard Shells..."
"What has been seen.."
"Dat shell"
"Dat shell [xpost r/gifs]"
"As requested  laser turtle."
"Daaaamn"
"Squirtle uses bubblebeam!"
"Finding out my post has a lot of upvotes."
"I like it rough."
"Remember this guy ?"
"Oh God"
"Still gets me everytime..."
"In Minnesota  not all cats are lucky enough to make the front page (taken by on trail camera)"
"Im sorry to report Reddit  we've lost a friend."
"Pretty much everybody on r/aww"
"So I got to pet a 6 month old huskie today and i was all like.."
"I don't even..."
"A stroll in the park (FIXED)"
"A stroll in the park"
"At dawn..."
"When?"
"You Heard Her"
"I finished my summer class today...."
"jim lahey"
"Already got a job lined up after college"
"Red Panda loves grape"
"om noms"
"Green and Pink"
"I'll see your Wal-Mart review and raise you a Wendy's review."
"Wendy's: Yo give me some nugets."
"Wendy's SonNnNnNnN!"
"This guy really likes Wendy's"
"14 out of 14 people found this review helpful"
"..actually I was planning on jumping a Sarlacc"
"I want to live backwards..."
"How I feel when I get a text from a girl..."
"100 000 readers!"
"Coolest hipster of all time."
"My reaction when i got 2 upvotes in less than 1 minute after posting."
"My reaction when listening to a Skrillex song for the first time (my ears hath been assaulted!)"
"My girlfriend walked in on me looking at gonewild (my reaction)"
"MFW I found out when I got a 4 on my A.P. test."
"At the end of inception"
"First time watching BME Pain Olympics"
"When I found out my college roommate from Korea went to a PSY concert over the summer."
"Fast and Furious: Humans vs Dogs"
"Dogs:1 Humans:0"
"My holiday card..."
"How to escape the f***ing Friend Zone (fixed!) (FIXED)"
"Scrolling  scrolling scrolling... HEY!"
"Scrolling  scrolling scrolling... HEY!"
"stay on the air..."
"Scroll down"
"Oh... fuck."
"This makes me laugh everytime"
"Oh charts"
"Facebook is getting intense these days"
"Went to play some Happy Wheels and was greeted with this."
"I will never spam refresh again!"
"Well headache puppy  you need to load my webpage."
"There's clearly no argument here."
"There's clearly no argument here."
"Proof."
"See.. he is real! (x-post from /r/funny)"
"But spiderman doesn't exist."
"Always keep your faith up!"
"I thought my friend was christian  but then he posted this."
"Every time I see this I think I'm about to be killed"
"When you're listening to your favorite song and think no one's watching you"
"When I dance."
"How I feel after I win a $5 lottery ticket."
"Destination Uknown"
"Pick up the pieces baby"
"That's one talented manatee."
"Well  he's talented  that's for sure."
"Oh  Benny..."
"Nothing is ever black and white"
"Nothin is ever black and white"
"How to do homework"
"I just made bacon and eggs  as someone who never cooks  this is how it feels."
"Understanding something in r/AskScience"
"My girlfriend told me she started the grill &quot;all by herself&quot;. I imagine this was her reaction.."
"How i felt when my power turned on 5 minutes ago"
"How I felt after discovering my internet was back up after it was down for a few days"
"Peace Nobel Price goes to..."
"Welcome to fucking Texas."
"Showed up in my news feed"
"Well thats one way to do it"
"Well  that's one way to transport your goods.."
"Cattle hauler"
"A new way to transport cattle?"
"Umm... Stay?"
"Taking the cow for a ride."
"Mitt Romney's cow"
"Meanwhile in North Dakota.."
"Meanwhile in North Dakota.."
"Meanwhile in North Dakota..."
"Dubai [1920 x 1080]"
"Dubai"
"I can't believe how amazing Dubai looks."
"He received a passing grade..."
"Snakes on a Plane"
"Science Rules"
"Bill Nye &quot;the not so dead since guy&quot;"
"Pretty cool storm cloud"
"Rain cloud"
"rain from a plane  rain from a plaaaneeee"
"Thor's view of a thunderstorm!"
"Storm over Newcastle  UK"
"Rain cloud over Newcastle."
"Storm directly over the North East of England yesturday  taken from an airplane"
"What rain looks like from the sky"
"what rain looks like from the sky"
"Those are some nice Toms."
"I searched for &quot; how to be cool&quot; on Google and found this....."
"0_0"
"0_0 (xpost from r/gifs)"
"wtf Spiderman!"
"Reddit user  Vogey  has turned a popular jpg into an animated gif. We've witnessed the birth of something beautiful."
"&quot;........Oh what's this? A r/gonewild link?&quot;"
"...With less servants."
"&quot;Oh I'm sorry we actually just ran out of guacamole.&quot;"
"Finding out that my dad has more karma than me after only 9 days as a Redditor"
"Anytime someone tells me they watch MTV still."
"My reaction when Redditors watch the shows they wish were off the air"
"When I found out what kind of porn my husband watches while going through his browsing history"
"My reaction when my girlfriend said she didn't know who Bill Nye was"
"My reaction when my girlfriend said she didn't know who Bill Nye was/ is"
"Brand new gaming laptop finally shipped today  same day the Steam Summer Sale starts."
"How Mitt Romney views Government's role in society."
"What you look like to Activision"
"[FIXED] How I feel EVERY time I make a student loan payment"
"How I feel having to pay for everything for my girlfriend and I for our weekend getaway."
"My Mother's view of my childhood spending on Pokemon cards  Yu Gi Oh cards  Beyblades  etc."
"This makes me laugh way too much"
"Very non chalant"
"Mind Blown..."
"Magnus wants.."
"These kids should be a ruling council."
"I like the way Magnus thinks..."
"The answer is always more magnets"
"C-130 Angel Wing Flares"
"Eating frosting off my body"
"Just when this meme was dying.."
"Cat fish"
"SUP!"
"Pikachu at level 1000"
"Pokemon - Christian Version - Imgur"
"Its everywhere!!!!"
"Pokemon   Christian Version . (X-Post From R/Pokemon)"
"Big pussy"
"My reaction after receiving a downvote."
"Introspective Pug"
"How I Think Google Glass Will Be"
"The only person who can pull off Google Glasses."
"This guy deserves to get the crapped kicked out of him"
"Internet  find this man!! Makes me so mad!"
"Floridian's react to a hurricane hitting the Northeast"
"Whenever I see political debates on facebook"
"That will teach her a lesson!!"
"Porn for Squirrels (SFW)"
"You that read wrong."
"Every time I wash a spoon."
"Every damn time"
"A mother from Shenzhen  China  has shaved numbers into the heads of her 6-year-old sons to help teachers differentiate them"
"Those aren't socks..."
"I found this is in R/Ainbow and figured it deserved a little more love. This is great."
"I saw Snape on the 5 Galleon note"
"Found this on my news feed"
"Snape?"
"Does Reddit have any room for a KOALA?"
"Just a sleeping Albino Koala.."
"I heard reddit likes it when you post these on your cake day"
"This is what I imagine being in Afghanistan is like."
"a bouquet of kittens"
"Karma Whoring: Am I doing it right?"
"I thought this was cute  then I noticed the bad shop job [First post]"
"Suddenly  kittens !"
"Now that's my kinda bouquet"
"Tom Cruise everybody"
"Kindness is rare but these people are doing it right! Hoboken  NJ."
"Seen in NJ  what a friendly neighbor"
"Good guy Greg in Hoboken   NJ"
"Take Some of Mine"
"faith in humanity restored"
"A nice gesture to people without power"
"Good guy/gal New Jerseyan"
"Seen in Hoboken  NJ"
"Jersey Cares with Shares"
"Seen in NJ... heartwarming"
"I saw this image floating around the internet today  and found out it was my cousins in Hoboken who were doing this!"
"Meanwhile  on the East coast..."
"The day after Halloween on Facebook"
"republicanprimaries.gif"
"This is a pretty good animation of how New Gingrich gained the lead."
"Here to party"
"Nailed it."
"bizzaro adam  ders and uncle blazer"
"After farting in an aisle..."
"starting to study for an exam the night before"
"Take me there. Right now."
"Trypophobia trigger  making your skin crawl one pore at a time."
"Well shit... I guess I can't steal this bike..."
"Some people just aren't the brightest"
"Earth without art  is just eh."
"Friday"
"Hot Problems"
"Hot Problems [FIXED]"
"Everybody chill out..."
"Good idea. [pic]"
"If it doesn't bounce  give it the 30 second rule"
"Should I put the balls in my mouth or play with them?"
"Made by a madman who enjoys the choking of children and slow adults."
"Peekaboo!"
"When I realize I missed my cakeday because of a power outage."
"After my first visit to r/spacedicks"
"Nothing like learning a new skill."
"For my Cakeday Karma-Whoring  I give you this..."
"When I finally prove someone wrong after a long argument."
"An incredible view of The Milky Way from Mars"
"It's not his fault he's small!"
"Well that Rammstein concert went off without a hitch!!"
"Is this photo shopped?"
"Windsurfing: Now with more wind!"
"I'd shit my pants"
"Yes he believe"
"SPAAAACE!"
"I'm like a bird"
"Windsurfing Space Adventures"
"Like a Bird (Fixed)"
"and Mother Earth got your ass down!"
"Challenge Accepted."
"I prefer &quot;The Far Side&quot; over Calvin &amp; Hobbes"
"My favorite Far Side comic"
"Shit just got real"
"2016 Olympics are looking good"
"How I Feel When Downvoting a Front Page Post."
"My youtube playlist struck gold..."
"I don't remember this in the movie!"
"Social fabric"
"How to let him know I like him"
"Ladies and gentlemen  the Monkey-faced Orchid..."
"Serving The Queen [PIC]"
"Never understand bees."
"Wait for it..."
"I will never understand bees."
"Happy 75th Birthday Bill Cosby"
"50 Shades of Lego"
"casually glancing at the toilet cubicle opposite as you wash your hands and ... oh"
"This painting was hanging in the room where I took my AP test... and I could not concentrate on the test. How this is not a meme yet I do not know."
"William Grant  skatin' like a boss  1782"
"iOS 6 Apple Maps showing Toronto Pearson International Airport (x-post from r/Aviation)"
"iOS 6 Apple Maps view of an airport (x-post from r/Aviation)"
"Apple's new iOS 6 maps on Toronto Pearson Airport: ...Close enough!"
"Parenting Level OVER 9000!!!!"
"My sister just found this on a car that parked too close to the wrong person."
"Upvote gif I made"
"Nice throw  would've gone into the bucket..."
"Worst Dad Ever or Best Dad Ever?"
"Ouch."
"Grumpy Cat howl at the moon"
"Three Tard Moon"
"Three Tard Moon"
"Three Tard Moon"
"Three Tard Moon"
"3Tard Moon"
"3Tard Moon"
"Three Tard Moon"
"How about a drink dog?"
"It's always nice to have a buddy around."
"Buddies forever"
"The buddy system."
"One Bad-Ass Koala"
"SO EPIC"
"Leaving work on a Friday"
"Cool Koala's don't look at explosions."
"Just Walk Away."
"They understand diversity."
"Fishing's not that hard."
"Resigning like a boss."
"A big pile of Buffalo skulls in the 1870s"
"A big pile of Buffalo Skulls circa 1870s"
"Mount Ranier Casting a Shadow in the Clouds."
"Mount Ranier Casting a Shadow in the Clouds [3968 x 2232]"
"What redditors do when their internet connection is down."
"When I get no upvotes"
"How I feel when an identical post I had gets a shitload of upvotes"
"How I feel when I think i have a brilliant link and it gets downvoted"
"Air Hockey (X-Post from r/gifs)"
"I love air hockey!"
"I would shit my pants if i saw this while hiking alone!!"
"Seems Legit...."
"Get under the spout they said..."
"Aron Ralston's got nothin' on this crab [GIF]"
"How I act when I bust ass trying to impress a girl"
"127 Hours in a nutshell"
"Getting a poor QA score after submitting my 2 weeks notice at a call center..."
"Me after receiving a poor QA score at a call center after my 2 weeks notice has been submitted."
"Crab Fever"
"As someone who used to get up at 3AM for work  here's my response to the 8AM class thing."
"Hong Kong Skyline at Night"
"Hong Kong Night Skyline"
"Hong Kong Night Skyline"
"suprised kitten"
"Surprised Kitten"
"I see your 3d snacks and raise you these glorious delights"
"Introducing people to Reddit"
"Introducing friends to Reddit"
"Broccoli Noms"
"It's supposed to be funny but made me go awww"
"wat"
"Instantly what I thought when I saw this"
"All of my wat. All of it. Every last drop of it."
"How MYCRYSIS checks your age"
"Just awwwwww"
"Oh Japan..."
"Photo I took of the Chicago skyline from a beach in Indiana."
"Chicago skyline from a beach in Indiana (xpost from r/pics)"
"Chicago Skyline at Sunset"
"Photo of the Chicago Skyline from a beach in Indiana"
"Its just you and me..."
"My thoughts after doing &quot;no fap September&quot;"
"Fuck Gravity."
"Fuck Gravity"
"Splash."
"Watching someone walk into the room I just farted in."
"When you finish masturbating the second before someone gets home"
"For all it's technical flaws on release  Rage still has some amazing graphics..."
"thsspthsppthsppthhsp"
"Delicious delicious karma"
"Its my IRL Birthday today! This is how i feel about all the food and gifts im getting."
"Eat shit  bird!"
"How reddit reacts to Rick Santorum."
"Every time I see a post about a girlfriend"
"All glory to the hypnotoad on cake day!"
"Orange arrow to the left people..."
"It's my Cake Day and I don't own a cat."
"you know what to do"
"Boulder  CO [1500 x 1001]"
"Dat uplift"
"Work it out"
"That's some strong stuff..."
"Hairy Earnhardt fan."
"Secret NYC Subway Station"
"You're doing it wrong."
"Fall from stairs like a bossy boss"
"I'm OK"
"Baby Goat Mosh Pit"
"Bigger diamond = Bigger gun"
"Sounds like a bargain!"
"The joys of living in rural Ohio"
"Well  we have been warned every time"
"Kanye West and Kim Kardashian in 20 years [Fixed]"
"Let us remember our fallen comrades..."
"Impossible..."
"Frozen fall"
"My first attempt  the original image was posted to r/pics quite a while back  by POTATO_IN_MY_ANUS  thought this was quite relevant."
"Anarchy in the UK"
"Epic inexplicable moments abound  but still  in the history of the Universe  few are as epic and inexplicable as this one...."
"Making a glass horse"
"The process of creating a blown glass horse [gif] (x-post /r/woahdude)"
"Whenever someone tells me to follow them...the urge to do this is extreme!"
"Duke Nukem+Colbert"
"When my brother got in trouble for something I did"
"Still my favorite Colbert"
"Got my HP Touchpad!"
"How I feel when I get a single upvote on Reddit..."
"Every time I listen to Yes by LMFAO this is in my head"
"Passed all my classes despite being addicted to Reddit."
"Successfully asking out a girl"
"When my crush likes my comments on facebook. (X-post from /r/foreveralone)"
"When my crush likes my comments on facebook. (X-post from /r/foreveralone)"
"When I barely beat someone to a four-way stop"
"My reaction when I saw The Culture High is fully funded before its deadline!"
"Broke 1000 Karma Today! (my reaction)"
"Me when the guy I'm trying to avoid cancels because he's sick"
"Everyone's Reaction to Jersey Shore Being Cancelled"
"So my friend was at Disneyland when.."
"That 1000 word essay on the first week of college"
"Whenever I have to write a paper..."
"Run for your lives!"
"Dnt run frm hm fegetz let him luv u."
"They finally made a GIF of that duckling video"
"Exactly how my dog acts when he realizes I'm trying to take a dump without him and squeezes in right before I shut the door."
"Duck on the rampage"
"He was a well known dicktator."
"Cats on catnip"
"This cat is tripping balls."
"Mushroom mash up"
"What is he doing??"
"Context needed."
"slowly he's got inside their minds until they all believed they were fish"
"Can't think of a more fitting scenario for this. (Thank you r/reactiongifs)"
"family counseling..."
"slowly he got inside their minds until they all believed they were fish"
"Swing to fence (pic)"
"Nice shot  it may end up with a broken hand"
"It's a shovel."
"Why I oughta!"
"Guess he didn't like that decision."
"Me when a friend gets into a fight"
"Indifferent cat"
"I never asked for this."
"Yep  that looks about right"
"The Romsters?"
"Things that make you go hmmmmmm"
"Just Nicolas Cage with Jabba the Hutt"
"Stop tickling me"
"Um... They're alive in there.... [NSFL]"
"How I look when my friend is talking to a girl"
"Newest member of our book club."
"The cat doing a little planning for the new year"
"This book doesn't say anything about how to kill mockingbirds"
"Train Etiquette. Super Simple Stuff"
"How considerate of Stevo"
"Ad for Used BMWs"
"European ads are so much better than North American Ones. [Fixed]"
"Stay on the sidewalk... [NSFW/NSFL]"
"Just failed all my finals."
"Fuck this day!"
"Ban Floaties"
"Snoop Dog in a count costume your argument is invalid."
"Happy birthday Snoop Dogg  toke one up for him today fellow ents"
"before there was snoop lion  there was..."
"So you wanted to see a shaved bear?"
"How old were you when you started shaving your bear? I just shaved mine."
"Just a shaved bear."
"This is a bear. Perhaps you could say that it BEARS no hair...! Seriously though what the fuck"
"This guy's gonna get cold come winter..."
"Fuzzy Wuzzy was a bear..."
"This is insane..!"
"Fundie friend just messaged me this"
"This has all just been terrible misunderstanding"
"sorry if this is old...but it had me laughing."
"Thought you guys would enjoy this (x-post from r/atheism)"
"15 MB Hard Drive for only $2495. Limited offer. What a bargain!"
"because  FUCK physics"
"Popeye the sailor."
"My favorite thing about October"
"I'm a grown-ass man  and these three are still the reason why I love Halloween."
"they are coming for you..."
"Wait for it..."
"WTF Midgets?"
"Don't worry  he's got a helmet.."
"Dad teaching his kid to bike"
"Aww father and son bonding time!"
"&quot;Vicious&quot; Bear Attack. Found in r/funny  thought it belonged here."
"A Nuclear Bomb Of Cute."
"that puppy....it's making my insides feel all fuzzy and warm. I LOVE IT!!"
"Superteam Unite!"
"Justice League  ready for action"
"My friend as a baby"
"Courage vs. Insanity"
"Courage vs. Insanity"
"Alpha wolf is unfazed"
"Wolf fight"
"Chomp"
"The superhero Reddit deserves!"
"I found this on my old laptop  thought I would share."
"This is one dandelion."
"Dating in a nutshell [Fixed] [Fixed]"
"How you know it's finals time."
"This just happened to me and i was worried that my night was ruined"
"The most annoying thing to see when your trying to not be productive."
"Boss just thanked me for being so productive this morning. All thanks to this."
"Orange Screen of Death"
"Finals are over!"
"EVERY TIME you see this screen"
"What the front page is REALLY like today"
"Here's a picture of your worst nightmare. now give me karma."
"Must be finals week..."
"12/21/12! 12/21/12! 12/21/12! 12/21/12!"
"Oh god  it really IS the end of the world!"
"How you know the world is ending"
"NOOOOOOOO!!!!!!!!!!!"
"This is the most depressing and horrifying thing I have ever seen. I think I need to get out more."
"Pythagorean Theorem"
"Just look at it"
"LOOK AT IT!"
"Fancy cat is disappointed"
"How I felt after deleting The Facebook."
"When I first discovered Reddit"
"Girlfriend just texted me that her period is over."
"Checking out Brazzers after my friend gave me his login"
"How I feel watching Chick-fil-A go down in flames"
"F-ood"
"big smile!"
":)"
"So hardcore..."
"Beefeater"
"troll gif"
"Mission Impossible Cat"
"Because going down the stairs was too mainstream"
":3"
"I see your baby hippo and raise you a smiling baby hippo"
"Whenever I am talking to someone online and they stop responding [FIXED]"
"If you didn't realize how large whales were already..."
"Para whaling."
"Me  realizing I missed the run on Zelda  while sleeping."
"Summery of Obama's AMA."
"Beautiful Barcelona"
"Equal Height Party?"
"Equal Height Party"
"A &quot;Same Height Party&quot;. Seems like it could be the basis for a Far Side cartoon."
"Anyone ever been here?"
"I'd hire him"
"What kind of construction do you do?"
"Everyone has their specialty"
"One of my favorites"
"How to pick up chicks"
"Truer words have never been spoken."
"There was a Sesame Street crucifixion in my local department store"
"Found this pamphlet on the ground outside  could not stop laughing"
"He died for our sins"
"Every hangover."
"Whatever..."
"How I feel as a nurse when I see wounds on /r/WTF"
"I am going to hell for this..."
"Found it on FB this morning."
"ready for school?"
"Splashing..."
"i got a chuckle out of this"
"Little Jimmy starts the day with a bushel of 12 Fucks"
"hey guys"
"Deep Throat NSFW"
"Just saw my girlfriend and my ex-girlfriend having a conversation on each others walls"
"When you realize you gotta take a dump"
"I thought I heard something while I was playing Amnesia."
"When I realize that thing on the wall is a spider."
"Maybe she doesn't quite belong in r/aww"
"King of the Downvote"
"My favorite gif"
"Had to be done..."
"Every time I see a thread titled &quot;I see your ____ and raise you ____&quot;"
"Knockout"
"Do what mama says"
"My mom made me..."
"Ct"
"Thanks 4chan... (SFW)"
"BEST STORY EVER"
"How I feel as an Apple Retail employee who requested off 9/21-9/23 over 6 months ago."
"When someone downvotes my post"
"Apparently  no one is safe."
"Wait... You want to stab me where?"
"Wait a second-"
"The New Avengers: Approved."
"Avengers  ASSEMBLE!"
"One of these things is not like the others"
"The missing Avenger."
"Incredible BBC Nature Favourite - I laughed at his little face! (2048 x 1365)"
"Do you think this guy is cute or what?? (2048 x 1365)"
"Very Funny face!!! (2048 x 1365)"
"Man in Fail"
"Still my favorite GIF on the web"
"I think he's finally getting the hang of things"
"Suit up boys..."
"Suit up boys.. [fixed]"
"Since MIB 3 is coming out  thought this would be appropriate"
"sweet shades"
"Everytime I want to be cool."
"DROP IT"
"I could watch this for hours - Imgur"
"Not as easy as it looks..."
"Googled &quot;douchebaggery&quot; [FIXED]"
"Climbing to the the top rope when suddenly  chair shot."
"A member of /r/aww"
"Reddit's addiction"
"My Morning Reddit Fix In a Nutshell"
"The reddit addiction is fed"
"Rough night with Palmela"
"What am I doing with my life?"
"Breadcat."
"So this exists."
"New monkey species discovered in the congo! Has very human-like facial features..."
"A new species of Nicholas Cage has been discovered."
"Never pick dare."
"Truth or Dare?"
"OOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOH"
"How I feel when I go to leave a comment and someone else already posted what I was going to say."
"I cannot lie.."
"He like it when I..."
"I don't want to laugh."
"One picture can tell the whole story."
"Meanwhile..."
"I'm a stupid cat"
"GIF Sound Mashups - Kitty Gif and Spanish Song"
"The perfect 90's couple..."
"Upper class banana"
"and the award for classiest banana goes to"
"I searched &quot;Funny cat mustache top hat&quot; and this came up."
"Significant Otters."
"Sharing secrets."
"Wildebeest (x-post from r/gifs)"
"Great Minds in Action"
"It's a matter of leaf or death"
"Look at the baby"
"When Titanic dethroned Star Wars at the box-office  Lucas sent this to Cameron."
"Cannot Unsee: Honey Boo Boo"
"Cannot unsee(x-post r/pics)"
"Thats two for flinching"
"*Boop!*"
"Imma Bop You On The Nose."
"Tag you're it!"
"boop."
"Tag! You're it."
"Boop"
"How a real man works out"
"One Sexy Dadd"
"Drop it like its hot."
"I have the perfect endpin..."
"Or anyone else  for that matter."
"Louis CK on minorities"
"What doesn't kill me"
"Day 1 of Communist America [FB]"
"Hayfever is coming"
"Good morning!"
"When was the last time you were this happy. Never. You have never been this happy."
"You guys just make me so happy!"
"wake up and smell the flowers!"
"Wish I could be as happy as this little guy."
"My brain has so much fuck."
"I could watch this for hours..."
"I'm not even sure if this belongs here or in /r/WTF."
"NEEDZ MOAR HOGAN"
"what i REALLY want to say when customers ask &quot;how are you?&quot; after i've been standing on my feet for 8 hours dealing with bullshit"
"When I finally drag my ass to the gym"
"Shark week summed up in one sentence:"
"Lungi Terror ( x-post from r/india )"
"HARRRBBBBRRRRRRRGGLLL"
"Shoop Da Whoop"
"Walter Flanders"
"Hi diddly ho neighborino"
"Friend sent me this to start my morning."
"Who's that pokemon?!"
"Sincerely  The Universe"
"Certificate every human should receive at birth"
"Saw this on an add the other day.."
"..wait  what?!? O_o"
"Falcon PUNCH!"
"FALCON!!....oh shit"
"Fear and Loathing in Mos Eisley"
"Happy St. Patrick's Day!!"
"Now That's a Pot of Gold!"
"So that's what is at the end of the rainbow.."
"I fucking hate radicals. And I've had to deal with them a lot this week."
"The cruel hand of fate"
"since reddit likes cats"
"What did I just find?"
"Help! I've Been Taken Captive by Sea Horses!"
"What i thought of when i saw this gif"
"Tell em'"
"This seems more fitting than the other"
"Beautiful huge Butterfly. Anyone know what type of butterfly this is?"
"When you sit on the toilet thinking only the seat is down  but the lid is down also."
"*save game corrupted*"
"In Russia  protester pepper spray police."
"This mashup was suggested a while ago...Thom Yorke is groovy."
"Just two piglets swimming"
"the game is playing itself"
"Whatever this man is doing  I need to find out NOW."
"Asian Arcade Gamer is the best around!"
"we've all been there at some point..."
"This GIF always cheers me up"
"Suddenly...Pigeon"
"Why you should heed signs"
"Don't feed the birds..."
"Don't feed the birds..."
"Subscribed today  had a good song and spent and hour looking for the right gif."
"Don t feed the pigeons."
"Probably my favorite gif of all time"
"Pigeons..."
"Wut?"
"Wut?"
"Not entirely sure this belongs here but it's still funny..."
"Looking for a &quot;T&quot; necklace."
"It's so simple!"
"What did Apple really invent?"
"Can someone explain this to me? If it's true  how did Apply win anything?"
"Reddit and Johnny Bravo lately."
"Found out I work with 3 redditors tonight..."
"Keanu Reeves"
"Keanu Reeves"
"Hy Oh Silveeer!"
"Up and ov-- Oof!"
"I'm a panda"
"What happens when a person falls in love with her creation?"
"Little Friend"
"forever alone"
"Should have held on tighter."
"I wish I could honestly think in my head girls wish that happened to them except for..."
"What...The...Fuck..."
"Doughboy!"
"My high school had a Career dress-up day  this is what my friend decided to go as"
"Was career day at school for dressup day. This is what he came back with"
"Fire up the ovens  Muffin Man! We got a big order to fill."
"And now! For my next trick..."
"My cat doesn't like it when we play &quot;magic show&quot;"
"I present to you....The most badass .gif ever"
"Like A Boss"
"Taking a no-wiper"
"I want to walk away from an explosion to THIS song"
"Mission: Compleat"
"Mission: Complete"
"I am cornholio"
"Darker and Edgier World 1-1 of Super Mario Bros."
"Nom nom nom nom nom nom nom."
"The captain is coming! Quick  do something important!"
"Socially Awkward Extra"
"Ed O'Neill (Married with Children  Modern Family) has been reading the same newspaper for 20 years"
"The Republican's October Surprise"
"Proof that Obama is a Socialist?"
"World's most accurate pie chart..."
"The most accurate pie chart  ever."
"Tired of political pie charts? Here is the only pie chart that matters."
"When I expect to drink regular soda and I taste diet"
"Looking at my facebook newsfeed"
"Browsing R/Facepalm"
"When no one up-votes my comment."
"Hitler and bank charges according to 4chan (shockingly good for them)"
"My 25 year old son drew this painting yesterday  should i tell him to apply for Academy of Fine Arts Vienna (again)?"
"Stone bridge in fall"
"a sad reminder that discrimination still exists..."
"Scared the kit out of him."
"I think once was enough but okay it works"
"The dog receives special privileges. He is regularly released  and seems more than willing to return. He is obviously retarted."
"Cats vs Dogs"
"Drunk Baby - Dinner Time"
"Dora the Explorer"
"What it's like being anemic living in a house with the air conditioner always on."
"A walk on a lovely fall day  with a freshly-shaved face"
"How I answer questions during a job interview."
"I just had a job interview. This is how I feel now."
"Classic Ron Swanson"
"Take that!"
"Oh sit down"
"Went to poop at work... Forgot my phone."
"After sitting through the credits of Dark Knight Returns for nothing"
"Jeremy Clarkson &amp; James May"
"Top Gear."
"Who says steroids don't bring out the sexy??"
"Who needs swag?"
"Soft kitty  warm kitty  little ball of fur"
"Every single night"
"13 million dollar bank statement left at a coffee shop with this message on it......"
"resume of a boss"
"Need my resume? Nope."
"How to break in a neighbor."
"This popped up on my newsfeed. Spiderman or mini pony?"
"One of those things that I thought was a plant is now eating the biggest fish in my office tank..."
"One of those things that I thought was a plant is now eating the biggest fish in my office tank... (xpost from wtf)"
"He's got the moves like Jagger  but he breathes fire"
"That's suspicious..."
"How i feel as a european redditor seeing these NC stuff."
"My reaction when people tell me they don't like desserts"
"Bitch Kick[gif]"
"To an extent  she was asking for it."
"To Protect and Serve"
"It's just a theory right?"
"Rainbow field"
"In 1999: imagine all the karma."
"this poor quality baby will forever freak me out"
"Midgets can be cruel."
"You call wrestling a sport  I call it a comedy"
"Fuck you I'm a dog"
"You did what with Mozart?"
"You did what with Mozart? (X-post from r/youtubecomments)"
"Hot Coals x Legos"
"Made in class from bloop's collection with some improvising"
"Made from bloop's collection and extras. Enjoy"
"This is my favorite wallpaper to date"
"How long did he practice for that? And WHY?"
"You're doing it wrong...Or maybe really  really right."
"you are what you eat!"
"This is how I picture people when they trash talk music genres."
"This picture describes vegans/vegetarians succinctly."
"Everyone is an atheist like me."
"this is why I usually don't give a fuck"
"Not one fuck was given"
"Showing up to a job interview in jeans and a plain t-shirt  and getting the job over the guy who wore a suit."
"Sufferin' Succotash! They're MON-stars!"
"Lost to Michael Jordan  but won the costume contest."
"How I felt after reaching 1 000 comment karma."
"How I feel when I get more upvotes than downvotes."
"I just got the 1000th upvote on a post and this is how it felt"
"I was doing a google search for a Barney Stinson gif  found this instead"
"When I noticed my karma tripled overnight(to 43)."
"Critical hit!"
"bitch slap"
"Here comes the.."
"Me during every argument with the GF"
"It's Probing Time!"
"We cum in peace?"
"Aliens... [NSFW]"
"It won't hurt I promise. (NSFW)"
"Aliens..."
"This is fucking bullshit"
"Redditor places 6 yellow starbursts next to three opened packages to make it seem like he was shafted. All for that sugary karma goodness."
"Luckiest Man Alive"
"Found a leaked picture of the new Ironman 3 movie...smh..."
"Insane Iron Man Cosplay."
"The heavens have opened!"
"Montana Thunderstorm - National Geographic"
"Obama is a wizard"
"TUNNLE SNAKES RULE!"
"When God Created The Earth"
"I am a Democrat  but I'm a bit busy at the moment."
"The truth is..."
"more important things to do"
"Homecoming rage"
"The definition of &quot;not giving a fuck&quot;"
"And a single fuck was not given... well..."
"Not even a single fuck"
"A single fuck was given."
"I wish Coke would make this now"
"Under Water Hunting"
"Gone Fishin"
"The fleeting life of a fish"
"Good info for potential buyers"
"Apparently houses need to advertise they are not haunted! Stolen from FB"
"But if it isn't  then why is there a need for the sign? ..."
"Found this in r/funny.. thought it belonged here. &quot;A Real Lesbian..&quot;"
"Seems a bit unsympathetic towards the families of their victims..."
"Ma'am  I don't think that's quite how you eat Cheerios."
"Working in IT  this is how I feel by the end of the week after 40 hours of staring at a computer..."
"yolo!"
"yolo pug"
"I do what I want  bitch."
"This is how I picture Joe the Cat after ingesting all that catnip."
"Landing on my feet is overrated"
"Never ending cat fail"
"Im rollin'  Im rollin'..."
"How I go downstairs the morning after a night of heavy drinking"
"Fat Sonic"
"WTF kind of magic trick is that?!"
"Atheist magician"
"I don't really know what to say about this"
"Amazing magic trick"
"Abortions in Russia"
"Not sure if it's a repost  but does anyone know the source of this?"
"Magic Fetus Trick"
"Kung Fu Panda?"
"How I feel after taking someones OC and submitting it as my own"
"The Raveinator is back"
"How I feel when this gif gets reposted"
"Anybody know this girl's name?"
"Mfw everytime I get a lot of downvotes"
"MFW people post things on here about rape."
"Lets get it on."
"Easily amused"
"I think this belongs here..."
"Ooo sexy picture of girl on the bea.....OH WTF?!?"
"This isn't right.."
"This just showed up on my FB news feed.."
"Just a lady with a gorgeous feet."
"Taking fetish to the next level (NSFW)"
"best story ever!"
"It felt like jelly."
"i LOVE this time of night"
"Me when im in the mood  and my girlfriend isnt"
"Worth it just for the very end... &quot;That bitch is crazy  man&quot;"
"Calm down pussy"
"Actually  this cat is like me sometimes with OCD."
"Seinfeld Wars"
"Not sure If I am doing this right.... But I wanted to share this Nic Cage meme shirt I made."
"Since my saloon girl pics got so many up votes  I thought it try my Nic Cage shirt once more!"
"Scientific Genius"
"I wonder what he hears all the time"
"For Seal!"
"The little guy must be a horse wisperer."
"Love"
"Checking your new submission from the night prior.."
"Finding your new submission from the night prior.."
"These two.. would have dated..."
"/r/conservative right now"
"You came to the wrong neighbourhood"
"a neighborhood full of redditors"
"They call him The Cat Master"
"Oh boy!"
"As a Libertarian  how I feel about the upcoming election"
"How I feel when I see &quot;comment score below threshold.&quot;"
"Whenever I see someone reply to a link with &quot;The fuck did I just watch?&quot;"
"How I feel when I see people fighting on Facebook"
"Me  waiting for treesgonewild to explode on 4/20."
"Walking into a final I studied for."
"What I do when I hear an argument about gay marriage beginning."
"When I see that a reply comment has twice as many upvotes as the previous comment.."
"Just put a brand new Droid on eBay with the starting bid at $1.00...."
"Whenever I see my town is going to get hit with severe thunderstorms."
"When I see a youtube video on the front page."
"How I feel browsing /r/politics during the Republican National Convention."
"..and then he NAILS you."
"Jesus:First he nails you THEN he NAILS you!"
"I was searching up rule 34s when this came up..."
"This was a facebook profile icon."
"Drugs."
"Catastrophic Dance Moves"
"DUBSTEP"
"Rock and roll dude!  lets dance to the grove."
"Red panda can't quite reach"
"Remember  when someone annoys you..."
"Is someone bothering you?"
"Is someone bothering you?"
"Can you guess his rank?"
"Mouse Shotput"
"OH CRAP"
"So I guess my town should invest more in its roads. (Credit WRAL TV)"
"Kids spell the darndest things."
"Romney's kids sure knows their family's priority"
"Some things were just meant to be...."
"Money"
"Possibly the greatest Freudian slip in U.S. History."
"Mitt Romney &amp; the greatest Freudian slip in history."
"How blatant can you get?"
"Enough already"
"How I feel seeing all the pregnant cats on r/aww..."
"Went to my friends house and hes been using Reddit for 2 years"
"How I feel every time I browse the top reddits"
"Too soon?"
"As a Michiganian"
"As a PC owner with Steam"
"Picard's take on the Lubbock County &quot;invasion&quot;"
"What I was thinking today."
"I get self conscious every time I'm in a public washroom..."
"This is why we have Scrabble"
"As an Indian living in Denmark..."
"Man throws acid on his wife's face and forces her to stay married to him."
"Whenever I watch my mom on the computer"
"Picard on Seals."
"Picard on Pizza Rolls"
"&quot;Yeah  that's the spot&quot;"
"One of my favorite crossovers."
"dafuq"
"Cat thinks box is the bee's knees"
"My friend posted this as his new Facebook profile pic yesterday. He's lost 22 friends  so far."
"Look  another Moose in a Tree Post!"
"what jesus thinks about downvoters"
"Cheetah Catches Gazelle Ridin' Dirty"
"what i think of you..."
"1 2 3 4 5 .... ready or not here I come!"
"Please insert Disc 2."
"Kenya just let me download it off the Internet next time?"
"My neighbors at 3 a.m."
"My neighbors at 3 am."
"Every fucking night"
"What I imagine my neighbors do all day"
"I just realized this chimp is wearing jorts (jean shorts)"
"Chimp feeding a baby tiger"
"Baby monkey bottle feeding a baby Tiger"
"just feeding time.."
"Drink up little buddy!"
"A Monkey and a Tiger"
"Here's a picture of a chimpanzee feeding a baby tiger"
"Adorable"
"Adorable"
"Monkey feeding a baby tiger!"
"Monkey feeding baby tiger"
"Cute monkey feeds small baby tiger"
"What I want to do when someone is talking loudly while I'm trying to study."
"What happens when you're loud in class and someone is trying to study."
"I will never dress my shih tzu's up for Halloween  but if I did.."
"ALL DAY LONG Scout  Sniper  and Engi dream of sex!"
"What is love?"
"Face Swap..?"
"my cake day"
"I have no pets nor arts and crafts to display."
"I have no discernible talents for my cake day I just googled what to do. I am satisfied."
"the hulks a lot cuter than i remembered"
"When they put too much mayo on my subway"
"When I see someone use 'your' instead of 'you're' incorrectly."
"As an Australian citizen  this is how I will view the American elections."
"How I feel when factual information I give gets downvoted into oblivion for &quot;sounding pretentious.&quot;"
"How I look every time I browse a university's meme page."
"when someone is touching my screen with their finger"
"So I called into Fox News Radio today and got through. This is how I felt throughout the phone call."
"When I try to explain the Internet to my dad. (he is Soooo impatient and clicks everything)"
"When my wife has already seen something I find on Reddit"
"trying to tell my boss why we shouldn't be friends on facebook"
"As a Canadian reading the Chicken-fil-A controversy."
"Nathan Fillion posted his IAmA in r/Denver"
"Watching my parents use the computer."
"How I try to act watching my girlfriend play video games..."
"Jim Lehrer Attempting to Moderate the Presidential Debate Last Night"
"As a graphics programmer  HIFW /r/gaming tries to explain why mirrors don't work in FPS games"
"How I feel whenever my post gets no upvotes"
"I bet atheists would be amazing at this..."
"I was channel surfing when..."
"Googled Lemon Dick  Did Not Dissapoint"
"To fight diarrhea  the best thing is a lemon."
"Dog swag!"
"Found this on Facebook -_-"
"&quot;If you don't get your butt down here in 2 minutes you aren't getting dessert tonight  mister!&quot; Oh shi-"
"How do you fuck that up?"
"These are grains of sand  magnified 250x. Amazing how these tiny worlds are under our feet and we have no idea."
"Sand magnified at 250x. Patterns of nature are amazing."
"This was over in r/facepalm. I think it also belongs here..."
"When you hear the phone ring while on the toilet"
"When my toe gets stuck in my shorts while putting them on"
"Remember this the next time your cat wants to lick you."
"Cat tongue (misplaced in /r/wtf)"
"They are getting clever!"
"Simon Amstell on Attacking Religion"
"How I feel on Thanksgiving"
"After eating Thanksgiving Dinner"
"That is gonna hurt tomorrow."
"Why Spongebob is an amazing show."
"How I imagine the commenters on /r/SpaceDicks"
"Just a Kitten  soooo adorable!"
"Googled &quot;cats&quot; this was the first search result..."
"What downvoted cats end up doing."
"So I herd u liek kittans"
"So i herd u liek kittans"
"C'mon society  really?"
"Dog the bounty hunter."
"Straight outta Chernobyl  Ukraine."
"Chernobyl..."
"I was doing research on the Chernobyl nuclear disaster when I found THIS little guy"
"Chernobyl Diaries + Marley &amp; Me"
"RAWR!"
"Rebirth"
"Grossest thing ive ever seen"
"What face do women make when they see your penis? Here's my answer:"
"Deception"
"Irish girl sunbathing"
"How I feel being a Christian and a Republican on Reddit"
"'Bout to clap this bitch up in here."
"Party hard"
"This is how I party when im alone."
"Party hard and celebrate!"
"Gunman and Remote Ass Kid"
"It is almost friday!!!!"
"PARTY HARD"
"It's Friday!"
"i go hard"
"I just broke a hundred upvotes on a sub reddit. ITS TIME TO...."
"How to tell if it's HTML5"
"You'll Shit Bricks"
"One danger of a summer heat wave"
"tuuuuuuuuuuube!"
"&quot;french fry&quot;"
"&quot;french fry&quot;"
"Finally."
"Meanwhile in Japan..."
"My niece and a monkey [fixed]"
"Trust issues"
"Virgins... [SFW]"
"I honestly can't think of a witty title for this..."
"My favorite game!"
"So do I"
"whenever someone posts a sad story on Reddit"
"How I feel having had my period for a month straight..."
"The Bomb? Planted by aliens."
"Just got one-shotted?"
"terrorists"
"Is this the view our Canadian friends have of Mt. Rushmore?"
"The other side of America"
"Oh Hey Mom!"
"Uggh. It had 3000+ likes aswell."
"Watching my dad (a GP doctor) watch House is more entertaining than the show - Imgur"
"Damn it  Harry"
"This kid is a Champ"
"trash."
"I really hate some people"
"What a huge dick."
"I was trying to get to some boxes when I found this gem"
"Found this gem in the middle of the level"
"Just Putin on his way to save Russia"
"Just cruisin'"
"Putin flies crane"
"Russian Airlines"
"Front page  here I come.."
"some people are natural born swimmers....and other people are not..."
"just saw this awesome picture.. nice weather there"
"What to do when bored!"
"I guess she likes having an eye on the back of her head?"
"Eye like your hair!"
"Big cola"
"Happen to see this in my fb feed today... BIG COLA."
"Thirsty?"
"We don't see enough pictures like this."
"Riker's beard - Deal with it"
"Bless this gif"
"The beard makes the man"
"Why would you do that  son?"
"No words can explain this."
"Best mom in the world."
"I don't even [NSFW]"
"Armadillo lizard"
"Armadillo lizard"
"Nobody. Nobody says you have to have fur to be cute."
"Congress on the Constitution..."
"How I feel when people start posting comments longer than one paragraph"
"Skrillex vs Bush"
"I had my first final today."
"MFW a post has 1700 replies"
"when i accidently go to r/creepy"
"One of the few images that has literally made me say WTF out loud"
"Truly WTF worthy"
"For the love of God....WHY?"
"Wait  what?"
"Well that escalated quickly..."
"Cat MD"
"This just in  Jeff Goldblum chases and stalks innocent velociraptor man."
"Rex"
"Bravo Target....Bravo"
"Bob Marley copied Drake!"
"Jesus Use Me"
"Corgi Loop"
"I looked up &quot;funny gifs&quot; and found this...."
"Can't beat the commute."
"Banana Dance Off"
"quick friend is eating lunch post bananas"
"My reaction to iFunny."
"I'm never leaving my house again..."
"A chip off the ol' Abe Simpson block."
"Walking into the middle of an awkward conversation"
"Black people.."
"soo  The most Up-to-date CPR instructions have been made public."
"SOON"
"The film industry should consider doing these real life stunts."
"It's Jackie Chan!"
"Jackie San VS The Eye of Sauron (GIF)"
"Meet Libby (gif)"
"&quot;Hey  llama! It's rude to chew with your mouth open.&quot;"
"When a teacher opens internet explorer to play a class video"
"Every time I'm eating breakfast and get stuck at a red light..."
"How I feel when a llama slowly turns its head and looks at me"
"Requiem for an Alpaca"
"I'm watching you"
"Reddit  what's your most awkward gif? This is mine..."
"Realizing its my Cakeday."
"My response to my ill daughter when she told me she's been using my carmex all week."
"Welcome to Australia"
"A spider eating a snake in suburban Australia."
"SEAL Team Siete"
"I want someone to do this in London this year"
"Being Captain Falcon in Super Smash Bros 64"
"thinking I can handle r/spacedicks after seeing all the &quot;back to its roots&quot; r/WTF posts"
"Deal with it"
"I just don't understand!"
"How Reddit sees OP's"
"League of Draven"
"Snorlax causin' hella traffic and shit"
"Snorlax goes gangsta"
"The real Starfox"
"Star Fox Is Down"
"Live Action Star Fox"
"STAR FOX IS DOWN"
"Starfox is down"
"Star Fox..... Is Down..."
"25 self-portraits drawn on 25 different drugs"
"25 Different Drugs. 25 Self-Portraits."
"25 self portraits drawn on 25 different drugs"
"25 self-portraits on 25 different drugs"
"I whip my ears back 'n forth..."
"Anybody remember &quot;I whip my ears back and forth?&quot; so here's the continued story!"
"How I turn on the ladies on the dance floor"
"do you want to go to the vet?"
"Wiggle Wiggle Wiggle"
"Whenever someone asks me for gum"
"HIFW I'm the only girl in the weight room"
"My face when someone asks me for gum"
"Wiggle Wiggle Wiggle"
"&quot;That&quot; time  ladies?"
"Fantasy Football"
"The cure for internet addiction.."
"The longer you stare  the funnier it gets"
"Gentlemen  if I may..."
"So that's how rainbows are made huh?"
"What my local news covers in the morning"
"these need to stop."
"Only dance I've ever learned in my whole life."
"The only dance worth learning. [x-post r/Gifs]"
"that feeling when a post is getting upvoted"
"when people ask me to throw them their ball"
"Reddit's reaction when I admit to being a dog  NOT CAT  lover."
"Play time's over..."
"Fuck you science"
"How I Feel At The End Of An Argument."
"When someone tells me how bad weed is."
"If it fits  it ships.."
"Cat's got his tongue"
"Clever slogan"
"My attempt at posting."
"Whenever I try to upload original content."
"Posting Unpopular Opinions on Reddit"
"What I imagine a Christian feels like trying to make and argument in a r/atheism comment stream"
"This game seriously needs a Sequel"
"Soon. (When you see it)"
"poor widdle guy =("
"My favorite book growing up."
"The Highly Anticipated Sequel"
"Group photo at formal party"
"Group photo at formal party (xpost from r/perfecttiming)"
"Not Today"
"I spent my reading week on reddit"
"If Only We Could Find a Way to Keep it This Size"
"Apple recently"
"Apple's suing logic"
"Found this freaky ass fish"
"The ocean can be a dick sometimes"
"iPhone 5"
"China &quot;apple store&quot; is being real honest"
"Truth (repost from r/funny)"
"The pain of uncertainty in what could be a final goodbye."
"The pain of uncertainty in what could be a final goodbye."
"Sleepy kitten"
"Sleeeeeepy"
"How i upvote in /r/aww"
"Manute Bol"
"I give you the original slender man [fixed][fixed]"
"Who needs am air strike when you have the power of lightening?"
"Who needs am air strike when you have the power of lightening?"
"Who needs an air strike when you have the power of lightening? [x-post]"
"Nathan Fillion's awesome Canada-based costume"
"Nathan Fillion's awesome Canada-based costume [xpost from r/Canada]"
"Nathan Fillion as Captain Canada"
"Reddit today .."
"Meanwhile  at the RNC..."
"This was all I could think of every time someone said &quot;American&quot; or &quot;America&quot; during the Republican Convention."
"Facebook today"
"Have you ever seen a building designed like this before?"
"Baby skunk"
"NOW tell me you don't like skunks"
"This makes me want one of my own."
"Found this gem on good old Facebook."
"Go ahead."
"Neo vs SubZero"
"SNIPER!!!"
"Sniper! Get Down!"
"You have something right... oh never mind I'll get it"
"Still a better love story than twilight."
"He's just going to be hungry again in an hour..."
"Yum."
"Oh  he's tho dead cold my thongue has thuck thu him..."
"I don't even..."
"Holding down power button [first]"
"It's just a figment of your imagination."
"Stop messing with my brain!"
"Still hard to process after staring for 5 minutes"
"Jay Adams"
"It's for his own good..."
"How you like me now?"
"Ye He Got Dumped"
"start me up"
"What happens when I turn this?"
"What does this do?"
"Start me up... If you start me up  I'll never stop..."
"Start me up... If you start me up  I'll never stop... [gif]"
"Pencil sharpener."
"Why is this so entertaining?"
"Not funny but awesome CHECK OUT!"
"KEEP ROLLIN ROLLIN ROLLIN ROLLIN"
"You spin my pencil right round"
"This makes me laugh way more than it should"
"I say."
"Touch the Rainbow"
"My favorite gif on the internet. Try it!"
"Touch The Rainbow!!!"
"Touch The Rainbow!!!"
"They won't suspect a thing"
"The seems like a great commercial!"
"Feel the beat!"
"Feel the beat!"
"How I get ready to have sex...[FIXED]"
"Look at all these poor guys trying to hula hoop"
"Not usually a big fan of memes  but this one gave me a good chuckle"
"My cakeday message regarding your upvote..."
"As a new Redditor  this is what i think of Karma."
"Free Karma Please!"
"When my boyfriend told me he just bought my Christmas present"
"Pretty sure this belongs here."
"I googled &quot;What is Reddit?&quot; and this came up.."
"What the fuck Africa?"
"What in the actual fuck."
"&quot;Nigerian Pickle boys.&quot;"
"Searching wtf on google and this is just so what the fuck."
"Japanese dough kneading."
"Gotta put a beat on it."
"A decent metaphor for the Romney campaign."
"Every time anybody plays... especially Michael J Fox"
"Gallery of awesome Halloween costumes from Redditors"
"I witnessed one of my college classmates say this today- &quot;I don't think To Kill A Mockingbird should be read in schools any more. Slavery is over. The book isn't relevant any more.&quot;"
"Don't look or he follows"
"Avocado corner pocket !"
"It works."
"A casual game of pool in Africa"
"Oh  the level of DUMBNESS is...!?"
"What. The. Fuck."
"I think you're doing that wrong."
"Guess who gives absolutely zero fucks about the Kardashians!"
"My response to  &quot;Who loves Gary Oldman?&quot;"
"How I feel as the heir to a hotel empire trying to prove to my dad I'm not an idiot."
"How I feel when I realize I'm a good 10+ years older than most of you college kids."
"How I feel when most of my friends are Republican while I am a Democrat."
"Hup Holland!"
"WWI simplified"
"WW1 History Lesson"
"After years of learning US history  nothing explains World War I to me as well as this does"
"Here comes the... [fixed]"
"here comes the BOOM [FIXED]"
"Beetlejesus... amirite?"
"This made me giggle  because the crucifixes with Christ on em  weirds me out."
"Whenever I'm walking through the streets of Berlin.."
"Dang it  I hate cleaning up crumb [nsfwish]"
"This still makes me laugh"
"LAWL"
"Crumbing!"
"Is this.. Bread porn?? [sfw]"
"IM GONNA CRUMB!!"
"what your dog do when you're not watching"
"Its a Pug life."
"Pug Rocking"
"How I act when all alone"
"Abandoned library"
"Beautiful abandoned library"
"Nothing gay about football"
"How I feel when I realize Redditors are mean  and I should stick to r/aww"
"Did anyone call a plumber?"
"Now the shoe is on the other foot."
"Another perspective?"
"First time playing Counter Strike."
"Late to the party but first time playing CS 1.6"
"Renaissance Mutant Ninja Turtles!"
"I find this to be incredibly badass."
"Teenage Mutant Ninja....Artists?"
"How I feel about other Redditor's birthdays"
"So it's my Cake Day."
"When people try to talk politics with me"
"Me playing Minecraft for the first time in a while after multiple updates."
"One of the logos i saw most during my childhood.(Fixed)"
"Happy Birthday you magnificent bastard."
"he's like nutella for your ears"
"Nightmares forever."
"I went to my first &quot;Hardcore&quot; concert last Friday night. This is all i saw."
"When you spill cereal all over the carpet and don't know what to do"
"I just realized I missed Free Slurpee Day..."
"When wake up and get to my 8am class to find out there was homework due"
"When I realize I have a paper due tomorrow that I've barely even started."
"Rugby Alpaca"
"Nightmare Fuel."
"That's just amazing."
"One very lucky person... oh and one unlucky person"
"HEY! I was driving that..."
"What the ... I don't even ..."
"The weirdest car crash"
"The persuasive powers of alcohol"
"If you insist"
"Alcohol..."
"Like the new username?"
"That's one way to put it.."
"Level level:level"
"Waking up in the middle of a dream about sex"
"America's Largest Untapped Oil Reserve."
"Moved to Pennsylvania for college and found my true love."
"Bear Grylls Forever Alone"
"I see your coyote in a grill  and raise you some cow in a grill"
"All this talk about PETA makes me want to get one of these. [fixed]"
"All this talk about PETA makes me want to get one of these. (FIXED)"
"SUPPLIES!"
"Supplies"
"Supplies?"
"supplies"
"Still the best gif ever made"
"Middle Class to Obama and Romney: We're glad you love us  but can you give us what we really want?"
"You feel me Rombama?"
"Nod ya head..."
"The presidential candidate debate was straight up G dwag"
"What is politics? Baby  don't tax me. Don't tax me. No more."
"Betta have my money."
"My favorite part of the debate was when Metallica started playing."
"F*ck Everything!"
"The only thing you need to do..."
"Feel good!"
"Boosh"
"when I saw that my small subreddit had reached 50 subscribers"
"Worst. Easter Bunny. Ever."
"He's Everywhere!!!"
"Guess Who?"
"DO NOT WANT"
"My life"
"Lost it at [6].. Could you imagine? and did you know that?!"
"Poor Space Elephants..."
"Neat Elephant Fact"
"ingenuity: the quality of being clever  original  and inventive"
"My Electricity went out so i MacGyvered this shit."
"Make do with what you have..."
"Pssst..."
"Bitch what !"
"Dead Man Walking"
"I want you to whisper dirty things in my ear..."
"Dumb Duck"
"What Portal game developer watched as a kid."
"My view on this over-inflated backlash against Chick Fil A for not supporting gay marriage"
"When people bitch about reposts [reposted]"
"When people bitch about reposts"
"When people bitch about reposts (Not sure if repost)"
"What does Zoidberg need to do around here to get a little less eye contact?!"
"How I see all the girls at Mardi Gras [Ex-Post from /r/Zoidberg]"
"How I hoped cakeday would feel"
"How I felt waking up this morning and realizing I'd missed the gf's sexytime invite text."
"How I feel when I'm the first person to downvote an unpopular post"
"Well that escalated quickly."
"Just popped up in my newsfeed...[X-post with r/pics]"
"Japanese Wrestling... love it"
"Japanese wrestling"
"Get in my pouch!"
"Someone I know made hotdogs at work."
"Dire  Dire Docks"
"This exists"
"This is what happens when I post to Reddit."
"Whenever I Try To Throw A Grenade In Battlefield 3."
"What posting to reddit is like"
"probably the most badass shark ever lived on the Earth"
"The Australians Were Here"
"The Australians Were Here"
"Battered Warrior"
"King of the ocean"
"Battered warrior"
"Scarred."
"Aww  look at the cute little OH MY GOD"
"Bull's eye"
"I see your 'most American picture ever' and give you the most Asian picture ever"
"Describing RES to a redditor who doesn't have RES"
"Bird"
"Boobs or I move him closer"
"Well that sums up when I will eat this!"
"My Kinda Ramen."
"So we began Shakespeare in class today."
"A Photo of the Most Elite Pilots on Earth Looking Incredibly Badass"
"A Photo of the Most Elite Pilots on Earth Looking Incredibly Badass"
"14 pilots in full pressure suits stand in front of a United States Air Force U-2 reconnaissance aircraft at Beale AFB [3547x2093]"
"Elite pilots looking badass in front of a U2 bomber."
"I ate his liver with some meow mix.... and a nice bowl of milk"
"This is pretty much my favorite GIF atm"
"It's not what they're arguing for. It's how they're arguing for it."
"Barack Obama's insightful words on abortion"
"Still one of my favorite pics  ever."
"One step closer to the robot apocalypse..."
"How I feel eating trail mix"
"People who clap after a plane lands."
"The worst torture imaginable"
"The worst type of torture"
"The War on Drugs: 40 years of an unchanging 1.3% addiction rate  a $1.5 trillion price tag and counting"
"How to blow 1.5 trillion dollars"
"About 2 seconds into shaving my beard off."
"Going on Reddit on my birthday"
"After watching a horror movie when i'm home alone"
"How I felt after installing the Windows 8 consumer preview"
"Accepted a Friend Request from my Ex Girlfriend."
"How FunkyJunk feels after hiring Charles Carreon."
"After realizing I forget to clear my history while letting a friend use my laptop"
"How I feel after deciding to stay up all night"
"So I searched American gif and this is what I found"
"My reaction while voting"
"How I felt finally hitting 1776 karma..."
"It's like he made himself into a dog burrito!"
"If SOPA is Defeated..."
"the first hour of a road trip feels like this..."
"In the car after picking up a bag"
"Jitterbug"
"Penguin Shuffle"
"Penguin be dancin'"
"Defiance"
"Scumbag Amurrica"
"A bit true when you think about it"
"I shall use this line next time.."
"Apple's latest competitor"
"Must be an IPhone"
"I will probably never be as happy as this dog."
"My friend's dog was happy about his birthday dinner."
"happy dog"
"I humbly submit my vote for the worst tattoo ever"
"Just Three Dudes"
"David Bowie  Iggy Pop And Lou Reed"
"Fight me!"
"The fuck did you say?"
"That moment when I see a full jar of nutella"
"Wanna fight?"
"EVERY TIME I get on /b/."
"So  how does that banana taste..."
"Banana"
"When a conversation with a female ends with &quot;I'll see you later&quot;"
"Troy's worst nightmare (x-post from WTF)"
"I think we got a troll on board."
"I have no words."
"Welcome to Disney World kids"
"It's called fashion; look it up"
"Mr.Dragon's Birthday."
"Then and now I watch &quot;Barney and friends...&quot;"
"and now I have a heart!"
"Evolution: Life on Earth is one Big Extended Family"
"Slenderman has really sunk low to get his $20"
"this is what happens to anorexics eventually"
"The espresso cups at Cafe Toro Negro in Guatemala."
"Coffee on the inside cone on the outside waffle cone coffee mug"
"No."
"Broke out laughing in my lecture when I saw this in r/4chan"
"The abandoned Chinese amusement park named &quot;Wonderland&quot;"
"Uhm okay."
"¿Haven't you heard?"
"Me 3 days into NO FAP September...."
"When my girlfriend says she'll be coming over in an hour"
"Ballwashers"
"How I feel as a guy getting out of the shower and drying myself off"
"On the overly attached girlfriend..."
"All I could think leaving Dark Knight Rises (no spoilers)"
"After skipping the first minute of a porn."
"as a Canadian observing the Chick-Fil-A debacle"
"When I see a post on the front page less than an hour after being posted"
"The entire time I was playing The Walking Dead Episode 3."
"My thoughts while graphing Parabolas."
"Having Sex After 1 Year of Being Dry"
"After my new boyfriend of five days told me he loved me..."
"Just read through the Arthurian legends and myths. This pretty much sums up every story in there..."
"How I felt when I woke up and saw snow this morning."
"Two months ago  my wife started browsing reddit because she liked the cat pictures. Yesterday  she said she isn't sure if she believes in God anymore"
"Fear this..."
"A nope eating a bird. Not sure if repost"
"Okay. Now I'm never going to Australia."
"I see your California Spider  and raise you an Australian Bird Eating Spider"
"Germany FTW!"
"The Real Reason for Broken N64 Joysticks"
"Destroying N64 Controllers Since... [Fixed]"
"Distorting N64 joysticks since 1998."
"Sometimes when other people make bad decisions it's funny"
"New way to Manscape"
"I see your fabulous football and raise you fabulous swimming."
"It's Friday!!!"
"Shake it all the time."
"I know these posts may be getting old  but I'd love to see a sequel to this"
"Java Updates"
"Reality 3D"
"I resized some of my favorite wallpapers for the iPhone 5 and thought I would share - Enjoy!"
"Another J Bieber song? Sure! Just let me take my instrument."
"Take that Hannah Montana"
"Badass kid"
"nigel...."
"Cat Dance"
"If tomatoes are fruit..."
"How I am with memes"
"If the Christian God is the true god it cannot be a perfect God."
"We likey bouncy! We likey bouncy!"
"Because Japan."
"I want one."
"trippy profile pic"
"Paint me like one of your French girls"
"Wait...what?"
"Meet Shorty"
"Giraffe + Fat Corgi Puppy = This."
"Sir... there is a bomb in this ball... and it will detonate if it hits the ground..."
"Saw this on the top of my news feed"
"When people make fun of me for going to church."
"The Transfiguration of Nicolas Cage"
"Nicolas Cage on my newsfeed"
"Face off!"
"The Boss."
"Sheenface (2011) - IMDb"
"My attempt at some Reddit Birthday Karma Whoring."
"Accidentally dropped flour on my desk[FTFY]"
"Best quote from The Office. Always makes me laugh."
"Michael Scott and Toby"
"Oh  Michael Scott..."
"My favorite line from the Office"
"happy easter."
"Who else is excited for this?"
"Arrested Development Reunion Picture"
"Wow  just wow.."
"My heart goes out to this motorcycle"
"Hands Up"
"All of us at the school dances"
"Gotta love mixing techno and meth"
"Rage your face off"
"Silly Germans..."
"How I feel as a closet atheist at Christian camp."
"Jesus is my co-pilot"
"Possibly the Best Wingman Ever"
"Best wingman"
"Skateboarding in New York in the 60's  thought reddit might enjoy this."
"Ignore the crane."
"How my first post went"
"My first handjob in 3 days"
"Did a double-take when I saw this"
"When I haven't blown my nuts for a week"
"My greatest fear about anal"
"SFW Cumshot"
"My girlfriend after I was at my parents for a week..."
"New York's response to a car alarm going off almost constantly starting at 4am"
"New York's response to a car alarm going off almost constantly starting at 4am [x-post from r/pics]"
"True nightmare @_@"
"Welp  I won't be sleeping any time this year."
"Robin Skrilliams"
"I'm I saying this right &quot;pot&quot;?"
"I wish this was real"
"I wish this was real. X-post from r/funny"
"My girl  so curious about the big world."
"High Fives"
"Free high fives"
"I'll settle for a fist bump"
"Let's put him right here."
"My reaction when my friend links an onion article and somebody comments with &quot;Is this real?&quot;"
"When someone complains about Reddit on Reddit [FIXED]"
"When someone immediately reposts a shit post with a new title"
"Seeing Abraham Lincoln Vampire Hunter  after having read the book"
"Listening to my co-workers discuss the evidence that proves the existence of god."
"Checking out 9gag for the first time"
"Everytime I See a Brand New Redditor Trying to Get Karma off a Recent Repost"
"How I feel when I see people with karma in the thousands and I still can't get past 10 after being on reddit for over 11 months."
"MFW my brother comments on my facebook and tries way too hard to be funny AND smart"
"*pop*"
"Organic?"
"Anti Rape"
"Nice puppy... OH SHIT"
"Let sleeping dogs lie"
"How I feel when something expensive unexpectedly goes wrong..."
"Surprise!"
"Let me just take a peek at your asshole."
"The real reason to let sleeping dogs lie."
"A little surprise."
"The world's most terrible things  all compiled into one domination based sex movie."
"Reddits nightmare [fixed]"
"50 shades of I can't wait to see this!!!"
"Best movie ever"
"Fifty Shades of Grey movie poster"
"Faster than the speed of plastic bag."
"Oooh what is thi- NO! NONONONO!"
"Find the mistake."
"Imagine the lawsuits..."
"Sad thing is people will buy it"
"I found Jesus too!"
"Googled &quot;Soldier in Mexican border control&quot;"
"Historically accurate."
"Been my desktop background for about a year  always keeps things in perspective [FIXED]"
"This one always cracks me up."
"Slow motion lightening. [gif]"
"Slow-motion lightening"
"Slow motion lightning"
"How in the hell?"
"Can't decide if awesome  or gross... I kinda love it."
"And this little piggy...."
"And this little piggy..."
"Meanwhile  in Colorado..."
"Wait. What?"
"it's tougher to be a fireman than i thought."
"How I Feel About The End Of Winter"
"Sup guys!"
"He doesn't even go here..."
"On-campus rioting; Senior vs. Freshmen."
"Don't leave the conehead hangin! Someone give him a high-5"
"So is that a piccolo??"
"They told me I could be anything so I became a dwarf"
"They told me I could be anything so I became a dwarf"
"Who needs a title when you got this guy!"
"I find this relevant to the Mars landing"
"I was searching for pictures of parsnips when..."
"What are you looking at?"
"Just walking the fish"
"Sesame Streets reaction to Mitt Romney's claim to cut funding to PBS."
"Tea-Rex"
"All too familiar..."
"How I felt at the first middle school dance"
"My puppy likes to lay around and watch me while I practise yoga. She makes it kinda hard to concentrate sometimes."
"My puppy likes to lay around and watch me while I practise yoga. She makes it kinda hard to concentrate sometimes. - Imgur"
"My puppy likes to lay around and watch me while I practise yoga. She makes it kinda hard to concentrate sometimes."
"good comeback..."
"Harry gets the last word."
"A different grumpy cat. Almost as cute."
"Creepy dad"
"My GF showed up pretty drunk last night. I showed her this &amp; she puked in my living room. hurts my head sober.... lol"
"Failing like a boss"
"Thumbs up while crashing a bike (x-post from /r/perfecttiming)"
"(Y)(Y)"
"Accurately labeled hotel toiletries"
"Accurately labeled hotel toiletries [FIXED]"
"Well they are white."
"Well they are white."
"When I forget lunch and then hear there's leftover food from a lunch meeting"
"Cant. Stop. Staring."
"Crazy Eye [gif]"
"SHIT SHIT SHIT SHIT SHIT SHIT"
"This really should be a breed"
"Pika-kitty"
"Gotta catch'em all!"
"Kittychu!!!"
"Scorpion Cat"
"People need to stop caring about getting downvoted to oblivion. This is how I always feel when I get downvoted."
"This is how I feel after losing a 35+ hours Skyrim profile."
"Woke up to see the new 'BOOBS' meme all over reddit"
"When my most upvoted comment is a FTFY"
"Does anyone else feel this way about the most awesome 30 seconds of fireworks you've ever seen?"
"How i feel about this whole Chik-fil-a mess."
"After dying for the 50th time on dayz"
"When I die in call of duty after getting my highest killstreak."
"This shirt has it down."
"Eskimos!"
"Dr. Heiters mammalia/reptilian-centipede"
"Nice Park"
"I guess humans aren't the only animals you can make centipedes from"
"Let your children develop their own opinions"
"Let your children develop their own damn opinions"
"What the fuck did I just read."
"MURICA!!!"
"Smallest dick ever"
"That is one tiny penis. (SFW)"
"Not sure if want."
"Just take it easy  buddy!"
"Cat in a hat"
"First cat post  this gentlemen kitty is well worth it."
"I just had to do a factory reset on my phone because I wasn't receiving texts. I lost everything. Luckily  I saved this so I can re-download it."
"The best reaction to the Scary Maze prank game"
"scary posts on Reddit"
"You won't take me alive!"
"ICEBERG! ICEBERG!"
"so i Googled..."
"Somebody just liked this on Facebook. Faith in humanity lost."
"Well.. That escalated quickly.."
"well that escalated quickly (fb)"
"This is just getting out of hand.... Found on my facebook feed"
"Good night  sweet Prince (1957-2012) [Hung Wang]"
"My OCD is so excited! (in b4 OCPD trolls)"
"Googled &quot;Grossest Pic on the Internet&quot; Now I Know What Regret Feels Like.."
"Don't fuck with these military girls"
"Well that's a big plus..."
"Rodger Federer after this Aussie Open Match"
"What happens when you put a mentos in a beer"
"How America sees the World"
"Oh  kardashian."
"British English phrases and what they *really* mean - a handy guide for foreigners"
"What the British say  what the British mean  and what everyone else understands."
"I don't know man.."
"Who's a good boy!?"
"Pug thoughts"
"In the spirit of Labor Day cookouts"
"A sausage dog!"
"Hot dog for snack!...buuurrppp..."
"Don't eat me..."
"Hotdog"
"I found the secret the Teletubbies kept hidden in the basement."
"My people need me"
"How it feels browsing reddit these times"
"Whenever someone corrects me on the gender I call their pet"
"After I learned my friend's girlfriend discovered pinterest"
"&quot;Lol Grumpy Cat&quot;"
"Bill Enclosed......"
"No words can describe the amount of awesome this picture contains"
"The greatest picture ever taken? Yes  I believe so."
"And you thought the Freddy Mercury pose couldn't get any better. Pft. You were wrong."
"Penguins can be trolls too"
"Let me give you a hand"
"How I feel downvoting something to 0"
"My sibling and I once mom looks away..."
"SPLAT."
"Scumbag penguin..."
"how I feel being downvoted on reddit"
"Everytime I think I have a good idea at work."
"Eat it!"
"By Simon Rich"
"That clueless smug look just made me laugh even more."
"The irony"
"my  what magnificent skin you have. what's your secret?"
"mmm... this is what souls must feel like"
"choco-ginger"
"Fuck no..."
"Why did it have to be snakes!?"
"Splitscreen."
"This shit makes me laugh every time I see it."
"Everytime my friend sends me a spacedicks link"
"Scrolling through reddit without having seen The Dark Knight Rises"
"A spider slowly descended in front of my face while I was driving today."
"How I felt during my first Anal Sex experience."
"Overheard a girl in my class telling others that the Nickelback concert she went to &quot;was awesome&quot;"
"Play it cool  baby. Play it cool."
"Reddit's reaction after Obama's AMA"
"Hope for This Generation RESTORED!"
"So this popped up on Facebook Though you might like it."
"Not hung like a horse though"
"This pic just screamed SJP"
"Took a picture with Sarah Jessica Parker on the set of the new SatC film set... she made me laugh so hard I cried"
"Sarah Jessica Parker and her best friend circa 1998."
"So this popped up on Facebook Though you might like it (fixed)"
"Stereotypes are bad"
"There's only one way to find out..."
"Stereotypes for all species!!"
"Deer crash..."
"So a deer crashed in a person's home this week in my town..."
"Deer crashes into home in my town. The deer was tranquilized  removed from the house and released after being trapped in the bedroom for about 45 minutes."
"Animal services snapped this picture when a deer broke into someone's home in my hometown."
"I shall call him Derp!"
"dErP"
"My little derp after his bath"
"for fuck's sake can someone please explain?"
"I heard we're doing roots"
"wtf  douchebag"
"Awwww yeaaaah. Paul Randy."
"Paul Ryan Working Out"
"Shhhhhhh...don't speak."
"Paul Ryan weightlifting in a backwards cap"
"Paul Ryan's boner."
"Vice-Bro Nominee"
"Perhaps not the most flattering picture of Paul Ryan..."
"Internet Gold. I can't stop laughing."
"Last night at midnight"
"You can ring his bell"
"seems right"
"Oh  Batman..."
"Son of a... (retweeted by Glen Mazzara)"
"Movie Night"
"This is my first cat post to Reddit. Am I doing it right?"
"Googled &quot;Reddit worthy pictures&quot; this was the first thing to pop up."
"Nest bed"
"Sitting at the computer knowing that your girlfriend is coming over soon"
"How I feel with my girlfriend around her parents"
"Scottish stool"
"I don't know if this is brilliant or disturbing."
"the kilt wearers chair."
"Go back"
"What the hell is this guy's coat made out of?"
"Pastor saves with suit jacket"
"Ladies and Gentlemen of r/Atheism  i give you: Religion!"
"The phantom minister"
"Using the fan in Super Smash Bros"
"Oh boy."
"The first time my girlfriend touched my penis..."
"I can't handle how cute this is right now."
"Corgi Treadmill!"
"Workout buddies"
"Corgis Training"
"Corgis want in on the montage action"
"Two puppies  one treadmill"
"Back to school"
"What happens when I think I've posted something funny and different..."
"I'm a Sign"
"This whole subreddit."
"Aha!"
"New species of chameleon found on Madagascar is so tiny it fits on a...."
"Planking  Marine style."
"Only the lucky gamers get those jobs."
"What I imagine every young Redditor's parent is thinking"
"I've been pretty disappointed so far by the lack of 'The Far Side' cartoons on Reddit."
"How it feels to finally hit the front page"
"Dancing to Dubstep"
"IT'S FRIDAY"
"How I feel  dancing to DnB"
"Sheldon is even more epic"
"70% chance of what..."
"Im staying inside."
"How I feel when someone reposts my link."
"that is the question"
"Personally I think it should be the other way around."
"Tough decision"
"Whats that? Oh just John F Kennedy the Alien Hunter"
"THE FUTURE!"
"First Post: Mom Fixes the Printer"
"Random acts of Kindness"
"Jealousy"
"A Fruit Story"
"&quot;SEEDS.... SEEDS!!!!&quot;"
"I don't even."
"cosby meets hill"
"There should be more Bill Cosby gifs on Reddit."
"Fish Flops"
"I don't even.."
"After I quit scrambling for my cake day and finally give up the karma quest"
"Moms"
"Ready to eat after a long day"
"Getting home from a long day  ready to eat."
"Fooled me"
"Patriotic sanitary pads?? WTF did I just see?!!"
"Dolphin banana with dancing kid?"
"How I feel after I get an up vote"
"What I've learned in my short four months on Reddit... yeah f*ck you  too  guys."
"Phone Contacts"
"Two girls one taco. SFW"
"Sharing Tacos"
"What time is it?"
"Time For Tickles"
"Bill Fucking Murray"
"Bill Fucking Murray"
"Classy as fuck."
"Bill Fucking Murray"
"Bill Fucking Murray"
"How I feel after I post something and I get mean comments about how stupid my post it"
"Apparently  Obama Blows"
"Obama playing the trombone"
"Aliens..."
"Irish rugby player Brian O'Driscoll visits a young girl in the hospital with the Heineken cup."
"Leinster Rugby Team bring the cup to Temple St Childrens Hospital"
"I Didn't Choose The Thug Life... The Thug Life Chose Me"
"Nice try mom."
"The one repost i being waiting for this month."
"Chicago Police heard you liked horses..."
"So I heard you like horses..."
"Yo dawg  I heard you like police horses..."
"The cops in my city aren't all pigs [xpost from r/chicago]"
"Floating Island Boat TAKE MY MONEY!"
"ORSOS Island yacht (x-post /r/IfIWonTheLottery)"
"The Island Yacht (x-post /r/IfIWonTheLottery)"
"HIIIYAAA!"
"sorry if this is a repost but my god does it belong here"
"Death From Above!"
"Come at me  kitten!"
"Cat Fight!"
"Expectro Petronum"
"And good morning to you  Senator."
"Such an idiot...he put his small case on the bottom!"
"I don't understand this &quot;hoverhands&quot; that you speak of."
"A step up from hover hand (x-post from r/cringe)"
"Logging Moose is logging"
"Work level: Moose"
"Meanwhile in Canada"
"No to corporal punishment!"
"Yup  that seems to be working out just fine."
"Excellent parenting (or lazy parenting  can't tell)"
"Hey Reddit  Here's a totally badass picture of Mark Twain in Nikola Tesla's lab. Happy Friday."
"Mark Twain in Nikola Tesla's lab"
"Mark Twain in Nikola Tesla's lab in 1894"
"Mark Twain in Nikola Tesla's Lab"
"Me when I accidentally click on a link to r/politics"
"Someone points a rubber band at you  and you're like"
"So i got a text from my ex saying that she was pregnant...."
"When I wake up and realize I've overslept.."
"This was too much fun."
"If you search &quot;paper on pencil&quot; on Google images this is the fifth thing to come up..."
"Look into my eyes"
"Careful  I think he's serious..."
"Protect the virtue"
"Remember them ?!"
"Daughter of the year"
"One of the saddest pictures in existence..."
"Studying hard for a test and not knowing the first question"
"When on a date she casually mentions that she has a boyfriend"
"When the teacher says:&quot;You have a test tomorrow&quot;"
"How I feel trying to eat while browing r/WTF"
"Totally Busted"
"I'm laughing so hard. Who the hell actually does this?"
"11 dangerous teenage trends."
"...Paula Deen's face on Katy Perry's body should be even better! (I stopped laughing long enough to finish this.)"
"My buddy posted this on FB"
"One of MY favorite faceswaps"
"I'm sorry  but this is not the face I picture when I think 'world's richest woman.'"
"On facebook one day when I found out that this is now on somebody I know's body."
"Colonel Sanders Tattoo"
"What Stress does to You"
"I heard Reddit prefers when we post some [OC]"
"My boyfriend said this reminds him of me. I think it's accurate. [x-post from somewhere  not sure where he found it  probably /r/Funny]"
"Thats Me- lol"
"On Kitchen Floor. Nope!"
"Was cleaning my basement when about 8 or 9 of these guys showed up behind an old box. NOPE"
"&quot;Imagine a puddle waking up one morning and thinking...&quot; - Douglas Adams"
"oh... hey there"
"I see your Batman mask and raise you a Spiderman"
"I found the real Spiderman on my FB wall."
"American Indians were doing just fine without a state before the statists ruined everything. (x-post)"
"Indian Wisdom"
"Where White Man Went Wrong"
"Where White Man Went Wrong..."
"Photobomb: Level giraffe"
"Stupid techy Flanders"
"Tumblr in one picture"
"I just realized my cakeday was yesterday"
"was seeing if the old website for the movie Titan A.E was still up and got redirected to this"
"Well  shit"
"Democratic Peoples Republic Of Korea"
"Well  that's enough internet for today."
"If you can't go over............omnomnom"
"How i feel when eating something i dont like."
"90's Bad ass"
"Limbo meets Portal"
"Watch where you're goin'"
"Socially Awkward?"
"Because I don't know anyone who doesn't like penguins."
"Im Sooooooorry!"
"Goodbye  friend."
"Off to New Zealand"
"Oh Obi  that's not nice to do."
"Welcome to Organic Chemistry..."
"Gymnast slipping"
"She's not coming back"
"Ok  bro... Bro  ok.... Bro... Really  bro  it's ok...."
"Pretty sound logic."
"This is what it's like [FB] [FIXED] [FIXED] [FIXED] [FIXED] [FIXED] [FIXED]"
"L.E.D Zeppelin"
"L.e.d. Zeppelin"
"Beep Boop Beep Bop BEEEEPPP BOPPP!!!"
"R2D2"
"Yes... delightful"
"Awesome cigarette case."
"And he is smoking a Camel"
"Not sure if I want to smoke it..."
"That about sums it up."
"One Nation...Under God..."
"Poker face."
"[10] guy plays poker"
"UPS delivery procedure. (source?)"
"That escalated quickly..."
"boy that escalated quickly"
"too far"
"Noticed this while scrolling through my Facebook news feed. Certainly escalated quickly."
"What is wrong with some people"
"I found this on Facebook. Wow."
"I found this picture on Facebook..."
"Facebook.. You've taken it to far. (saw on FB)"
"Today is my Birthday. Here is more Facebook stupidity."
"Facebook  are you serious?"
"This is the first one I've seen that is pretty distasteful"
"The more you come into contact  the worse it gets...."
"Probably a repost  but this is definitely WTF worthy."
"Moar please."
"[NSFW: Nude/Gore] Well  I suppose that's one way to go camping."
"Hunter S. Thompson did not fuck around."
"A day in the life of Hunter S. Thompson"
"IT WAS YOU!"
"'Merica Fuck Yeah"
"Best YouTube comment I have seen yet..."
"Crocodiles and Butterflies (X-post from r/animalporn)"
"Crocodile and Butterflies"
"Wehre aur u fruhm?"
"When code works after the first compile"
"Thats how I feel when someone upvotes my comment or post"
"How i feel when my ex goes insane after a breakup and i come out fine"
"Checking my account on pay day and there's way more than I thought."
"HIFW I get my first upvote"
"It may not seem like much  but after years of searching  I realized I am a deist!"
"Yeah  this would have been my advice too."
"That should help with the spots."
"Dog's Diner II"
"Some Men "
"You monster!"
"Next time someone asks you your size"
"waiting for a girl I like to text me back..."
"As bad as the damn ASPCA commercials... Scumbag Futurama"
"Wife wanted to watch an episode of Futurama. She is a monster!"
"Damn You  Oprah!"
"Post your #1 favourite gif of all time. DOOO ITTTT!"
"For my cakeday. You get my favorite gif  and YOU get my favorite gif! You ALL get my favorite gif!"
"First day exploring the new house and yard. It's going to be a long summer."
"/r/WTF today."
"After browsing reddit today  I can't help but think this is what my attic looks like."
"Still my favorite GIF of all time."
"I always think of Zim when I see this gif."
"How every redditor seems to be reacting to Grumpy Cat right now"
"can't look away...just keeps getting funnier"
"No fucks were given that day"
"Found this in the comments of another link  still can't stop laughing"
"Cool Story Bro"
"Cool Story Brah"
"When someone try's to tell me about how awesome their weekend is going to be..."
"GF just sent me this  figured reddit would enjoy."
"The day it was legalized"
"Young Neil deGrasse Tyson is S.M.A.R.T."
"A young Neil deGrasse Tyson (x-post from /r/OldSchoolCool)"
"TIL Neil DeGrasse Tyson could probably kick my ass!"
"Happy 54th birthday to this badass."
"Neil deGrasse Tyson as a younger man."
"Billy Mays here with the Forever Alone pillow."
"Forever alone"
"Beep! Derivery!"
"Frank you! Come again  preese!"
"One Ron Ton soop please"
"Found this GEM on the 4chan."
"Beep Beep!"
"SPECIAR DERIVERY!"
"Really wish more people would play this..."
"Classic &quot;That 70s Show&quot;"
"Parade Rage"
"This is what debating a Ryan-Republican always winds up looking like."
"The vice presidential debate in one photo"
"A priceless photo from the current vice-presidential debate."
"Reuters with an amazing Biden picture"
"Biden vs. Ryan"
"In order to find his equal  an Irishman is forced to talk to god!"
"I CAN'T DEAL WITH ALL THIS MALARKEY!"
"What a sweet trip"
"Yo  I heard you like rap so we pimped your ride"
"Pimp my ride  Mexico"
"Meanwhile in Mexico... [x-post from r/mexico]"
"Gotta have tunes"
"pimp my ride"
"I see your sound tank and raise you a sound donkey"
"Go on! Be free!"
"Go! Take to the skies! Be free!"
"Fly away now"
"Found this while looking for gifs."
"This is just beautiful"
"Meanwhile  in Russia..."
"Don't Text and Drive!!!!! - Imgur"
"Port Isaac and the neighbouring coast of North Cornwall captured from a Cessna light aircraft at 2000 feet"
"Port Isaac England"
"Port Isaac England [960 × 640]"
"how my white friends look at my family parties"
"How I imagine what it's like to be a Jehovah's Witness."
"Just one of the things you come across on the internet..."
"Silly Zippy"
"Classic Zippy."
"I met a butterfly the other day"
"I met a butterfly the other day"
"The face of God"
"Sums up God's existence.."
"What are friends for"
"Microscopic crack in steel as photographed by an electron microscope"
"The Good  The Bag  and The Unlucky"
"The Good  The Bad and The Unlucky"
"I cannot stop staring!"
"Reddit version of Paranormal Activity"
"i'm not sure i understand..."
"This made me giggle a little"
"Anatomically correct male"
"Use your brain (NSFW)"
"Use your brain (NSFW)"
"Use your brain"
"Classic..."
"`merica"
"My biggest fear when asked to hold a new born"
"Grumpy Cats take on &quot;My biggest fear when asked to hold a new born&quot; [FIXED]"
"Shortest attention span ever"
"Am I the only one who think these twos bromance is better than Turk and JD?"
"some of the great bromances of our time"
"Fun with Statues!"
"When statues attack"
"Genius statue photograph poses"
"When I'm told I need to stay late on a Friday.."
"Looking through my gif folder. Oh man  the girls reaction gets me everytime."
"Never fails to make me laugh:"
"Yea you better walk away!"
"Nothing...just sitting here"
"Yeah keep walking!!"
"Nuke out to sea. The colors are simply radiating."
"This is why I stuck with reddit for a year now"
"How I've been feeling for the past 4 hours trying to finish a power point for a presentation tomorrow."
"Morphing"
"Morphing with Muse"
"How my cats stand every day to watch the birds."
"And so it begins... [x-post from /r/pics]"
"When I realized I missed the Obama AMA"
"Jesse for Breaking Bad on The Price is Right"
"If you think about it  this was totally like GTA for kids"
"Milk whore"
"Damn..."
"We need to talk..."
"As if Stewie Griffin wasn't FABULOUS enough already."
"When you die  do you become closer to god?"
"dammit  checkmate indeed"
"gutter mouth"
"Cool graffiti art."
"reddit in a nutshell"
"I'm getting pretty excited...."
"New Dark Knight Rises Poster. Best yet!"
"Ladies and Gentlemen  only one more day!!!"
"Happy Birthday  Les Stroud"
"Happy birthday  Les Stroud. (x from r/pics)"
"Lawyer"
"Look at this bad use of a meme i found on facebook/my school"
"Well that explains iOS6 maps... (Fixed)"
"Play dead"
"Play dead."
"Working on Friday  only thing on my mind"
"Shit is about to get crazy in the technology world."
"So I guess the RNC seems to be going well..."
"This is what I see everytime I see drunk girls uploading pics to Facebook."
"Peekaboo."
"down boy down ..."
"Me after leaving my calculus finals today"
"How those with ties to Penn State are reacting today"
"Just realized I only have 1h30m left on my cakeday and I haven't posted anything"
"This thug sure knows how to Photoshop!"
"This thug sure knows how to photoshop!"
"Why does this keep on happening!?!?!?"
"A collection of infomercial gifs. Oh God my sides..."
"Infomercial GIFS aka Comic Gold"
"Nancy Reagan and Mr. T"
"I pity the fool who would try to do what First Lady Nancy Reagan is doing right here."
"Mr. T portrays Santa Claus at the White House with First Lady Nancy Reagan in 1983."
"Pooping"
"An incredibly lucky shot of a bird shaking water off"
"Bird shaking water off [X-post from r/pics]"
"Drunk limbo fail"
"Stop asking questions and help me find my goddamn pants."
"Whoops."
"No  Grandma"
"Pole dancing skills - 6913370ver9000"
"Impressive"
"Hitler ain't happy  he's feelin bad"
"Welcome to Texas  ladies and gentlemen  where anything is possible."
"photobomb level: freud"
"photobomb level: freud"
"Cheesy and unrelated."
"It works so well!"
"Miguel doesn't think you trust in his self-righteous suicide"
"Can the Pick of Destiny be found in El Dorado?"
"Just a classic for everyone!"
"How the lute is meant to be played"
"My reaction after receiving a job offer earlier today."
"To battle we ride!"
"RIP Michael Clarke Duncan"
"This is a real thing that exists."
"I'm Sorry"
"Bible Banging Homophobes at PRIDE Parade"
"Chicago Christians showed up at a gay pride parade to apologize for homophobia in the Church"
"I need to find them"
"Not a Bad Way to Start"
"Some gold on my facebook today"
"my response when someone calls me gay"
"How I feel whenever I think I post an amazing story and the first comment is one criticizing me..."
"Every time I see a Skyrim post on here..."
"When i was told that my boyfriend was being mean to his ex (that I hate)"
"When I'm Called A Nerd..."
"Not sure if re-post  but she nailed it."
"Wrong place at the wrong time? Guess it's all about perspective."
"Yoda with human skin color"
"Spongebob Square pants is celebrating his 25th birthday today"
"Spongebob is 25."
"Happy Birthday you marvelous bastard."
"Fuck bitches..."
"Classic"
"Happy as a clam!"
"Clams have feelings too"
"just found a bitch from my grade school had a baby. I still remain childless. Huzzah."
"Gangnam Style"
"GIF Sound Mashups"
"Gangnam Kitty"
"Catnam style"
"Tastes good man"
"Thirsty Kitty"
"Just gettin a drink"
"Hate it when this happens.."
"Never give up"
"That bitch got what she deserved"
"Amazing skateboarder."
"Overly Manly Man on Ron Swanson's wall."
"Nonononono...okay."
"Watch out Ron! Dementors!"
"Why would you wear this in public?"
"This One Always Makes My Day Better"
"If you ever feel bad about yourself just think at least you’re not a model for..."
"Don't do it  puny human!"
"Don't do it  puny human!"
"I WANT THIS NOW!!!"
"Those Eyes"
"Awkward seating arrangement"
"I'd like you introduce you to Jesus: The original one cup specialist"
"The way Michelangelo wanted to paint it..."
"He's got about a 100% chance of making that shot.."
"The Last Frat Party"
"The Last Frat Party"
"My precious...."
"I'm thinking about buying this  any thoughts?"
"A game that REALLY needs a sequel."
"Can't put this on Facebook  but it's perfect for Reddit!"
"Fresh from the concentrate camps."
"ADOLF HITLER"
"Dragon Falls  Venezuela"
"Looking down"
"Angel Falls from above"
"Angel falls"
"Dragon Falls [1680 x 1050]"
"Dragon Falls"
"nope"
"Little Mermaid"
"Happy Halloween"
"'Bagel Head' - a hip new trend in Japan"
"I see what you did there..."
"Dammit woman would you get off my back"
"AAAHHH!!!!!!!"
"Scream Pepper"
"Angriest Plant Around"
"This Pepper is Not Happy"
"Work for perspective"
"Another amazing sculpture by Jonty Hurwitz"
"Reddit I give you lightning volcano"
"Why isn't my camera working?"
"Water thrusting jetpack"
"Seems Legit"
"Because Fukushima isn't funny just yet."
"Those poor kids!"
"how do you make bongos that small anyway"
"found this randomly on google with the help of a friend... she doesn't think it belongs here"
"I shall play you the song of my people."
"Men have their priorities in line..."
"Overthinking"
"Her disaster explained"
"Her Diary vs. His Diary"
"Reality Sucks"
"After graduating from college"
"How I felt after waking up to see USA take the lead over China in Olympic medals"
"How I feel with 51 link karma."
"For my first cake day  my favorite gif seen on reddit so far"
"Cant handle it  CAN YOU!!!"
"(SFW) Coming from 4chan...thinking I can handle /r/spacedicks..."
"My brother telling me Canada is a state."
"Looks like i need a refill."
"We all make choices. Some are good  and some like this:"
"So in addition to a girlfriend I decided I don't want a job either"
"Choices."
"Choices"
"Choices"
"Endeavor launch (pic)"
"How I feel after 2 years of marriage"
"Not sure whether to laugh or cry"
"Best  Faceswap  Ever."
"I present  rock bottom"
"A nutritional meal on the bus ride home."
"How I feel everyone on r/trees looks and acts."
"TO ADVENTURE!"
"Onward my friends"
"Was watching the Reddiquette song and realized how awesome this gif is"
"Reddit  what are your favorite upvote/downvote gifs?"
"Googled &quot;What is Reddit?&quot;....... Was not disappointed."
"Libera me from Downvotes"
"Bacon is good for me! (and the Narwhals)"
"Super Snoo and Space Narwhal's adventure through Upvote Space"
"How i feel every time i submit a link on reddit"
"Just found this cool redit alien pic my friend made"
"What idiots do to reposts"
"Redditor fetish"
"Check out this amazing optical illusion"
"Look at the dot above.. [GIF]"
"This is why communal showers gross me out..."
"It's a major problem at Lasalle University."
"U were srs"
"u were srs"
"Parthenon and the full moon"
"Checkmate  Christians..."
"This is fucking genius."
"it's called &quot;product placement&quot;"
"Anybody? No?...Cool."
"Mr. Lonely"
"When falls come to Johannesburg"
"H.R. Giger Cake"
"Yeah I guess I'll pass on the cake this time..."
"This gif always makes my day."
"Enjoying your job."
"Whenever im trying to have fun in public with my girlfriend around(xpost from r/gifs)"
"There's no point in ever taking another roller coaster picture again  because this is the best."
"The Dark Knight"
"My post reached 2 upvotes after 5 hours but I got 1 comment saying &quot;First time I've genuinely laughed at a meme in a long time.&quot;"
"A lot of engineering freshmen follow this advice"
"Where's your god now?"
"Me when I try to dance while high."
"My initial reaction to Obama's AMA"
"When i learned Obama did an AMA"
"Campus today (x-post from r/gifsound)"
"Double aww"
"Breaking up."
"Forever alone...Together."
".. What?"
"This real doll convention looks like a blast!"
"When you see it..."
"I went on a date tonight  me on the right."
"Realizing it's your cake day!"
"Realizing it's your cake-day"
"Internet Search History"
"Yeah  I'd confess too."
"Cloud City  Dubai"
"GIF of the day  courtesy of Gangnam Style!"
"Can you hear me now? [WARNING: GANGNAM STYLE]"
"The only real use for little kittens"
"Whack-A-Kitty"
"Whenever i browse r/new."
"Whenever i browse /new."
"This is not an upvote"
"This.....is not and upvote"
"walter white downvotes (x-post r/breakingbad)"
"Whenever I see a post referring to 'facebook gold&quot; (x-post from r/breakingbad)"
"You asked for it"
"Walter White...Pokemon Master."
"When someone has a good post  but many spelling errors"
"When a conservative is spotted on reddit"
"Yes  I'm here for the Karma."
"Trolling Taylor"
"I love Bill Hader."
"What home computers looked like in 2004 -projected"
"I wanted waffles!"
"I WANTED WAFFLES?"
"I WANTED WAFFLES!"
"How I hope my gift giving is this christmas."
"But I wanted Waffles."
"Googled what the fuck. Was not disappointed."
"Really? Seriously?"
"Really? Seriously? Yes! (1 hour earlier)"
"Haters gonna..."
"They see me rollin'  they hatin'"
"Romney level: Snookie"
"Ok  honey..."
"Stay in the damn box!"
"When the morning coffee finally hits at work"
"..oh fuck!"
"Oh.Shit."
"Iron Batman"
"I hate turtles!"
"Damn turtle  you scary."
"Staying Alive!"
"GIF Sound Mashups"
"DAMN NATURE you scary!"
"Oh my god!"
"Worlds cutest Turtle and Mouse!!"
"Which hole is best...."
"So my girlfriend told me she requires one of these... anyone know where I can acquire one?"
"Hey Reddit!"
"Is this what you want?"
"Fuck it  CATS!"
"Remember Reddit  Valentine's Day is coming soon"
"Finn and Jake I found"
"A pic I found a long time ago  one show that won't be the same."
"The things they sell in Tesco these days..."
"Welsh lady ass fudge"
"British Redditors: What the hell kind of candy are you selling?"
"Jesus drove a Honda"
"What Would Jesus Drive"
"Haters be hating."
"a real ball buster"
"Here's a fun game; Guess the country!"
"My sister tries to play it cool when her crush looks over but I may be the reason he never speaks to her"
"So i heard it's international clown week."
"shit just got real"
"I don't know about you guys..."
"Table Trick? Nailed it."
"Karma whoring done correctly?"
"The mouse taking the photo is a little worried right now."
"Ouch."
"Fuck gravit... ahh wtf!"
"Broken back gymnast"
"What i showed my kids when they asked for a trampoline (possible nsfl)"
"Great picture from a deer cam"
"I  for one  openly welcome our rubber ducky overlords."
"Big Duck - once a year visitor to Brisbane"
"Hater's gonna Hate [Fixed]"
"Video gaming in 1994 vs 2010"
"Video gaming in 1994 vs 2010"
"Cause &amp; Effect [gif]"
"Fuck the police"
"What an asshole"
"Why is the donkey in the well...AGAIN???"
"what an asshole.."
"Worth a shot..."
"Forever alone"
"I think I'm doing something wrong"
"Red Bull Free Fall - Behind the Scenes"
"This is fucking genius."
"When I accidentally upvote a post I meant to downvote..."
"Whenver I open anything on Reddit that takes more than 5 seconds to digest"
"When I decide to cook dinner and the recipe tells me to use low heat"
"When a frozen food suggests conventional oven cooking over microwaving (X-post from r/gifs)"
"when I saw the wait times for the new Mann vs. Machine TF2 Update"
"Working 50 hours a week when each online class says it will require 10+ hours a week"
"HIFW My friend suggest we do an Arnold Schwarzenegger workout routine."
"MFW I'm hungry and I read the directions on the food I want"
"Windows needs an update."
"Every time a bottle of conditioner says &quot;Apply to hair and leave on for 3-5 minutes&quot;"
"Whenever there's a gif longer than a few seconds."
"whenever an /r/funny link requires a lot of reading"
"How I feel anytime there's a &quot;When you see it&quot; post [FIXED]"
"Loading gifs on my smartphone"
"When I learned what NaNoWriMo was"
"Looking for flash games  seeing flash MMO's"
"What i think when Girls can have more than one orgasm during sex  but guys have to train themselves to do so. . ."
"My parents insist I should get a job while taking 16 credit hours in college  this is what I send them every time as a reply."
"It's my cake day and I'm feeling all flustered."
"Listening to foreign music..."
"He's pretty excited [FIXED]"
"RedBull gives you Wings. Above and Below you"
"How I feel when I have a great idea and find it posted already"
"Trying to get to the front page on your cake day"
"LOL"
"Douches... they start so young"
"Blowing out a candle... like a ninja!"
"The Models for American Gothic."
"I can't even comprehend how it'd even be possible to give birth to a child in this condition."
"So true"
"Haters Gonna Hate"
"Potatoes Gonna Potate"
"Drop it."
"My Reaction to Overly Attached Girlfriend"
"When it's your birthday and you get greetings from facebook."
"how my hard drive feels after i download the valve complete pack"
"Finally watched Toy Story 3  with a date"
"When you have to go"
"Nasty."
"Katy Perry WIN."
"Daria costume."
"Katy Perry as Jane Lane from Daria."
"&quot;Who likes short shorts?&quot; or &quot;Gawd  you just don't get me son! Leave me alone!&quot;"
"Emo Rob and his Ford Fiesta."
"Suddenly  bye."
"to this day  my favorite .gif"
"Mess with one of them  you mess with all of them"
"We'll teach you a lesson! [GIF]"
"don't fuck with me bitch"
"Real friends back you up... No matter what... ?"
"Punk-ass pole!"
"A man walks into a bar..."
"Fuck this post"
"Look what they have done to me"
"judo at its finest!"
"Graceful Reversal"
"How I end all my arguments"
"I hear the view is great"
"None for you  ass."
"omnomnomnom"
"omnomnomnom"
"Om nom nom nom"
